Indiana, session 2026, HB1003.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 2-5-1.3-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 270, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 13. (a) A study committee shall
study the issues assigned by the legislative council that are within the
subject matter for the study committee, as described in section 4 of this
chapter.
(b) In addition to the issues assigned under subsection (a), the
interim study committee on roads and transportation shall advise the
bureau of motor vehicles regarding the suitability of a special group (as
defined in IC 9-13-2-170) to receive a special group recognition license
plate for the special group (as defined in IC 9-13-2-170) for the first
time under IC 9-18.5-12-4 and the suitability of a special group (as
defined in IC 9-13-2-170) to continue participating in the special group
recognition license plate program under IC 9-18.5-12-5.
(c) In addition to the issues assigned under subsection (a), the
interim study committee on corrections and criminal code shall review
current trends with respect to criminal behavior, sentencing,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


incarceration, and treatment and may:
(1) identify particular needs of the criminal justice system that can
be addressed by legislation; and
(2) prepare legislation to address the particular needs found by the
committee.
(d) In each even-numbered year, in addition to the issues assigned
under subsection (a), the interim study committee on courts and the
judiciary shall review, consider, and make recommendations
concerning all requests for new courts, new judicial officers, and
changes in jurisdiction of existing courts. A request under this
subsection must include at least the following information to receive
full consideration by the committee:
(1) The level of community support for the change, including
support from the local fiscal body.
(2) The results of a survey that shall be conducted by the county
requesting the change, sampling members of the bar, members of
the judiciary, and local officials to determine needs and concerns
of existing courts.
(3) Whether the county is already using a judge or magistrate
from an overserved area of the judicial district.
(4) The relative severity of need based on the most recent
weighted caseload measurement system report published by the
office of judicial administration.
(5) Whether the county is using any problem solving court as
described in IC 33-23-16-11, and, if so, the list of problem solving
courts established in the county, and any evaluation of the impact
of the problem solving courts on the overall judicial caseload.
(6) A description of the:
(A) county's population growth in the ten (10) years before the
date of the request; and
(B) projected population growth in the county for the ten (10)
years after the date of the request, to the extent available;
and any documentation to support the information provided under
this subdivision.
(7) A description of the county's use of pre-incarceration
diversion services and post-incarceration reentry services in an
effort to decrease recidivism.
(8) If the request is a request for a new court or new courts, an
acknowledgment from the county fiscal body (as defined in
IC 36-1-2-6) with the funding sources and estimated costs the
county intends to pay toward the county's part of the operating
costs associated with the new court or new courts.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


The office of judicial administration shall post the list of required
information provided under this subsection on its website.
(e) In each even-numbered year, in addition to the issues assigned
under subsection (a), the interim study committee on courts and the
judiciary shall review the most recent weighted caseload measurement
system report published by the office of judicial administration and do
the following:
(1) Identify each county in which the number of courts or judicial
officers exceeds the number used by the county in that report
year.
(2) Determine the number of previous report years in which the
number of courts or judicial officers in a county identified in
subdivision (1) exceeded the number used by the county in that
particular report year.
(3) Make a recommendation on whether the number of courts or
judicial officers in the county should be decreased.
The office of judicial administration shall post a list of the number of
courts or judicial officers used in each county for each report year, and
the number of years in which the number of courts or judicial officers
in the county has exceeded the number used by the county, on its
website.
(f) In addition to studying the issues assigned under subsection (a),
the interim study committee on child services shall:
(1) review the annual reports submitted by:
(A) each local child fatality review team under IC 16-49-3-7;
(B) the statewide child fatality review committee under
IC 16-49-4-11; and
(C) the department of child services under IC 31-25-2-24;
during the immediately preceding twelve (12) month period, and
may make recommendations regarding changes in policies or
statutes to improve child safety; and
(2) report to the legislative council before November 1 of each
interim, in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6, the results of:
(A) the committee's review under subdivision (1); and
(B) the committee's study of any issue assigned to the
committee under subsection (a).
(g) In each even-numbered year, in addition to the issues assigned
under subsection (a), the interim study committee on government shall
do the following:
(1) Determine whether a group has met in the immediately
preceding two (2) years.
(2) Review reports submitted to the committee in accordance with
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


IC 1-1-15.5-4.
(3) Identify all interstate compacts that have been fully
operational for at least two (2) years to which the state is a party.
(4) Consider whether to:
(A) remain a party to; or
(B) withdraw from;
each interstate compact.
(5) If the committee determines that the state should withdraw
from an interstate compact, identify the steps needed to withdraw.
(6) Report before November 1 to the legislative council, in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6 the committee's:
(A) recommendations for proposed legislation to repeal
groups:
(i) after determining that the groups have not met during
the immediately preceding two (2) years; and or
(ii) after reviewing a group's report under subdivision (2);
and
(B) findings and recommendations regarding the interstate
compacts.
As used in this subsection, "group" refers to an authority, a board, a
commission, a committee, a council, a delegate, a foundation, a panel,
or a task force that is established by statute, has at least one (1)
legislator assigned to it, and is not staffed by the legislative services
agency.
(h) In each odd-numbered year, in addition to the issues
assigned under subsection (a), the interim study committee on
government shall:
(1) identify each group that has been operational for at least
two (2) state fiscal years;
(2) review the statutory duties and recent activities of each
group identified under subdivision (1);
(3) for each group identified under subdivision (1), determine
whether the group should be:
(A) retained because the group has ongoing statutory
duties and it remains the most appropriate group to fulfill
those duties;
(B) repealed because the group has fulfilled its statutory
duties;
(C) repealed because the group's statutory duties could be
more efficiently fulfilled after transferring them to another
group or state agency; or
(D) repealed because the group's statutory duties are
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


redundant because the duties also belong to another group
or state agency; and
(4) report before November 1 to the legislative council, in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6, the committee's findings
and recommendations regarding the groups evaluated under
this subsection.
As used in this subsection, "group" refers to an authority, a board,
a commission, a committee, a council, a delegate, a foundation, a
panel, or a task force that is established by statute and not staffed
by the legislative services agency.
(h) (i) In 2026 and 2027, in addition to the issues assigned under
subsections (a) and (f), the interim study committee on child services
shall review the report submitted by the child welfare task force under
IC 2-5-55.7-8. This subsection expires December 31, 2027.
SECTION 2. IC 2-5-36-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.221-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. The commission shall do the following:
(1) Study and evaluate the following:
(A) Access to services for vulnerable youth.
(B) Availability of services for vulnerable youth.
(C) Duplication of services for vulnerable youth.
(D) Funding of services available for vulnerable youth.
(E) Barriers to service for vulnerable youth.
(F) Communication and cooperation by agencies concerning
vulnerable youth.
(G) Implementation of programs or laws concerning
vulnerable youth.
(H) The consolidation of existing entities that serve vulnerable
youth.
(I) Data from state agencies relevant to evaluating progress,
targeting efforts, and demonstrating outcomes.
(J) Crimes of sexual violence against children.
(K) The impact of social networking websites, cellular
telephones and wireless communications devices, digital
media, and new technology on crimes against children.
(2) Review and make recommendations concerning pending
legislation.
(3) Promote information sharing concerning vulnerable youth
across the state.
(4) Promote best practices, policies, and programs.
(5) Cooperate with:
(A) other child focused commissions;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(B) the judicial branch of government;
(C) the executive branch of government;
(D) stakeholders; and
(E) members of the community.
(6) Create and provide staff support to a statewide juvenile justice
oversight body to carry out the following duties described in
section 9.3 of this chapter:
(A) Develop a plan to collect and report statewide juvenile
justice data.
(B) Establish procedures and policies related to the use of:
(i) a validated risk screening tool and a validated risk and
needs assessment tool;
(ii) a detention tool to inform the use of secure detention;
(iii) a plan to determine how information from the tools
described in this clause is compiled and shared and with
whom the information will be shared; and
(iv) a plan to provide training to judicial officers on the
implementation of the tools described in this clause.
(C) Develop criteria for the use of diagnostic assessments as
described in IC 31-37-19-11.7.
(D) Develop a statewide plan to address the provision of
broader behavioral health services to children in the juvenile
justice system.
(E) Develop a plan for the provision of transitional services for
a child who is a ward of the department of correction as
described in IC 31-37-19-11.5.
(F) Develop a plan for grant programs described in section 9.3
of this chapter.
The initial appointments and designations to the statewide
juvenile justice oversight body described in this subdivision shall
be made not later than May 31, 2022. The chief justice of the
supreme court shall designate the chair of the statewide juvenile
justice oversight body and shall make the initial appointments and
designations to the statewide juvenile justice oversight body,
which may incorporate members of an existing committee or
subcommittee formed under the commission. The initial meeting
of the oversight body shall be held not later than July 1, 2022.
(7) Create and provide staff support to a statewide youth, family,
and caregiver engagement initiative to carry out the following
duties:
(A) Provide staff support and funding for commission
activities provided by a:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(i) youth member of the commission appointed under
section 4 of this chapter; or
(ii) youth, family, or caregiver member of a commission
committee, task force, or subcommittee who has been
appointed as a community member.
(B) Develop a statewide plan to support, encourage, and
expand the engagement of youth, families, and caregivers in
state policymaking impacting youth and children.
(C) Provide and support educational:
(i) opportunities;
(ii) convenings; and
(iii) experiences;
that facilitate increased youth, family, and caregiver
participation.
(D) Support the efforts of other state agencies and community
organizations that seek to support, encourage, and expand the
engagement of youth, families, and caregivers in policy
decisions impacting youth and children.
(E) Solicit direct feedback from youth, families, and caregivers
to inform commission recommendations concerning:
(i) points of complexity and inefficiency in child serving
systems;
(ii) duplication of services and potential points of
consolidation; and
(iii) improving time to permanency and reducing the trauma
of systems involvement.
(8) Submit a report not later than September 1 of each year
regarding the commission's work during the previous year. The
report shall be submitted to the legislative council, the governor,
and the chief justice of Indiana. The report to the legislative
council must be in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(9) Perform the duties of the commission set forth in
IC 31-26-4.
SECTION 3. IC 2-5-53.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 53.5. Government Reform Task Force
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "agency" has the meaning set
forth in IC 4-22-2-3.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "council" refers to the legislative
council established by IC 2-5-1.1-1.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "rule" has the meaning set forth
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


in IC 4-22-2-3.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "task force" refers to the
government reform task force established by section 5 of this
chapter.
Sec. 5. The government reform task force is established.
Sec. 6. (a) Except as provided in subsections (b), (c), (d), and (e),
IC 2-5-1.2 applies to the task force.
(b) The task force consists of the following ten (10) members of
the general assembly:
(1) Three (3) members appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate.
(2) Two (2) members appointed by the minority leader of the
senate.
(3) Three (3) members appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives.
(4) Two (2) members appointed by the minority leader of the
house of representatives.
A member of the task force serves at the pleasure of the appointing
authority.
(c) The task force shall meet as called by the chair. All meetings
of the task force shall be open to the public in accordance with and
subject to IC 5-14-1.5. All records of the task force shall be subject
to the requirements of IC 5-14-3.
(d) A majority of the members of the task force constitutes a
quorum. The affirmative vote of at least a majority of the members
at a meeting at which a quorum is present is necessary for the task
force to take official action other than to meet and take testimony.
(e) The:
(1) chairman of the council shall designate the chair; and
(2) vice chairman of the council shall designate the vice chair;
of the task force from the members of the task force. The chair and
vice chair of the task force serve as chair and vice chair at the
pleasure of the appointing authority.
Sec. 7. The task force shall study:
(1) the feasibility of transferring the administration of the
office of the state chemist from Purdue University to the
Indiana state department of agriculture;
(2) any employment issue arising from a transfer of the
administration of the office of the state chemist; and
(3) any issue arising from a transfer of any property, records,
funds, or accounts of the office of state chemist to the Indiana
state department of agriculture.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


Sec. 8. The task force may request information or testimony
from department or agency heads, or the designee of a department
or agency head, as determined necessary by the task force.
Sec. 9. The task force shall:
(1) develop recommendations in a report concerning the
issues set forth in section 7 of this chapter; and
(2) submit the report to the council in an electronic format
under IC 5-14-6 not later than November 1, 2026.
Sec. 10. The legislative services agency shall provide support
staff to the task force.
Sec. 11. This chapter expires June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4. IC 4-3-21.5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.74-2020,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. The task force consists of the following
members:
(1) The lieutenant governor or the lieutenant governor's designee.
(2) The secretary of commerce or the secretary of commerce's
designee.
(3) One (1) member appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(4) One (1) member appointed by the president pro tempore
of the senate.
(3) (5) The following members chosen by the military assets in
their geographic areas:
(A) One (1) member representing the Southern Indiana
Defense Network.
(B) One (1) member representing Radius Indiana.
(C) One (1) member representing greater Fort Wayne, Indiana.
(D) One (1) member representing the Defense Finance and
Accounting Service, Lawrence, Indiana.
(E) One (1) member representing the Grissom Regional
Defense Alliance.
(F) One (1) member representing the West Central Indiana
Defense Network.
(G) One (1) member representing the Michigan City Coast
Guard Station.
SECTION 5. IC 4-3-21.5-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 9. A member of the task force who is a member of the
general assembly is a nonvoting member.
SECTION 6. IC 4-4-16-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.83-2005,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The Indiana main street council is
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


established. The council consists of:
(1) the secretary of agriculture and rural development or a person
designated by the secretary, who shall serve as chairman; and
(2) at least seven (7) but not more than ten (10) persons appointed
by the secretary, who represent organizations concerned with the
purposes of the program established by this chapter and who
represent all geographic regions of the state.
(b) Members appointed to the council by the secretary shall serve
for a term of three (3) years, beginning on July 1 after their
appointment. However, a member appointed to fill a vacancy on the
council shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(c) The council shall:
(1) develop and direct policy;
(2) coordinate administrative techniques; and
(3) provide assistance;
to carry out the purposes of the Indiana main street program.
(d) Each member of the council who is not a state employee is
entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b).
Each member is entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses and
other expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's
duties, as provided in the state travel policies and procedures
established by the department of administration and approved by the
state budget agency.
(e) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 7. IC 4-4-16-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.83-2005,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. (a) To carry out the purposes described in
section 1 of this chapter, the office of rural affairs acting for and on
behalf of the Indiana main street council and the Indiana main street
program, may:
(1) execute contractual agreements;
(2) receive money from any source;
(3) expend money for an activity appropriate to the purposes of
this chapter; and
(4) execute agreements and cooperate with:
(A) any other state or federal department or agency;
(B) Indiana political subdivisions; or
(C) any private person or corporation.
(b) The office of rural affairs shall:
(1) develop and direct policy;
(2) coordinate administrative techniques; and
(3) provide assistance;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


to carry out the purposes of the Indiana main street program.
SECTION 8. IC 4-13.6-1-11 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 11. "Professional
services" mean the services of:
(1) a person registered or certified under IC 25-4; IC 25-4-1 or
IC 25-4-2;
(2) a person licensed under IC 25-31; IC 25-4-3; or
(3) a person who performs services or studies that:
(A) relate to the design or the feasibility of a building,
structure, or improvement; and
(B) are recognized in the industry as professional in nature.
SECTION 9. IC 4-15-12-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.215-2016,
SECTION 88, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) There is created the affirmative action
advisory committee to assist in the effective implementation of the
affirmative action policy. The committee is composed of eight (8)
members. The governor shall appoint the members of the committee
with the advice of the affirmative action officer. The members serve at
the pleasure of the governor.
(b) A member of the committee is entitled to reimbursement for
traveling expenses and other expenses actually incurred in connection
with the member's duties, as provided in the state travel policies and
procedures established by the department of administration and
approved by the budget agency. A member who is not an officer or
employee of the state is entitled to the minimum salary per diem as
provided in IC 4-10-11-2.1(b) while performing the member's duties.
(c) The committee shall select from its membership a chairperson
and vice chairperson to serve for one (1) year from the date of
selection. They may be reelected at the pleasure of the committee. In
any instance where the chairperson or vice chairperson does not serve
the chairperson's or vice chairperson's full term, the committee shall
select another to serve in the chairperson's or vice chairperson's own
right a full term.
(d) The affirmative action advisory committee shall:
(1) provide liaison activities with the affirmative action officer
with respect to problems and suggestions concerning the
affirmative action policy;
(2) advise the affirmative action officer and the governor of
recommended changes in the implementation of the affirmative
action policy and improved guidelines for state agency programs;
and
(3) advise the governor and the affirmative action officer
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


concerning the effectiveness and status of the total
implementation of the affirmative action policy.
(e) The affirmative action advisory committee may review the
affirmative action programs of state agencies for effectiveness and
improvements.
(f) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 10. IC 4-22-2-0.3, AS ADDED BY P.L.220-2011,
SECTION 45, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.3. (a) The adoption of any rule by a state agency
without the approval of the fire prevention and building safety
commission established under IC 22-12-2-1 (before its repeal)
before July 1, 1987, is legalized and validated.
(b) The adoption of any rule by the fire prevention and building
safety commission before July 1, 2026, is legalized and validated
and considered a rule of the department of homeland security after
June 30, 2026.
SECTION 11. IC 4-22-2.6-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 56, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) To readopt a rule, an agency must conduct
a review of the rule to consider the continued need for the rule and
whether the rule, if readopted, will meet each of the standards in
IC 4-22-2-19.5 and (if applicable) the requirements for fees, fines, and
civil penalties in IC 4-22-2-19.6.
(b) In the review, the agency shall reexamine previous cost benefit,
economic impact, fiscal impact, and regulatory burden statements
prepared by the agency for the rule under IC 4-3-22-13, IC 4-22-2-22.7,
IC 4-22-2-22.8, IC 4-22-2-28, IC 4-22-2.1-5, or an executive order and
revise the statements to reflect any change in circumstances that affect
the analysis. The agency shall identify any alternative methods of
achieving the purpose of the rule that are less costly or less intrusive,
or that would otherwise minimize the economic impact of the proposed
rule on small businesses (as defined in IC 4-22-2.1-4) and other
regulated entities. The agency also shall consider the following:
(1) The nature of any complaints or comments received from the
public, including small businesses (as defined in IC 4-22-2.1-4),
concerning the rule or the rule's implementation by the agency.
(2) The complexity of the rule, including any difficulties
encountered by:
(A) the agency in administering the rule; or
(B) small businesses (as defined in IC 4-22-2.1-4) or other
regulated persons in complying with the rule.
(3) The degree to which technology, economic conditions, or
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


other factors have changed in the area affected by the rule since
the last time the rule was reviewed.
(c) In the review, the agency shall compare the requirements
within the rule to similar requirements in Illinois, Kentucky,
Michigan, Ohio, and any additional states designated by the office
of management and budget for comparison.
(c) (d) The agency shall prepare written findings concerning the
agency's determinations under this section. The written findings shall
include the following:
(1) A statement identifying whether the program or subject
matter covered by the rule is still carried out by the agency.
(2) The rationale for the agency's determination under
subsection (a) for the continued need for the rule.
(3) The rationale for the agency's determination under
subsection (a) that the rule, if readopted, will meet each of the
standards in IC 4-22-2-19.5 and (if applicable) the
requirements for fees, fines, and civil penalties in
IC 4-22-2-19.6.
(4) Either of the following:
(A) Any revisions to previously prepared cost benefit,
economic impact, fiscal impact, or regulatory burden
statements prepared by the agency for the rule under:
(i) IC 4-3-22-13;
(ii) IC 4-22-2-22.7;
(iii) IC 4-22-2-22.8;
(iv) IC 4-22-2-28; or
(v) IC 4-22-2.1-5;
if those previously prepared statements were published by
the Indiana Register.
(B) If the rule did not have a prior cost benefit, economic
impact, fiscal impact, or regulatory burden statement
prepared by the agency for the rule under:
(i) IC 4-3-22-13;
(ii) IC 4-22-2-22.7;
(iii) IC 4-22-2-22.8;
(iv) IC 4-22-2-28; or
(v) IC 4-22-2.1-5;
published in the Indiana Register, a copy of an updated
regulatory burden statement that meets the requirements
of IC 4-22-2-22.7.
(5) Any alternative methods of achieving the purpose of the
rule that are less costly or less intrusive, or that would
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


otherwise minimize the economic impact of the proposed rule
on small businesses (as defined in IC 4-22-2.1-4) and other
regulated entities.
(6) The nature of any complaints or comments received from
the public, including small businesses (as defined in
IC 4-22-2.1-4), concerning the rule or the rule's
implementation by the agency.
(7) Any difficulties encountered by:
(A) the agency in administering the rule; or
(B) small businesses (as defined in IC 4-22-2.1-4) or other
regulated persons in complying with the rule.
(8) The degree to which technology, economic conditions, or
other factors have changed in the area affected by the rule
since the last time the rule was adopted, readopted, or
amended.
(9) Whether the federal government or any of the states
covered by subsection (c) have less restrictive requirements
than the rule, and, if so, the evidence or unique circumstances
that justify why the more restrictive requirements in the rule
are necessary.
(10) The last time the substantive content of the rule was
amended.
(11) Whether the substantive content in the rule would be
more appropriately integrated into the Indiana Code as
opposed to remaining as a separate administrative rule. In
making such a determination, the agency shall consider the
frequency of updates to the rule since its initial promulgation.
If the substantive content of the rule has not been modified in
the prior eight (8) years, the agency must present specific
facts that justify keeping the substantive content in an
administrative rule rather than the Indiana Code.
(e) The written findings in subsection (d) must be submitted in
a form that can be easily loaded into commonly used business
analysis software and published in the Indiana Register using the
format jointly developed by the publisher, the office of
management and budget, and the budget agency. The office of
management and budget may provide more stringent requirements
for rules with fiscal impacts and costs above a threshold amount
determined by the office of management and budget.
SECTION 12. IC 4-22-2.6-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
MAY 15, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) If an agency elects to readopt a rule
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


under this chapter, the agency shall submit a copy of the written
findings under section 4 of this chapter to the office of management
and budget and the legislative council not later than the first
regular business day in July of the year preceding the year in
which the rule expires under this chapter.
(a) (b) If an agency elects to readopt a rule under this chapter, the
agency shall submit a notice of proposed readoption to the publisher
not later than the first regular business day in September of the year
preceding the year in which the rule expires under this chapter for
publication in the Indiana Register. A separate notice must be
published for each board or other person or entity with rulemaking
authority.
(b) (c) The notice must include the following:
(1) A general description of the subject matter of all rules
proposed to be readopted.
(2) A listing of rules that are proposed to be readopted, listed by
their titles and subtitles only.
(3) A written public comment period of thirty (30) days and
instructions on how to submit written comments to the agency.
(4) A request for comments on whether specific rules should be
reviewed through the regular rulemaking process under
IC 4-22-2-23 through IC 4-22-2-36 (as modified by IC 13-14-9,
when applicable).
(5) A summary of The agency's written findings under section 4
of this chapter.
(6) Any other information required by the publisher.
(c) (d) The agency shall submit the material in the form required by
IC 4-22-2-20. The agency need not resubmit the documents required by
IC 4-22-2-21 if the publisher received a copy of the documents when
the rule was previously adopted or amended. The publisher shall
review the material submitted under this section and determine the date
that the publisher intends to include the material in the Indiana
Register. After:
(1) establishing the intended publication date; and
(2) receiving the material as required by this section;
the publisher shall provide an electronic mail authorization to proceed
to the agency and publish the material on the intended publication date.
SECTION 13. IC 4-23-5.5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.34-2013,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. As used in this chapter:
(1) "board" refers to the Indiana recycling market development
board created by this chapter;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(1) "department" refers to the department of environmental
management established by IC 13-13-1-1;
(2) "division" refers to the division of pollution prevention
established by IC 13-27-2-1; and
(3) "office" refers to the Indiana office of energy development
established by IC 4-3-23-3.
SECTION 14. IC 4-23-5.5-2 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 2. (a) The Indiana recycling market development board
is created and constitutes a public instrumentality of the state. The
exercise by the board of the powers conferred by this chapter is an
essential governmental function.
(b) The board consists of nine (9) members, one (1) of whom shall
be the lieutenant governor or the lieutenant governor's designee and
eight (8) of whom shall be appointed by the governor for four (4) year
terms. The governor's appointees shall be chosen from among
representatives of:
(1) the waste management industry;
(2) the recycling industry;
(3) Indiana universities and colleges with expertise in recycling
research and development;
(4) industrial and commercial consumers of recycled feedstock;
(5) environmental groups; and
(6) private citizens with a special interest in recycling.
No more than four (4) appointed members shall be of the same political
party.
(c) A vacancy in the office of an appointed member, other than by
expiration, shall be filled in like manner as the original appointment for
the remainder of the term of that retiring member. Appointed members
may be removed by the governor for cause.
(d) The board shall have seven (7) ex officio advisory members as
follows:
(1) The governor.
(2) The director of the department of natural resources.
(3) The commissioner of the department of environmental
management.
(4) Two (2) members from the house of representatives of
opposite political parties appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives for two (2) year terms that expire June 30 of each
odd-numbered year.
(5) Two (2) members from the senate of opposite political parties
appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate for two (2)
year terms that expire June 30 of each odd-numbered year.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(e) The division shall serve as the staff of the board.
(f) An ex officio advisory member identified in subsection (d) may,
in writing, designate a representative to serve in an advisory capacity
when the ex officio member is unable to attend a board meeting.
(g) The terms of the members of the board appointed by the
governor under subsection (b) expire as follows:
(1) For four (4) of the members, as determined by the governor,
December 31, 2025, and every fourth year thereafter.
(2) For four (4) of the members, as determined by the governor,
December 31, 2027, and every fourth year thereafter.
SECTION 15. IC 4-23-5.5-2.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 2.5. (a) Each member of the board who is not a state
employee is entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by
IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member is also entitled to reimbursement for
mileage, traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4, and other
expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's duties as
provided in the state policies and procedures established by the Indiana
department of administration and approved by the budget agency.
(b) Each member of the board who is a state employee is entitled to
reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4
and other expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's
duties as provided in the state policies and procedures established by
the Indiana department of administration and approved by the budget
agency.
(c) Each member of the board who is a member of the general
assembly is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage, and travel
allowances paid to members of the general assembly serving on interim
study committees established by the legislative council. Per diem,
mileage, and travel allowances paid under this subsection shall be paid
from appropriations made to the legislative council or the legislative
services agency.
(d) Expenses paid under subsections (a) and (b) shall be paid from
appropriations made to the department of environmental management.
SECTION 16. IC 4-23-5.5-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 3. The governor shall appoint one (1) of the appointed
members as chairperson. Five (5) members of the board shall constitute
a quorum and the affirmative vote of a majority of the membership
shall be necessary for any action taken by the board. A vacancy in the
membership of the board does not impair the right of the quorum to act.
SECTION 17. IC 4-23-5.5-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 4. A representative appointed by the division, in
consultation with the lieutenant governor or the lieutenant governor's
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


designee, shall be the chief administrative officer for the board and
shall direct and supervise the administrative affairs and technical
activities of the board in accordance with rules, regulations, and
policies established by the board. The division may appoint the
employees as the board may require and the agents or consultants as
may be necessary for implementing this chapter. The division shall
prepare an annual administrative budget for review by the budget
agency and the budget committee.
SECTION 18. IC 4-23-5.5-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 5. A member of the board must disclose to the board any
interest in a project the board may be considering for action. The board
shall determine whether that member shall be allowed to participate in
activities related to that project.
SECTION 19. IC 4-23-5.5-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2024,
SECTION 41, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The board department shall do the
following:
(1) Adopt procedures for the regulation of its affairs and the
conduct of its business.
(2) Meet at the offices of the division on call of the chairperson at
least once each calendar quarter. The meetings shall be upon ten
(10) days written notification, shall be open to the public, and
shall have official minutes recorded for public scrutiny.
(3) (1) Report annually in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6 to
the legislative council concerning:
(A) the projects in which it has participated and is currently
participating with a complete list of expenditures for those
projects; and
(B) the information obtained through the recycling activity
reports submitted to the commissioner of the department of
environmental management under IC 13-20-25 concerning the
calendar year most recently ended.
(4) Annually prepare an administrative budget for review by the
budget agency and the budget committee.
(5) (2) Keep proper records of accounts of the department's
activities under this chapter and make an annual report of its
condition to the state board of accounts.
(6) (3) Receive petitions and make determinations under
IC 13-20.5-2-2.
(b) The board department shall consider projects involving the
creation of the following:
(1) Markets for products made from recycled materials.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(2) New products made from recycled materials.
(c) The board department may promote, fund, and encourage
programs facilitating the development and implementation of waste
reduction, reuse, and recycling in Indiana.
SECTION 20. IC 4-23-5.5-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.204-2007,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. The board, department, upon approval by the
governor and the budget agency, may make the following expenditures:
(1) Matching grants to federal, state, and local governmental
agencies for research and development of:
(A) recycling projects; and
(B) recycling market development projects;
in Indiana.
(2) Matching grants to individuals, corporations, limited liability
companies, partnerships, educational institutions, and other
private sector groups for recycling and recycling market research
and development.
(3) Direct grants, loans, or loan guarantees to those individuals
and organizations specified in subdivision (1) or (2) of this
section.
(4) Contractual services for recycling and recycling market
research and development programs.
(5) Other projects and expenses consistent with this chapter.
SECTION 21. IC 4-23-5.5-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. The board
department does not have the authority to exercise the power of
eminent domain in carrying out its powers and duties under this
chapter.
SECTION 22. IC 4-23-5.5-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.204-2007,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. The board department may:
(1) on behalf of the state, receive and accept grants, gifts, and
contributions from public agencies, including the federal
government, and from private agencies and private sources,
including the Indiana business modernization and technology
corporation, for the purpose of researching and developing
recycling within the state, and may administer such, money
received under this section, including contracting with other
public and private organizations, to carry out the purposes for
which such the grants, gifts, and contributions were made;
(2) establish application forms and procedures for programs
consistent with this chapter;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(3) accept applications from private and public sources for
funding of programs consistent with this chapter;
(4) provide funding for studies, research projects, and other
activities required to assess the nature and extent of recycling
markets in Indiana and the nature and extent of recycling
resources to meet the needs of the state;
(5) deposit funds not currently needed to meet the obligations of
the board with the treasurer of state to the credit of the fund, or
invest in obligations as provided by IC 5-13-10.5; and
(6) participate in or sponsor programs, conferences, or seminars
aimed at assisting the state in promoting recycling market
development.
SECTION 23. IC 4-23-5.5-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 101, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) The Indiana recycling
promotion and assistance fund is established. The purpose of the fund
is to promote and assist recycling throughout Indiana by focusing
economic development efforts on businesses and projects involving
recycling. The fund shall be administered by the board. department.
(b) Sources of money for the fund consist of the following:
(1) Appropriations from the general assembly.
(2) Repayment proceeds of loans made from the fund.
(3) Gifts and donations.
(4) Money from the solid waste management fund.
(5) Variable recycling fee revenue deposited under
IC 13-20.5-2-1.
(c) Money remaining in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year
does not revert to the state general fund.
(d) The board department may use money in the fund to make
loans to assist:
(1) persons in establishing new recycling businesses;
(2) in the expansion of existing recycling businesses; and
(3) manufacturers in retrofitting equipment necessary to reuse or
recycle secondary materials.
(e) The board department shall establish loan:
(1) amounts;
(2) terms; and
(3) interest rates.
(f) The board department may use money in the fund to make
grants for research and development projects involving recycling. The
board shall establish amounts for grants.
(g) A person, business, or manufacturer that wants a grant or loan
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


from the fund must file an application with the board. department.
(h) The board department shall establish criteria for awarding
grants and loans under this section.
(i) To implement the central Indiana waste diversion project as
described in IC 13-20-26, the board department shall award not more
than four million dollars ($4,000,000) in total to applicants chosen to
participate in the project based on:
(1) the recommendations of the department of environmental
management after conducting an evaluation of the proposals
submitted under IC 13-20-26-2; and
(2) the requirements set forth in subsection (j).
(j) In awarding the funds described in subsection (i), the board
department shall:
(1) consult with the department of environmental management
when reviewing the review proposals under IC 13-20-26-2;
(2) consider the:
(A) type; and
(B) amount of;
waste that is proposed to be diverted during the project under
IC 13-20-26;
(3) consider the potential for productive reuse of the waste that is
being diverted based on the information provided in the proposal
submitted under IC 13-20-26-2; and
(4) give priority to proposals with the largest amount of waste
diversion potential throughout the project under IC 13-20-26.
(k) The board department may transfer money in the fund to the
state solid waste management fund established by IC 13-20-22-2 for
use by the department of environmental management to make
payments under IC 13-20-17.7-6.
SECTION 24. IC 4-23-5.5-15 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) The Indiana
energy efficiency loan fund is established for the purpose of assisting
Indiana industries and governing bodies (as defined in
IC 36-1-12.5-1.5) in undertaking energy efficiency projects. The fund
shall be administered by the board. department.
(b) Sources of money for the fund consist of the following:
(1) Appropriations from the general assembly.
(2) Repayment proceeds, including interest, of loans made from
the fund.
(3) Donations, gifts, and money received from any other source,
including transfers from other funds or accounts.
(c) Money remaining in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


does not revert to the state general fund.
(d) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public funds may be invested. Interest that accrues
from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(e) The board department shall establish:
(1) amounts, terms, and interest rates for loans under this section;
and
(2) criteria for awarding loans under this section.
(f) A person, business, governing body, or manufacturer that wants
a loan from the fund must file an application in the manner prescribed
by the board. department.
SECTION 25. IC 4-23-6-7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 7. This chapter expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 26. IC 4-23-6.5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 30, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The board consists of seven (7) members.
The board must include the following:
(1) The commissioner of the Indiana department of health or the
commissioner's designee.
(2) The chairman of the commission on forensic sciences or the
chairman's designee.
(3) (2) The superintendent of the state police department or the
superintendent's designee.
(4) (3) Four (4) county coroners appointed by the governor, who
shall consider appointing coroners who are women or members
of minority groups.
(4) An attorney appointed by the governor.
(b) Not more than two (2) of the county coroner members of the
board may be from the same political party.
SECTION 27. IC 4-23-7-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.84-2012,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The management and control of the Indiana
library and historical department is hereby vested in a board which
shall be known as the Indiana library and historical board, and which
shall consist of five (5) members, who shall be appointed by the
governor.
(b) All members shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years. A
person may not be appointed as a member of the Indiana library and
historical board unless the person is a citizen of high standing and
probity and has a known and active interest in library or historical
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


work. The members of the board shall be appointed as follows:
(1) One (1) member of the library and historical board shall be
appointed on recommendation of the state board of education.
(2) One (1) member must be appointed on the recommendation of
the Indiana Library Federation.
(3) At least one (1) member shall be appointed on
recommendation of the Indiana historical society.
(4) At least one (1) member must be a public library trustee
appointed on the recommendation of the Indiana Library Trustee
Association.
(c) The members of the board shall serve without compensation, but
shall be entitled to receive their actual expenses necessarily incurred
in attending the meetings and transacting the business of the board, and
in participating in such other activities as may be in the interest of the
department.
(d) Any vacancy which may occur in the membership of the board
for any cause shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the
unexpired term.
(e) The board may prepare plans subject to the approval of the
governor and advise with the proper officials in the construction of
alterations and additions to the building and provide necessary
equipment and furnishings within the appropriations of funds for these
purposes.
(f) The board may receive and administer any state or federal aid
which may become available for the improvement and development of
library and historical services in Indiana.
SECTION 28. IC 4-23-7-2.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2018,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.1. (a) The Indiana library and historical board
shall elect one (1) of its members as president, another as secretary,
and such other officers as it determines, each of whom shall hold office
for a term of one (1) year.
(b) The board may designate the director of the state library as the
executive secretary of the board with duties as prescribed by the board.
SECTION 29. IC 4-23-7-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2018,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the
Indiana library and historical board shall formulate policies for the
care, management, and expansion of the Indiana library and historical
department so that the department is operated according to the most
approved standards of library and historical service.
SECTION 30. IC 4-23-7-5.2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.2. The Indiana library
and historical board may accept gifts, bequests, and devises of personal
and real property for the maintenance, use, or benefit of the Indiana
library and historical department under such terms and conditions and
with such obligations, liabilities, and burdens as in the judgment of the
board and the governor is in the best interest of the Indiana library and
historical department; however, no obligation, liability, or burden shall
be assumed that is in excess of appropriations made by law for the
payment of such obligations, liabilities, and burdens.
SECTION 31. IC 4-23-7-5.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2009,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.3. (a) The Indiana library and historical board
may, on the recommendation of the director of the state library, sell,
lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of library materials under:
(1) IC 5-22-21; or
(2) IC 5-22-22.
(b) The Indiana library and historical board may, on the
recommendation of the director of the state library and in accordance
with policies and procedures adopted by the board, sell, donate, or
exchange library materials to or with other public or nonprofit libraries
or historical societies.
(c) The Indiana library and historical board may, on the
recommendation of the director of the state library, adopt policies and
procedures for evaluating a proposal to:
(1) accept gifts of;
(2) sell;
(3) exchange; or
(4) otherwise dispose of;
library materials described in IC 4-23-7.1-3.
SECTION 32. IC 4-23-7-5.4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.4. (a) The library and
historical department fund is established as a dedicated fund to be
administered by the Indiana library and historical board. The monies
in the fund may be expended by the board exclusively for the
maintenance, use, or benefit of the Indiana library and historical
department.
(b) The proceeds from the sale of items as directed by law or by the
Indiana library and historical board, from gifts of money or the
proceeds from the sale of gifts donated to the fund, and from
investment earnings from any portion of the fund, shall be deposited in
the fund.
(c) All monies accruing in the fund are hereby appropriated
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


continuously for the purposes specified in this section.
(d) No portion of the fund shall revert to the general fund of the
state at the end of a fiscal year; however, if the fund is abolished, its
contents shall revert to the general fund of the state.
SECTION 33. IC 4-23-7.1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2018,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Agency" means any state administration, agency, authority,
board, bureau, commission, committee, council, department,
division, institution, office, service, or other similar body of state
government.
(2) "Board" means the Indiana library and historical board
established by IC 4-23-7-2.
(3) "Department" means the Indiana library and historical
department established by IC 4-23-7-1.
(4) "Director" means director of the Indiana state library.
(5) "Historical bureau" means the Indiana historical bureau
established by IC 4-23-7.2-2.
(6) "Public library" has the meaning set forth in IC 36-12-1-5.
(7) "State library" means the Indiana state library established by
IC 4-23-7-3.
(8) "Statewide library card program" refers to the program
established by section 5.1 of this chapter.
SECTION 34. IC 4-23-7.1-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. The state library
shall initiate or participate in plans or programs for historical or library
development in Indiana that are considered appropriate by the Indiana
library and historical board.
SECTION 35. IC 4-23-7.1-23 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. The enumeration
of the specific powers and duties in this chapter does not exclude the
state library from engaging in any other activity, not contrary to law,
that the Indiana library and historical board may consider appropriate
in the development of library service to state government, to the
libraries and library profession of Indiana, and to the citizens of the
state.
SECTION 36. IC 4-23-7.1-32, AS AMENDED BY P.L.84-2012,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 32. Any book or other library material, unless
restricted because of its value, physical condition, historical
importance, demand, requirement for research, or legal or contractual
restriction, belonging to or in custody of the state library may be
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


borrowed for use outside of the library by any resident of the state or
any library in accordance with policies adopted by the Indiana library
and historical board.
SECTION 37. IC 4-23-7.1-39.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.13-2013,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 39.1. (a) The state library advisory council is
established for the purpose of advising the board and the state librarian
concerning:
(1) general policies of the state library;
(2) plans or programs for library development and interlibrary
cooperation;
(3) library research;
(4) professional development for librarians;
(5) standards and rules for library services;
(6) administration and distribution of state and federal funds; and
(7) other matters as requested by the board and the state librarian.
(b) The advisory council consists of not more than fifteen (15)
members.
(c) The board shall appoint the members of the advisory council,
with nominations for appointment from library organizations and the
state librarian.
(d) Members of the advisory council shall serve two (2) year terms.
However, the board shall stagger the terms of the initial appointees.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection (d), if a member misses a majority
of the advisory council's meetings in a calendar year, the board may
remove the member and appoint a new member to serve the remainder
of the term of the member removed under this subsection.
(f) A member of the advisory council is not entitled to
compensation, per diem, or reimbursement for expenses.
(g) A quorum of the members must be present for the advisory
council to take any official action. A quorum of the advisory council
consists of a majority of the members appointed to the advisory
council. An affirmative vote by a majority of the members present is
needed for the advisory council to make a recommendation or take any
official action.
(h) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 38. IC 4-23-7.2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2018,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this
chapter:
(1) "Agency" means any state administration, agency, authority,
board, bureau, commission, committee, council, department,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


division, institution, office, service, or other similar body of state
government.
(2) "Board" means the Indiana library and historical board
established by IC 4-23-7-2.
(3) "Department" means the Indiana library and historical
department established by IC 4-23-7-1.
(4) "Deputy director" means the deputy director of the Indiana
historical bureau.
(5) "Director" means director of the library.
(6) "Historical bureau" means the Indiana historical bureau
established by section 2 of this chapter.
(7) "Library" means the Indiana state library established by
IC 4-23-7-3.
SECTION 39. IC 4-23-7.2-11 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) The historical bureau shall establish the Indiana
historical marker program for marking historical sites in Indiana. As a
part of this program, the historical bureau shall fix a state format for
historical markers. No person may erect an historical marker in the
state format without the approval of the historical bureau. All historical
markers in the state format shall be provided by the historical bureau
using appropriated funds, local matching funds, donations, grants, or
any other funds provided for that purpose according to the guidelines
and rules of the historical marker program.
(b) The board may appoint a historical marker advisory committee
to serve without compensation. The committee may advise the board
and the director concerning the following:
(1) Guidelines and rules for the historical marker program.
(2) Appropriate sites to be marked.
(3) Other matters concerning the historical marker program as
requested by the board or the director.
(c) Historical markers approved under this section, including state
format markers installed after 1945 and markers installed by the
Indiana Civil War centennial commission, are the property of the state.
Maintenance of state historical markers is part of the historical marker
program. The historical bureau may cooperate with individuals, local
and state agencies, and private institutions and organizations for the
maintenance of the historical markers. Funds made available to the
historical marker program, as approved by the board, may be used for
necessary maintenance.
(d) No historical marker may be erected on a highway of the state
highway system without the approval of the historical bureau as to its
historical accuracy. This provision is in addition to any other
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


requirement of law.
SECTION 40. IC 4-23-7.2-21 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 21. (a) An advisory committee is established to advise
the historical bureau in establishing an oral history of the general
assembly under section 20 of this chapter. The committee consists of
the following eight (8) members:
(1) One (1) member of the general assembly appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives.
(2) One (1) member of the general assembly appointed by the
minority leader of the house of representatives.
(3) One (1) member of the general assembly appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate.
(4) One (1) member of the general assembly appointed by the
minority leader of the senate.
(5) Four (4) members appointed by the governor as follows:
(A) One (1) member nominated by the Indiana library and
historical board.
(B) One (1) member nominated by the Indiana Historical
Society.
(C) One (1) member nominated by the Center for the Study of
History and Memory at Indiana University.
(D) One (1) member nominated by the board of trustees of The
History Museum in South Bend.
(b) The following apply to the governor's appointments under
subsection (a)(5):
(1) Not more than two (2) members appointed by the governor
may be members of the same political party.
(2) The appointments must be made so that the northern, central,
and southern regions of Indiana are represented on the committee.
(c) Members of the committee serve at the pleasure of the
appointing authority. If a vacancy occurs on the committee, the
appointing authority that appointed the member whose position is
vacant shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy. An individual
appointed to fill a vacancy must have the qualifications that a member
appointed by the appointing authority must have.
(d) The:
(1) chairman of the legislative council, with the advice of the
vice-chairman, shall designate the chair; and
(2) vice-chairman of the legislative council, with the advice of the
chairman, shall designate a vice-chair;
of the committee from among the legislative members of the
committee. The chair and vice-chair of the committee serve at the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


pleasure of the appointing authority.
(e) Each member of the committee is entitled to receive the same
per diem, mileage, and travel allowances paid to individuals who serve
as legislative and lay members, respectively, of interim study
committees established by the legislative council.
(f) The historical bureau shall provide staff support to the
committee.
(g) Expenses incurred by the committee to carry out its functions
must be paid from appropriations to the Indiana library and historical
board.
(h) On or before July 1, 2027, and July 1 biennially thereafter, the
committee shall submit a report to the executive director of the
legislative services agency, in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6, for
review by the interim committee on government in accordance with
IC 1-1-15.5-4 and IC 2-5-1.3-13(g). The report shall describe:
(1) official action taken; and
(2) actionable items considered;
by the committee during the preceding two (2) years.
SECTION 41. IC 4-23-12 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Indiana Commission for Arts and Humanities in Education).
SECTION 42. IC 4-23-24.1-0.1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 0.1. The amendments made to section 3 of this chapter
by P.L.199-2007 apply only to members of the commission appointed
by the governor after December 31, 2008. A member of the
commission appointed by the governor under section 3 of this chapter
before January 1, 2009, may serve the entire four (4) year term to
which the member was appointed, as provided in section 4(b) of this
chapter.
SECTION 43. IC 4-23-24.1-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2024,
SECTION 42, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The commission consists of thirteen (13)
members, appointed as follows:
(1) Nine (9) members who are Indiana residents appointed by the
governor. Each Indiana congressional district must be represented
by at least one (1) individual appointed under this subdivision
who is a resident of that congressional district. Not more than five
(5) members appointed under this subdivision may be members
of the same political party.
(2) (1) The commissioner of the department of administration
or the commissioner's designee.
(2) The director of the Indiana housing and community
development authority or the director's designee.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(3) The chief executive officer of the state museum or the chief
executive officer's designee.
(4) The state librarian or the state librarian's designee.
(5) The director of the civil rights commission or the
director's designee.
(6) Four (4) members appointed by the governor in
accordance with subsection (c).
(7) Four (4) members of the general assembly who are appointed
under section 5 of this chapter.
(b) Members of the commission serve at the pleasure of the
appointing authority.
(c) The following apply to members appointed under subsection
(a)(6):
(1) Not more than two (2) of the members may be members of
the same political party.
(2) At least three (3) of the members must reside in different
Indiana congressional districts.
SECTION 44. IC 4-23-24.1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The governor shall annually designate one
(1) of the members appointed under section 3(a)(1) 3(a)(6) of this
chapter as chairperson of the commission.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), members of the
commission appointed under section 3(a)(1) of this chapter by the
governor serve a four (4) year term. For a member appointed after
June 30, 2026, each term expires as follows:
(1) For a member appointed from an odd-numbered congressional
district, December 31, 2025, and each fourth year thereafter.
(2) For a member appointed from an even-numbered
congressional district, December 31, 2027, and each fourth year
thereafter. December 31, 2030, and each fourth year
thereafter.
(c) This subsection applies to a member appointed by the
governor under section 3 of this chapter before July 1, 2026. The
term of each member expires July 1, 2026.
(c) (d) A member appointed by the governor under section 3(a)(1)
3 of this chapter may be reappointed for successive terms.
(d) (e) The governor shall fill a vacancy among the members
appointed under section 3(a)(1) 3(a)(6) of this chapter. A member
appointed under this subsection serves until the end of the unexpired
term of the vacating member of the commission.
SECTION 45. IC 4-23-24.1-5.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.42-2024,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


SECTION 45, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. (a) The commission:
(1) shall meet at the call of the chairperson as necessary to fulfill
its duties under this chapter; and
(2) must meet at least two (2) times each calendar year.
(b) The chairperson may:
(1) designate subcommittees as necessary to meet between
commission meetings; and
(2) require a subcommittee to report on its activities to the full
commission.
SECTION 46. IC 4-23-24.1-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.199-2007,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. Seven (7) members of the commission
constitute a quorum. The affirmative votes of at least seven (7)
members of the commission are required for the commission to
take official action.
SECTION 47. IC 4-23-24.1-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2024,
SECTION 46, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Each member of the commission who is not
a state employee is entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided
by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member is also entitled to reimbursement for
mileage, traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4, and other
expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's duties as
provided in the state policies and procedures established by the Indiana
department of administration and approved by the budget agency.
Expenses incurred under this subsection and subsection (b) shall be
paid out of the funds appropriated to the civil rights commission.
(b) Each member of the commission who is a state employee is
entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under
IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in connection with
the member's duties as provided in the state policies and procedures
established by the Indiana department of administration and approved
by the budget agency.
(c) Each member of the commission who is a member of the general
assembly is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage, and travel
allowances paid to members of the general assembly serving on interim
study committees established by the legislative council. Per diem,
mileage, and travel allowances paid under this subsection shall be paid
from appropriations made to the legislative council or the legislative
services agency.
(d) Expenses incurred under subsections (a) and (b) shall be
paid out of the funds appropriated to the civil rights commission.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


SECTION 48. IC 4-23-24.1-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. The civil rights
commission shall furnish the necessary staff and administrative
support for the commission.
SECTION 49. IC 4-23-24.1-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. Funding for the commission
is derived from money appropriated to the civil rights commission.
Money appropriated to the civil rights commission for the purposes
of this chapter does not revert to the state general fund at the end
of a state fiscal year, but remains available to the civil rights
commission until the purpose for which the money was
appropriated is fulfilled.
SECTION 50. IC 4-23-24.1-12 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) The Dr. Martin Luther
King, Jr. holiday commission special fund is established to provide
money for special projects of the commission.
(b) The treasurer of state shall administer the fund.
(c) Expenses of administering the fund must be paid from
money in the fund.
(d) The fund consists of gifts, contributions, and money donated
to the commission.
(e) The treasurer of state shall invest money in the fund not
needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same manner as
other public funds may be invested. Interest on investments made
under this subsection accrues to the fund.
(f) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
(g) Money in the fund is continuously appropriated for the
purposes described in subsection (a).
SECTION 51. IC 4-23-25 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Indiana Commission for Women).
SECTION 52. IC 4-23-26-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. This chapter expires
December 31, 2026.
SECTION 53. IC 4-23-27-9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 9. This chapter expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 54. IC 4-23-28 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Commission on Hispanic/Latino Affairs).
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


SECTION 55. IC 4-23-31 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Commission on the Social Status of Black Males).
SECTION 56. IC 4-23-32 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Native American Indian Affairs Commission).
SECTION 57. IC 4-23-35 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 35. Indiana State Historical Records Advisory Board
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "board" refers to the Indiana
state historical records advisory board established by section 3 of
this chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "NHPRC" means the federal
National Historical Publications and Records Commission.
Sec. 3. The Indiana state historical records advisory board:
(1) initially established under Executive Order 06-01; and
(2) continued under Executive Order 13-13 and 17-06;
is established under the Indiana department of administration. The
board is a continuing board. The purpose of the board is to carry
out the duties under section 8 of this chapter.
Sec. 4. (a) The board consists of seven (7) voting members.
(b) At least four (4) members of the board must have recognized
experience in the administration of government records, historical
records, or archives.
(c) One (1) of the seven (7) members under subsection (a) must
be the state archivist. The remaining six (6) members shall be
appointed by the state archivist and are lay members who:
(1) may be reappointed; and
(2) serve at the will of the state archivist.
There is no term limit for members of the board.
(d) The state archivist shall serve as state coordinator and chair
of the board.
Sec. 5. (a) The term of a member appointed under section 4(a)
of this chapter is three (3) years.
(b) The state archivist shall appoint a new member to fill a
vacancy on the board that occurs for any reason. A member
appointed under this subsection serves the remainder of the
unexpired term of the vacating member.
Sec. 6. (a) This section applies to a member of the board
appointed under Executive Order 06-01, 13-13, or 17-06.
(b) An individual who serves as a member of the board on June
30, 2026, is appointed by operation of law to serve the remainder
of the member's unexpired term. A subsequent vacancy shall be
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


filled by the state archivist under section 4(c) of this chapter.
(c) This section expires July 1, 2030.
Sec. 7. (a) The board shall meet at least quarterly at the call of
the chair.
(b) The chair may call additional meetings. There is no
maximum number of meetings that may be called by the chair.
(c) A quorum consists of a simple majority of voting members.
Sec. 8. (a) The board shall serve as the central advisory body
for:
(1) historical records planning; and
(2) projects:
(A) funded by the NHPRC; and
(B) developed and carried out within Indiana.
(b) The board may do the following:
(1) Develop and submit to the NHPRC state priorities for
historical records programs as part of a state plan.
(2) Solicit or develop proposals for NHPRC grant projects.
(3) Review proposals by institutions in Indiana and make
recommendations about the proposals to the NHPRC.
(4) Work to preserve Indiana's documentary heritage.
(5) Promote practices that ensure preservation of, and access
to, the state's public and private records.
(6) Encourage adherence to archival and records management
principles through meetings and workshops.
(7) Survey repositories, support the state's records
management program, and promote the sharing of collection
information.
(8) Encourage the professional development of archivists,
curators, volunteers, and others dedicated to the task of
caring for Indiana's documentary heritage.
Sec. 9. (a) Each member of the board who is not a state
employee is not entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided
by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). A member is, however, entitled to
reimbursement for expenses actually incurred in connection with
the member's duties as provided in the state policies and
procedures established by the Indiana department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
(b) The expenses of the board shall be paid in the same manner
in which the board's expenses were paid under Executive Orders
06-01, 13-13, and 17-06.
(c) The Indiana department of administration shall staff the
board.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


Sec. 10. The affirmative votes of a majority of the members
appointed to the board are required for the board to take action on
any measure, including final reports.
Sec. 11. (a) The board shall annually submit a report on its work
to the governor.
(b) A report under subsection (a) is a public record.
SECTION 58. IC 4-23-36 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 36. Indiana Cultural Commission
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "commission" refers to the
Indiana cultural commission established by section 3 of this
chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "Native American Indian" means
an individual who is at least one (1) of the following:
(1) An Alaska native as defined in 43 U.S.C. 1602(b).
(2) An Indian as defined in 25 U.S.C. 450b(d).
(3) A native Hawaiian as defined in 20 U.S.C. 7517(1).
Sec. 3. The Indiana cultural commission is established.
Sec. 4. (a) The commission consists of fifteen (15) members
appointed as follows:
(1) Two (2) members of the house of representatives
appointed as follows:
(A) One (1) member appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives.
(B) One (1) member appointed by the minority leader of
the house of representatives.
(2) Two (2) members of the senate appointed as follows:
(A) One (1) member appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate.
(B) One (1) member appointed by the minority leader of
the senate.
(3) One (1) individual who is not a member of the general
assembly appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(4) One (1) individual who is not a member of the general
assembly appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate.
(5) The secretary of the family and social services
administration, or the secretary's designee.
(6) The commissioner of the Indiana department of health, or
the commissioner's designee.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(7) The secretary of education, or the secretary's designee.
(8) The commissioner of the department of correction, or the
commissioner's designee.
(9) The director of the civil rights commission, or the
director's designee.
(10) Four (4) individuals appointed by the governor in
accordance with subsection (b).
(b) The following apply to members of the commission
appointed by the governor under subsection (a)(10):
(1) The appointed individuals may not be members of the
general assembly or state employees.
(2) The appointed individuals must represent the following:
(A) African Americans.
(B) The Hispanic/Latino community.
(C) Women.
(D) Native American Indians.
(c) If a legislative member of the commission ceases to be a
member of the legislative chamber from which the member was
appointed, the member ceases to be a member of the commission.
(d) A member of the commission:
(1) serves at the pleasure of the member's appointing
authority; and
(2) may be removed at any time by the appointing authority.
(e) If a vacancy on the commission occurs, the appointing
authority who appointed the former member whose position has
become vacant shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy. An
individual appointed to fill a vacancy serves on the commission for
the remainder of the unexpired term of the individual's
predecessor.
Sec. 5. (a) A member of the commission may be reappointed for
successive terms.
(b) The following members serve a two (2) year term that
expires June 30 of an odd-numbered year:
(1) A member of the general assembly appointed to the
commission under section 4 of this chapter.
(2) A member appointed to the commission under section
4(a)(3) or 4(a)(4) of this chapter.
(c) A member appointed to the commission under section
4(a)(10) of this chapter serves a term that expires December 31,
2028, and each fourth year thereafter.
Sec. 6. (a) The commission shall meet:
(1) at the call of the chairperson as necessary to fulfill its
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


duties under this chapter; and
(2) at least once quarterly in each calendar year.
(b) The chairperson shall designate the following subcommittees
to meet at least two (2) times each year:
(1) African American affairs.
(2) Hispanic/Latino affairs.
(3) Women and families.
(4) Native American Indian affairs.
Each subcommittee shall submit an annual report on its activities
to the full commission.
(c) The chairperson may:
(1) designate other subcommittees to meet between
commission meetings; and
(2) require a subcommittee to report on its activities to the full
commission.
(d) A subcommittee designated under this section is comprised
of the following:
(1) At least three (3) members of the commission appointed by
the chairperson.
(2) Not more than three (3) members of the public appointed
by the chairperson.
A member of public appointed to a subcommittee must be selected
based on the individual's background and experience related to the
subcommittee's designated purpose.
(e) A member of the public who serves on a subcommittee is
entitled to receive a minimum salary per diem and to
reimbursement for mileage and traveling expenses. Amounts
payable under this subsection must be paid:
(1) from appropriations made to the civil rights commission;
and
(2) in the same manner that a per diem, mileage, and traveling
expenses are paid to a member of the commission described
in section 9(a) of this chapter.
Sec. 7. (a) At the first official meeting of the commission each
year, the members shall elect:
(1) a member to serve as the chairperson of the commission;
and
(2) a member to serve as the vice chairperson of the
commission.
(b) A member elected to serve as chairperson or vice
chairperson of the commission shall serve for a term of one (1)
year. The term of office expires at the first commission meeting
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


held in the following year.
(c) A vacancy in the office of chairperson or vice chairperson
must be filled by a member of the commission selected by vote of
the remaining members of the commission.
Sec. 8. Eight (8) members of the commission constitute a
quorum for conducting commission business. The affirmative vote
of at least eight (8) members is required for the commission to take
official action on any measure. A member of the commission may
participate in a meeting by electronic means in accordance with
IC 5-14-1.5-3.6 as long as at least five (5) members of the
commission are physically present at the meeting.
Sec. 9. (a) Each member of the commission who is not a state
employee is entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by
IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member is also entitled to reimbursement
for mileage and traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4,
and other expenses actually incurred in connection with the
member's duties as provided in the state policies and procedures
established by the Indiana department of administration and
approved by the budget agency.
(b) Each member of the commission who is a state employee is
entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under
IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in connection
with the member's duties as provided in the state policies and
procedures established by the Indiana department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
(c) Each member of the commission who is a member of the
general assembly is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage,
and travel allowances paid to members of the general assembly
serving on interim study committees established by the legislative
council. Per diem, mileage, and travel allowances paid under this
subsection shall be paid from appropriations made to the
legislative council or the legislative services agency.
(d) Expenses paid under subsections (a) and (b) shall be paid
from appropriations made to the civil rights commission.
Sec. 10. The commission shall do the following:
(1) Identify, study, and research issues affecting
underrepresented and minority groups, including the groups
described in section 6(b) of this chapter, in the following
areas:
(A) Health care.
(B) Economic and business development.
(C) Employment.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(D) Education.
(E) Social and family development.
(F) Housing.
(G) Civil rights.
(H) The justice system.
(I) Any other aspect of society identified by the
commission.
(2) Promote cooperation and understanding between
communities throughout Indiana.
(3) Assess the needs of underrepresented and minority groups
and identify recommendations to resolve those needs.
(4) Promote full participation of underrepresented and
minority groups in all aspects of society.
(5) Identify legal and social barriers to underrepresented and
minority groups.
(6) Identify measures that could facilitate easier access to
state and local government services by underrepresented and
minority groups.
(7) Make recommendations to appropriate governmental
agencies regarding issues of preservation and excavation of
Native American Indian historical and archeological sites,
including the reburial of remains of Native American Indians,
that are consistent with IC 14-21-1-25.5.
(8) Monitor legislation, policies, and other legal developments
in order to make recommendations to the general assembly
and the governor that support the commission's purposes.
(9) Gather, study, and disseminate information on
underrepresented and minority groups through publications,
public hearings, conferences, and other means.
(10) Before November 1 of each year, submit an annual report
on the commission's activities to:
(A) the governor; and
(B) the legislative council in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6.
Sec. 11. The commission may study topics that are not described
in section 10 of this chapter as assigned by:
(1) statute;
(2) the governor;
(3) the legislative council; or
(4) the chairperson of the commission.
Sec. 12. The commission may do the following:
(1) Designate and appoint members to subcommittees in
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


accordance with section 6 of this chapter.
(2) Transact business and enter into contracts that support
the commission's purposes.
(3) Apply for, receive, and disburse gifts, contributions, and
grants of funds or in-kind services.
(4) Adopt, rescind, and amend bylaws to regulate the conduct
of the commission's business.
(5) Assign duties to the commission's officers under the
commission's bylaws.
Sec. 13. The commission may not study or make any
recommendation on the following issues:
(1) Negotiations between a Native American Indian tribe and
the state or federal government concerning tribal sovereignty.
(2) Gaming on tribal land.
Sec. 14. (a) The civil rights commission shall provide staff and
administrative support for the commission.
(b) Except as provided in section 9(c) of this chapter, expenses
incurred under this chapter shall be paid from funds appropriated
to the civil rights commission.
(c) Money appropriated to the civil rights commission for the
purposes of this chapter does not revert to the state general fund
at the end of a state fiscal year, but remains available to the civil
rights commission until the purpose for which the money was
appropriated is fulfilled.
Sec. 15. (a) The Indiana cultural commission special fund is
established to provide money for special projects of the
commission.
(b) The treasurer of state shall administer the fund.
(c) Expenses of administering the fund must be paid from
money in the fund.
(d) The fund consists of gifts, contributions, and money donated
to the commission.
(e) The treasurer of state shall invest money in the fund not
needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same manner as
other public funds may be invested. Interest on investments made
under this subsection accrues to the fund.
(f) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
(g) Money in the fund is continuously appropriated for the
purposes described in subsection (a).
Sec. 16. (a) As used in this section, "license plate revenue" refers
to money attributable to license plate sales under IC 9-18.5 that
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


was paid to the Native American Indian affairs commission (before
its repeal) or to the commission under IC 9-18.5-22-4.
(b) The commission and the civil rights commission shall assist
members of the Native American Indian community in establishing
a nonprofit corporation to:
(1) advocate for the Native American Indians residing in
Indiana; and
(2) promote events, programming, and services for the benefit
of Native American Indians residing in Indiana.
(c) Not later than thirty (30) days after executive director of the
civil rights commission determines that the:
(1) nonprofit corporation described in subsection (b) has been
established; and
(2) officers of the corporation are in place and prepared to
fulfill their official duties;
the executive director shall inform the bureau of motor vehicles
that the nonprofit corporation has been established and is
prepared to receive revenue under IC 9-18.5-22-4 in the ensuing
calendar year.
(d) Before January 1 of the calendar year following the calendar
year in which a nonprofit corporation described in subsection (b)
is established under this section, the commission shall transfer any
remaining license plate revenue under its control to the treasurer
of the nonprofit corporation.
SECTION 59. IC 4-31-11-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. A member of a
development committee is not entitled to the minimum salary per diem
provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b) However, a member is entitled to or
reimbursement for traveling expenses and other expenses actually
incurred in connection with the member's duties. as provided in the
state travel policies and procedures established by the department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
SECTION 60. IC 5-1.5-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.259-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) There is established a board of directors to
govern the bank. The powers of the bank are vested in this board.
(b) The board is composed of:
(1) the treasurer of state, who shall be the chairman ex officio, or
the treasurer of state's designee;
(2) the public finance director appointed under IC 5-1.2-3-6, who
shall be the director ex officio, or the public finance director's
designee; and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(3) five (5) directors one (1) director appointed by the governor;
(4) two (2) directors appointed by the president pro tempore
of the senate; and
(5) two (2) directors appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(c) Each of the five (5) directors appointed by the governor: under
subsection (b)(3) through (b)(5):
(1) must be a resident of Indiana;
(2) must have substantial expertise in the buying, selling, and
trading of municipal securities, in municipal administration or in
public facilities management;
(3) serves for a term of three (3) years and until the director's
successor is appointed and qualified;
(4) is eligible for reappointment;
(5) is entitled to receive the same minimum salary per diem as is
provided in IC 4-10-11-2.1(b) while performing the director's
duties. Such a director is also entitled to the same reimbursement
for traveling expenses and other expenses, actually incurred in
connection with the director's duties as is provided in the state
travel policies and procedures, established by the department of
administration and approved by the budget agency; and
(6) may be removed by the governor for cause by the
appropriate appointing authority.
(d) Any vacancy on the board, other than by expiration of term, shall
be filled by appointment of the governor the appropriate appointing
authority for the unexpired term only.
SECTION 61. IC 5-2-2 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Law Enforcement Academy Building Commission).
SECTION 62. IC 5-13-9-12, AS ADDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 63, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) As used in this section, "board" refers to
the Indiana local government investment pool board established by
subsection (c).
(b) As used in this section, "investment pool" refers to the local
government investment pool established by section 11(b) of this
chapter.
(c) The Indiana local government investment pool board is
established as a continuing board under the executive branch of state
government. The purpose of the board is to establish policies for the
investment of funds contributed to the investment pool.
(d) The board consists of the following seven (7) members:
(1) The treasurer of state, or the treasurer of state's designee.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(2) The director of the Indiana department of financial
institutions.
(3) Two (2) members with practical experience with financial
institutions, local government or public finance, or financial
investments domiciled in Indiana, appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate.
(4) Two (2) members with practical experience with financial
institutions, local government or public finance, or financial
investments domiciled in Indiana, appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives.
(5) One (1) member with practical experience with financial
institutions, local government or public finance, or financial
investments domiciled in Indiana, appointed by the governor.
(e) A member appointed under subsection (d)(3), (d)(4), or (d)(5)
serves a term of four (4) years and may be reappointed by the
appointing authority.
(f) A member appointed under subsection (d)(1) or (d)(2) who
ceases to hold the office or qualification described in that subsection
ceases to be a member of the board.
(g) The governor shall designate one (1) of the members as
chairperson. The treasurer of state, or the treasurer of state's
designee, shall serve as the chairperson of the board. The
chairperson has one (1) vote on all matters voted on by the members.
(h) A member of the board who is appointed under subsection
(d)(3), (d)(4), or (d)(5) serves a term that ends June 30 of the
odd-numbered year four (4) years after appointment.
(i) The board shall meet at least four (4) times a year and at the call
of the chairperson.
(j) Five (5) members of the board constitute a quorum. The
affirmative votes of four (4) members are required to take any action.
(k) Each member of the board who is not a state employee is entitled
to the minimum salary per diem provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b) for each
day that the member is engaged in the official business of the board.
The member is also entitled to reimbursement for mileage, traveling
expenses, and other expenses actually incurred in connection with the
member's duties, as provided in the state travel policies and procedures
established by the Indiana department of administration and approved
by the budget agency.
(l) The expenses of the board shall be paid from the investment
pool.
(m) The board shall establish policies regarding how the treasurer
of state shall administer and invest the funds in the investment pool.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


The policies must provide the following:
(1) There is not a minimum time for which funds paid into the
investment pool must be retained by the investment pool.
(2) There is not a limit on the number of accounts that the state or
a unit of government participating in the investment pool may
establish within the investment pool.
(3) The investment pool shall be audited at least annually by an
independent auditing firm, with an electronic or paper copy of the
audit provided to the state and each unit of government
participating in the pool.
(4) Not less than fifty percent (50%) of funds available for
investment shall be deposited in banks qualified to hold deposits
of participating local government entities.
(n) The board may select and direct the treasurer of state to contract
with accountants, attorneys, regulated investment advisors, money
managers, and other finance and investment professionals to make
investments and provide for the public accounting and legal
compliance necessary to ensure and maintain the safety, liquidity, and
yield of the investment pool.
SECTION 63. IC 5-16-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The department of homeland security shall
provide a safe depository for all blueprints and specifications filed as
provided in section 1 of this chapter and retain them for inspection and
loan under the conditions and restrictions as the fire prevention and
building safety commission department of homeland security shall
determine by rule. The fire prevention and building safety commission
department of homeland security may designate the librarian of the
state of Indiana as the custodian of any blueprints and specifications
filed with it, at any time, and it shall be the duty of the state librarian
to safely preserve the same in the state archives as public documents.
SECTION 64. IC 5-16-10-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2006,
SECTION 31, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Affiliate" means a parent, descendant, spouse, spouse of a
descendant, brother, sister, spouse of a brother or sister,
employee, director, officer, partner, limited liability company
manager or member, joint venturer, a corporation subject to
common control with the architect, engineer or construction
manager, a shareholder or corporation who controls the architect,
engineer or construction manager, or a corporation controlled by
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


the architect, engineer, or construction manager.
(2) "Architect" means the person registered under IC 25-4-1.
(3) "Construction manager" means a person designated as a
construction manager by contract who provides professional
management services, which contribute to the control of time and
the cost and quality of a public construction project, and who
performs those services concurrent with architectural and
engineering services rendered during the design and construction
phases of a construction project.
(4) "Engineer" means the person registered under IC 25-31-1.
IC 25-4-3.
(5) "Person" means a natural person, a partnership, a limited
liability company, or a corporation.
(6) "Public construction project" means the construction,
remodeling, rehabilitation, or repair of any building or other
facility of a unit of local government, whether the building or
facility is owned by the unit or leased by the unit with an option
to purchase under IC 36-1-10 or any other law. However, "public
construction project" does not mean highway or bridge
construction.
(7) "Unit of local government" includes any county, city, town,
township, and any other political subdivision, commission, or
agency created under law. However, the term does not include a
school corporation or lessor corporation qualifying under
IC 20-47-2 or IC 20-47-3.
SECTION 65. IC 5-16-10-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. The limitations
expressed in section 2 of this chapter should not be interpreted to
permit any person who is not a registered architect under IC 25-4-1 or
a registered engineer under IC 25-31-1 IC 25-4-3 to do any act which
constitutes the practice of architecture or engineering nor to prevent
any unit of local government from employing any person who is a
registered architect under IC 25-4-1 or a registered engineer under
IC 25-31-1 IC 25-4-3 to perform services which constitute the practice
of architecture or engineering.
SECTION 66. IC 5-16-11.1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.57-2013,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "professional
services" means those services that are:
(1) within the scope of practice specified by IC 25-4 for
architecture, IC 25-31 IC 25-4 for professional engineering, or
IC 25-21.5 for surveying; or
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(2) performed by any licensed architect, professional engineer, or
professional surveyor in connection with the architect's,
engineer's, or surveyor's professional employment or practice.
SECTION 67. IC 5-16-13-16, AS ADDED BY P.L.70-2023,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) As used in this section, "adequate welding
standards" means specifications, guidelines, tests, and other methods
used to ensure that all structural steel welds meet, at minimum, the
codes and standards for such welds established in the welding code and
under rules adopted by the fire prevention and building safety
commission under IC 22-13-2-2. department of homeland security.
(b) As used in this section, "certified welding inspector" means a
person who has been certified by the American Welding Society to
inspect structural steel welding projects and conduct welder
qualification tests.
(c) As used in this section, "structural steel welding" means
structural welds, weld repair, the structural system, and the welding of
all primary steel members of a structure in accordance with the welding
code. The term does not include welding that is required by the
American Society of Mechanical Engineers to have its own
certification.
(d) As used in this section, "welding code" refers to the American
Welding Society structural steel welding code D1.1, as in effect on July
1, 2023.
(e) A contractor whose workers are welding the structural steel on
a public works project shall ensure that all of the following occur:
(1) The workers performing the structural steel welding have been
tested by, and hold a valid certification from, a facility that, or an
individual who, has been accredited by the American Welding
Society to test and certify welders and welding inspectors.
(2) All structural steel welds performed for the project meet
adequate welding standards and are listed in the project's job
specifications.
(3) All structural steel welding inspections listed in the project's
job specifications are completed by a certified welding inspector.
SECTION 68. IC 5-28-15-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2018,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) There is established in each enterprise
zone an urban enterprise association (U.E.A.). The twelve (12) ten (10)
members of the U.E.A. shall be chosen as follows:
(1) The governor shall appoint the following:
(A) One (1) state legislator whose district includes all or part
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


of the enterprise zone.
(B) One (1) representative of the corporation, who is not a
voting member of the U.E.A.
(2) (1) The executive of the municipality in which the zone is
located shall appoint the following:
(A) One (1) representative of the plan commission having
jurisdiction over the zone, if any exists.
(B) One (1) representative of the municipality's department
that performs planning or economic development functions.
(C) Two (2) representatives of businesses located in the zone,
one (1) of whom shall be from a manufacturing concern, if any
exists in the zone.
(D) One (1) resident of the zone.
(E) One (1) representative of organized labor from the
building trades that represent construction workers.
(3) (2) The legislative body of the municipality in which the zone
is located shall appoint, by majority vote, the following:
(A) One (1) member of the municipality's legislative body
whose district includes all or part of the zone.
(B) One (1) representative of a business located in the zone.
(C) Two (2) residents of the zone, who must not be members
of the same political party.
(b) Members of the U.E.A. serve four (4) year terms. The appointing
authority shall fill any vacancy for the balance of the vacated term.
(c) Members may be dismissed only by the appointing authority and
only for just cause.
(d) The members shall elect a chairperson, a vice chairperson, and
a secretary by majority vote. This election shall be held every two (2)
years in the same month as the first meeting or whenever a vacancy
occurs. The U.E.A. shall meet at least once every three (3) months. The
secretary shall notify members of meetings at least two (2) weeks in
advance of meetings. The secretary shall provide a list of members to
each member and shall notify members of any changes in membership.
SECTION 69. IC 5-30-1-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.74-2005,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. "Design criteria developer" means a
person registered under IC 25-4 as an architect or IC 25-31 IC 25-4-3
as a professional engineer who is responsible for preparing the design
criteria package for the public agency for a design-build project.
SECTION 70. IC 5-30-1-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.74-2005,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 7. "Design services" means services that are:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(1) within the scope of practice specified by IC 25-4 for
architecture or IC 25-31 IC 25-4 for professional engineering; or
(2) performed by a registered architect or professional engineer in
connection with the architect's or engineer's professional
employment or practice.
SECTION 71. IC 5-30-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.166-2011,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. (a) Before entering into a design-build
contract, a public agency must appoint a technical review committee
of at least three (3) individuals.
(b) The members of the technical review committee must include
the following:
(1) A representative of the public agency.
(2) At least two (2) of the following, but not more than one (1)
under each clause:
(A) An architect registered under IC 25-4.
(B) A professional engineer registered under IC 25-31.
IC 25-4-3.
(C) A qualified contractor under IC 4-13.6 or an individual
employed by the qualified contractor.
(c) A member of the technical review committee who is an architect
or a professional engineer may be:
(1) an employee of the public agency; or
(2) an outside consultant retained by the public agency for the
specific purpose of evaluating proposals submitted under this
article.
(d) The design criteria developer may serve as:
(1) a full member; or
(2) a nonvoting adviser;
of the committee.
SECTION 72. IC 5-32-2-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.128-2014,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 8. "Engineer" refers to a person registered
under IC 25-31-1. IC 25-4-3.
SECTION 73. IC 6-9-7-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 93, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The county treasurer shall establish an
innkeeper's tax fund. The treasurer shall deposit in that fund all money
received under section 6 of this chapter that is attributable to an
innkeeper's tax rate that is not more than five percent (5%).
(b) Money in the innkeeper's tax fund shall be distributed as
follows:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(1) Forty percent (40%) shall be distributed to the commission to
carry out its purposes, including making any distributions or
payments to the Lafayette - West Lafayette Convention and
Visitors Bureau, Inc.
(2) Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed to a community
development corporation that serves a metropolitan area in the
county that includes:
(A) Lafayette; and
(B) West Lafayette;
for the community development corporation's use in tourism,
recreation, and economic development activities.
(3) Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed to Historic
Prophetstown to be used by Historic Prophetstown for carrying
out its purposes.
(4) Ten percent (10%) shall be distributed to the Wabash River
Enhancement Corporation to assist the Wabash River
Enhancement Corporation in carrying out its purposes.
(5) The following amounts shall be distributed to the department
of natural resources for the development of projects in the state
park on the Wabash River, including its tributaries:
(A) For distributions in calendar year 2023, ten percent (10%).
(B) For distributions in calendar year 2024, nine percent (9%).
(C) For distributions in calendar year 2025, eight percent
(8%).
(D) For distributions in calendar year 2026, seven percent
(7%).
(E) For distributions in calendar year 2027, six percent (6%).
(F) For distributions in calendar year 2028, five percent (5%).
(G) For distributions in calendar year 2029, four percent (4%).
(H) For distributions in calendar year 2030, three percent
(3%).
(I) For distributions in calendar year 2031, two percent (2%).
(J) For distributions in calendar year 2032, one percent (1%).
(K) For distributions after calendar year 2032, zero percent
(0%).
The department of natural resources is not required to provide
additional state resources to the state park described in this
subdivision as a result of the reduction of revenue set forth in this
subdivision.
(6) The following amounts shall be distributed to the county fiscal
body for the purposes set forth in subsection (c):
(A) For distributions in calendar year 2023, zero percent (0%).
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(B) For distributions in calendar year 2024, one percent (1%).
(C) For distributions in calendar year 2025, two percent (2%).
(D) For distributions in calendar year 2026, three percent
(3%).
(E) For distributions in calendar year 2027, four percent (4%).
(F) For distributions in calendar year 2028, five percent (5%).
(G) For distributions in calendar year 2029, six percent (6%).
(H) For distributions in calendar year 2030, seven percent
(7%).
(I) For distributions in calendar year 2031, eight percent (8%).
(J) For distributions in calendar year 2032, nine percent (9%).
(K) For distributions after calendar year 2032, ten percent
(10%).
(7) Twenty percent (20%) shall be distributed as determined by
the county fiscal body.
(c) Amounts distributed to the county fiscal body under subsection
(b)(6) may only be used for tourism or quality of life purposes,
including:
(1) mixed use development projects;
(2) quality public spaces;
(3) multiple transportation options;
(4) multiple housing options;
(5) revitalization of historic, blighted, or vacant properties;
(6) arts, culture, and creativity; and
(7) recreation and green spaces.
(d) An advisory commission consisting of the following members
is established:
(1) The director of the department of natural resources or the
director's designee.
(2) The public finance director or the public finance director's
designee.
(3) A member appointed by the Native American Indian affairs
Indiana cultural commission.
(4) A member appointed by Historic Prophetstown.
(5) A member appointed by the community development
corporation described in subsection (b)(2).
(6) A member appointed by the Wabash River Enhancement
Corporation.
(7) A member appointed by the commission.
(8) A member appointed by the county fiscal body.
(9) A member appointed by the town board of the town of
Battleground.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(10) A member appointed by the mayor of the city of Lafayette.
(11) A member appointed by the mayor of the city of West
Lafayette.
(e) The following apply to the advisory commission:
(1) The governor shall appoint a member of the advisory
commission as chairman of the advisory commission.
(2) Six (6) members of the advisory commission constitute a
quorum. The affirmative votes of at least six (6) advisory
commission members are necessary for the advisory commission
to take official action other than to adjourn or to meet to hear
reports or testimony.
(3) The advisory commission shall make recommendations
concerning the use of any proceeds of bonds issued to finance the
development of Prophetstown State Park.
(4) Members of the advisory commission who are state
employees:
(A) are not entitled to any salary per diem; and
(B) are entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses as
provided under IC 4-13-1-4 and to reimbursement for other
expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's
duties as provided in the state policies and procedures
established by the Indiana department of administration and
approved by the budget agency.
(f) The Indiana finance authority may issue bonds for the
development of Prophetstown State Park under IC 5-1.2-6.
SECTION 74. IC 7.1-4-13-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The wine grape
market development fund is created.
(b) The wine grape market development fund may not be used for
political or legislative activity of any kind.
(c) The fund shall be administered by the council director and used
for the purpose of this chapter. The expenses of administering the fund
shall be paid from money in the fund.
(d) Money in the fund at the end of a fiscal year does not revert to
the state general fund.
SECTION 75. IC 7.1-4-13-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The wine grape
market development council is created.
(b) The council shall have an odd number of members, but not less
than seven (7) nor more than fifteen (15) members. The following are
the members of the council:
(1) The director or the director's designee.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(2) The chairman of the horticulture department at Purdue
University or chairman's designee.
(3) The chairman of the food science department at Purdue
University or the chairman's designee.
(4) Other members that the director shall appoint.
(c) A majority of the members of the council must be wine grape
growers or processors of wine grape products.
(d) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 76. IC 7.1-4-13-9 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The council shall
adopt bylaws governing the terms of office, filling unexpired terms,
expenses, quorum, duties, and other administrative matters. The bylaws
may be amended by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the members present, if
a quorum is present.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 77. IC 7.1-4-13-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The council
shall do the following:
(1) Elect a chairman and any other officers.
(2) Recommend expenditures from the wine grape market
development fund for the administration of the wine grape market
development program and for the administration of this chapter.
(3) Perform any other necessary duties.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 78. IC 7.1-4-13-11 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) The director
shall consider the advice, recommendations, and assistance of the
council for the expenditure of funds for the wine grape market
development program and for the administration of this chapter.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 79. IC 8-1-1.1-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. As used in this
chapter:
"Council" means the advisory council to the office of utility
consumer counselor created under section 7 of this chapter (before its
expiration on December 31, 2026).
"Counselor" means the consumer counselor established under
section 2 of this chapter.
"Deputy consumer counselor" means the deputy consumer
counselor for Washington affairs that may be established under section
9.1 of this chapter.
"Utility" means any public utility, municipally owned utility or
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


subscriber owned utility under the jurisdiction of the commission.
SECTION 80. IC 8-1-1.1-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.53-2014,
SECTION 74, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) There is created the advisory council to the
office of the utility consumer counselor. The council consists of nine
(9) members. Each Indiana congressional district must be represented
by at least one (1) individual appointed under this section who is a
resident of that congressional district. However, the reduction in
membership of the council from ten (10) members to nine (9) shall be
accomplished as the terms of members end and new members are
appointed. Until the expiration of the term of a member who is serving
on the council on January 1, 2014, and resides in the same
congressional district as another member, the council consists of ten
(10) members.
(b) Members of the council, including those filling vacancies
occurring in the council membership, shall be appointed by the
governor. All members shall be appointed to a term of four (4) years,
except those who have been appointed to fill a vacancy in the council
whose term will be the unexpired portion of the term. All members
shall serve until their successor has been duly appointed and qualified.
(c) The membership shall be representative of the various sectors of
Indiana economy, including, but not limited to: agriculture, business
and industry, labor, and local government.
(d) The members shall annually elect of themselves a chairman.
(e) Members are entitled to receive per diem and travel expense
reimbursement at the standard rates provided for state employees for
expenses they incur in the performance of their duties under this
chapter subject to the approval of the consumer counselor.
(f) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 81. IC 8-1-30.3-5.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.160-2020,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5.5. (a) For purposes of this section, an
individual, or the company employing the individual, is qualified to
perform an appraisal if the individual is:
(1) an engineer registered under IC 25-31; IC 25-4-3; or
(2) an appraiser licensed under IC 25-34.1-8.
(b) For purposes of this section, an individual performing an
appraisal, or the company employing the individual, is disinterested if:
(1) the fee for the appraisal services is fixed before the individual
performs the appraisal;
(2) the individual is not an employee of one (1) of the parties to
the acquisition;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(3) the individual is not a state or municipal employee; and
(4) the:
(A) individual; and
(B) company, if applicable;
do not have affiliated interests (as defined in IC 8-1-2-49) in one
(1) of the parties to the acquisition.
(c) An appraisal under section 5(c)(2) of this chapter must be
performed by three (3) qualified and disinterested appraisers,
including:
(1) at least one (1) appraiser qualified under subsection (a)(1);
and
(2) at least one (1) appraiser qualified under subsection (a)(2).
(d) If the three (3) appraisers performing an appraisal for purposes
of section 5(c)(2) of this chapter cannot agree as to an appraised value,
the appraisal is sufficient for purposes of section 5(c)(2) of this chapter
if the appraisal is signed by two (2) of the appraisers.
SECTION 82. IC 8-1.5-2-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.229-2019,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4. Whenever the municipal legislative body
or the municipal executive determines to sell or otherwise dispose of
nonsurplus municipally owned utility property, it shall provide for the
following in a writing that shall be made available, upon request, for
inspection and copying at the offices of the municipality's municipally
owned utility in accordance with IC 5-14-3:
(1) The appointment, as follows, of three (3) residents of Indiana
to serve as appraisers:
(A) One (1) disinterested person who is an engineer licensed
under IC 25-31-1. IC 25-4-3.
(B) One (1) disinterested appraiser licensed under IC 25-34.1.
(C) One disinterested person who is either:
(i) an engineer licensed under IC 25-31-1; IC 25-4-3; or
(ii) an appraiser licensed under IC 25-34.1.
(2) The appraisal of the property.
(3) The time that the appraisal is due.
It is sufficient for purposes of this section that the municipal legislative
body or municipal executive provides for the appointment in written
contracts with the appraisers or the firms with whom the appraisers are
employed.
SECTION 83. IC 8-10-9-6 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The district shall
be governed by a board of directors consisting of seven (7) five (5)
members, four (4) of whom are appointed by the executive of the city
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


in which the district is formed, two (2) of whom are appointed by the
governor, and one (1) of whom is appointed by the legislative body of
the city in which the district is formed.
(b) Members of the board serve terms of three (3) years. A member's
term may be extended by any partial term to which the member was
appointed to fill a vacancy.
(c) Five (5) Three (3) members of the board of directors must be
qualified electors of the city in which the district is formed. Two (2)
members need not be residents of the city in which the district is
formed but shall be representatives of property owners of land that
borders waterways within the district. One (1) of the two (2) members
shall be among the members appointed by the mayor. and one (1) shall
be among the members appointed by the governor.
(d) The appointing authority shall fill all vacancies of members
appointed by that authority.
SECTION 84. IC 8-14-11-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this
chapter, "board" refers to the local bridge grant board established by
section 9 of this chapter.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 85. IC 8-14-11-9 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The local bridge
grant board is established to receive and review applications for grants
under this chapter. The board consists of the following members:
(1) The director of the department, or the director's designee.
(2) Six (6) persons appointed by the governor, no more than three
(3) of whom may be of the same political party, as follows:
(A) Two (2) members of a county executive.
(B) One (1) county highway engineer.
(C) One (1) mayor of a city.
(D) One (1) member of a town board of trustees.
(E) One (1) person with substantial experience or education in
the design or construction of bridges.
A member appointed under clause (A), (B), (C), or (D) who
ceases to hold the office described in that clause ceases to be a
member of the board.
(b) The governor shall designate a member of the board to serve as
chairman.
(c) Members of the board who are appointed by the governor serve
for terms of four (4) years. The governor shall fill a vacancy on the
board by appointing a new member to serve the remainder of the
unexpired term.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(d) A member of the board, other than the director of the
department, is entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by
IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). Each member of the board is entitled to
reimbursement for traveling expenses and other expenses actually
incurred in connection with the member's duties, as provided in the
state travel policies and procedures established by the department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
(e) Four (4) members of the board constitute a quorum. The
affirmative votes of four (4) members of the board are required for the
board to take any action.
(f) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 86. IC 8-14-11-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The department
shall provide staff support to the board.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 87. IC 8-14-11-11 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. The board
department shall establish criteria to be used in evaluating
applications for grants from the fund. These criteria:
(1) must be consistent with the purposes of the federal local
bridge program (23 U.S.C. 144(n));
(2) must be based on good engineering practices; and
(3) must provide for an equitable distribution of grants to counties
located throughout Indiana.
SECTION 88. IC 8-17-5-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. The county
highway engineer must be a registered engineer, licensed by the state
board of registration for professional engineers, Indiana board of
registration for design professionals, experienced in highway
engineering and construction and a resident of Indiana during the
engineer's employment.
SECTION 89. IC 8-17-5-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 297, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 9. The auditor of each county
that employs a full-time county highway engineer shall annually certify
that employment to the state comptroller. The certification must
include:
(1) the name and address of the county highway engineer; and
(2) the serial number of the engineer's certificate of registration
issued by the state board of registration for professional
engineers. Indiana board of registration for design
professionals.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


SECTION 90. IC 8-23-9-60, AS ADDED BY P.L.70-2023,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 60. (a) As used in this section, "adequate welding
standards" means specifications, guidelines, tests, and other methods
used to ensure that all structural steel welds meet, at minimum, the
codes and standards for such welds established in the welding code and
under rules adopted by the fire prevention and building safety
commission under IC 22-13-2-2. department of homeland security.
(b) As used in this section, "certified welding inspector" means a
person who has been certified by the American Welding Society to
inspect structural steel welding projects and conduct welder
qualification tests.
(c) As used in this section, "structural steel welding" means
structural welds, weld repair, the structural system, and the welding of
all primary steel members of a structure in accordance with the welding
code. The term does not include welding that is required by the
American Society of Mechanical Engineers to have its own
certification.
(d) As used in this section, "welding code" refers to the American
Welding Society structural steel welding code D1.1, as in effect on July
1, 2023.
(e) A contractor whose workers are welding the structural steel on
a project shall ensure that all of the following occur:
(1) The workers performing the structural steel welding have been
tested by, and hold a valid certification from, a facility that, or an
individual who, has been accredited by the American Welding
Society to test and certify welders and welding inspectors.
(2) All structural steel welds performed for the project meet
adequate welding standards and follow the project's special
provisions.
(3) All structural steel welding inspections listed in the project's
special provisions are completed by a certified welding inspector.
(f) If the department reasonably suspects a contractor has violated
this section, the department shall require the contractor to remedy the
violation not later than thirty (30) days after the department notifies the
contractor of the violation. The notification to the contractor must be
signed by the commissioner and sent by a method that enables the
department to verify receipt of the notice by the contractor. During the
thirty (30) day period, the contractor may continue to work on the
project. If the contractor fails to remedy the violation within the thirty
(30) day period, the department shall find the contractor not
responsible and determine the length of time the contractor is
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


considered not responsible by the department.
(g) In making the determination of the length of time a contractor is
not responsible under subsection (f), the department shall consider the
severity of the violation. The period during which a contractor is
considered not responsible:
(1) may not exceed forty-eight (48) months; and
(2) begins on the date of substantial completion of the project.
(h) A finding by the department under subsection (f) that a
contractor is not responsible may not be used by another state agency
or a political subdivision in making a determination as to whether the
contractor is responsible for purposes of that state agency's or political
subdivision's award of a public works contract to that contractor.
SECTION 91. IC 9-18.5-22-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.198-2016,
SECTION 327, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The bureau shall, with the advice
of the Native American Indian affairs commission established under
IC 4-23-32, Indiana cultural commission established under
IC 4-23-36, design and issue an Indiana Native American trust license
plate as a special group recognition license plate under IC 9-18.5-12.
SECTION 92. IC 9-18.5-22-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.118-2022,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The Indiana Native American trust fund is
established.
(b) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the Indiana
Native American trust fund not currently needed to meet the
obligations of the Indiana Native American trust fund in the same
manner as other public trust funds are invested. Interest that accrues
from these investments shall be deposited in the Indiana Native
American trust fund.
(c) The bureau shall administer the Indiana Native American trust
fund. Expenses of administering the Indiana Native American trust
fund shall be paid from money in the Indiana Native American trust
fund.
(d) The bureau shall distribute at least one (1) time each month the
money from the fund to the Native American Indian affairs commission
established under IC 4-23-32. as follows:
(1) Before January 1 of the calendar year following the
calendar year in which a nonprofit corporation is established
under IC 4-23-36-16, to the Indiana cultural commission
established under IC 4-23-36.
(2) After December 31 of the calendar in which a nonprofit
corporation is established under IC 4-23-36-16, to the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


treasurer of the nonprofit corporation.
(e) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not revert
to the state general fund.
(f) The Native American Indian affairs commission may use money
received under this section for any lawful purpose of the Native
American Indian affairs commission. The Indiana cultural
commission or the nonprofit corporation described in subsection
(d) may use money received under this section for any lawful
purpose that impacts, studies, supports, or relates to the Indiana
Native American community.
SECTION 93. IC 9-27-5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 60, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The director of the state department of
toxicology may solicit and receive aid from the following:
(1) The office of traffic safety.
(2) The state police department.
(3) The commission on forensic sciences.
(4) (3) The Indiana Coroners Association.
(5) (4) The Indiana department of health.
(6) (5) The Indiana State Medical Association.
(7) (6) Other agencies that may, in the director's opinion, make a
contribution to the effectiveness of the study.
SECTION 94. IC 9-27-6-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.85-2013,
SECTION 71, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) As used in this section, "advisory board"
refers to the driver education advisory board established by subsection
(b).
(b) The driver education advisory board is established to advise the
commissioner in the administration of the policies of the commission
and the bureau regarding driver education.
(c) The advisory board is composed of seven (7) individuals
appointed by the commissioner as follows:
(1) Three (3) members must be driver education professionals
endorsed by the bureau under section 8 of this chapter. In the
selection of individuals for membership under this subdivision,
consideration must be given to driver education instruction
performed in urban and rural areas.
(2) One (1) member must be a traffic safety advocate.
(3) One (1) member must be a representative of the bureau.
(4) One (1) member must be a representative of higher education.
(5) One (1) member must be a representative of the insurance
industry.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(d) A member of the advisory board serves a two (2) year term. A
member may not be appointed to more than two (2) consecutive full
terms. Each member serves until the member's successor is appointed
and qualified.
(e) A member of the advisory board may be removed for good
cause.
(f) A vacancy on the advisory board shall be filled by the
appointment by the commissioner of an individual to fill the position
to which the vacating member was appointed under subsection (c) for
the vacating member's unexpired term.
(g) The advisory board shall:
(1) consult with and advise the commissioner in the
administration of the policies of the commission and the bureau
regarding driver education; and
(2) suggest rules regarding the education and training of persons
to operate or drive motor vehicles or to prepare a person for an
examination or validation for a driver's license.
(h) A member of the advisory board is not subject to liability in a
civil action for bodily injury or property damage arising from or
thought to have arisen from an action taken in good faith as a member
of the advisory board.
(i) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 95. IC 9-27-7-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.85-2013,
SECTION 78, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The commissioner shall appoint a five (5)
member advisory board consisting of at least three (3) active
motorcyclists to serve in an advisory capacity to the program.
(b) A member of the advisory board serves a three (3) year term. A
member may not be appointed to more than two (2) consecutive full
terms. Each member serves until the member's successor is appointed
and qualified.
(c) A member of the advisory board may be removed for good
cause.
(d) A vacancy on the advisory board shall be filled by the
appointment by the commissioner of an individual to fill the position
to which the vacating member was appointed under subsection (a) for
the vacating member's unexpired term.
(e) A member of the advisory board is not subject to liability in a
civil action for bodily injury or property damage arising from or
thought to have arisen from an action taken in good faith as a member
of the advisory board.
(f) This section expires December 31, 2026.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


SECTION 96. IC 10-13-2-9 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The
superintendent shall adopt rules necessary to accomplish the purposes
of this chapter.
(b) In formulating the rules, the superintendent shall have the advice
and assistance of the criminal justice advisory committee established
by section 10 of this chapter.
SECTION 97. IC 10-13-2-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The criminal
justice advisory committee is established.
(b) The committee consists of the following persons or their
designated representatives:
(1) The superintendent, who shall act as chairman.
(2) The attorney general.
(3) The executive director of the criminal justice planning agency.
(4) The commissioner of corrections.
(5) One (1) county sheriff serving in the sheriff's second or
subsequent term of office.
(6) One (1) chief of police with at least two (2) years of
experience as chief.
(7) One (1) prosecuting attorney in the prosecuting attorney's
second or subsequent term of office.
(8) One (1) judge of a court of general criminal jurisdiction.
(9) The executive director of the law enforcement training
academy.
(10) A criminologist or forensic scientist.
(c) A member of the committee:
(1) must be appointed by the governor on a nonpartisan basis; and
(2) shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.
(d) A member of the committee serves without compensation except
per diem as provided by law.
(e) The committee shall meet as often as is considered necessary by
the superintendent to formulate or revise rules for the statewide
operation of the criminal justice data division.
(f) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 98. IC 10-13-3-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) As used in this
chapter, "council" means the security and privacy council established
by section 34 of this chapter.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 99. IC 10-13-3-34 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 34. (a) There is
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


established a security and privacy council that consists of nine (9)
members selected under subsections (b) and (c).
(b) The following six (6) members shall be appointed by and shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor:
(1) A prosecuting attorney.
(2) The police chief of a city.
(3) The sheriff of a county.
(4) A criminal court judge.
(5) Two (2) citizens who are not law enforcement officers.
(c) The following persons, or their designees, also are members of
the council:
(1) The superintendent.
(2) The attorney general.
(3) The commissioner of the department of correction.
(d) Members of the council are not entitled to receive compensation
but are entitled to receive a per diem and mileage on those days in
which they are engaged in the business of the council. Per diem and
mileage paid shall be that amount paid to state employees.
(e) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 100. IC 10-14-1-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. "Commission"
refers to the Indiana emergency medical services fire and EMS
standards and education commission established by IC 16-31-2-1.
IC 16-31-2-1.5.
SECTION 101. IC 10-14-3-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.85-2015,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The agency shall prepare and maintain a
current state emergency operations plan. The plan may provide for the
following:
(1) Prevention and minimization of injury and damage caused by
disaster.
(2) Prompt and effective response to disaster.
(3) Emergency relief.
(4) Identification of areas particularly vulnerable to disaster.
(5) Recommendations for:
(A) zoning;
(B) building;
(C) other land use controls;
(D) safety measures for securing mobile homes or other
nonpermanent or semipermanent structures; and
(E) other preventive and preparedness measures designed to
eliminate or reduce disaster or its impact;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


that must be disseminated to both the fire prevention and building
safety commission and local authorities.
(6) Assistance to local officials in designing local emergency
action plans.
(7) Authorization and procedures for the erection or other
construction of temporary works designed to protect against or
mitigate danger, damage, or loss from flood, conflagration, or
other disaster.
(8) Preparation and distribution to the appropriate state and local
officials of state catalogs of federal, state, and private assistance
programs.
(9) Organization of manpower and chains of command.
(10) Coordination of federal, state, and local disaster activities.
(11) Coordination of the state disaster plan with the disaster plans
of the federal government.
(12) Other necessary matters.
(b) The agency shall take an integral part in the development and
revision of local and interjurisdictional disaster plans prepared under
section 17 of this chapter. The agency shall employ or otherwise secure
the services of professional and technical personnel capable of
providing expert assistance to political subdivisions, a political
subdivision's disaster agencies, and interjurisdictional planning and
disaster agencies. These personnel:
(1) shall consult with subdivisions and government agencies on
a regularly scheduled basis;
(2) shall make field examinations of the areas, circumstances, and
conditions to which particular local and interjurisdictional
disaster plans are intended to apply; and
(3) may suggest revisions.
(c) In preparing and revising the state disaster plan, the agency shall
seek the advice and assistance of local government, business, labor,
industry, agriculture, civic and volunteer organizations, and community
leaders. In advising local and interjurisdictional agencies, the agency
shall encourage local and interjurisdictional agencies to seek advice
from the sources specified in this subsection.
(d) The state disaster plan or any part of the plan may be
incorporated in rules of the agency or by executive orders.
(e) The agency shall do the following:
(1) Determine requirements of the state and political subdivisions
for food, clothing, and other necessities in the event of an
emergency.
(2) Procure and pre-position supplies, medicines, materials, and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


equipment.
(3) Adopt standards and requirements for local and
interjurisdictional disaster plans.
(4) Provide for mobile support units.
(5) Assist political subdivisions, political subdivisions' disaster
agencies, and interjurisdictional disaster agencies to establish and
operate training programs and public information programs.
(6) Make surveys of industries, resources, and facilities in
Indiana, both public and private, necessary to carry out this
chapter.
(7) Plan and make arrangements for the availability and use of
any private facilities, services, and property, and if necessary and
if the private facilities, services, or property is used, provide for
payment for the use under agreed upon terms and conditions.
(8) Establish a register of persons with types of training and skills
important in emergency prevention, preparedness, response, and
recovery.
(9) Establish a register of mobile and construction equipment and
temporary housing available for use in a disaster emergency.
(10) Prepare, for issuance by the governor, executive orders,
proclamations, and regulations necessary or appropriate in coping
with disaster.
(11) Cooperate with the federal government and any public or
private agency or entity in achieving any purpose of this chapter
and in implementing programs for disaster prevention,
preparation, response, and recovery.
(12) Do other things necessary, incidental, or appropriate to
implement this chapter.
(f) The agency shall ascertain the rapid and efficient
communications that exist in times of disaster emergencies. The agency
shall consider the desirability of supplementing these communications
resources or of integrating these resources into a comprehensive
intrastate or state-federal telecommunications or other communications
system or network. In studying the character and feasibility of any
system, the agency shall evaluate the possibility of multipurpose use of
the system for general state and local governmental purposes. The
agency shall make appropriate recommendations to the governor.
(g) The agency shall assist political subdivisions in implementing
the intrastate mutual aid compact created by section 10.8 of this
chapter.
SECTION 102. IC 10-18-1-1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "commission"
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


refers to the Indiana war memorials commission established by section
2 of this chapter.
SECTION 103. IC 10-18-1-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. As used in this chapter,
"department" refers to the Indiana department of veterans affairs
established by IC 10-17-1-2.
SECTION 104. IC 10-18-1-1.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.6. (a) On January 1, 2027, all
powers, duties, agreements, and liabilities of the Indiana war
memorials commission are transferred to the department.
(b) On January 1, 2027, all records and property of the Indiana
war memorials commission, including appropriations and other
funds under the control or supervision of the Indiana war
memorials commission, are transferred to the department.
(c) After December 31, 2026, a reference to the Indiana war
memorials commission in a statute, rule, or other document is
considered a reference to the department.
(d) The rules adopted by the Indiana war memorials
commission before January 1, 2027, are considered, after
December 31, 2026, rules of the department.
SECTION 105. IC 10-18-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.149-2016,
SECTION 39, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. (a) The Indiana war memorials
commission is established.
(b) The commission consists of nine (9) members. Each Indiana
congressional district must be represented by at least one (1) member
who is:
(1) a resident of that congressional district;
(2) a veteran of service in the armed forces of the United States of
America in time of war;
(3) a citizen of Indiana at the time of the service; and
(4) appointed:
(A) in the manner;
(B) for the terms;
(C) to have the powers; and
(D) to perform the duties;
as provided in this chapter.
(c) (a) The department: commission:
(1) as the commission and in the commission's name, may
prosecute and defend suits; and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(2) has all other duties, rights, and powers that are:
(A) necessary to implement this chapter; and
(B) not inconsistent with this chapter.
(d) The members of the commission are not liable in their individual
capacity, except to the state, for any act done or omitted in connection
with the performance of their duties under this chapter.
(e) (b) A suit against the commission department must be brought
in a court with jurisdiction in Marion County. Notice or summons of
the suit shall be served upon the director of the department.
president, vice president, or secretary of the commission. In a suit
against the commission, it is not necessary to name the individual
members of the commission as either plaintiff or defendant.
Commission members may sue and be sued in the name of the Indiana
war memorials commission.
(f) The commission shall:
(1) report to the governor through the adjutant general; and
(2) be under the adjutant general for administrative supervision.
SECTION 106. IC 10-18-1-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 3. (a) The governor shall appoint members
of the commission for a term of three (3) years, subject to removal as
provided in this section.
(b) The commissioners:
(1) must be persons of high standing and character; and
(2) serve without compensation, except for reimbursement for any
reasonable expenses necessarily incurred by the commissioners
in the performance of their duties.
(c) The commissioners shall be selected without regard to their
political affiliations. However, not more than six (6) of the
commissioners at any time may be members of the same political party.
(d) The governor may, for just cause, based upon written charges
specifying alleged misconduct, remove any member of the commission,
after notice to the member and a public hearing.
(e) The governor shall appoint a qualified person to fill the
unexpired term of a member who does not complete the member's term.
SECTION 107. IC 10-18-1-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 4. (a) The governor shall execute a
certificate of appointment that makes reference to this chapter and sets
forth the term of appointment for each member of the commission. The
governor shall deposit the certificates of appointment in the office of
the secretary of state, who shall record the certificates in a book kept
for that purpose.
(b) The secretary of state shall notify each person appointed as a
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


commissioner of the person's appointment. The person's acceptance of
the appointment shall be signified by subscribing to an oath, to be
endorsed on the certificate of appointment:
(1) to support the Constitution of the United States and the
Constitution of the State of Indiana; and
(2) to faithfully and honestly discharge the person's duty under the
law as a commissioner.
(c) The secretary of state shall deliver the certificate, when
recorded, to the person named in the certificate. The certificate
constitutes the commission of the person named as a member of the
commission for the term specified.
(d) If a person appointed fails to qualify under this section within
ten (10) days after notice of the person's appointment, the governor
shall appoint another qualified person as a commissioner.
SECTION 108. IC 10-18-1-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 5. The commission shall elect the following:
(1) One (1) member of the commission to serve as president.
(2) One (1) member of the commission to serve as vice president.
(3) One (1) qualified person who is not a member of the
commission to serve as secretary of the commission.
The commission shall elect officers each year. Officers shall hold their
respective offices for one (1) year or during the pleasure of the
commission.
SECTION 109. IC 10-18-1-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 6. (a) The president and vice president of the
commission shall, before entering upon the discharge of their duties,
give bond to the approval of the governor, each in the sum of ten
thousand dollars ($10,000), conditioned for the faithful performance of
the duties as may be imposed upon them by law.
(b) The officers and any other officers required to give a bond under
this chapter may furnish as surety any surety company authorized to
transact business in Indiana that meets the approval of the commission,
and the premium on any bond shall be paid as a part of the expenses of
the commission.
SECTION 110. IC 10-18-1-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 7. (a) The president shall do the following:
(1) Preside over the meetings of the commission.
(2) Sign all vouchers approved by the commission under this
chapter.
(3) Sign all contracts and agreements in the name of the
commission that have been authorized by the commission. The
secretary shall attest to contracts signed by the president.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(b) If the president is absent or unable to act, the vice president shall
perform the president's duties.
SECTION 111. IC 10-18-1-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 8. (a) The secretary appointed by the
commission shall take an oath to faithfully perform the duties of the
secretary's office.
(b) The secretary shall do the following:
(1) Keep a record of the proceedings of the commission.
(2) Make a record of contracts and obligations.
(3) Furnish each contractor with a copy of the contractor's
contract that:
(A) is endorsed "approved by order of the commission";
(B) lists the date of the approval; and
(C) is signed by the secretary.
A contract is not valid until endorsed and delivered by the
secretary.
(4) Certify all vouchers ordered by the commission.
(5) Keep a set of books to show the financial condition of the
commission.
(6) Make quarterly statements as provided in this chapter of the
costs and expenditures of the commission, a complete list of
vouchers, and for what purpose and to whom paid. The reports
shall be filed with the state comptroller as provided in this chapter
and are open to the inspection and use of the general assembly.
(c) The secretary shall give a bond in the sum of ten thousand
dollars ($10,000) for the faithful performance of the secretary's duties.
(d) The contracts for any purpose connected with the Indiana World
War Memorial shall be recorded by the secretary in a book kept for that
purpose. The secretary shall retain on file all vouchers and other
valuable papers of value to the commission, to the contractor, and to
the public.
SECTION 112. IC 10-18-1-9 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 9. (a) The
commission department may employ a superintendent.
(b) The superintendent shall give bond in an amount and with surety
to be approved by the commission. department.
(c) The superintendent's duties and compensation shall be
prescribed by the department. commission.
SECTION 113. IC 10-18-1-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 10. (a) The
commission department shall employ an individual who is responsible
for the care and preservation of all personal property owned by the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


commission department that has historic significance.
(b) The individual employed by the commission department under
subsection (a) must meet the qualifications set by the division of state
museums and historic sites of the department of natural resources.
SECTION 114. IC 10-18-1-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 319, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 11. (a) The commission
department shall do the following:
(1) Keep a record of the commission's proceedings.
(2) Make a quarterly report for public use that includes the
following:
(A) A detailed account of the expenditures of the commission.
department to administer this chapter.
(B) A summary of the commission's proceedings that includes:
(i) a statement of all contracts let;
(ii) the name of the person to whom the contracts were let;
and
(iii) the amount of each contract.
(b) The report required under subsection (a) must be filed with the
state comptroller.
(c) Reports created and filed under this section are public records.
SECTION 115. IC 10-18-1-12 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 12. (a) The commission may adopt rules that
set forth:
(1) the time, place, and method of calling and conducting
meetings; and
(2) the manner and method of the conduct of business, including:
(A) the government and regulation of the commission's
employees; and
(B) the management of the ground and premises under the
commission's care and control;
as the commission considers prudent and not inconsistent with this
chapter and other statutes.
(b) The commission shall meet at the call of the commission's
president or at the time set forth in the commission's rules. A majority
of the members constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
However, all official action of the commission must receive the
approval in a meeting of a majority of all the members of the
commission.
SECTION 116. IC 10-18-1-13 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 13. (a) The
commission shall designate one (1) of its members to department
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


shall do the following:
(1) Assume general charge of and preserve all Indiana battle
flags.
(2) Have custody of all battle and organization flags in the
possession of the state that were used by any of the military
organizations of the state:
(A) in any of the wars or campaigns in which the United States
has been engaged; and
(B) in which Indiana veterans have participated.
(3) In the preservation of the battle flags, as far as possible, see
that the name and the branch of service in which the organization
served are attached to or preserved with the flag.
(4) Collect data in reference to each organization or military unit
whose flag is in the possession of the commission and place the
data with the flag or banner of each of the organizations or
military units.
(b) The commission department shall do the following:
(1) Collect Indiana battle flags not in the possession of the state
from the United States, patriotic societies, or individuals.
(2) Reinforce, collect the data for, and otherwise prepare all battle
flags for preservation.
(3) Collect, systematize, and prepare a brief history of each flag
and index and catalogue each flag.
(4) Collect, purchase, and procure all necessary materials for the
preservation of the flags.
(5) For the purpose of collecting and preparing the necessary data,
reinforcing the flags, and performing other duties required by this
chapter:
(A) with the approval of the budget agency, employ and fix the
compensation of employees as may be necessary; and
(B) purchase material of any character that is required in
carrying out this chapter.
SECTION 117. IC 10-18-1-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.30-2013,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 14. (a) The Indiana battle flags fund is
established to restore and preserve Indiana battle flags.
(b) The department: commission:
(1) shall administer the fund; and
(2) may spend the money in the fund for the purposes of the fund.
(c) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(d) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public funds may be invested. Interest that accrues
from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(e) All money accruing to the fund is appropriated continuously for
the purposes of the fund.
(f) Money in the fund at the end of a fiscal year does not revert to
the state general fund.
SECTION 118. IC 10-18-1-15 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 15. (a) All flag
cases completed shall be in the custody of the department
commission. The superintendent shall have the cases cleaned
periodically as necessary.
(b) The department commission may determine the method and
manner in which the flags shall be preserved.
SECTION 119. IC 10-18-1-16 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 16. (a) Out-lot
five (5) and out-lot thirty-six (36), in Indianapolis, according to the
original plat of the city, are dedicated and set apart as grounds for the
Indiana War Memorial subject to the provisions of this chapter.
(b) Out-lots five (5) and thirty-six (36) dedicated in subsection (a),
together with all or any part of squares five (5) and sixteen (16) or any
part of those squares, in Indianapolis, according to the original plat of
the city, that are acquired, dedicated, and set apart and added to the real
estate dedicated in subsection (a) by:
(1) the state; or
(2) Indianapolis, by Marion County, or Indianapolis and Marion
County jointly and then conveyed by the city, county, or city and
county jointly by proper deed, grant, or contract to the state;
for War Memorial and other public purposes constitutes and shall be
referred to as "Memorial Place". The permanent name of "Memorial
Place" shall be selected by the department. commission.
(c) A necessity is declared to exist to limit:
(1) the kind, character, and height of buildings upon; and
(2) the use of real estate and buildings that are located within
three hundred (300) feet of the outside boundaries of;
Memorial Place as constituted in this chapter. The department
commission may acquire, by purchase, donation, or condemnation, the
right to limit the kind, character, and height of buildings upon and the
use of real estate and buildings on real estate within three hundred
(300) feet of the outside boundaries of Memorial Place.
(d) The department commission shall erect and maintain in
Indianapolis, upon or within grounds dedicated or acquired under this
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


chapter, as the department commission considers best, a suitable
structure or structures:
(1) to commemorate the valor and sacrifice of the soldiers, sailors,
and marines of the United States and of all others who rendered
faithful, loyal, heroic, and self-sacrificing service at home and
overseas in World War I;
(2) to provide a place or places of meeting and headquarters for
organizations of soldiers, sailors, and marines or any other
patriotic societies or associations;
(3) to keep records, archives, documents, flags, mementos, and
relics; and
(4) for other public meetings and other public purposes;
to inculcate a true understanding and appreciation of the duties,
benefits, and privileges of American citizenship and inspire patriotism
and respect for the law to the end that peace may prevail, good will be
promoted, justice be administered and established, public order
maintained, and liberty and freedom under the law perpetuated.
SECTION 120. IC 10-18-1-17 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 17. (a) If squares
five (5) and sixteen (16) or any part of those squares in Indianapolis,
according to the original plat of the city, are acquired, dedicated, and
set apart and added to the real estate dedicated in this chapter by the
state for war memorial and other public purposes by Indianapolis, by
Marion County, or by the city and county jointly by proper deed,
contract, or grant, by which the city or county, or the city and county
jointly, convey the real estate or any part of the real estate to the state
for war memorial and other public purposes, the department
commission may accept from the city, the county, or the city and
county jointly the deed, grant, or contract by which the real estate or
any part of the real estate is conveyed to the state for war memorial and
other public purposes, subject to the terms, conditions, and provisions
contained in the deed, grant, or contract.
(b) The department commission may agree that, to the extent that
the city, the county, or the city and county jointly appropriate and use
money in the acquisition of the real estate or any part of the real estate,
the real estate and interests in the real estate and the memorial
structures erected on the real estate (to the extent of the money so
appropriated and used by the city, by the county, or by the county and
city jointly) shall be a city war memorial, a county war memorial, or a
joint war memorial.
(c) If the real estate or any part of the real estate is acquired and
conveyed to the state, the department commission may erect structures
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


on outlots five (5) and thirty-six (36) dedicated in this chapter or upon
any part of the real estate so dedicated or acquired as provided in this
chapter as the department commission considers best.
(d) The department commission shall develop any part or all of the
real estate described in this chapter that has been dedicated or acquired
as provided in this chapter as a memorial place, together with square
twenty-five (25), known as University Square in Indianapolis,
according to the original plat of the city, to secure a harmonious and
unified architectural and aesthetic effect of the entire series of grounds
used and dedicated for memorial purposes. The grounds must include
square twenty-five (25), known as University Square, which shall be
and constitute a part of the memorial park, and shall be used as a public
park.
(e) The department commission may sell buildings and
improvements situated on outlots five (5) and sixteen (16) when they
come under the commission's department's jurisdiction, custody, and
control or remove the buildings and improvements as the department
commission considers best. The department commission may contract
with Indianapolis, with Marion County, or with the county and city
jointly, concerning the use and rents of the buildings and improvements
on squares five (5) and sixteen (16) until it is necessary to remove the
buildings for the purpose of erecting the memorial structure or
structures. The department commission may contract with the city or
county or the city and county jointly with reference to the sale of
buildings and improvements upon the real estate that may be acquired
and conveyed to the state by the city or county or by the city and county
jointly for War Memorial and other public purposes. The contracts
must provide how the proceeds from the rent or sale of buildings and
improvements shall be applied.
SECTION 121. IC 10-18-1-18, AS AMENDED BY P.L.17-2005,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 18. The department commission may do the
following:
(1) Make and execute contracts and other instruments that may be
required in connection with the erection and maintenance of a
suitable structure or structures upon or within Memorial Place.
(2) Adopt rules for the following:
(A) The proper management, government, and use of
Memorial Place and the structures situated on Memorial Place.
(B) The government of employees.
(3) Acquire by condemnation the right to limit the kind, character,
and height of buildings upon and the use of real estate or
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


buildings located within three hundred (300) feet of the outside
boundaries.
(4) Adopt reasonable rules as are proper to limit the kind,
character, and height of buildings located or erected within three
hundred (300) feet of the outside boundaries of Memorial Place
and the use of the buildings or real estate. A building constructed
or maintained or business conducted in violation of any rule may
be abated as a nuisance in an action begun and prosecuted by the
department. commission.
(5) Receive donations, gifts, devises, and bequests and use them
in connection with the purposes of this chapter.
(6) Establish a nonprofit corporation to do the following:
(A) Promote public support for the purposes of the
department commission and this chapter.
(B) Preserve and promote the historical and educational
activities of the commission.
(C) Operate for the benefit of the purposes of the department
commission and this chapter.
The corporation is subject to audit by the state board of accounts
as if it were a state agency.
(7) Transfer money donated to the department commission for
the purposes described in subdivision (6) to a corporation
established under subdivision (6).
(8) Transfer:
(A) artifacts;
(B) images; or
(C) documents of cultural heritage, historical, or museum
relevance;
under the commission's department's control to a corporation
established under subdivision (6) without complying with
IC 5-22-21 and IC 5-22-22.
SECTION 122. IC 10-18-1-20 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 20. The
department commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 for the
government of the monument and Monument Circle. The rules are
binding and effective when approved by the governor.
SECTION 123. IC 10-18-1-21 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 21. (a) The
department: commission:
(1) has general control of the State Soldiers' and Sailors'
Monument Circle; and
(2) may employ a superintendent.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(b) The superintendent may, with the advice and consent of the
department commission, appoint engineers, elevator operators,
electricians, and watchmen as are actually required, all of whom are
subject to removal at any time by the department commission for any
reason satisfactory to the commission. department.
(c) The superintendent:
(1) has direct charge and supervision of the monument and
Monument Circle, subject to the orders of the department;
commission; and
(2) may require watchmen to act as elevator operators and
elevator operators to act as watchmen.
(d) The superintendent and the engineers, watchmen, and elevator
operators have police powers with all powers of a constable.
SECTION 124. IC 10-18-1-22, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 320, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 22. (a) The superintendent
shall execute a bond in the penal sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000),
to be approved by the department. commission.
(b) The superintendent shall:
(1) on the first day of each month, make a sworn statement to the
state comptroller of all receipts and expenditures, with vouchers
attached for the preceding month, on account of the monument;
and
(2) at the same time, pay over to the treasurer of state all money
received by the superintendent from all sources in the operation
of the monument for the preceding month.
The state comptroller shall draw a warrant on the treasurer of state,
payable to the superintendent, engineers, elevator operators, and
watchmen, for the amounts due them as salaries and to the
superintendent for a total of expenditures other than salaries incurred
in the management of the monument and Monument Circle as shown
by the vouchers.
SECTION 125. IC 10-18-1-25 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 25. A person who
intentionally damages or removes any of the property of the state on
Monument Circle is liable for the payment of a penalty not less than
twice the sum necessary to repair the damage or restore the lost
property. The penalty may be collected by the department commission
in a civil action.
SECTION 126. IC 10-18-1-26 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 26. (a) The
department commission may do the following:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(1) Make or sell the following:
(A) Pictures, models, books, and other representations of the
monuments and grounds.
(B) Souvenirs.
(2) Establish and maintain souvenir shops on property that the
department commission manages.
(3) Hire and pay salaries for full-time or part-time employees for
the souvenir shops.
(4) Contract with a nonprofit organization or corporation for the
continuous management of the souvenir shops.
(5) Report annually to the governor on the activities, revenues,
expenditures, and profits of the souvenir shops.
(b) Notwithstanding section 27 of this chapter, the following apply
to the profits from souvenir shop sales:
(1) The souvenir shop fund is established. The souvenir shop fund
shall be administered by the department. commission.
(2) Profits from the sales at souvenir shops established under
subsection (a) shall be deposited in the souvenir shop fund.
(3) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the souvenir
shop fund not currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund
in the same manner as other public funds may be invested.
(4) The expenses of administering the souvenir shop fund shall be
paid from money in the fund.
(5) The department commission may spend the money in the
souvenir shop fund for the following purposes:
(A) Maintenance or repair of properties managed by the
department. commission.
(B) Maintenance, repair, and acquisition of the following:
(i) Battle flags.
(ii) Appropriate artifacts.
(iii) Appropriate memorabilia.
(6) All money accruing to the souvenir shop fund is appropriated
continuously for the purposes listed in subdivision (5).
(7) Money in the souvenir shop fund at the end of a state fiscal
year does not revert to the state general fund.
(c) A person may not make or sell pictures, models, books, or other
representations of the monuments or grounds unless the person is
authorized to do so by the department. commission.
SECTION 127. IC 10-18-1-28 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 28. The
superintendent of the State Soldiers' and Sailors' Monument and of
Monument Circle and those serving under the superintendent who are
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


appointed by the department commission have police powers and may
make arrests or do other things as may be needed to enforce the laws
for the protection and care of the monuments and Monument Circle.
SECTION 128. IC 10-18-1-29 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 29. The
department commission may grant the use for public purposes of any
structures or any parts of structures erected by the commission
department under this chapter without rent or charge or for only a
nominal rental:
(1) to any organizations of soldiers, sailors, and marines and
others as a place for their meeting and headquarters and for the
keeping of records, archives, documents, flags, mementos, and
relics; and
(2) for other public meetings and other public purposes not
inconsistent with the purpose of this chapter;
for the time and upon the terms and conditions as the commission
department determines.
SECTION 129. IC 10-18-1-30 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 30. (a) The
department commission may not enter into a contract for:
(1) the purchase or sale of property, material, or supplies; or
(2) the performance of work or labor, except for salaries of
employees;
if the work and labor or materials and supplies cost more than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) without first giving notice of its intention
to purchase or sell the materials or supplies or to contract for the work
or labor by publication in a newspaper of general circulation printed
and published in the English language in Indianapolis for two (2)
successive weeks before the time fixed for the letting of the contract or
the sale of the property.
(b) A contract under this section must be in writing. The other
contracting party shall furnish bond for the faithful performance of the
contract in an amount fixed by the department commission and with
surety to the department's commission's approval, conditioned upon
the faithful performance of the contract. However, if the department
commission decides to purchase a patented article or material or an
article or material of a special type, character, or design of construction
or make that may be purchased from only one (1) person, firm, limited
liability company, or corporation, their agents or representatives, or for
which there is a fixed, standard price, the department commission is
not required to take or receive competitive bids. However, the
department commission shall publish in the manner set forth under
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


subsection (a) the number and character of the article or kind and
quality of material proposed to be purchased, the unit price, and the
total sum to be paid.
(c) A contract made in violation of this section is void.
SECTION 130. IC 10-18-1-32 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 32. The
department, commission, with the approval of the governor, may let
a contract for the erection of additional structures on the site of the
Indiana World War Memorial, in accordance with plans and
specifications adopted by the commission, department, with the
approval of the governor, to any competent and reliable contractor.
SECTION 131. IC 10-18-1-33 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 33. (a) The
department commission shall commemorate the valor of those loyal
citizens of this state who served with the armed forces of the United
States during World War II and the Korean Conflict by placing their
names in the archives of the World War Memorial located at
Indianapolis.
(b) The names must be placed in the archives in the same manner
as those honored by Indiana who served in World War I.
SECTION 132. IC 10-18-1-34 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 34. (a) The
department commission shall commemorate the valor of those loyal
citizens of Indiana who served with the armed forces of the United
States during the Vietnam conflict by placing their names in the
archives of the World War Memorial located at Indianapolis.
(b) The names must be placed in the archives in the same manner
as those honored by Indiana who served in World War I, World War II,
and the Korean Conflict.
SECTION 133. IC 10-18-1-38, AS AMENDED BY P.L.158-2013,
SECTION 169, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 38. It is a Level 6 felony for
a member of the commission or the architect, secretary, superintendent,
or any other person in the employ of the department commission to:
(1) knowingly be interested in or derive any profit from any
contract, employment, or purchase connected with the Indiana
World War Memorial or with any action of the department;
commission; or
(2) knowingly be interested in any claim against the department
commission or the state growing out of the erection or
maintenance of the Indiana World War Memorial;
other than for the compensation for their services or for their expenses
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


as provided in this chapter.
SECTION 134. IC 10-18-2-18 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 18. In the
establishment and maintenance of a county world war memorial, a
county executive or a board of trustees of a joint county and city world
war memorial has all the powers and duties conferred upon the Indiana
department of veterans' affairs Indiana War Memorials Commission
under IC 10-18-1, in so far as the powers and duties are not
inconsistent with this chapter. However, a county executive or board
may not employ a secretary.
SECTION 135. IC 10-18-3-18, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 321, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. (a) The governor may appoint
a commission known as the memorial art commission.
(b) The commission must consist of not more than seven (7)
qualified persons who serve without pay. However, members are to be
paid necessary expenses as certified by the governor to the state
comptroller.
(c) The commission shall consider the artistic qualities of a plan for
a proposed memorial.
(d) A memorial consisting of a building, monument, statue, tablet,
picture, arch, or work of art of any kind may not be erected without
first:
(1) submitting the plans to the memorial art commission; and
(2) securing criticism and advice from the commission with
respect to the memorial.
If a state art commission is established by law, it is ex officio the
memorial art commission.
(e) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 136. IC 10-18-4-19 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 19. In the
establishment and maintenance of a World War memorial, a city's
board of public works or the board of trustees of a joint county and city
World War memorial has all the powers and duties conferred upon the
Indiana department of veterans' affairs Indiana war memorials
commission under IC 10-18-1 to the extent the powers and duties
conferred in IC 10-18-1 are not inconsistent with this chapter.
However, this chapter does not authorize a city's board of public works
or a board of trustees of a joint county and city World War memorial
to employ a secretary.
SECTION 137. IC 10-19-3-3.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 77, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3.5. (a) For purposes of this section, "EMS"
means emergency medical services.
(b) For purposes of this section, "state EMS medical director" refers
to the state emergency medical services medical director appointed
under subsection (c).
(c) The executive director shall appoint an individual to serve as the
state emergency medical services medical director. The individual must
have the following qualifications:
(1) Thorough knowledge of state EMS laws and administrative
rules and regulations.
(2) At least five (5) years experience in the following:
(A) Medical direction of out of hospital EMS.
(B) Emergency department treatment of acutely ill and injured
patients.
(3) Significant experience and familiarity with the following:
(A) The design and operation of statewide EMS systems.
(B) Working with national and other state EMS committees.
(4) At the time of the individual's appointment, has a valid and
unrestricted license to practice medicine in Indiana.
(5) Be certified by the American Board of Emergency Medicine.
(6) Other areas of knowledge and expertise that the executive
director determines essential.
The state EMS medical director shall be an employee of the
department.
(d) The executive director shall submit the name of the individual
whom the executive director would like to appoint as state EMS
medical director to the Indiana emergency medical services fire and
EMS standards and education commission created by IC 16-31-2-1.
IC 16-31-2-1.5. The commission may, by a majority of the members,
vote not later than thirty (30) days after the submission on whether to
approve the appointment. If the commission:
(1) does not take any action; or
(2) by a majority of the commission votes to approve the
appointment of the individual;
not later than thirty (30) days after, the appointment shall become
effective. If a majority of the commission votes not later than thirty (30)
days after the submission of the appointment to not approve the
appointment, the executive director shall restart the appointment
process and submit an alternative individual for appointment.
(e) The state EMS medical director shall oversee all pre-hospital
aspects of the statewide EMS system, including the following:
(1) Medical components for systems of care that interface or
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


integrate with the statewide EMS system, including the following:
(A) Statewide planning for trauma, burn, cardiac, and stroke
care.
(B) Domestic preparedness.
(C) EMS for children.
(2) For all levels of emergency responders, establishment of the
following:
(A) Statewide model guidelines and best practices for all
patient care activities to ensure delivery of medical care
consistent with professionally recognized standards.
(B) A statewide EMS continuous quality improvement
program.
(C) A statewide EMS advocacy program.
(3) In cooperation with appropriate state and local agencies,
training and certification of all EMS providers.
(f) The state EMS medical director shall assist the executive director
on all issues related to statewide EMS, including the following:
(1) Consulting with EMS medical directors.
(2) In consultation with the Indiana emergency medical services
fire and EMS standards and education commission created by
IC 16-31-2-1, IC 16-31-2-1.5, providing guidance and assistance
on the following matters:
(A) Scope of practice for EMS providers.
(B) Restrictions placed on EMS certifications.
(C) Appropriate corrective and disciplinary actions for EMS
personnel.
(D) Education and training on emerging issues in EMS.
(3) EMS system research.
(4) Coordination of all medical activities for disaster planning and
response.
(5) Improving quality of care, research, and injury prevention
programs.
(6) Partnering with state agencies, including the Indiana
department of health and state educational institutions, to develop
public safety education and outreach programs.
SECTION 138. IC 10-19-3-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2020,
SECTION 50, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Except as provided in this section, for
purposes of IC 4-22-2, the executive director is the authority that
adopts rules for the department.
(b) The Indiana emergency medical services fire and EMS
standards and education commission is the authority that adopts rules
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


under IC 16-31.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), the fire prevention and
building safety commission is the authority that adopts rules under any
of the following:
(1) IC 22-11.
(2) IC 22-12.
(3) IC 22-13.
(4) IC 22-14.
(5) IC 22-15.
(d) (c) The board of firefighting personnel standards and education
Indiana fire and EMS standards and education commission is the
authority that adopts rules under IC 22-14-2-7(c)(7) and IC 36-8-10.5.
(e) (d) The executive director may adopt rules governing:
(1) emergency action plans; or
(2) emergency response plans;
for outdoor performances (as defined in IC 22-12-1-17.5) where
outdoor event equipment (as defined in IC 22-12-1-17.7) is used.
SECTION 139. IC 10-19-7-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 40, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The state fire marshal appointed under
IC 22-14-2-2 shall manage the department's administration of the
following:
(1) IC 22-11.
(2) IC 22-12.
(3) IC 22-13.
(4) IC 22-14.
(5) IC 22-15.
(b) In carrying out the duties under subsection (a), the state fire
marshal shall do the following:
(1) Provide department staff to support the fire prevention and
building safety commission established by IC 22-12-2-1.
(2) partner with state agencies, including the Indiana department
of health and state educational institutions, to develop public
safety education and outreach programs.
(c) The state fire marshal may not exercise any powers or perform
any duties specifically assigned to either of the following:
(1) The fire prevention and building safety commission.
(2) the state building commissioner.
(d) The state fire marshal may delegate the state fire marshal's
authority to the appropriate department staff.
SECTION 140. IC 11-12-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 82, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The department shall adopt under IC 4-22-2
minimum standards for county jails governing:
(1) general physical and environmental conditions;
(2) services and programs to be provided to confined persons;
(3) procedures for the care and control of confined persons that
are necessary to ensure the health and safety of confined persons,
the security of the jail, and public safety; and
(4) the restraint of pregnant inmates. Rules adopted under this
subdivision must be consistent with IC 11-10-3.5.
However, the department may not adopt any standard that prohibits the
placement of more than one (1) prisoner in a prisoner cell that has
thirty-five (35) square feet or more of floor space per prisoner.
(b) The standards must be sufficiently flexible to foster the
development of new and improved practices and to accommodate local
needs and circumstances. The standards must be consistent with the
laws of Indiana and the rules of the Indiana department of health and
the fire prevention and building safety commission. department of
homeland security.
(c) The commissioner shall select a committee of not less than five
(5) county sheriffs to consult with the department before and during the
drafting of the proposed minimum standards. County sheriffs shall be
selected from the various classes of counties to ensure that densely,
moderately, and sparsely populated counties are represented. Each
county sheriff is entitled to the minimum salary per diem as provided
in IC 4-10-11-2.1 for each day engaged in the official business of the
committee and to reimbursement for traveling and other expenses, as
provided in the state travel policies and procedures established by the
Indiana department of administration and approved by the budget
agency.
(d) At least sixty (60) days before setting the date for a public
hearing under IC 4-22-2, the department shall forward copies of the
proposed minimum standards to each county sheriff and each board of
county commissioners and shall solicit their views and suggestions.
SECTION 141. IC 12-7-2-34, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2024,
SECTION 75, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 34. "Commission" means the following:
(1) For purposes of IC 12-10-2, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-10-2-1.
(2) For purposes of IC 12-12-2, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-12-2-1.
(3) For purposes of IC 12-13-14, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-13-14-1.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(4) For purposes of IC 12-15-30.5, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-15-30.5-2.
(5) (3) For purposes of IC 12-15-33, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-15-33-1.
(6) (4) For purposes of IC 12-21-7.1, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-21-7.1-1.
(7) (5) For purposes of IC 12-28-1, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-28-1-3.
SECTION 142. IC 12-7-2-44, AS AMENDED BY P.L.6-2012,
SECTION 81, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 44. "Council" means the following:
(1) For purposes of IC 12-9-4, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-9-4-1.
(2) For purposes of IC 12-12-8, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-12-8-2.5.
(3) For purposes of IC 12-13-4, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-13-4-1.
(4) (3) For purposes of IC 12-12.7-2, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-12.7-2-2.
(5) (4) For purposes of IC 12-21-4, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-21-4-1.
SECTION 143. IC 12-7-2-87.8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.210-2015,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 87.8. "Food retailer", for purposes of
IC 12-13-14, has the meaning set forth in IC 12-13-14-1(f).
IC 12-13-14-1.
SECTION 144. IC 12-7-2-142, AS AMENDED BY P.L.171-2011,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 142. "Political subdivision", for purposes of
the following statutes, has the meaning set forth in IC 36-1-2-13:
(1) IC 12-8.
(2) IC 12-13-4.
(3) (2) IC 12-32-1.
SECTION 145. IC 12-8-2.5-11, AS ADDED BY P.L.160-2012,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) A member who is not a state employee is
not entitled to both either of the following:
(1) The minimum salary per diem provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b).
(2) Reimbursement for travel expenses and other expenses
actually incurred in connection with the member's duties. as
provided in the state travel policies and procedures established by
the Indiana department of administration and approved by the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


budget agency.
(b) A member who is a state employee is entitled to reimbursement
for travel expenses and other expenses actually incurred in connection
with the member's duties, as provided in the state travel policies and
procedures established by the Indiana department of administration and
approved by the budget agency.
(c) A member who is a member of the general assembly is entitled
to receive the same per diem, mileage, and travel allowances paid to
members of the general assembly serving on interim study committees
established by the legislative council.
SECTION 146. IC 12-11-14-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.12-2016,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The ABLE board of the authority is
established. The board consists of the following:
(1) The following four (4) ex officio members:
(A) The treasurer of state.
(B) The secretary of family and social services.
(C) The budget director.
(D) The executive director of the Indiana housing and
community development authority.
(2) Five (5) appointed members who:
(A) are appointed by the governor; and
(B) consist of the following: appointed as follows:
(i) (A) One (1) member appointed by the governor who
has significant experience in actuarial analysis, accounting,
investment management, or other areas of finance that are
relevant to the authority.
(ii) (B) One (1) member appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives who has significant legal expertise
and knowledge of estate planning.
(iii) (C) One (1) member appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate who is a representative of a statewide
organization that advocates on behalf of individuals with
disabilities.
(iv) (D) One (1) member who is an individual with a
disability.
(v) (E) One (1) member who is a family member of an
individual with a disability.
(b) A certificate of appointment or reappointment of each member
shall be filed with the authority, and this certificate is conclusive
evidence of the due and proper appointment of the member.
(c) Not more than three (3) of the appointed members of the board
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


may belong to the same political party.
(d) An appointed member serves a four (4) year term. An appointed
member shall hold over after the expiration of the member's term until
the member's successor is appointed and qualified.
(e) The governor appointing authority may reappoint an appointed
member of the board.
(f) A vacancy shall be filled for the balance of an unexpired term in
the same manner as the original appointment.
(g) The treasurer of state shall serve as chairperson of the board.
The board shall annually elect one (1) of its ex officio members as vice
chairperson and may elect any other officer the board desires. The
board shall meet at the call of the chairperson and as provided in the
bylaws of the authority.
(h) The governor appointing authority may remove an appointed
member for misfeasance, malfeasance, willful neglect of duty, or other
cause.
(i) An appointed member of the board is not entitled to the
minimum salary per diem provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). However,
each appointed member is entitled to reimbursement for traveling
expenses and other expenses actually incurred in connection with the
member's duties.
(j) An ex officio member of the board is entitled to reimbursement
for traveling expenses and other expenses actually incurred in
connection with the member's duties.
(k) An ex officio member of the board may designate a person to
serve as an ex officio member of the board in the absence of the ex
officio member.
(l) The majority of the members of the board constitute a quorum for
the purposes of conducting the board's business and exercising the
board's powers and for all other purposes. Vacant positions may not be
counted when determining whether a majority of the members is
present.
(m) The affirmative vote of a majority of all the members of the
board who are present is necessary for the authority to take action. A
vacancy in the membership of the board does not impair the right of a
quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the
authority. An action taken by the board under this article may be
authorized by:
(1) resolution at any regular or special meeting; or
(2) unanimous consent of all the members who have not
abstained.
A resolution takes effect immediately upon adoption and need not be
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


published or posted.
SECTION 147. IC 12-13-4-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. This chapter expires December
31, 2026.
SECTION 148. IC 12-13-14-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.210-2015,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "automated
teller machine" means an electronic hardware device owned or
operated by or on behalf of a financial institution or retailer that is
capable of dispensing currency and responding to balance inquiries
through the use of a magnetic stripe card issued by or on behalf of the
division for distribution of assistance through an EBT system as
described in this chapter.
(b) As used in this chapter, "commission" refers to the electronic
benefits transfer commission established by this chapter.
(c) (b) As used in this chapter, "Department" refers to the United
States Department of Health and Human Services.
(d) (c) As used in this chapter, "EBT program" means an electronic
benefits transfer program.
(e) (d) As used in this chapter, "financial institution" means a bank,
trust company, savings institution, credit union, or any other
organization:
(1) whose principal business activity is providing banking or
financial services to the public; and
(2) that is organized, supervised, and authorized to do business in
Indiana under IC 28 or Title 12 of the United States Code.
(f) (e) As used in this chapter, "food retailer" means a retailer that:
(1) sells food items to consumers; and
(2) has been authorized under 7 CFR 278 to participate in SNAP.
(g) (f) As used in this chapter, "person" includes any individual or
entity described in IC 6-2.5-1-3.
(h) (g) As used in this chapter, "point of sale terminal" means an
electronic hardware device that is:
(1) used at a retailer's place of business where consumers pay for
goods or services; and
(2) capable of:
(A) initiating a request for authorization of a purchase of
tangible personal property;
(B) disbursing currency from an account;
(C) initiating a balance inquiry for an account; or
(D) distributing assistance through an EBT system as
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


described in this chapter.
(i) (h) As used in this chapter, "primary business" means more than
fifty percent (50%) of the gross retail income (as defined in
IC 6-2.5-1-5) attributable to the location or premises where the
business is located.
(j) (i) As used in this chapter, "retailer" means a person that, in the
ordinary course of business:
(1) sells or transfers tangible personal property; or
(2) provides or performs services for compensation;
to consumers.
(k) (j) As used in this chapter, "Secretary" refers to the Secretary of
the United States Department of Agriculture.
SECTION 149. IC 12-13-14-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.210-2015,
SECTION 38, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The electronic benefits transfer commission
is established.
(b) The commission consists of eight (8) members appointed by the
secretary of family and social services as follows:
(1) Two (2) employees of the office of the secretary of family and
social services.
(2) Two (2) members of the Indiana Grocers and Convenience
Store Association, nominated by the chief executive officer of the
Indiana Grocers and Convenience Store Association for
consideration by the secretary of family and social services.
(3) Two (2) members of the Indiana Bankers Association,
nominated by the chief executive officer of the Indiana Bankers
Association for consideration by the office of the secretary of
family and social services.
(4) Two (2) persons representing recipients of SNAP benefits or
TANF benefits. One (1) person shall be nominated by the Indiana
Food and Nutrition Network, and one (1) person shall be
nominated by the Indiana Coalition for Human Services for
consideration by the secretary of family and social services.
(c) The terms of office shall be for three (3) years. The members
serve at the will of the secretary of family and social services. A
vacancy on the commission shall be filled by the secretary of family
and social services in the same manner the original appointment was
made.
(d) The secretary of family and social services shall appoint the
initial chairperson from among the members of the commission. The
commission shall meet on the call of the chairperson. When the
chairperson's term expires, the commission shall elect a new
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


chairperson from among the membership of the commission.
(e) The division shall provide staff needed for the commission to
operate under this chapter.
(f) The commission members are not eligible for per diem
reimbursement or reimbursement for expenses incurred for travel to
and from commission meetings.
(g) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 150. IC 12-13-16-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.73-2020,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) As used in this chapter, "advisory
committee" refers to the 211 advisory committee established by section
9 of this chapter.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 151. IC 12-13-16-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.241-2023,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The 211 advisory committee is established.
The advisory committee includes the following members appointed by
the governor or the governor's designee:
(1) Two (2) members, each of whom represents a different
Indiana United Way entity.
(2) Two (2) members, each of whom represents a different local
service agency that receives referrals from 211.
(3) Seven (7) members representing the types of human services
provided under this chapter.
(4) One (1) individual representing the Indiana Association of
Rehabilitation Facilities.
(b) The initial members of the advisory committee serve the
following terms:
(1) Three (3) members serve a term of one (1) year.
(2) Five (5) members serve a term of two (2) years.
(3) Five (5) members serve a term of four (4) years.
Members appointed to the advisory committee thereafter serve terms
of four (4) years.
(c) The governor or the governor's designee shall appoint the
chairperson of the advisory committee.
(d) The advisory committee shall do the following:
(1) Provide input and consultation regarding implementation and
administration of 211 services by the office of the secretary to
ensure compliance with any requirements or obligations under
this chapter.
(2) Advise the office of the secretary and make recommendations
concerning the use of and goals for 211 services.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(e) The office of the secretary shall staff the advisory committee.
The expenses of the advisory committee shall be paid by the office of
the secretary.
(f) Each member of the advisory committee who is not a state
employee is entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by
IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member is also entitled to reimbursement for
traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses
actually incurred in connection with the member's duties as provided
in the state policies and procedures established by the Indiana
department of administration and approved by the budget agency.
(g) Each member of the advisory committee who is a state employee
is entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under
IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in connection with
the member's duties as provided in the state policies and procedures
established by the Indiana department of administration and approved
by the budget agency.
(h) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 152. IC 12-15-30.5-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.116-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "commission" refers
to the nonemergency medical transportation commission established by
section 7 of this chapter.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 153. IC 12-15-30.5-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.116-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Before October 1, 2019, the office of the
secretary shall prepare a report containing the number of Medicaid
fee-for-service nonemergency medical transportation claims paid by:
(1) vehicle type;
(2) Medicaid recipient category; and
(3) whether the recipient for which the claim was paid resided in:
(A) the community;
(B) a health facility;
(C) an intermediate care facility for individuals with
intellectual disabilities;
(D) a hospital; or
(E) another location.
(b) Beginning June 1, 2016, through May 31, 2019, the claims data
reported in subsection (a) must be organized by month.
(c) The office of the secretary shall submit the report prepared under
subsection (a) to the commission.
(d) This section expires December 31, 2026.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


SECTION 154. IC 12-15-30.5-7, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The nonemergency medical transportation
commission is established for the purpose of overseeing the provision
of nonemergency medical transportation services to ensure that
Medicaid fee-for-service recipients are receiving satisfactory service
and to ensure that brokers pay the claims of transportation providers in
a timely manner.
(b) The commission consists of the following members:
(1) Two (2) members of the senate, who may not be members of
the same political party, appointed by the president pro tempore
of the senate with the advice of the minority leader of the senate.
(2) Two (2) members of the house of representatives, who may
not be members of the same political party, appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives with the advice of the
minority leader of the house of representatives.
(3) One (1) representative of the office of the secretary.
(4) One (1) individual representing a broker.
(5) One (1) individual representing a transportation provider that
has contracted with a broker.
(6) One (1) individual representing the Indiana Hospital
Association.
(7) One (1) individual representing the Indiana Health Care
Association.
(8) One (1) individual representing the Indiana Association of
Rehabilitation Facilities.
(9) One (1) individual representing the Arc of Indiana.
(10) One (1) physician licensed under IC 25-22.5.
(11) One (1) individual representing dialysis providers.
(12) One (1) Medicaid fee-for-service recipient.
(13) One (1) individual representing the Indiana Association of
Area Agencies on Aging.
(14) One (1) individual representing the Indiana Emergency
Medical Services Association.
(c) The members of the commission described in subsection (b)(1)
and (b)(2) shall serve:
(1) as nonvoting advisory members; and
(2) for a four (4) year term.
(d) The members of the commission described in subsection (b)(3)
through (b)(14) shall be appointed by the governor for terms of four (4)
years. The term of a member of the commission expires July 1.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


However, a member may continue to serve until a successor is
appointed. In case of a vacancy, the governor shall appoint an
individual to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term. The
governor shall designate one (1) member described in this subsection
as chairperson of the commission.
(e) The initial appointments beginning July 1, 2019, must be:
(1) made by the governor not later than October 1, 2019; and
(2) notwithstanding subsection (d), staggered as follows:
(A) Two (2) years for the members appointed under subsection
(b)(4), (b)(6), (b)(8), (b)(10), (b)(12), and (b)(14).
(B) Three (3) years for the members appointed under
subsection (b)(5), (b)(7), (b)(9), (b)(11), and (b)(13).
This subsection expires July 1, 2024.
(f) (e) The office shall provide staff support and technical assistance
to the commission, including the collection of and dissemination of
data and reports required by this chapter, in order for the commission
to carry out its duties under this chapter.
(f) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 155. IC 12-15-30.5-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.116-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Each member of the commission who is not
a state employee is entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided
by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). Such a member is also entitled to reimbursement
for traveling expenses and other expenses actually incurred in
connection with the member's duties, as provided in the state travel
policies and procedures established by the Indiana department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
(b) Each member of the commission who is a state employee but
who is not a member of the general assembly is entitled to
reimbursement for traveling expenses and other expenses actually
incurred in connection with the member's duties, as provided in the
state travel policies and procedures established by the Indiana
department of administration and approved by the budget agency.
(c) Each member of the commission who is a member of the general
assembly is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage, and travel
allowances paid to legislative members of interim study committees
established by the legislative council. Per diem, mileage, and travel
allowances paid under this subsection shall be paid from appropriations
made to the legislative council or the legislative services agency.
(d) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 156. IC 12-15-30.5-9, AS ADDED BY P.L.116-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The commission shall meet at least two (2)
times per year at a public meeting to do the following:
(1) Review a report submitted under this chapter.
(2) Provide feedback and make recommendations to the office of
the secretary concerning the provision of nonemergency medical
transportation services.
(3) Approve any monies to be awarded to a broker as part of a
withhold provision outlined in the contract between the office of
the secretary and the broker.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 157. IC 12-15-30.5-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.161-2025,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, and July 1
biennially thereafter, the commission shall submit a report to the
executive director of the legislative services agency, in an electronic
format under IC 5-14-6, for review by the interim committee on
government in accordance with IC 1-1-15.5-4 and IC 2-5-1.3-13(g).
The report shall describe:
(1) official action taken; and
(2) actionable items considered;
by the commission during the preceding two (2) years.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 158. IC 12-17.2-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 117, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The division may do the
following:
(1) Prescribe forms for reports, statements, notices, and other
documents required by this article or by the rules adopted under
this article.
(2) Increase public awareness of this article and the rules adopted
under this article by preparing and publishing manuals and guides
explaining this article and the rules adopted under this article.
(3) Facilitate compliance with and enforcement of this article
through the publication of materials under subdivision (2).
(4) Prepare reports and studies to advance the purpose of this
article.
(5) Seek the advice and recommendations of state agencies whose
information and knowledge would be of assistance in writing,
revising, or monitoring rules developed under this article. These
agencies, including the office of the attorney general, Indiana
department of health, division of mental health and addiction,
bureau of criminal identification and investigation, and fire
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


prevention and building safety commission, the department of
homeland security, shall upon request supply necessary
information to the division.
(6) Make the directory of licensees available to the public for a
charge not to exceed the cost of reproducing the directory.
(7) Charge a reasonable processing fee for each license
application and renewal as follows:
(A) For a child care center license, a fee of two dollars ($2) per
licensed child capacity.
(B) For a child care center new inquiry application packet, a
fee not to exceed five dollars ($5).
(C) For a child care home license new inquiry application
packet, a fee not to exceed five dollars ($5).
(D) For a child care home annual inspection, a fee not to
exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).
(8) Exercise any other regulatory and administrative powers
necessary to carry out the functions of the division.
SECTION 159. IC 12-17.2-2-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 118, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The division shall adopt rules
under IC 4-22-2 concerning the licensing and inspection of child care
centers and child care homes after consultation with the following:
(1) Indiana department of health.
(2) Fire prevention and building safety commission. Department
of homeland security.
(b) The rules adopted under subsection (a) shall be applied by the
division and state fire marshal in the licensing and inspection of
applicants for a license and licensees under this article.
SECTION 160. IC 12-17.2-2-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 44, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) A program operated to serve migrant
children that is exempted under section 8(6) of this chapter and is
certified by the United States Department of Health and Human
Services shall be:
(1) granted a provisional license by the division, for a limited
period not to exceed one (1) year and that is subject to review
every three (3) months, if the division determines that the
program reasonably complies with the rules adopted by the
division; and
(2) inspected by the department of homeland security.
(b) The division and the fire prevention and building safety
commission department of homeland security shall adopt rules under
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


IC 4-22-2 that apply only to programs operated to serve migrant
children that take into consideration the fact that the programs:
(1) operate in donated space;
(2) provide services for children from migrant worker families;
and
(3) are operated during a single period of less than one hundred
twenty (120) consecutive days during a calendar year.
(c) This section does not prohibit a program operated to serve
migrant children from applying for a license under this article.
SECTION 161. IC 12-17.2-2-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.225-2013,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The division may grant a variance or
waiver of a rule governing a provider. A variance or waiver granted
under this section must promote statewide practices and must protect
the rights of persons affected by this article.
(b) The division may grant a variance to a rule if a provider does the
following:
(1) Submits to the division a written request for the variance in
the form and manner specified by the division.
(2) Documents that compliance with an alternative method of
compliance approved by the division will not be adverse to the
health, safety, or welfare of a child receiving services from the
applicant for the variance, as determined by the division.
(c) A variance granted under subsection (b) must be conditioned
upon compliance with the alternative method approved by the division.
Noncompliance constitutes the violation of a rule of the division and
may be the basis for revoking the variance.
(d) The division may grant a waiver of a rule if a provider does the
following:
(1) Submits to the division a written request for the waiver in the
form and manner specified by the division.
(2) Documents that compliance with the rule specified in the
application for the waiver will create an undue hardship on the
applicant for the waiver, as determined by the division.
(3) Documents that the applicant for the waiver will be in
substantial compliance with the rules adopted by the division after
the waiver is granted, as determined by the division.
(4) Documents that noncompliance with the rule specified in the
application for a waiver will not be adverse to the health, safety,
or welfare of a child receiving services from the applicant for the
waiver, as determined by the division.
(e) Except for a variance or waiver of a rule governing child care
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


homes, a variance or waiver of a rule under this section that conflicts
with a building rule or fire safety rule adopted by the fire prevention
and building safety commission department of homeland security is
not effective until the variance or waiver is approved by the fire
prevention and building safety commission. department of homeland
security or, with the approval of the department of homeland
security, the state building commissioner.
SECTION 162. IC 12-17.2-2-12 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) If the division
determines that a waiver or variance expiring under section 11 of this
chapter will continue to serve the public interest, the division may do
the following:
(1) Renew the waiver or variance without modifications.
(2) Renew and modify the waiver or variance as needed to
promote statewide practices and to protect the rights of persons
affected by this article.
(b) Before taking an action under subsection (a), the division may
require a licensee under this article to do the following:
(1) Apply for the renewal of a waiver or variance on the form
specified by the division.
(2) Provide the information required by the division.
(c) Except for a waiver or variance of a rule governing child care
homes or foster homes, before taking an action under subsection (a),
the division must obtain the approval of the fire prevention and
building safety commission department of homeland security for the
action if either of the following occurs:
(1) The fire prevention and building safety commission
department of homeland security substantially changes a
building rule or fire safety rule affected by the waiver or variance
after the date the commission department of homeland security
last approved the waiver or variance.
(2) The division substantially modifies any part of a waiver or
variance that conflicts with a building rule or fire safety rule
adopted by the fire prevention and building safety commission.
department of homeland security.
SECTION 163. IC 12-17.2-2-14.2, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2014,
SECTION 68, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14.2. (a) As used in this section, "program" refers
to the paths to QUALITY program established by subsection (b).
(b) The paths to QUALITY program is established. The program is
a voluntary child care facility quality rating and improvement system
implemented by the division in partnership with the following
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


organizations under the trademark "Paths to QUALITY":
(1) Indiana Association for the Education of Young Children.
(2) Indiana Association for Child Care Resource and Referral.
(3) Indiana Head Start Collaboration Office.
(4) Department of education established by IC 20-19-3-1.
(5) Early Childhood Alliance.
(6) 4C of Southern Indiana.
(c) The program shall use four (4) levels at which a child care
facility participating in the program may be rated, with Level 4
indicating the highest level of quality child care.
(d) The office of the secretary shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
administer the paths to QUALITY program rating system. The rules
must include procedures that outline eligibility and application
procedures for the program, the establishment of procedures relating
to the rating process, and the establishment or alteration of standards
used in the rating process.
(e) The office of the secretary shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
establish the steering council of the program to make recommendations
to the division on program issues and resources. Rules adopted under
this subsection must require that council members be appointed from
partner organizations that assist in the implementation of the program
and serve to coordinate the program plan.
SECTION 164. IC 12-17.2-3.5-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) A facility where
a provider operates a child care program must have two (2) exits that:
(1) do not require passage through a:
(A) garage; or
(B) storage area;
where hazardous materials are stored;
(2) are not windows;
(3) are on different sides of the facility;
(4) are not blocked; and
(5) are operable from the inside without the use of a key or any
special knowledge.
(b) A provider shall:
(1) conduct monthly documented fire drills:
(A) in accordance with the rules of the fire prevention and
building safety commission; department of homeland
security; and
(B) that include complete evacuation of all:
(i) children; and
(ii) adults who provide child care;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


in the facility;
(2) maintain documentation of all fire drills conducted during the
immediately preceding twelve (12) month period, including:
(A) the date and time of the fire drill;
(B) the name of the individual who conducted the fire drill;
(C) the weather conditions at the time of the fire drill; and
(D) the amount of time required to fully evacuate the facility;
and
(3) maintain a two and one-half (2 1/2) pound or greater ABC
multiple purpose fire extinguisher:
(A) on each floor of the facility; and
(B) in the kitchen area of the facility;
in each facility where the provider operates a child care program.
SECTION 165. IC 12-17.2-5-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The fire prevention
and building safety commission department of homeland security
must provide consultation regarding the licensure of child care homes
to the division upon request.
SECTION 166. IC 12-17.2-5-6.5, AS AMENDED BY
P.L.134-2024, SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. To qualify for a license to
operate a class II child care home under this chapter, a person must do
the following:
(1) Provide all child care services on the first story of the child
care home unless the class II child care home meets the
exceptions to the first story requirements contained in the Indiana
building code adopted by the fire prevention and building safety
commission department of homeland security in effect at the
time the class II child care home provider applies for licensure.
(2) Provide a smoke detection system that is:
(A) hard wired to the building's electrical system; and
(B) wired in a manner that activates all of the detector devices
in the building when one (1) detector device is activated.
(3) Provide a fire extinguisher in each room that is used to
provide child care services.
(4) Meet:
(A) the exit requirements for an E-3 building occupancy
classification under the Indiana building code adopted by the
fire prevention and building safety commission, department
of homeland security, except for any illumination
requirements, in effect at the time the class II child care home
provider initially applies for licensure; and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92


(B) the illumination requirements established in section
6.3(b)(3) of this chapter.
(5) Provide a minimum of thirty-five (35) square feet for each
child.
(6) Conduct fire drills required under article 37 of the Indiana fire
prevention code adopted by the fire prevention and building
safety commission department of homeland security in effect
at the time the class II child care home provider applies for
licensure.
(7) Apply for a license before July 1, 1996, or after June 30, 2001.
(8) Comply with rules adopted by the division of family resources
for class II child care homes.
(9) Complete the training course taught or approved by the
division concerning safe sleeping practices for a child within the
person's care as described in IC 12-17.2-2-1(10).
SECTION 167. IC 12-17.2-5-36 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 36. The fire prevention
and building safety commission department of homeland security
may not adopt rules that classify a child care home as an E building
occupancy classification.
SECTION 168. IC 12-17.2-6-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 46, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) As used in this section, "primary use of the
building" means the occupancy classification that is:
(1) most closely related to the intended use of the building; and
(2) determined by the rules of the fire prevention and building
safety commission department of homeland security in effect
at the time that the child care ministry is first registered.
(b) The state fire marshal shall inspect a child care ministry
registered under section 2 of this chapter to ensure that the child care
ministry complies with the requirements of subsection (c).
(c) Except as provided in the following, a registered child care
ministry shall comply with all rules of the fire prevention and building
safety commission department of homeland security applicable to the
primary use of the building:
(1) A registered child care ministry with an occupant load of at
least fifty (50) shall do either of the following:
(A) Install and maintain a fire alarm system in compliance
with the rules of the fire prevention and building safety
commission. department of homeland security.
(B) Provide a notice on a form prescribed by the department
of homeland security to the parents of each child who attends
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

100
the ministry stating that the ministry does not have the same
level of fire safety protection as a licensed child care center.
(2) Each registered child care ministry with an occupant load of
less than fifty (50) shall do either of the following:
(A) Install and maintain in good operating condition at least
one (1) battery operated smoke detector in each room and
corridor used by the ministry.
(B) Provide a notice on a form prescribed by the department
of homeland security to the parents of each child who attends
the ministry stating that the ministry does not have the same
level of fire safety protection as a licensed child care center.
(3) Each registered child care ministry shall comply with the rules
of the fire prevention and building safety commission
department of homeland security concerning fire drills.
For purposes of this subsection, occupant load is determined by
dividing the total square footage of the area used by the child care
ministry by thirty-five (35) and rounding any result that is not a whole
number up to the next whole number.
(d) The state fire marshal shall make an inspection of a child care
ministry registered under section 2 of this chapter at least annually.
(e) During an inspection, the state fire marshal shall inspect the
structure in which the child care ministry is conducted for fire safety
and life safety with respect to the structure's primary use.
SECTION 169. IC 12-17.6-2-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.53-2014,
SECTION 111, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The office shall contract with
an independent organization to evaluate the program.
(b) The office shall report the results of each evaluation to the
(1) children's health policy board established by IC 4-23-27-2;
and
(2) interim study committee on public health, behavioral health,
and human services established by IC 2-5-1.3-4 in an electronic
format under IC 5-14-6.
(c) This section does not modify the requirements of other statutes
relating to the confidentiality of medical records.
SECTION 170. IC 12-17.6-2-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.53-2014,
SECTION 112, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. Not later than April 1, the office
shall provide a report describing the program's activities during the
preceding calendar year to the:
(1) budget committee;
(2) legislative council; and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

101
(3) children's health policy board established by IC 4-23-27-2;
and
(4) (3) interim study committee on public health, behavioral
health, and human services established by IC 2-5-1.3-4 in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
A report provided under this section to the legislative council must be
in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
SECTION 171. IC 12-17.6-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.103-2009,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The benefit package provided under the
program shall focus on age appropriate preventive, primary, and acute
care services.
(b) The office shall offer health insurance coverage for the following
basic services:
(1) Inpatient and outpatient hospital services.
(2) Physicians' services provided by a physician (as defined in 42
U.S.C. 1395x(r)).
(3) Laboratory and x-ray services.
(4) Well-baby and well-child care, including:
(A) age appropriate immunizations; and
(B) periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment services
according to a schedule developed by the office.
The office may offer services in addition to those listed in this
subsection if appropriations to the program exist to pay for the
additional services.
(c) The office shall offer health insurance coverage for the following
additional services if the office determines that the coverage for the
services has an actuarial value equal to or greater than the actuarial
value of the services provided by the benchmark program: determined
by the children's health policy board established by IC 4-23-27-2:
(1) Prescription drugs.
(2) Mental health services.
(3) Vision services.
(4) Hearing services.
(5) Dental services.
(d) Notwithstanding subsections (b) and (c), the office may not
impose treatment limitations or financial requirements on the coverage
of services for a mental illness if similar treatment limitations or
financial requirements are not imposed on coverage for services for
other illnesses. Coverage for mental illness under the program must
include the following:
(1) Inpatient mental health services and substance abuse services
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

102
provided in an institution that:
(A) treats mental disease; and
(B) has more than sixteen (16) beds;
unless coverage is prohibited by federal law.
(2) Psychiatric residential treatment services.
(3) Community mental health rehabilitation services.
(4) Outpatient mental health services and substance abuse
services, with no greater limitations on the number of units per
rolling year than are required under the Medicaid program.
However, the office may require prior authorization for the services
specified in subdivisions (1) through (4).
SECTION 172. IC 12-17.6-4-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) It is a violation
of IC 27-4-1-4 if an insurer, or an insurance producer or insurance
broker compensated by the insurer, knowingly or intentionally refers
an insured or the dependent of an insured to the program for health
insurance coverage when the insured already receives health insurance
coverage through an employer's health care plan that is underwritten by
the insurer.
(b) The office shall coordinate with the children's health policy
board under IC 4-23-27 to evaluate the need for mechanisms that
minimize the incentive for an employer to eliminate or reduce health
care coverage for an employee's dependents.
SECTION 173. IC 12-30-7-9 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 9. (a) The county
executive shall appoint a board of managers for the health center. The
board of managers shall be composed of eleven (11) county residents
appointed on the basis of the residents' recognized interest in and
demonstrated knowledge of the problems of the health center and the
proper care and treatment of the patients and residents. The board of
managers must be composed of any combination of the following:
(1) Physicians holding unlimited licenses to practice medicine in
Indiana.
(2) Licensed registered nurses, pharmacists licensed under
IC 25-26-13, or licensed dentists.
(3) Individuals appointed from business, industry, and the health
professions, or consumer representatives.
(4) Social workers.
(5) Dietitians.
(6) Professional engineers (as defined in IC 25-31-1-2).
IC 25-4-0.5-10).
(7) Any other resident of the county the board of commissioners
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

103
considers qualified.
(b) Not more than six (6) members of the board of managers may be
members of the same political party.
SECTION 174. IC 13-11-2-177.7, AS ADDED BY P.L.176-2023,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 177.7. "Qualified environmental
professional", for purposes of IC 13-23-13, means the following:
(1) A registered professional engineer (as defined in
IC 25-31-1-2). IC 25-4-0.5-10).
(2) A licensed professional geologist (as defined in
IC 25-17.6-1-6.5).
(3) A certified hazardous materials manager (CHMM) as certified
by the Institute of Hazardous Material Management.
(4) A professional soil scientist registered under IC 25-31.5-4-1.
SECTION 175. IC 13-18-3-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.113-2014,
SECTION 70, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 12. The board shall adopt rules providing
that whenever a person submits plans to a unit concerning the design
or construction of:
(1) a sanitary sewer or public water main, if:
(A) a professional engineer who is registered under IC 25-31
IC 25-4-3 prepared the plans;
(B) the unit provided for review of the plans by a qualified
engineer and subsequently approved the plans; and
(C) all other requirements specified in rules adopted by the
board are met; or
(2) a sanitary sewer extension for and within a subdivision, if:
(A) a qualified professional surveyor who is registered under
IC 25-21.5 prepared the plans;
(B) the subdivision is being laid out or having been laid out by
the professional surveyor subject to IC 25-21.5-7;
(C) the unit provided for review of the plans by a qualified
engineer and subsequently approved the plans; and
(D) all other requirements specified in rules adopted by the
board are met;
the plans are not required to be submitted to any state agency for a
permit, permission, or review, unless required by federal law.
SECTION 176. IC 13-20-13-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.37-2012,
SECTION 33, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. A person that obtains a certificate of
registration under section 3 of this chapter must do the following:
(1) Report annually to the department on the following:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

104
(A) The number of passenger tire equivalents received at the
waste tire storage site or by the waste tire processing
operation.
(B) The number and manner of disposal of the passenger tire
equivalents.
(2) Maintain contingency plans to protect public health and the
environment.
(3) If the person operates a waste tire storage site, maintain
financial assurance acceptable to the department necessary for
waste tire removal, in an amount specified in rules adopted by the
board under section 11(b)(3) of this chapter.
(4) Maintain a copy of the certificate of registration at the site.
(5) Comply with applicable rules and requirements established by
the fire prevention and building safety commission department
of homeland security for indoor waste tire storage sites.
(6) Retain a copy of manifests received from a waste tire
transporter under IC 13-20-14 for at least one (1) year and make
a copy of the manifests available to the department upon request.
SECTION 177. IC 13-20-26-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.153-2023,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) There is established a central Indiana waste
diversion project for the following purposes:
(1) Determining the most practical and effective means of:
(A) addressing domestic supply chain disruptions that result
in:
(i) scarcity of raw materials necessary for manufacturing and
other industries in Indiana;
(ii) increased prices of those raw materials; and
(iii) manufacturing delays, employment fluctuations, and
stagnant growth;
(B) preventing the unnecessary disposal of potentially valuable
recyclable materials in landfills and waste incinerators;
(C) stimulating economic development, including the:
(i) creation of employment opportunities throughout
Indiana; and
(ii) market development through the reuse of recyclable
materials by diverting the materials from waste streams
throughout the project area for commercial reuse;
(D) advancing research and development to enhance existing
waste diversion efforts and support the creation of new
processes and technologies that expand upon the existing
universe of waste diversion and reuse of recyclable material;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

105
and
(E) supporting recycling technology or programs that:
(i) involve the return, collection, and sorting of recyclable
glass, aluminum, or plastic beverage containers;
(ii) are accessible to the general public; and
(iii) are operated by a retail merchant (as described in
IC 6-2.5-4-1), a professional sports or entertainment venue,
an airport, a school for students between kindergarten and
grade 12, or an institution of higher education.
(2) Determining the feasibility of expansion of the waste
diversion program throughout Indiana by analyzing data provided
by project participants to the department to measure the success
of the project in:
(A) diverting waste from landfills and incinerators; and
(B) providing valuable raw materials for manufacturing and
other Indiana industries.
(3) Determining the potential for future market development.
(b) The project established under this section shall be limited to
applicants located in Marion County during the first round of grants.
Following the completion of the first round of grants, the project shall
be expanded for a second round of grants. Applicants located in the
following counties shall be eligible to receive grants during the second
round:
(1) Marion.
(2) Hamilton.
(3) Hancock.
(4) Shelby.
(5) Johnson.
(6) Morgan.
(7) Hendricks.
(8) Boone.
(c) An applicant who is eligible to participate in the project
established under this section must demonstrate direct connectivity in
diversion of valuable raw materials for procurement to identified
Indiana based end markets as a commodity.
(d) The project established under this section shall commence upon
the:
(1) approval of the proposals submitted under this chapter; and
(2) award of funds necessary to implement the project.
The duration of the project may not exceed four (4) years after the date
that the project commences.
(e) The project established under this section shall commence a
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

106
second round of grants within one (1) year after the first round of
grants are awarded to the selected projects. Applicants selected for a
grant during the first round of grants may apply for a grant during the
second round of grants.
(f) Grant applicants seeking funding from the project established
under this section must provide a financial match, as determined by the
Indiana recycling market development board department under
IC 4-23-5.5-7, to receive funding.
SECTION 178. IC 13-20.5-2-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.178-2009,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. Not later than sixty (60) days after the date of
the statement provided to a manufacturer under section 1(c) of this
chapter, the manufacturer may petition the Indiana recycling market
development board created by IC 4-23-5.5-2 department for relief
from the variable recycling fee imposed under section 1 of this chapter
upon showing of good cause. In determining whether to grant a petition
for relief under this section, the Indiana recycling market development
board department shall determine whether the manufacturer has made
good faith progress to achieve substantial compliance with this article.
A determination by the Indiana recycling market development board
department under this subsection is not subject to appeal by the
manufacturer.
SECTION 179. IC 13-23-2-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. A unit of local
government may not enact or enforce an ordinance that is in conflict
with any of the following:
(1) This article.
(2) Rules adopted by the fire prevention and building safety
commission department of homeland security under this article.
(3) Rules adopted by the board under this article.
SECTION 180. IC 13-23-3-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) To obtain a
certificate under section 1 of this chapter, a person must:
(1) take an examination that is approved;
(2) achieve a passing score on the examination that is established;
and
(3) pay any reasonable fees necessary to offset the costs incurred
by the state fire marshal department in administering the
examination and certification procedures that are established;
under rules adopted by the fire prevention and building safety
commission. board.
(b) An examination described under subsection (a) must cover the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

107
following subjects:
(1) Relevant rules adopted by the:
(A) board; and
(B) fire prevention and building safety commission;
the board concerning underground storage tanks.
(2) Any other subjects approved under rules adopted by the fire
prevention and building safety commission. board.
(c) The fire prevention and building safety commission board shall
adopt rules establishing the following:
(1) The number of times a person who fails an examination
described under this section may take the examination again.
(2) The period of time a person who fails an examination
described under this section must wait before taking the
examination again.
(d) The state fire marshal department may, under rules adopted by
the fire prevention and building safety commission, certify a person:
(1) under section 1 of this chapter; and
(2) by reciprocity;
if the person is licensed or certified by another state that has
certification requirements that are substantially similar to the
requirements established under this section.
SECTION 181. IC 14-8-2-48, AS AMENDED BY P.L.251-2023,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 48. (a) "Commission", except as provided in
this section, refers to the natural resources commission.
(b) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-13-1, has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-13-1-1.
(c) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-13-2, has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-13-2-2.
(d) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-13-4, has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-13-4-1.
(e) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-13-5, has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-13-5-1.
(f) (d) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-13-6, has the meaning
set forth in IC 14-13-6-2.
(g) (e) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-13-9, has the meaning
set forth in IC 14-13-9-2.
(h) (f) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-20-11, has the meaning
set forth in IC 14-20-11-1.
(i) (g) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-28-4, has the meaning
set forth in IC 14-28-4-1.
(j) (h) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-30-2, has the meaning
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

108
set forth in IC 14-30-2-2.
(k) (i) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-30-3, has the meaning
set forth in IC 14-30-3-2.
(l) (j) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-30-4, has the meaning
set forth in IC 14-30-4-2.
(m) (k) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-30.5, has the meaning
set forth in IC 14-30.5-1-2.
(n) (l) "Commission", for purposes of IC 14-33-20, has the meaning
set forth in IC 14-33-20-2.
SECTION 182. IC 14-8-2-59, AS AMENDED BY P.L.197-2011,
SECTION 47, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 59. "Corridor" has the following meaning:
(1) For purposes of IC 14-13-4, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-13-4-2.
(2) For purposes of IC 14-13-5, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-13-5-2.
(3) For purposes of IC 14-13-6, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-13-6-3.
SECTION 183. IC 14-8-2-61 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 61. "Council", for purposes of IC 14-21-1, has the
meaning set forth in IC 14-21-1-5.
SECTION 184. IC 14-9-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Advisory Council).
SECTION 185. IC 14-10-1-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. This article expires December
31, 2026.
SECTION 186. IC 14-10-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.78-2019,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The natural resources commission is
established. The commission consists of twelve (12) eleven (11)
members as follows:
(1) The commissioner of the Indiana department of transportation
or the commissioner's designee.
(2) The commissioner of the department of environmental
management or the commissioner's designated deputy.
(3) The director of the office of tourism development or the
director's designee (before July 1, 2020) or the director of the
Indiana destination development corporation or the director's
designee (after June 30, 2020).
(4) The director of the department.
(5) The chairperson of the advisory council established by
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

109
IC 14-9-6-1.
(6) (5) The president of the Indiana academy of science or the
president's designee.
(7) (6) Six (6) citizen members appointed by the governor, at least
two (2) of whom must have knowledge, experience, or education
in the environment or in natural resource conservation. Not more
than three (3) citizen members may be of the same political party.
SECTION 187. IC 14-13-2-32, AS ADDED BY P.L.106-2012,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 32. (a) The Little Calumet River basin project
advisory board is established.
(b) The advisory board consists of the following members:
(1) One (1) member appointed by the executive of each
municipality located in the watershed.
(2) One (1) member appointed by the board of county
commissioners of Lake County.
(c) Each member of the advisory board must have experience in:
(1) designing;
(2) constructing;
(3) maintaining; or
(4) managing;
drainage or flood control facilities in the watershed.
(d) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 188. IC 14-13-4-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. This chapter expires
December 31, 2026.
SECTION 189. IC 14-13-5-18 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. This chapter expires
December 31, 2026.
SECTION 190. IC 14-21-1-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "council" refers to the
advisory council established by IC 14-9-6-1.
SECTION 191. IC 14-21-1-12 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. The division shall
do the following:
(1) Develop a program of historical, architectural, and
archeological research and development, including continuing
surveys, excavations, scientific recording, interpretation, and
publication of the state's historical, architectural, and
archeological resources.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

110
(2) Prepare a preservation plan for the state that establishes
planning guidelines to encourage the continuous maintenance and
integrity of historic sites and historic structures. However, the
plan is not effective until the plan has been
(A) presented to the council for review and comment; and
(B) approved by the review board after public hearing.
(3) Undertake the action necessary to qualify the state for
participation in sources of federal aid to further the purposes
stated in subdivisions (1) and (2).
(4) Provide information on historic sites and structures within
Indiana to federal, state, and local governmental agencies, private
individuals, and organizations.
(5) Advise and coordinate the activities of local historical
associations, historic district commissions, historic commissions,
and other interested groups or persons.
(6) Provide technical and financial assistance to local historical
associations, historic district commissions, historic commissions,
and other interested groups or persons.
(7) Review environmental impact statements as required by
federal and state law for actions significantly affecting historic
properties.
SECTION 192. IC 14-21-1-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2007,
SECTION 169, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. The division may do the
following:
(1) Recommend the purchase, lease, or gift of historic property of
archeological importance and make recommendations to the
director council, and commission regarding policies affecting the
operation and administration of these sites and structures by the
section of historic sites of the division of state museums and
historic sites.
(2) Prepare and review planning and research studies relating to
archeology.
(3) Conduct a program of education in archeology, either within
the division or in conjunction with a postsecondary educational
institution.
(4) Inspect and supervise an archeological field investigation
authorized by this chapter.
SECTION 193. IC 14-21-1-22.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22.5. (a) The review board shall
establish the Indiana historical marker program for marking
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

111
historical sites in Indiana. As a part of this program, the review
board shall fix a state format for historical markers. No person
may erect a historical marker in the state format without the
approval of the review board. All historical markers in the state
format shall be provided by the review board using appropriated
funds, local matching funds, donations, grants, or any other funds
provided for that purpose according to the guidelines and rules of
the historical marker program.
(b) The review board may appoint a historical marker advisory
committee to serve without compensation. The committee may
advise the review board and the director concerning the following:
(1) Guidelines and rules for the historical marker program.
(2) Appropriate sites to be marked.
(3) Other matters concerning the historical marker program
as requested by the review board or the director.
(c) Historical markers approved under this section, including
state format markers installed after 1945 and markers installed by
the Indiana Civil War centennial commission, are the property of
the state. Maintenance of state historical markers is part of the
historical marker program. The review board may cooperate with
individuals, local and state agencies, and private institutions and
organizations for the maintenance of the historical markers. Funds
made available to the historical marker program, as approved by
the review board, may be used for necessary maintenance.
(d) No historical marker may be erected on a highway of the
state highway system without the approval of the review board as
to its historical accuracy. This provision is in addition to any other
requirement of law.
SECTION 194. IC 14-21-1-25.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.133-2012,
SECTION 173, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 25.5. (a) If a Native American
Indian burial ground is discovered, the department shall immediately
provide notice to the Native American Indian affairs commission
established by IC 4-23-32. Indiana cultural commission established
under IC 4-23-36.
(b) If Native American Indian human remains are removed from a
burial ground, the department shall provide the following to the Native
American Indian affairs Indiana cultural commission:
(1) Any written findings or reports that result from the analysis
and study of the human remains.
(2) Written notice to the Native American Indian affairs Indiana
cultural commission that the analysis and study of the human
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

112
remains are complete.
(c) After receiving written notice under subsection (b)(2), the Native
American Indian affairs Indiana cultural commission shall make
recommendations to the department regarding the final disposition of
the Native American Indian human remains.
SECTION 195. IC 14-25-2-2.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.3-2008,
SECTION 102, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. (a) As used in this chapter,
"water utility" means:
(1) a public utility (as defined in IC 8-1-2-1(a));
(2) a municipally owned utility (as defined in IC 8-1-2-1(h));
(3) a not-for-profit utility (as defined in IC 8-1-2-125(a));
(4) a cooperatively owned corporation;
(5) a conservancy district established under IC 14-33; or
(6) a regional water district established under IC 13-26;
that provides water service to the public.
(b) A person that seeks to contract with the commission for the
provision of certain minimum quantities of stream flow or the sale of
water on a unit pricing basis under section 2 of this chapter must
submit a request to the commission and the department. The
commission shall not make a determination as to whether to enter into
a contract with the person making the request until:
(1) the procedures set forth in this section have been followed;
and
(2) the commission has reviewed and considered each report
submitted to the commission under subsection (i).
(c) Not later than thirty (30) days after receiving a request under
subsection (b), the department shall provide, by certified mail, written
notice of the request to the following:
(1) Each person with whom the commission holds a contract for:
(A) the provision of certain minimum quantities of stream
flow; or
(B) the sale of water on a unit pricing basis;
as of the date of the request.
(2) The executive and legislative body of each:
(A) county;
(B) municipality, if any; and
(C) conservancy district established under IC 14-33, if any;
in which the water sought in the request would be used.
(3) The executive and legislative body of each:
(A) county;
(B) municipality, if any; and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

113
(C) conservancy district established under IC 14-33, if any;
in which the affected reservoir is located.
(d) Not later than seven (7) days after receiving a notice from the
department under subsection (c), each person described in subsection
(c)(1) shall, by certified mail, provide written notice of the request to
each:
(1) water utility; or
(2) other person;
that contracts with the person described in subsection (c)(1) for the
purchase of water for resale. Each person to whom notice is mailed
under this subsection is in turn responsible for providing written notice
by certified mail to each water utility or other person that purchases
water from that person for resale. A water utility or another person
required to provide notice under this subsection shall mail the required
notice not later than seven (7) days after it receives notice of the
request from the water utility or other person from whom it purchases
water for resale.
(e) At the same time that:
(1) a person described in subsection (c)(1); or
(2) a water utility or another person described in subsection (d);
mails any notice required under subsection (d), it shall also mail to the
department, by certified mail, a list of the names and addresses of each
water utility or other person to whom it has mailed the notice under
subsection (d).
(f) In addition to the mailed notice required under subsection (c), the
department shall publish notice of the request, in accordance with
IC 5-3-1, in each county:
(1) in which a person described in section (c)(1) is located;
(2) in which the affected reservoir is located;
(3) in which the water sought in the request would be used; and
(4) in which a water utility or other person included in a list
received by the department under subsection (e) is located.
Notwithstanding IC 5-3-1-6, in each county in which publication is
required under this subsection, notice shall be published in at least one
(1) general circulation newspaper in the county. The department may,
in its discretion, publish public notices in a qualified publication (as
defined in IC 5-3-1-0.7) or additional newspapers to provide
supplementary notification to the public. The cost of publishing
supplementary notification is a proper expenditure of the department.
(g) A notice required to be mailed or published under this section
must:
(1) identify the person making the request;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

114
(2) include a brief description of:
(A) the nature of the pending request; and
(B) the process by which the commission will determine
whether to enter into a contract with the person making the
request;
(3) set forth the date, time, and location of the public meeting
required under subsection (h); and
(4) in the case of a notice that is required to be mailed under
subsection (c)(1) or (d), a statement of the recipient's duty to in
turn provide notice to any:
(A) water utility; or
(B) other person;
that purchases water for resale from the recipient, in accordance
with subsection (d).
(h) The advisory council established by IC 14-9-6-1 department
shall hold a public meeting in each county in which notice is published
under subsection (f). A public meeting required under this subsection
must include the following:
(1) A presentation by the department describing:
(A) the nature of the pending request; and
(B) the process by which the commission will determine
whether to enter into a contract with the person making the
request.
(2) An opportunity for public comment on the pending request.
The advisory council department may appoint a hearing officer to
assist with a public meeting held under this subsection.
(i) Not later than thirty (30) days after a public meeting is held
under subsection (h), the advisory council department shall submit to
the commission a report summarizing the public meeting.
SECTION 196. IC 14-25-7-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.161-2025,
SECTION 23, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The commission shall administer this
chapter.
(b) The deputy director for the bureau of resource management shall
serve as technical secretary to the commission. The deputy director
shall perform the duties that are required by this chapter or that the
commission directs.
(c) The advisory council established by IC 14-9-6-1 shall serve in
an advisory capacity to the commission with respect to the
implementation of the commission's powers and duties, including the
drafting of rules and development of inventories, assessments, and
plans.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

115
(d) For the time that the advisory council is involved in the drafting
of rules, the membership of the council shall be augmented as follows:
(1) Two (2) members of the senate, not more than one (1) of
whom may be of the same political party, shall be appointed for
a term of two (2) years by the president pro tempore of the senate.
(2) Two (2) members of the house of representatives, not more
than one (1) of whom may be of the same political party, shall be
appointed for a term of two (2) years by the speaker of the house
of representatives.
These members are entitled to travel expenses and a per diem
allowance as determined by the budget agency for members of boards
and commissions generally.
(e) (c) The department shall provide professional, technical, and
clerical personnel, equipment, supplies, and support services
reasonably required to assist the commission in the exercise of the
commission's powers and duties under this chapter. The department
shall include money for this purpose in the regular operating budget
requests of the department.
(f) On or before July 1, 2027, and July 1 biennially thereafter, the
advisory council shall submit a report to the executive director of the
legislative services agency, in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6, for
review by the interim committee on government in accordance with
IC 1-1-15.5-4 and IC 2-5-1.3-13(g). The report shall describe:
(1) official action taken; and
(2) actionable items considered;
by the advisory council during the preceding two (2) years.
SECTION 197. IC 14-25-7-12.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.189-2015,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.5. (a) The department shall cooperate with the
United States Geological Survey to establish a program under which
volunteers may monitor the water resource and provide monitoring data
to the commission, the department, and the United States Geological
Survey. Data derived from the voluntary monitoring conducted under
the program may be:
(1) collected and disseminated by the commission under section
12(1) of this chapter; and
(2) used by the commission in conducting the continuing
assessment of the availability of the water resource under section
11(1) of this chapter.
(b) The department may cooperate with other local, state, and
federal governmental agencies in implementing this section.
(c) The commission, under IC 4-22-2 and section 10(a) of this
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

116
chapter, may adopt rules concerning the administration of this section.
Section 10(c) and 10(d) of this chapter does not apply to the adoption
of rules under this subsection.
SECTION 198. IC 14-26-2-24, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2025,
SECTION 44, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 24. (a) Relying on recommendations of the
department, and the advisory council established by IC 14-9-6-1, the
commission shall adopt, under IC 4-22-7-7(a)(5)(A), and maintain a
nonrule policy statement that lists the public freshwater lakes in
Indiana. For each public freshwater lake the statement must include the
following information:
(1) The name of the lake.
(2) The county and specific location within the county where the
lake is located.
(b) A person may obtain an administrative adjudication from the
office of administrative law proceedings for the listing or nonlisting of
a lake as a public freshwater lake through a licensure action, status
determination, or enforcement action under IC 4-21.5.
SECTION 199. IC 14-27-7.5-9 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 9. (a) The owner
of a high hazard structure shall:
(1) have a professional engineer licensed under IC 25-31
IC 25-4-3 make an engineering inspection of the high hazard
structure at least one (1) time every two (2) years;
(2) submit a report of the inspection in a form approved by the
department to the department. The report must include at least the
following information:
(A) An evaluation of the structure's condition, spillway
capacity, operational adequacy, and structural integrity.
(B) A determination of whether deficiencies exist that could
lead to the failure of the structure, and recommendations for
maintenance, repairs, and alterations to the structure to
eliminate deficiencies, including a recommended schedule for
necessary upgrades to the structure.
(b) If after an inspection under subsection (a) the licensed
professional engineer who conducted the inspection determines that
maintenance, repairs, or alterations to a high hazard structure are
necessary to remedy deficiencies in the structure, the owner shall
perform the recommended maintenance, repairs, or alterations.
(c) The department shall issue a notice of violation under section 11
of this chapter to the owner of a high hazard structure who fails to:
(1) have the structure inspected under subsection (a);
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

117
(2) perform recommended maintenance, repairs, or alterations to
the structure under subsection (b); or
(3) biennially submit the inspection report prepared under
subsection (a).
(d) The department may make an engineering inspection of a high
hazard structure to ensure compliance with this chapter.
SECTION 200. IC 14-33-14-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 8. (a) As used in
this section, "cost index source" refers to the Engineering News Record
Construction Cost Index, as published by McGraw Hill Construction
or its successor.
(b) Before January 1, 2006, the board of a district may elect to
adjust the annual cost of maintenance of the works of improvement as
stated in the plan, as calculated in subsection (d), if the following
conditions are met:
(1) The board has at a meeting adopted a resolution that sets forth:
(A) the annual cost of maintenance of the works of
improvement as stated in the plan, and the year when the
annual cost was stated in the plan; and
(B) the new, adjusted annual cost of maintenance of the works
of improvement.
(2) The calculation under subsection (d) has been verified by
either the state conservation engineer for the Natural Resources
Conservation Service of the United States Department of
Agriculture or a professional engineer licensed under IC 25-31-1.
IC 25-4-3.
(3) The board has provided a copy of the resolution to the
department of local government finance (established by
IC 6-1.1-30-1.1) within sixty (60) days of adoption.
(c) If the board of a district adopts a resolution under section (b)(1),
a copy of the resolution must be included in the district's annual report,
and a copy of the annual report must be provided to the local circuit
court and the department of natural resources.
(d) The annual cost of maintenance of the works of improvement as
stated in the plan of a district may be adjusted to an amount not to
exceed the amount determined as follows:
STEP ONE: Determine the cost index from the cost index source
for the most recent year.
STEP TWO: Determine the cost index from the cost index source
for the year that the annual cost of maintenance of the works of
improvement was stated in the plan.
STEP THREE: Divide the number determined in STEP ONE by
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

118
the number determined in STEP TWO.
STEP FOUR: Multiply the result of STEP THREE by the annual
cost of maintenance of the works of improvement that is stated in
the plan.
SECTION 201. IC 14-34-3-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. An application
for a surface coal mining and reclamation permit must include the
following:
(1) The names and addresses of the following:
(A) The permit applicant.
(B) Every legal owner of record of the property (surface and
mineral) to be mined.
(C) The holders of record of any leasehold interest in the
property.
(D) Any purchaser of record of the property under a real estate
contract.
(E) The operator if the operator is a person different from the
applicant.
(F) If a person in clauses (A) through (E) is a business entity
other than a single proprietor, the names and addresses of the
principals, officers, and resident agent.
(2) The names and addresses of the owners of record of all
surface and subsurface areas adjacent to any part of the permit
area.
(3) A statement of each current or previous surface coal mining
permit in the United States held by the applicant, including each
pending application, the permit identification, and the state that
issued that permit or holds the pending application.
(4) If the applicant is a partnership, a corporation, an association,
or other business entity, the following where applicable:
(A) The names and addresses of every officer, partner, or
director or person performing a function similar to a director
of the applicant.
(B) The name and address of each person owning, of record,
at least ten percent (10%) of any class of voting stock of the
applicant.
(C) A list of all names under which the applicant, partner, or
principal shareholder previously operated a surface coal
mining operation within the United States within:
(i) the five (5) years preceding the date of submission of the
application; or
(ii) any additional period that the director establishes.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

119
(5) A statement of whether the applicant or a subsidiary, an
affiliate, or a person controlled by or under common control with
the applicant has:
(A) ever held a federal or state coal mining permit that in:
(i) the five (5) years preceding the date of submission of the
application; or
(ii) any additional period that the director establishes;
was suspended or revoked or is in the process of revocation;
or
(B) had a mining bond or similar security deposited in lieu of
bond forfeited;
and if so, a brief explanation of the facts involved and
identification of the state in which this action occurred.
(6) A copy of the applicant's advertisement to be published under
IC 14-34-4-1. The advertisement must include the following:
(A) The names of the property owners involved.
(B) A description of the exact location and boundaries of the
proposed site sufficient so that the proposed surface coal
mining operation is readily locatable by local residents.
(C) The location where the application is available for public
inspection.
(7) A description of the following:
(A) The type and method of surface coal mining operation that
exists or is proposed.
(B) The engineering techniques proposed or used.
(C) The equipment used or proposed to be used.
(8) The anticipated or actual starting and termination dates of
each phase of the surface coal mining operation and the number
of acres of land to be affected.
(9) An accurate map or plan, to an appropriate scale, clearly
showing the following:
(A) The land to be affected as of the date of the application.
(B) The area of land within the permit area upon which the
applicant has the legal right to enter and commence surface
coal mining operations, including the following:
(i) A statement of those documents upon which the applicant
bases the applicant's legal right to enter and commence
surface coal mining operations on the area affected.
(ii) Whether that right is the subject of pending court
litigation.
(10) The name of the watershed and location of the surface stream
or tributary into which surface and pit drainage will be
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

120
discharged.
(11) A determination of the probable hydrologic consequences of
surface coal mining and reclamation operations, both on and off
the mine site, with respect to the following:
(A) The hydrologic regime.
(B) The quantity and quality of water in surface and ground
water systems, including the dissolved and suspended solids
under seasonal flow conditions.
(C) The collection of sufficient data for the mine site and
surrounding areas so that an assessment can be made of the
probable cumulative impacts of all anticipated mining in the
area upon the hydrology of the area and particularly upon
water availability.
However, this determination is not required until the time that
hydrologic information on the general area before mining is made
available from an appropriate federal or state agency. The permit
may not be approved until the information is available and is
incorporated into the application.
(12) When requested by the director, the climatological factors
that are peculiar to the locality of the land to be affected,
including the following:
(A) The average seasonal precipitation.
(B) The average direction and velocity of prevailing winds.
(C) The seasonal temperature ranges.
(13) Accurate maps to an appropriate scale clearly showing the
land affected on the date of application and the same information
that is set forth on topographical maps of the United States
Geological Survey of a scale of 1:24,000 or 1:25,000 or larger,
including all manmade features and archeological and historical
sites known by the division of historic preservation and
archeology. The map or plan must show the following:
(A) All boundaries of the land to be affected.
(B) The boundary lines and names of present owners of record
of all surface areas abutting the permit area.
(C) The location of all buildings within one thousand (1,000)
feet of the permit area.
(14) Cross section maps or plans of the land to be affected,
including the actual area to be mined, prepared by or under the
direction of and certified by an engineer licensed under IC 25-31
IC 25-4-3 or a geologist licensed under IC 25-17.6 with
assistance from experts in related fields such as land surveying
and landscape architecture. The maps or plans must show
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

121
pertinent elevation and location of test borings or core samplings
and depict the following:
(A) The nature and depth of the various strata of overburden
as required by the commission in the commission's rules.
(B) The location and quality of subsurface water if
encountered.
(C) The nature and thickness of each coal or rider seam above
the coal seam to be mined.
(D) The nature of the stratum immediately beneath the coal
seam to be mined.
(E) All mineral crop lines and the strike and dip of the coal to
be mined within the area of land to be affected.
(F) Existing or previous surface coal mining limits.
(G) The location and extent of known workings of each
underground coal mine, including mine openings to the
surface.
(H) The location of aquifers as required by the commission in
the commission's rules.
(I) The estimated elevation of the water table.
(J) The location of spoil, waste, or refuse areas and topsoil
preservation areas.
(K) The location of all impoundments for waste or erosion
control.
(L) Each settling or water treatment facility.
(M) Constructed or natural drainageways and the location of
each discharge to a surface body of water on the area of land
to be affected or adjacent to the land to be affected.
(N) Profiles at appropriate cross sections of the anticipated
final surface configuration that will be achieved under the
operator's proposed reclamation plan.
(15) A statement of the result of test borings or core samplings
from the permit area, including the following:
(A) Logs of the drill holes.
(B) The thickness of the coal seam found and an analysis of
the chemical properties of that coal.
(C) The sulfur content of each coal seam.
(D) Chemical analysis of potentially acid or toxic forming
sections of the overburden.
(E) A chemical analysis down to and including the deeper of
the following:
(i) The stratum lying immediately underneath the lowest
coal seam to be mined.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

122
(ii) An aquifer below the lowest coal seam to be mined that
may be adversely impacted by mining.
The director may waive the requirement as to the specific
application of this clause if the director determines in writing
the requirements are unnecessary.
(16) For the land in the permit application that a reconnaissance
inspection suggests may be prime farmland and to confirm the
exact location of the prime farmland, a soil survey in accordance
with the standards established by the United States Secretary of
Agriculture.
(17) A reclamation plan that meets the requirements of section 12
of this chapter.
(18) Proof that the applicant is self-insured or has a public
liability insurance policy issued by an insurance company
authorized to do business in Indiana in force for the surface coal
mining and reclamation operations for which the permit is sought.
The policy must provide for personal injury and property damage
protection in an amount adequate to compensate each person
injured as a result of the surface coal mining and reclamation
operation. If a permit is granted, the permittee shall maintain the
policy in full force and effect for the duration of the permit or a
renewal.
(19) A blasting plan that outlines the procedures the operator will
use to comply with IC 14-34-12.
(20) A listing of all notices of violations, and their final
resolution, of:
(A) IC 13-4.1 (before its repeal);
(B) this article; and
(C) a:
(i) federal statute or regulation; or
(ii) state statute or rule enacted or adopted in response to a
federal statute or regulation;
pertaining to air or water environmental protection;
incurred by the applicant or a subsidiary, an affiliate, or a person
controlled by or under common control with the applicant in
connection with any surface coal mining operation during the
three (3) year period before the date of application.
SECTION 202. IC 14-34-10-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in
this section, "higher or better uses" means postmining land uses that
have a higher:
(1) economic value; or
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

123
(2) nonmonetary benefit;
to the landowner or the community than the premining land uses.
(b) In addition to other standards a permittee must meet under rules
of the commission, a permittee shall do the following:
(1) Place markers on the site to readily identify the permit area.
(2) Conduct the surface coal mining operation in a manner that
maximizes the use and conservation of the solid fuel resource that
is recovered so that reaffecting the land in the future through
surface coal mining is minimized.
(3) Restore the land affected to a condition capable of supporting
the uses that the land was capable of supporting before mining or
higher or better uses of which there is a reasonable likelihood if:
(A) those uses do not:
(i) present an actual or a probable hazard to public health or
safety; or
(ii) pose an actual or a probable threat of water diminution
or pollution; and
(B) the permit applicant's declared proposed land use
following reclamation:
(i) is not impractical or unreasonable;
(ii) is not inconsistent with applicable land use policies and
plans;
(iii) does not involve unreasonable delay in implementation;
or
(iv) does not violate federal, state, or local law.
(4) Except as provided in subdivisions (5) and (6) and section 4
of this chapter with respect to all surface coal mining operations
backfill, compact where advisable to ensure stability or prevent
the leaching of toxic materials, and grade to restore the
approximate original contour of the land with all highwalls, spoil
piles, and depressions eliminated. Small depressions are allowed
if needed to retain moisture to assist revegetation or as otherwise
authorized under this article.
(5) In a surface coal mining operation that:
(A) is carried out at the same location over a substantial time;
(B) transects the coal deposit and the thickness of the coal
deposit relative to the volume of the overburden that is large;
and
(C) has overburden and other spoil and waste materials at a
particular point in the permit area or otherwise available from
the entire permit area that is insufficient, giving due
consideration to volumetric expansion, to restore the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

124
approximate original contour;
the operator, at a minimum, shall backfill, grade, and compact,
where advisable, using all available overburden and other spoil
and waste materials to attain the lowest practicable grade but not
more than the angle of repose to provide adequate drainage and
to cover all acid-forming and other toxic materials to achieve an
ecologically sound land use compatible with the surrounding
region.
(6) If in surface coal mining:
(A) the volume of overburden is large relative to the thickness
of the coal deposit; and
(B) the operator demonstrates that due to volumetric
expansion the amount of overburden and other spoil and waste
materials removed in the course of the mining operation is
more than sufficient to restore the approximate original
contour;
the operator shall, after restoring the approximate contour,
backfill, grade, and compact, where advisable, the excess
overburden and other spoil and waste materials to attain the
lowest grade but not more than the angle of repose and to cover
all acid-forming and other toxic materials to achieve an
ecologically sound land use compatible with the surrounding
region. The overburden or spoil shall be shaped and graded in a
way that prevents slides, erosion, and water pollution and
revegetated in accordance with the requirements of this article.
(7) Stabilize and protect all surface areas, including spoil piles,
affected by the surface coal mining and reclamation operation to
effectively control erosion and attendant air and water pollution.
(8) Remove the topsoil from the land in a separate layer and:
(A) replace the topsoil on the backfill area; or
(B) if the topsoil is not used immediately;
(i) segregate the topsoil in a separate pile from other spoil;
and
(ii) if the topsoil is not replaced on a backfill area within a
time short enough to avoid deterioration of the topsoil,
maintain a successful cover by quick growing plants or other
means so that the topsoil is preserved from wind and water
erosion, remains free of any contamination by other acid or
toxic material, and is in a usable condition for sustaining
vegetation when restored during reclamation.
However, if the topsoil is of insufficient quantity or of poor
quality to sustain vegetation or if other strata are more suitable for
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

125
vegetation requirements, the operator shall remove, segregate, and
preserve, in a like manner, the strata that are best able to support
vegetation.
(9) Restore the topsoil or the best available subsoil that is best
able to support vegetation.
(10) For all prime farmland as identified in IC 14-34-3-3(16),
comply with the specifications for soil removal, storage,
replacement, and reconstruction established by rules of the
commission and do the following:
(A) Segregate the A horizon of the natural soil unless it is
shown that other available soil materials will create a final soil
that has a greater productive capacity, stockpile this material,
if not used immediately, separately from other spoil, and
provide needed protection from wind and water erosion or
contamination by other acid or toxic material.
(B) Segregate the B horizon of the natural soil, or underlying
C horizons or other strata, or a combination of those horizons
or other strata that are texturally and chemically suitable for
plant growth and equal to or more favorable for plant growth
than the B horizon, in sufficient quantities to create in the
regraded final soil a root zone of comparable depth and quality
to that existing in the natural soil, stockpile this material, if not
used immediately, separately from other spoil, and provide
needed protection from wind and water erosion or
contamination by other acid or toxic material.
(C) Replace and regrade the root zone material described in
clause (B) with proper compaction and uniform depth over the
regraded spoil material.
(D) Redistribute and grade in a uniform manner the surface
soil horizon described in clause (A).
(11) Create, if authorized in the approved surface coal mining and
reclamation plan, permanent impoundments of water on mining
sites. The permittee may create the permanent impoundment only
after the permittee demonstrates the following:
(A) The size of the impoundment is adequate for the intended
purposes.
(B) The impoundment dam construction will be designed to
achieve necessary stability with an adequate margin of safety
compatible with that of structures constructed under 16 U.S.C.
1006.
(C) The quality of impounded water will be suitable, on a
permanent basis, for the intended use and discharges from the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

126
impoundment will not degrade the water quality below water
quality standards established under applicable federal and
state law in the receiving stream.
(D) The level of water will be reasonably stable.
(E) Final grading will provide adequate safety and access for
proposed water users.
(F) The water impoundments will not result in the diminution
of the quality or quantity of water used by adjacent or
surrounding landowners for agricultural, industrial,
recreational, or domestic uses.
(12) Conduct an augering operation associated with surface coal
mining in a manner that maximizes the recoverability of mineral
reserves remaining after the surface coal mining and reclamation
operation is complete and seal all auger holes with an impervious
and noncombustible material to prevent drainage except where
the director determines that the resulting impoundment of water
in those auger holes may create a hazard to the environment or the
public health or safety. The director may prohibit augering if
necessary to:
(A) maximize the use, recoverability, or conservation of the
solid fuel resources; or
(B) protect against adverse water quality impacts.
(13) Minimize disturbances to the prevailing hydrologic balance
at the mine site and associated offsite areas and to the quality and
quantity of water in surface and ground water systems during and
after surface coal mining and reclamation operations by doing the
following:
(A) Avoiding acid or other toxic mine drainage by measures
such as the following:
(i) Preventing or removing water from contact with
toxic-producing deposits.
(ii) Treating drainage to reduce toxic content that adversely
affects downstream water upon being released to
watercourses.
(iii) Casing, sealing, or otherwise managing boreholes,
shafts, and wells and keep acid or other toxic drainage from
entering ground and surface water.
(B) Conducting surface coal mining and reclamation
operations so as to prevent, to the extent possible using the
best technology currently available, violations of the effluent
limitations for coal mining operations established under
applicable state or federal law.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

127
(C) Constructing siltation structures under clause (B) before
commencement of surface coal mining operations that will be
certified by an engineer licensed under IC 25-31 IC 25-4-3
and constructed as designed and approved in the reclamation
plan.
(D) Cleaning out and removing temporary or large settling
ponds or other siltation structures from drainageways after
disturbed areas are revegetated and stabilized and depositing
the silt and debris at a site and in a manner approved by the
director.
(E) Restoring recharge capacity of the mined area to
approximate premining conditions.
(F) Avoiding channel deepening or enlargement in operations
requiring the discharge of water from mines.
(G) Other actions required under the permit.
(14) With respect to surface disposal of mine wastes, tailings, coal
processing wastes, and other wastes in areas other than the mine
workings or excavations, the following:
(A) Stabilize all waste piles in designated areas through
construction in compacted layers, including the use of
incombustible and impervious materials if necessary.
(B) Assure the following:
(i) The final contour of the waste pile will be compatible
with natural surroundings.
(ii) The site will be stabilized and revegetated according to
this article.
(15) Refrain from surface coal mining within five hundred (500)
feet of active and abandoned underground mines to prevent
breakthroughs and to protect the health or safety of miners.
However, the director shall permit an operator to mine near,
through, or partially through an abandoned underground mine or
closer to an active underground mine if the following conditions
exist:
(A) The nature, timing, and sequencing of the approximate
coincidence of specific coal surface mining activities with
specific underground coal mining activities are jointly
approved by the regulatory authorities concerned with surface
coal mining regulation and the health and safety of
underground miners.
(B) The operations will result in:
(i) improved resource recovery;
(ii) abatement of water pollution; or
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

128
(iii) elimination of hazards to the health and safety of the
public.
(16) Design, locate, construct, operate, maintain, enlarge, modify,
and remove or abandon, in accordance with the standards and
criteria used by the United States Secretary of the Interior to
ensure that flood control structures are safe and effectively
perform their functions, all existing and new coal mine waste
piles:
(A) consisting of:
(i) mine wastes;
(ii) tailings;
(iii) coal processing wastes; or
(iv) other liquid and solid wastes; and
(B) used temporarily or permanently as dams or embankments.
(17) Ensure the following:
(A) All debris, acid-forming materials, toxic materials, or
materials constituting a fire hazard are treated, buried, and
compacted or otherwise disposed of in a manner designed to
prevent contamination of ground or surface water.
(B) Contingency plans are developed to prevent sustained
combustion.
(18) Ensure that explosives are used only in accordance with the
following:
(A) IC 14-34-12.
(B) Applicable state and federal law.
(C) The rules adopted by the commission.
(19) Ensure that all reclamation efforts proceed in an
environmentally sound manner and as contemporaneously as
practicable with the surface coal mining operations. However, if
the applicant proposes to combine surface coal mining operations
with underground coal mining operations to assure maximum
practical recovery of the mineral resources, the director may grant
a variance for specific areas within the reclamation plan from the
requirement that reclamation efforts proceed as
contemporaneously as practicable and permit underground coal
mining operations before reclamation if the following conditions
are met:
(A) The director finds in writing the following:
(i) The applicant has presented, as part of the permit
application, specific, feasible plans for the proposed
underground mining operations.
(ii) The proposed underground mining operations are
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

129
necessary or desirable to assure maximum practical recovery
of the mineral resource and will avoid multiple disturbance
of the surface.
(iii) The applicant has satisfactorily demonstrated that the
plan for the underground coal mining operations conforms
to the requirements for underground coal mining in that
jurisdiction and that permits necessary for the underground
coal mining operations have been issued by the appropriate
authority.
(iv) The applicant has shown the areas proposed for the
variance are necessary for the implementation of the
proposed underground coal mining operations.
(v) Substantial adverse environmental damage, either onsite
or offsite, will not result from the delay in completion of
reclamation as required by this article.
(vi) The provisions for the offsite storage of spoil will
comply with subdivision (25).
(B) The commission has adopted specific rules to govern the
granting of variances in accordance with this subdivision.
(C) Variances granted under this subdivision are to be
reviewed by the director not more than three (3) years from the
date of issuance of the permit.
(D) Liability under the bond filed by the applicant with the
director under IC 14-34-6 is for the duration of underground
coal mining operations and until the requirements of this
section and IC 14-34-6 are fully complied with.
(20) Ensure that the construction, maintenance, and postmining
conditions of access roads into and across the site of operations
will control or prevent the following:
(A) Erosion and siltation.
(B) Pollution of water.
(C) Damage to the following:
(i) Fish or wildlife or their habitat.
(ii) Public or private property.
(21) Refrain from the construction of roads or other access ways:
(A) up a stream bed or drainage channel; or
(B) in the proximity of a channel;
that seriously alters the normal flow of water.
(22) Establish on the regraded areas and all other land affected a
diverse, an effective, and a permanent vegetative cover:
(A) of the same seasonal variety native to the area of land to be
affected; and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

130
(B) that is capable of self-regeneration and plant succession at
least equal in extent of cover to the natural vegetation of the
area.
However, an introduced species may be used in the revegetation
process where desirable and necessary to achieve the approved
postmining land use plan.
(23) Assume the responsibility for successful revegetation, as
required by subdivision (22), as follows:
(A) On lands not eligible for remining, for five (5) full years
after the last year of augmented seeding, fertilizing, irrigation,
or other work to assure compliance with subdivision (22).
However, if the director approves a long term intensive
agricultural postmining land use, the applicable five (5) or ten
(10) year period of responsibility for revegetation commences
at the date of initial planting for the long term intensive
agricultural postmining land use. If the director issues a
written finding approving a long term intensive agricultural
postmining land use as part of the mining and reclamation
plan, the director may grant exception to subdivision (22).
(B) On lands eligible for remining, for two (2) full years after
the last year of augmented seeding, fertilizing, irrigation, or
other work in order to ensure compliance with subdivision
(22).
(24) Protect offsite areas from slides or damage occurring during
the surface coal mining and reclamation operations and not
deposit spoil material or locate any part of the operations or waste
accumulations outside the permit area.
(25) Place all excess spoil material resulting from coal surface
mining and reclamation activities to ensure the following:
(A) Spoil is transported and placed in a controlled manner in
a position for concurrent compaction and in a manner that
assures mass stability and prevents mass movement.
(B) The areas of disposal are within the bonded permit areas
and all organic matter is removed immediately before spoil
placement.
(C) Appropriate surface and internal drainage systems and
diversion ditches are used in a manner that prevents spoil
erosion and movement.
(D) The disposal area does not contain springs, natural
watercourses, or wet weather seeps unless lateral drains are
constructed from the wet areas to the main underdrains in a
manner that prevents filtration of the water into the spoil pile.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

131
(E) If placed on a slope, the spoil is placed as follows:
(i) On the most moderate slope among the slopes on which,
in the judgment of the director, the spoil could be placed in
compliance with all the requirements of this article.
(ii) If possible, upon or above a natural terrace, bench, or
berm if the placement provides additional stability and
prevents mass movement.
(F) Where the toe of the spoil rests on a downslope, a rock toe
buttress of sufficient size to prevent mass movement is
constructed.
(G) The final configuration is compatible with the natural
drainage pattern and surroundings and suitable for intended
uses.
(H) Design of the spoil disposal area is certified by an
engineer licensed under IC 25-31 IC 25-4-3 and in
conformance with professional standards.
(I) All other provisions of this article are met.
(26) To the extent possible using the best technology currently
available the following:
(A) Minimize disturbances and adverse impacts of the
operation on fish, wildlife, and related environmental values.
(B) Enhance those resources where practicable.
(27) Provide for an undisturbed natural barrier:
(A) beginning at the elevation of the lowest coal seam to be
mined; and
(B) extending from the outslope for a distance determined by
the director;
to serve as a barrier to slides and erosion.
(28) Replace the water supply of an owner of interest in real
property who obtains all or part of the owner's supply of water for
domestic, agricultural, industrial, or other legitimate use from an
underground or a surface source if the supply is affected by
contamination, diminution, or interruption proximately resulting
from the surface coal mine operation. This article does not affect
the right of a person to enforce or protect under applicable law the
person's interest in water resources affected by a surface coal
mining operation.
(29) Meet other criteria that are necessary to achieve reclamation
in accordance with the purposes of this article, taking into
consideration the physical, climatological, and other
characteristics of the site.
SECTION 203. IC 14-34-10-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

132
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4. (a) The director
may, under procedures established by rule, permit surface coal mining
operations if:
(1) an industrial, a commercial, an agricultural, a residential, a
recreational, or a public facility is proposed for the postmining
use of the affected land; and
(2) the mining operation will remove an entire coal seam running
through the upper fraction of a ridge or hill, except as provided in
subsection (c)(1), by:
(A) removing all of the overburden; and
(B) creating a level plateau or a gently rolling contour;
(i) with no highwalls remaining; and
(ii) capable of supporting the postmining uses listed in
subdivision (1);
without regard to the requirement to restore the affected land to the
approximate original contour as set forth in section 2(b)(4), 3(b)(2), or
3(b)(3) of this chapter.
(b) The director may permit the proposed uses under subsection (a)
only if the following conditions are met:
(1) After consultation with the appropriate land use planning
agencies, if any, the proposed postmining land use is considered
an equal or a better economic or public use of the affected land
compared with the premining use.
(2) The applicant presents specific plans for the proposed
postmining land use and appropriate assurances that the use meets
the following conditions:
(A) The use is compatible with adjacent land uses.
(B) The use is obtainable according to data regarding expected
need and market.
(C) The use is assured of investment in necessary public
facilities.
(D) The use is supported by commitments from public
agencies where appropriate.
(E) The use is practicable with respect to private financial
capability for completion of the proposed use.
(F) The use is planned according to a schedule attached to the
reclamation plan so as to integrate the mining operation and
reclamation with the postmining land use.
(G) The use is designed by an engineer licensed under
IC 25-31 IC 25-4-3 and in conformance with professional
standards established to assure the stability, drainage, and
configuration necessary for the intended use of the site.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

133
(3) The proposed use is consistent with adjacent land uses and
existing state and local land use plans and programs.
(4) The governing body of the unit of general purpose government
in which the land is located and a state or federal agency that the
director determines to have an interest in the proposed use is
provided an opportunity of not more than sixty (60) days to
review and comment on the proposed use.
(5) All other requirements of this article are met.
(c) With respect to a permit granted under subsection (a) and in
addition to other requirements the commission establishes by rule, the
director shall require the following:
(1) The toe of the lowest coal seam and the overburden associated
with the seam are retained in place as a barrier to slides and
erosion.
(2) The reclaimed area is stable.
(3) The resulting plateau or rolling contour drains inward from the
outslopes except at specified points.
(4) No damage is done to natural watercourses.
(5) Spoil is placed on the hilltop bench as is necessary to achieve
the planned postmining land use and the operator places all
excess spoil material not retained on the hilltop in accordance
with section 2(b)(25) of this chapter.
(6) The operator ensures stability of the spoil retained on the
hilltop and meets all other requirements of this article.
(d) The director shall review all permits issued under this section
not more than three (3) years from the date of issuance unless the
applicant affirmatively demonstrates that the proposed development is
proceeding in accordance with the terms of the approved schedule and
reclamation plan.
SECTION 204. IC 14-34-10-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. (a) The director
may grant a variance from the requirement to restore to approximate
original contour set forth in section 3(b)(2) of this chapter if the
following conditions exist:
(1) After approval of the appropriate state environmental
agencies, the watershed control of the area is improved.
(2) Complete backfilling with spoil materials that maintains
stability following mining and reclamation is required to
completely cover the highwall.
(3) The owner of the surface knowingly requests in writing, as a
part of the permit application, that a variance be granted so as to
make the land, after reclamation, suitable for an industrial, a
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

134
commercial, a residential, a public, or a recreational use.
(4) After consultation with the appropriate land use planning
agencies, if any:
(A) the potential use of the affected land constitutes an equal
or a better economic or public use; and
(B) the variance is designed and certified by a professional
engineer licensed under IC 25-31 IC 25-4-3 and is in
conformance with professional standards established to assure
the stability, drainage, and configuration necessary for the
intended use of the site.
(b) With respect to a variance granted under subsection (a) or under
IC 13-4.1-8-4(a) (before its repeal) and in addition to other
requirements the commission establishes by rule, the director shall
require the following:
(1) Only the amount of spoil will be placed off the mine bench as
is necessary to achieve the planned postmining land use.
(2) Stability of the spoil retained on the bench is ensured.
(3) All spoil placement off the mine bench must comply with
section 2(b)(25) of this chapter.
(c) The director shall review all exceptions granted under this
section not more than three (3) years after the date of issuance of the
permit unless the permittee affirmatively demonstrates that the
proposed development is proceeding in accordance with the terms of
the reclamation plan.
SECTION 205. IC 14-37-7-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.140-2011,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 8. (a) The owner or lessee of coal or another
person with an interest to develop a coal resource may file with the
division an affidavit that:
(1) identifies by a map prepared by an engineer licensed under
IC 25-31 IC 25-4-3 or a geologist licensed under IC 25-17.6:
(A) the location of coal that the owner or lessee controls by
deed, lease, or other instrument for later commercial
production;
(B) the location of coal that is in an area targeted for later
commercial production;
(C) the location of the coal seam or seams of interest; and
(D) the approximate depth of the coal seam or seams of
interest; and
(2) states that the coal:
(A) can be mined using generally accepted underground
mining practices; and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

135
(B) is of sufficient quantity and quality to be commercially
saleable.
(b) All coal in an area designated under subsection (a) is considered
a commercially minable coal resource.
(c) An affidavit referred to in subsection (a) may be made before
applying for permits for the actual mining of the commercially minable
coal resource. The division shall:
(1) subject to subsection (e), keep the affidavit and map
confidential; and
(2) use the affidavit and map solely for determining if a
commercially minable coal resource is present in an area for
which a permit application has been filed under IC 14-37.
(d) The division shall determine if the proposed well location is in
an area underlain by coal identified in subsection (a) upon receipt of:
(1) a permit application referred to in subsection (c)(2); or
(2) an inquiry from a person interested in oil and gas explorations
or drilling a well for oil and gas purposes.
(e) The name of the person who filed the map referred to in
subsection (c) is not confidential.
SECTION 206. IC 15-11-16.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 16.5. Commission on Invasive Species and Pests
Sec. 1. (a) After June 30, 2026, all powers, duties, agreements,
and liabilities of the Indiana pesticide review board established by
IC 15-16-4-42, before its repeal, and the invasive species council
established by IC 15-16-10-3, before its repeal, are transferred to
the department, as the successor entity.
(b) After June 30, 2026, all records and property of the Indiana
pesticide review board and the invasive species council, including
appropriations and other funds under the control or supervision of
the Indiana pesticide review board and the invasive species council,
are transferred to the department, as the successor entity.
(c) After June 30, 2026, any amounts owed to the Indiana
pesticide review board and the invasive species council before
December 31, 2027, are considered to be owed to the department,
as the successor agency.
(d) After June 30, 2026, a reference to the Indiana pesticide
review board or the invasive species council in a statute, rule, or
other document is considered a reference to the commission, as the
successor entity.
(e) After June 30, 2026, any rule adopted by the Indiana
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

136
pesticide review board is considered a rule of the commission.
(f) On July 1, 2026, the Purdue University treasurer shall
transfer the balance that remains on June 30, 2026, in the invasive
species council fund established by IC 15-16-10-12 to the state
comptroller. The state comptroller shall deposit the money
received under this subsection into the commission on invasive
species and pests' invasive species council fund established by
section 7 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "commission" refers to the
commission on invasive species and pests established by section 4
of this chapter.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "fund" refers to the commission
on invasive species and pests' invasive species council fund
established by section 7 of this chapter.
Sec. 4. (a) The commission on invasive species and pests is
established. The commission consists of the following voting
members:
(1) One (1) representative of the Indiana department of
health.
(2) One (1) representative of the department of natural
resources.
(3) One (1) representative of the department of environmental
management.
(4) One (1) representative of the department of
transportation.
(5) One (1) representative of the department.
(6) One (1) representative of the Purdue University office of
agricultural research programs, appointed by the director of
the department.
(7) Two (2) ecologists:
(A) one (1) of whom is a terrestrial ecologist; and
(B) one (1) of whom is an aquatic ecologist;
appointed by the director of the department. Not more than
one (1) ecologist may be a plant ecologist.
(8) One (1) public representative, appointed by the director of
the department.
(9) One (1) representative of the pesticide producing or
manufacturing industry, appointed by the director of the
department.
(10) Two (2) representatives of producers of agricultural
crops or products on which pesticides are applied or that may
be affected by the application of pesticides:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

137
(A) one (1) of whom represents producers of agronomic
crops; and
(B) one (1) of whom represents producers of specialty
crops;
appointed by the director of the department.
(11) One (1) public representative from a conservation
organization, appointed by the director of the department.
(12) Three (3) qualified scientists, one (1) each in the fields of
entomology, plant pathology, and weed science, appointed by
the director of the department. One (1) scientist must be the
representative of either the Purdue University office of
agricultural research programs or the Purdue University
cooperative extension service.
(13) Three (3) certified and licensed commercial applicators
of pesticides who must represent three (3) different certificate
or license categories established under IC 15-16-5-45,
appointed by the director of the department.
(14) Two (2) individuals, appointed by the director of the
department, who represent organizations that are primarily
concerned with any of the following:
(A) The hardwood tree industry.
(B) The horticulture industry.
(C) The agriculture industry.
(D) The aquaculture industry.
(15) Two (2) individuals, appointed by the director of the
department, who represent organizations or local
governmental agencies primarily concerned with any of the
following:
(A) Land trusts.
(B) Biodiversity conservation.
(C) Aquatic conservation.
(D) Local parks and recreation.
(b) The state chemist shall serve as:
(1) chairperson of the commission; and
(2) a nonvoting member of the commission.
(c) The members appointed under subsection (a) serve at the
will of the appointing authority.
(d) The commission must meet at least one (1) time annually and
may meet at other times and at a location specified by the
chairperson or a majority of the commission.
(e) The commission shall publish the:
(1) minutes; and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

138
(2) video;
of each meeting.
(f) Twelve (12) voting members of the commission constitute a
quorum.
(g) Official actions are subject to approval by a simple majority
of the voting members present at a called meeting.
(h) The commission shall be staffed by the department.
Sec. 5. (a) Each member of the commission who is not a state
employee is entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by
IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member is also entitled to reimbursement
for mileage, traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4, and
other expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's
duties as provided in the state policies and procedures established
by the Indiana department of administration and approved by the
budget agency.
(b) Each member of the commission who is a state employee is
entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under
IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in connection
with the member's duties as provided in the state policies and
procedures established by the Indiana department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
Sec. 6. (a) The commission has the following duties:
(1) Carry out the commission's duties under IC 15-16-4.
(2) Recommend:
(A) priorities for projects;
(B) funding; and
(C) rules and laws;
concerning invasive species to the appropriate governmental
agencies and legislative committees.
(3) Recommend a lead state agency to:
(A) develop an invasive species inventory for each invasive
species taxon; and
(B) develop and maintain a data management system for
invasive species in Indiana.
(4) Communicate with other states, federal agencies, and state
and regional organizations to enhance consistency and
effectiveness in:
(A) preventing the spread of;
(B) early detection of;
(C) response to; and
(D) management of;
invasive species.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

139
(5) Coordinate invasive species education and outreach
programs.
(6) Convene or support an invasive species meeting at least
once per biennium to provide information on best practices
and pertinent research findings.
(7) Assist governmental agencies in:
(A) reviewing current invasive species policies and
procedures; and
(B) addressing any deficiencies or inconsistencies
concerning invasive species policies and procedures.
(8) Assist state agencies in reviewing the agencies'
performance measures for accountability concerning the
agencies' invasive species actions.
(9) Receive reports from any governmental agency regarding
actions taken on recommendations of the commission.
(10) Apply for grants.
(11) Provide grants for education concerning or management
of invasive species.
(b) The commission does not have any regulatory authority over
invasive species or the authority to hear appeals of grievances.
(c) The commission may create advisory committees to provide
information and recommendations to the commission.
(d) The commission shall issue a report to the interim study
committee on agriculture and natural resources established by
IC 2-5-1.3-4 in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6 in every
odd-numbered year. The report must include a summary of:
(1) the commission's activities;
(2) the performance of the commission's duties; and
(3) efforts in Indiana to identify and manage invasive species.
The report may include recommendations of the commission.
Sec. 7. (a) The commission on invasive species and pests'
invasive species council fund is established to carry out the
commission's responsibilities under section 6(a)(2) through 6(a)(11)
of this chapter. The fund shall be administered by the department.
(b) The fund consists of any of the following:
(1) Grants.
(2) Appropriations.
(3) Gifts and donations.
(c) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(d) The state treasurer shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

140
manner as other public funds may be invested. Interest that
accrues from these investments must be deposited in the fund.
(e) Money in the fund may be used for purposes set forth in this
chapter and to meet the expenses of administering this chapter.
(f) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
SECTION 207. IC 15-12-5-1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "council" refers
to the Indiana land resources council established by section 3 of this
chapter.
SECTION 208. IC 15-12-5-2 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "director" refers
to the director of the Indiana state department of agriculture.
SECTION 209. IC 15-12-5-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 3. The Indiana land resources council is
established.
SECTION 210. IC 15-12-5-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 4. The director shall provide the necessary
staff and administrative support for the council.
SECTION 211. IC 15-12-5-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. (a) The purpose of the council is to:
department shall:
(1) collect information; and
(2) provide:
(A) educational assistance;
(B) technical assistance; and
(C) advice;
to local governments regarding land use strategies and issues
across the state.
(b) The department shall retain all records and information
produced under this chapter and kept under section 11 of this
chapter (before its repeal).
SECTION 212. IC 15-12-5-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 6. The council department may do the
following:
(1) Provide technical assistance and information about land use
strategies.
(2) Facilitate collaboration among commonly affected state,
county, and local government units.
(3) Compile and maintain a land planning information library,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

141
both hard copy and electronic, that includes current data on land
resources in Indiana.
(4) Establish or coordinate educational programs for
governmental units, nongovernmental entities, and the public with
special consideration for local planning commission members and
county commissioners.
(5) Provide counties and local communities conducting land use
planning with access to technical and legal assistance through a
referral service.
(6) Provide information to local authorities on model ordinances
for programs and techniques on land use.
(7) Obtain grants and assist counties and local communities in
locating additional funding sources for planning projects.
(8) Make recommendations to the general assembly and other
governmental bodies concerning land resources.
(9) When requested, advise the general assembly on proposals
relating to land resources.
SECTION 213. IC 15-12-5-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 7. (a) The council consists of the following
members:
(1) The director or the director's designee.
(2) Nine (9) members appointed by the governor as follows:
(A) One (1) member representing county government.
(B) One (1) member representing municipal government.
(C) One (1) member representing farm owners.
(D) One (1) member representing home building and land
development.
(E) One (1) member representing business.
(F) One (1) member representing the environment.
(G) One (1) member with expertise in land use issues
representing academia.
(H) One (1) member representing soil and water conservation
districts.
(I) One (1) member representing forestry.
(b) Not more than five (5) of the members appointed by the
governor under subsection (a)(2) may be of the same political party.
(c) The term of a member is four (4) years.
(d) Each member appointed by the governor under subsection (a)(2)
is entitled to hold office for the term of the member's appointment and
is entitled to continue to serve after expiration of the member's
appointment until a successor is appointed and qualified.
(e) A member is eligible for reappointment.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

142
(f) A member appointed by the governor under subsection (a)(2)
may be removed from office by the governor and serves at the pleasure
of the governor.
(g) If a vacancy occurs among the members of the council appointed
by the governor under subsection (a)(2), the governor shall appoint an
individual to serve for the unexpired term of the vacating member.
SECTION 214. IC 15-12-5-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 8. The director or the director's designee
serves as chairperson of the council.
SECTION 215. IC 15-12-5-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 9. (a) A quorum of the council for
transacting business consists of six (6) members.
(b) The affirmative vote of at least six (6) members is necessary for
any action to be taken by the council.
(c) A vacancy in the membership of the council does not impair the
right of a quorum to exercise all rights and perform all duties of the
council.
SECTION 216. IC 15-12-5-10 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 10. The council shall meet at the call of the
chairperson.
SECTION 217. IC 15-12-5-11 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 11. The council's records and information
shall be kept at the office of the director.
SECTION 218. IC 15-12-5-12 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 12. (a) Each member of the council who is
not a state employee is entitled to the minimum salary per diem
provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member is also entitled to
reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4
and other expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's
duties as provided in the state policies and procedures established by
the Indiana department of administration and approved by the budget
agency.
(b) Each member of the council who is a state employee is entitled
to reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4
and other expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's
duties as provided in the state policies and procedures established by
the Indiana department of administration and approved by the budget
agency.
SECTION 219. IC 15-15-5-29 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 29. This chapter expires
December 31, 2026.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

143
SECTION 220. IC 15-16-1-3.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 3.5. As used in this chapter, "board" refers
to the Indiana fertilizer advisory board established by IC 15-16-2-25.
SECTION 221. IC 15-16-2-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "board" refers to
the Indiana fertilizer advisory board established by section 25 of this
chapter.
SECTION 222. IC 15-16-2-25, AS AMENDED BY P.L.81-2009,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 25. (a) The Indiana fertilizer advisory board is
established to:
(1) study the regulation of fertilizer material; and
(2) advise the state chemist on the administration of this chapter.
(b) The board consists of the following members:
(1) Two (2) representatives of the retail fertilizer industry.
(2) One (1) representative of fertilizer manufacturing,
distributing, or manufacturing and distributing.
(3) Two (2) representatives of producers of agricultural crops.
(4) One (1) representative of the lawn care industry.
(5) One (1) representative of the Purdue School of Agriculture.
(6) One (1) representative of a public conservation organization.
(7) One (1) representative of the livestock industry.
(8) The president of the Indiana Plant Food and Agricultural
Chemicals Association, who serves as a nonvoting member.
(9) One (1) representative of the department of environmental
management, who serves as a nonvoting member.
(10) The fertilizer administrator for the office of the state chemist,
who serves as a nonvoting member.
(11) The engineer specialist for the office of the state chemist,
who serves as a nonvoting member.
(12) One (1) representative of the Indiana state department of
agriculture, who shall serve as a nonvoting member.
(c) The state chemist shall appoint the voting members of the board,
who serve for terms of four (4) years.
(d) Voting members of the board may be appointed for successive
terms at the discretion of the state chemist.
(e) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 223. IC 15-16-2-26 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 26. (a) The state chemist may remove a
voting member of the board for cause before the expiration of the
member's term.
(b) Vacancies created by the death, resignation, or removal for cause
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

144
of a member of the board must be filled in the manner prescribed for
appointment to that board position. Vacancies must be filled not later
than thirty (30) days after the death, resignation, or removal for cause.
SECTION 224. IC 15-16-2-27 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 27. The board shall elect one (1) of its voting
members chairperson to serve for a term of two (2) years, unless the
chairperson's appointment expires before the expiration of the term, in
which case the term is for the duration of the chairperson's
appointment.
SECTION 225. IC 15-16-2-28 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 28. The board shall invite nonvoting
members to serve at the pleasure of the board.
SECTION 226. IC 15-16-2-29 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 29. (a) The board may meet at times
specified by the chairperson or by a majority of the board, but shall
meet at least once a year.
(b) Five (5) voting members of the board constitutes a quorum.
Official actions require a majority of the voting members. The
chairperson may actively participate in all decisions of the board.
SECTION 227. IC 15-16-2-49.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.81-2009,
SECTION 31, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 49.5. (a) If a person violates this chapter or a rule
adopted under this chapter, the state chemist may:
(1) warn, issue a citation to, or impose a civil penalty on the
person; or
(2) deny, suspend, revoke, or amend the person's registration
under this chapter.
(b) The state chemist shall adopt by rule, under IC 4-22-2, a
schedule of civil penalties that may be imposed under subsection (a).
The state chemist may impose a civil penalty only according to a
schedule of civil penalties recommended by the board.
(c) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates this chapter
commits a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 228. IC 15-16-4-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "board" means the Indiana
pesticide review board established by section 42 of this chapter.
SECTION 229. IC 15-16-4-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. As used in this chapter,
"commission" refers to the commission on invasive species and
pests established by IC 15-11-16.5-4.
SECTION 230. IC 15-16-4-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.91-2020,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

145
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. As used in this chapter, "device" means any
instrument or contrivance intended for trapping, destroying, repelling,
or mitigating any pest. The term does not include:
(1) equipment used for the application of pesticides when sold
separately from the pesticides;
(2) firearms; or
(3) simple mechanical devices, including barriers, traps, or
adhesives, or other simple contrivances that are not subject to this
chapter as determined by the pesticide review board. commission.
SECTION 231. IC 15-16-4-17, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. As used in this chapter, "highly volatile
herbicide" means a herbicide that the board commission has
determined to be capable of emitting vapors that may cause serious
injury to desired plants by reason of movement of the vapors from the
area of application of the herbicide to areas inhabited by the desired
plants.
SECTION 232. IC 15-16-4-37, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2023,
SECTION 73, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 37. As used in this chapter, "restricted use
pesticide" means the following:
(1) Any pesticide classified as a restricted use pesticide by the
administrator of the United States Environmental Protection
Agency.
(2) A pesticide designated as a restricted use pesticide in a law
enacted by the general assembly.
(3) Subject to section 50 of this chapter, a pesticide that the board
commission has determined to be unduly hazardous to persons,
animals, plants, wildlife, waters, or lands other than the pests it is
intended to prevent, destroy, control, or mitigate.
(4) All formulations containing methomyl (Chemical Abstracts
Service Reg. No. 16752-77-5).
(5) Any dicamba containing pesticide product that:
(A) contains a dicamba active ingredient concentration greater
than or equal to six and one-half percent (6.5%); and
(B) is intended for agricultural production uses but is not
labeled solely for use on turf or other nonagricultural use sites.
SECTION 233. IC 15-16-4-38, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 38. As used in this chapter, "rodenticide" means
any substance or mixture of substances intended for:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

146
(1) preventing;
(2) destroying;
(3) repelling; or
(4) mitigating;
rodents or any other vertebrate animal that the board commission
declares to be a pest.
SECTION 234. IC 15-16-4-42 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 42. (a) The Indiana pesticide review board is established.
The board consists of the following members:
(1) One (1) representative of the Indiana department of health.
(2) One (1) representative of the department of natural resources.
(3) One (1) representative of the department of environmental
management.
(4) One (1) representative of the Purdue University office of
agricultural research programs.
(5) One (1) representative of the Purdue University cooperative
extension service.
(6) Two (2) ecologists:
(A) one (1) a terrestrial ecologist; and
(B) one (1) an aquatic ecologist.
Not more than one (1) ecologist may be a plant ecologist.
(7) One (1) public representative.
(8) One (1) representative of the pesticide producing or
manufacturing industry.
(9) Two (2) representatives of producers of agricultural crops or
products on which pesticides are applied or that may be affected
by the application of pesticides:
(A) one (1) of whom represents producers of agronomic crops;
and
(B) one (1) of whom represents producers of specialty crops.
(10) One (1) public representative from a conservation
organization.
(11) Three (3) qualified scientists, one (1) each in the fields of
entomology, plant pathology, and weed science. One (1) scientist
must be the representative of either the Purdue University office
of agricultural research programs or the Purdue University
cooperative extension service.
(12) Three (3) certified and licensed commercial applicators of
pesticides who must represent three (3) different certificate or
license categories established under IC 15-16-5-45.
(13) The state chemist, who is an ex officio member and shall
serve as a nonvoting member.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

147
(14) The pesticide administrator for the office of the state
chemist, who shall serve as a nonvoting member.
(15) The pesticide training coordinator, who shall serve as a
nonvoting member.
(b) The voting members shall be appointed by the governor for
terms of four (4) years and, subject to subsection (d), continue until the
member's successor is approved and qualified. Appointments shall be
made so that not more than five (5) terms expire annually.
(c) Voting members may be appointed for successive terms at the
discretion of the governor.
(d) The governor may remove a voting member of the board prior
to the expiration of the member's term for cause.
SECTION 235. IC 15-16-4-43 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 43. A vacancy on the board of a voting member created
by death, resignation, or removal for cause of a member shall be filled
by the governor not later than thirty (30) days after the occurrence. The
new member serves for the remainder of the vacated term and must
meet the qualifications to be appointed to the board.
SECTION 236. IC 15-16-4-44 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 44. The board shall elect a member to serve as
chairperson for a term of two (2) years. However, if the chairperson's
appointment ends before the expiration of the term, the term is for the
duration of the chairperson's appointment.
SECTION 237. IC 15-16-4-45 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 45. (a) The board shall meet at least annually.
(b) The board may meet at other times and at a location specified by
the chairperson or a majority of the board.
(c) The board shall publish the:
(1) minutes; and
(2) video;
of each meeting.
SECTION 238. IC 15-16-4-46 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 46. (a) Ten (10) voting members of the board constitute
a quorum.
(b) Official actions are subject to approval by a simple majority of
board members present at a called meeting.
(c) The chairperson shall actively participate in all decisions of the
board.
SECTION 239. IC 15-16-4-47 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 47. The following individuals appointed to the board
shall serve without compensation but are entitled to receive per diem
payments at rates and under conditions incident to these positions:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

148
(1) State officials.
(2) Staff members of state offices.
(3) Staff members of the Purdue University office of agricultural
research programs.
(4) Cooperative extension service staff members.
Other members are entitled to reimbursement for traveling and other
expenses as provided in the Purdue University travel policies and
procedures, established by the Purdue University department of
transportation and approved by the Purdue University vice president of
business services.
SECTION 240. IC 15-16-4-48, AS AMENDED BY P.L.99-2012,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 48. The board commission may:
(1) collect;
(2) analyze; and
(3) interpret;
information on matters relating to the registration and use of pesticides.
SECTION 241. IC 15-16-4-49, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 49. (a) The board commission may, after notice
and public hearing as provided in IC 4-22-2, declare as a pest any form
of:
(1) plant;
(2) animal life; or
(3) virus;
that is injurious to plants, humans, domestic animals, articles, or
substances.
(b) When a hearing is held by the board, commission, the board
commission may designate one (1) or more persons as the board's
commission's agent or representative to conduct the hearing.
SECTION 242. IC 15-16-4-50, AS AMENDED BY P.L.29-2024,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 50. (a) The board commission may recommend
to the general assembly the addition, deletion, or reclassification of
pesticides by submitting in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6 a
report of the recommendations to the legislative council. In making a
determination to add or reclassify a pesticide as a restricted use
pesticide for all of Indiana or designated areas within Indiana, the
board commission must find that the characteristics of a pesticide
require that rules restricting the:
(1) sale;
(2) distribution; or
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

149
(3) use;
of the pesticide by any person are necessary to prevent undue hazards
to persons, animals, wildlife, lands, or waters, other than the pests that
they are intended to prevent, destroy, control, or mitigate. The board
commission shall publish the board's commission's findings in the
Indiana Register.
(b) The board commission may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to do
the following:
(1) Provide for the safe:
(A) handling;
(B) transportation;
(C) storage;
(D) display;
(E) distribution;
(F) disposal; and
(G) production;
of pesticide products and pesticide containers.
(2) Restrict or prohibit the use of certain types of containers or
packages for specific pesticides. The restrictions may apply to the:
(A) type of construction;
(B) strength; or
(C) size;
to alleviate danger of spillage, breakage, or misuse.
(3) Determine the time and conditions of the:
(A) sale;
(B) distribution; or
(C) use;
of restricted use pesticide products.
(4) Require that any or all restricted use pesticide products be
purchased, possessed, or used only under:
(A) permit;
(B) certificate;
(C) license; or
(D) registration;
of the state chemist or under certain conditions or in certain
quantities or concentrations.
(5) Require all persons issued:
(A) permits;
(B) certificates;
(C) licenses; or
(D) registrations;
under this subsection to maintain records as to the use of the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

150
restricted use pesticide products.
(c) The state chemist shall maintain a list of each class of pesticides
adopted by Indiana law or board commission rule on the website for
the state chemist. Failure to include a pesticide on the list does not
exempt a person from compliance with a law or rule for a pesticide
designated by law or rule.
SECTION 243. IC 15-16-4-52.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.249-2023,
SECTION 76, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 52.5. (a) Neither the board commission nor the
state chemist may by rule or otherwise impose a requirement or
limitation on the storage, distribution, use, application, or record
keeping of a general use pesticide by:
(1) a certified applicator;
(2) a commercial applicator;
(3) a licensed applicator for hire;
(4) a licensed applicator not for hire;
(5) a licensed pesticide business;
(6) a licensed public applicator; or
(7) a private applicator;
that is more stringent than the requirements and limitations applicable
under federal law, federal regulations, or Indiana statutory law to the
general use pesticide or a pesticide product containing a general use
pesticide and no restricted use pesticide.
(b) A rule or other requirement or limitation of the board
commission in effect on June 30, 2023, that does not comply with this
section is voided on July 1, 2023, to the extent it conflicts with this
section.
SECTION 244. IC 15-16-4-59, AS AMENDED BY P.L.99-2012,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 59. A person may not:
(1) detach, alter, deface, or destroy, in whole or in part, any label
or labeling provided for in this chapter or rules adopted under this
chapter;
(2) add any substance to, or take any substance from, a pesticide
in a manner that may defeat the purpose of this chapter;
(3) use for the person's own advantage or reveal, other than to:
(A) the state chemist;
(B) proper officials;
(C) employees of the state;
(D) the courts of this state in response to a subpoena;
(E) physicians; or
(F) pharmacists and other qualified persons for use in
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

151
emergencies in the preparation of antidotes;
any information relative to formulas of products acquired by
authority of section 61 or 64 of this chapter;
(4) use or cause to be used any pesticide contrary to section 50 of
this chapter;
(5) use a highly volatile herbicide except on written permission by
the state chemist; or
(6) neglect, or after notice, refuse to comply with this chapter, the
rules adopted under this chapter, or a lawful order of the state
chemist or board. commission.
SECTION 245. IC 15-16-4-60, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 60. Section 59(4) of this chapter does not apply to
pesticides used in research by:
(1) the United States Department of Agriculture;
(2) the United States Department of Interior;
(3) the Purdue University agricultural research programs; or
(4) other persons who are qualified researchers as approved by the
board. commission.
SECTION 246. IC 15-16-4-64.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.120-2008,
SECTION 70, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 64.5. (a) A person who is:
(1) regulated under this chapter; and
(2) aggrieved by any decision of the state chemist;
may obtain a review by the board commission if the person files a
written petition with the board commission not later than thirty (30)
days after the state chemist's decision.
(b) The board commission shall provide a copy of a petition filed
under subsection (a) to the state chemist not later than seven (7) days
after receiving the petition.
(c) Not more than fifteen (15) days after receiving a petition under
subsection (b), the state chemist shall certify and file with the board
commission a transcript of any record related to the petition, including
a transcript of any evidence received.
(d) Whenever a hearing is held under this section, the board
commission may designate one (1) or more persons as the board's
commission's agent or representative to conduct the hearing. The agent
or representative shall conduct the hearing in the manner provided by
IC 4-21.5-3.
(e) After hearing the appeal, the board commission shall affirm, set
aside, or modify the action of the state chemist. However, the state
chemist's finding of facts that are supported by the substantial evidence
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

152
is considered conclusive.
(f) A person aggrieved by any action of the board commission may
obtain judicial review under IC 4-21.5-5.
SECTION 247. IC 15-16-4-69, AS AMENDED BY P.L.29-2024,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 69. (a) Subject to this section, if a person violates
this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter, the state chemist
under IC 4-21.5-3-6 may warn, cite, or impose a civil penalty on the
person or:
(1) deny;
(2) suspend;
(3) revoke; or
(4) amend;
the person's registration under this chapter.
(b) The state chemist may impose civil penalties under this section
only in accordance with subsections (c) through (e). However, this
section does not require the state chemist to impose a civil penalty on
a person for any violation of this chapter or a rule adopted under this
chapter.
(c) Except for a violation described in subsection (d) or (e), the state
chemist may impose a civil penalty not exceeding two hundred fifty
dollars ($250) for a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under
this chapter. A civil penalty imposed under this subsection may be
adjusted for mitigating actions described in subsection (f). A civil
penalty under this subsection may not be imposed unless a warning for
a violation has previously been issued to the person for the same
violation within the previous five (5) years.
(d) Subject to adjustment under subsection (f) for mitigating actions,
the state chemist may impose a civil penalty not exceeding five
hundred dollars ($500) if the state chemist finds that a person has done
any of the following:
(1) Unknowingly committed an act described in section 57(1) of
this chapter.
(2) Committed an act described in section 57(2) through 57(5) of
this chapter.
(3) Unknowingly committed an act described in section 66(1) of
this chapter.
(4) Committed an act described in section 66(2) or 66(3) of this
chapter.
(5) Stored or dispensed a general use pesticide in a manner
inconsistent with 40 CFR 165.
(e) The state chemist may impose a civil penalty of one thousand
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

153
dollars ($1,000) if the state chemist finds that a person has done any of
the following:
(1) Knowingly committed an act described in section 57(1) of this
chapter.
(2) Committed an act described in section 57(8) of this chapter.
(3) Knowingly committed an act described in section 66(1) of this
chapter.
(4) Committed an act described in section 67, 68, 73(c), or 77 of
this chapter.
(5) Stored or dispensed a restricted use pesticide in a manner
inconsistent with 40 CFR 165.
(6) After notice, refused to comply with this chapter, the rules
adopted under this chapter, or a lawful order of the state chemist
or board. commission.
(f) The state chemist may not adjust the amount of the civil penalty
for a violation listed in subsection (e). The state chemist may reduce
the amount of the civil penalty for a violation listed in subsection (c) or
(d) if the state chemist finds that the person responsible for the
violation has taken any of the following mitigating actions:
(1) Cooperated with the state chemist during the investigation or
inspection process.
(2) Took corrective action to prevent future similar violations.
(3) Compensated a victim for any adverse effects that resulted
from the violation.
The state chemist may reduce the amount of the civil penalty by twenty
percent (20%) for each mitigating action taken by the person
responsible for the violation.
(g) A proceeding under IC 4-21.5-3 that involves the imposition of
a civil penalty may be consolidated with any other proceeding
commenced under IC 4-21.5 to enforce this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter.
(h) The state chemist shall limit the imposition of a civil penalty in
a proceeding involving multiple counts of repeated incidents of the
same violation to five (5) counts.
(i) Any findings related to a violation of this chapter must be
disclosed to the alleged violator before a:
(1) final determination is made; and
(2) penalty is assessed.
(j) Unless the state chemist has evidence of wrongdoing by the
licensed pesticide business, any warnings, citations, or civil penalties
regarding a pesticide use in violation of this chapter must be directed
at:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

154
(1) the employee who committed the violation; or
(2) the person who was responsible for the supervision of the
employee who committed the violation.
(k) Money collected for civil penalties imposed under this section
shall be credited to the office of Purdue pesticide programs. The money
may be used only to provide education about pesticides.
SECTION 248. IC 15-16-5-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "board" means the Indiana
pesticide review board established by IC 15-16-4-42.
SECTION 249. IC 15-16-5-7.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.5. As used in this chapter,
"commission" refers to the commission on invasive species and
pests established by IC 15-11-16-4.
SECTION 250. IC 15-16-5-24, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 24. As used in this chapter, "pest" means:
(1) any insect, rodent, nematode, fungus, or weed; or
(2) any other form of terrestrial or aquatic plant or animal life or
virus, bacteria, or other microorganism (except viruses, bacteria,
or other microorganisms on or in living humans or other living
animals) that is declared to be a pest by the administrator of the
United States Environmental Protection Agency or by the board.
commission.
SECTION 251. IC 15-16-5-44, AS AMENDED BY P.L.29-2024,
SECTION 38, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 44. (a) The board commission may adopt rules
under IC 4-22-2 prescribing policies and procedures relating to
restricted use pesticides:
(1) use;
(2) application;
(3) storage;
(4) distribution; and
(5) record keeping.
(b) The state chemist may adopt additional rules under IC 4-22-2 as
required to accomplish the purpose of this chapter.
(c) Rules adopted under this chapter may not permit any pesticide
use that is prohibited by federal law and regulations or orders issued
under federal law.
(d) The following requirements and standards established in federal
rules shall be adopted as state requirements and standards:
(1) 40 CFR 165, federal pesticide containers, repackaging, and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

155
containment structures.
(2) 40 CFR 170, federal pesticide agricultural worker protection
standard.
(3) 40 CFR 171.201, federal direct supervision of noncertified
applicators by certified applicators.
SECTION 252. IC 15-16-5-64, AS AMENDED BY P.L.29-2024,
SECTION 53, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 64. (a) A person may not produce, transport, store,
handle, or dispose of any pesticide product or pesticide product
containers in a manner that may:
(1) cause injury to:
(A) humans;
(B) beneficial vegetation;
(C) crops;
(D) livestock;
(E) wildlife; or
(F) beneficial insects; or
(2) pollute any waterway in a way harmful to any wildlife in a
waterway.
(b) The board commission may adopt rules governing the
production, transportation, storage, handling, and disposal of pesticide
products or pesticide containers. In determining these standards, the
board commission shall take into consideration any regulations issued
by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.
(c) Except for pesticides labeled for use in the treatment of drinking
water, pesticide storage, mixing, and loading is prohibited within the
isolation area of a wellhead protection area zone. Application of
pesticides within the isolation area is permitted unless prohibited by the
pesticide label.
(d) A pesticide storage container located within the wellhead
protection area zone and outside of the isolation area must be stored:
(1) on an impervious surface designed to contain a discharge of
the entire contents of the largest storage container plus the volume
displaced by all the other items within the contained area; and
(2) in an area protected from precipitation.
(e) A pesticide spill or discharge within the wellhead protection area
zone must be cleaned up immediately upon discovery and in a manner
that prevents the pesticide from threatening waters of the state, dry
wells, storm sewers, sanitary sewers, or septic systems.
(f) A person may not open burn a pesticide container in a manner
that allows air contaminants resulting from combustion to be emitted
directly into the air without passing through a stack or chimney from
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

156
an enclosed chamber, as allowed under 326 IAC 4-1.
SECTION 253. IC 15-16-5-65, AS AMENDED BY P.L.29-2024,
SECTION 56, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 65. Subject to section 66 of this chapter, the state
chemist under IC 4-21.5-3-6 may warn, cite, or impose a civil penalty
on a person for a violation under this chapter. The state chemist may
also deny, suspend, revoke, or modify any provision of any license,
permit, registration, or certification issued under this chapter if the state
chemist finds that the applicant or the holder of a license, permit,
registration, or certification has been issued a final civil order imposed
under 7 U.S.C. 136l(a), has a criminal conviction under 7 U.S.C.
136l(b), or has committed any of the following acts, each of which is
a violation of this chapter:
(1) Made false or fraudulent claims either verbally or through any
media misrepresenting the effect of pesticide products or methods
to be used.
(2) Recommended, used, or supervised the use of any registered
pesticide product in a manner inconsistent with its labeling
approved by the United States Environmental Protection Agency
or Indiana state registration for that pesticide, or in violation of
the United States Environmental Protection Agency or Indiana
state restrictions on the use of that pesticide product.
(3) Used known ineffective or improper pesticide products or
known ineffective amounts of pesticides.
(4) Operated faulty or unsafe equipment.
(5) Operated in a careless or negligent manner.
(6) Neglected or, after notice, refused to comply with this chapter,
the rules adopted under this chapter, or of any lawful order of the
state chemist or the board. commission.
(7) Refused or neglected to:
(A) keep and maintain the records required by this chapter; or
(B) make reports and supply information when required or
requested by the state chemist in the course of an investigation
or inspection.
(8) Made false or fraudulent records, invoices, or reports.
(9) Engaged in or professed to be engaged in the business of:
(A) using a pesticide or any other product regulated under this
chapter or by rules adopted under this chapter; or
(B) making a diagnostic inspection to determine infestations
of a wood destroying pest;
for hire on the property of another without having a business
license issued by the state chemist.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

157
(10) Used or supervised the use of a pesticide product that is
required to be used under this chapter by a person who is
certified, licensed, or permitted without having a person who is
certified, licensed, or permitted under this chapter conducting the
use.
(11) Used fraud or misrepresentation in the qualification or
application for, or renewal of, a license, permit, registration, or
certification.
(12) Refused or neglected to comply with any limitations or
restrictions on or in a duly issued license, permit, registration, or
certification.
(13) Aided or abetted a person to evade this chapter, conspired
with a person to evade this chapter, or allowed a license, permit,
registration, or certification to be used by another person.
(14) Made false or misleading statements during or after an
inspection concerning any infestation or infection of pests.
(15) Impersonated any federal, state, county, or city inspector,
investigator, or official.
(16) Knowingly purchased or used a pesticide product that was
not registered under IC 15-16-4.
(17) Failed to continuously maintain financial responsibility
required under section 58 of this chapter or to provide proof of
financial responsibility to the state chemist when requested.
(18) Intentionally altered a duly issued license, permit,
registration, or certification.
(19) Recklessly, knowingly, or intentionally impeded or prevented
the state chemist or the state chemist's agent from performing a
duty of the state chemist.
(20) Applied a pesticide in a manner that allowed it to drift from
the target site in a sufficient quantity to cause an adverse effect to
a nontarget site.
(21) Distributed a restricted use pesticide without having a
pesticide dealer registration issued by the state chemist.
(22) Distributed a restricted use pesticide to a noncertified end
user of the pesticide.
(23) Stored or disposed of a pesticide in a manner inconsistent
with the requirements established by the United States
Environmental Protection Agency or this chapter.
(24) Failed to perform the notification requirements for a
pesticide application in a school.
SECTION 254. IC 15-16-5-66, AS AMENDED BY P.L.29-2024,
SECTION 57, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

158
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 66. (a) The state chemist may impose civil
penalties under this section only in accordance with subsections (b)
through (d). However, this section does not require the state chemist to
impose a civil penalty on a person for any violation of this chapter or
a rule adopted under this chapter.
(b) Except for a violation described in subsection (c) or (d), the state
chemist may impose a civil penalty not exceeding two hundred fifty
dollars ($250) for a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under
this chapter. A civil penalty imposed under this subsection shall be
adjusted for mitigating actions described in subsection (e). A civil
penalty under this subsection may not be imposed unless a warning for
a violation has previously been issued to the person for the same
violation within the previous five (5) years.
(c) Subject to adjustment under subsection (e) for mitigating
actions, the state chemist may impose a civil penalty not exceeding five
hundred dollars ($500) if the state chemist finds that a person has done
any of the following:
(1) After written notice, neglected to:
(A) keep and maintain records; or
(B) make reports and supply information when required or
requested by the state chemist in the course of an investigation
or inspection;
as described in section 65(7) of this chapter.
(2) Committed an act described in section 65(8) of this chapter.
(3) Unknowingly committed an act described in section 65(9) or
65(10) of this chapter.
(4) After written notice, neglected to comply with any limitations
or restrictions on or in a duly issued license, permit, registration,
or certification as described in section 65(12) of this chapter.
(5) Committed an act described in section 65(14) or 65(16) of this
chapter.
(6) Recommended, used, or supervised the use of a general use
pesticide product in a manner inconsistent with its labeling and
resulting in an adverse effect.
(7) Recommended, used, or supervised the use of a restricted use
pesticide product in a manner inconsistent with its labeling and
resulting in no adverse effect.
(8) Applied a general use pesticide in a manner that allows it to
drift from the target site in a sufficient quantity to cause an
adverse effect to a nontarget site.
(9) Stored or dispensed a general use pesticide in a manner
inconsistent with the requirements in 40 CFR 165, Subpart E.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

159
(d) The state chemist may impose a civil penalty of one thousand
dollars ($1,000) if the state chemist finds that a person has done any of
the following:
(1) Stored or dispensed a pesticide in a manner inconsistent with
the requirements in 40 CFR 165, Subpart E, or as described in
section 64(a) of this chapter.
(2) Committed an act described in section 65(5) of this chapter.
(3) After notice, refused to comply with this chapter, the rules
adopted under this chapter, or any lawful order of the state
chemist or the board commission as described in section 65(6) of
this chapter.
(4) Refused to:
(A) keep and maintain records; or
(B) make reports and supply information when required or
requested by the state chemist in the course of an investigation
or inspection;
as described in section 65(7) of this chapter.
(5) Intentionally committed an act described in section 65(8) of
this chapter.
(6) Knowingly committed an act described in section 65(9) or
65(10) of this chapter.
(7) Committed an act described in section 65(11) of this chapter.
(8) Refused to comply with any limitations or restrictions on or in
a duly issued license, permit, registration, or certification as
described in section 65(12) of this chapter;
(9) Committed an act described in section 65(13), 65(15), 65(18),
or 65(19) of this chapter.
(10) Recommended, used, or supervised the use of a restricted use
pesticide product in a manner inconsistent with its labeling and
resulting in an adverse effect.
(11) Applied a restricted use pesticide in a manner that allows it
to drift from the target site in a sufficient quantity to cause an
adverse effect to a nontarget site.
(12) Distributed a restricted use pesticide without having a
pesticide dealer registration issued by the state chemist, as
described in section 65(21) of this chapter.
(13) Distributed a restricted use pesticide to a noncertified end
user of the pesticide, as described in section 65(22) of this
chapter.
(e) The state chemist may not adjust the amount of the civil penalty
for a violation listed in subsection (d). The state chemist may reduce
the amount of the civil penalty for a violation listed in subsection (b)
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

160
or (c) if the state chemist finds that the person responsible for the
violation has taken any of the following mitigating actions:
(1) Cooperated with the state chemist during the investigation or
inspection process.
(2) Took corrective action to prevent future similar violations.
(3) Compensated a victim for any adverse effects that resulted
from the violation.
The state chemist may reduce the amount of the civil penalty by twenty
percent (20%) for each mitigating action taken by the person
responsible for the violation.
(f) A proceeding under IC 4-21.5-3 that involves a civil penalty may
be consolidated with any other proceeding commenced under IC 4-21.5
to enforce this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter.
(g) The state chemist shall limit the imposition of a civil penalty in
a proceeding involving multiple counts of repeated incidents of the
same violation to five (5) counts.
(h) Any findings related to a violation of this chapter or rules
adopted under this chapter must be disclosed to the alleged violator
before a:
(1) final determination is made; and
(2) penalty is assessed.
(i) Unless the state chemist has evidence of wrongdoing by the
licensed pesticide business, any warnings, citations, or civil penalties
regarding a pesticide use in violation of this chapter must be directed
at:
(1) the employee who committed the violation; or
(2) the person who was responsible for the supervision of the
employee who committed the violation.
(j) Money collected for civil penalties imposed under section 65 of
this chapter shall be credited to the office of Purdue pesticide
programs. The money may be used only to provide education about
pesticides.
SECTION 255. IC 15-16-5-67, AS AMENDED BY P.L.109-2015,
SECTION 38, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 67. (a) A person who is:
(1) subject to an action under section 65, 66, or 70 of this chapter;
and
(2) aggrieved by any decision by the state chemist;
may obtain a review by the board, commission, if the person files a
written petition with the board commission not later than thirty (30)
days after the state chemist's decision.
(b) The board commission shall provide a copy of a petition filed
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

161
under subsection (a) to the state chemist not later than seven (7) days
after receiving the petition.
(c) Not more than fifteen (15) days after receiving a petition under
subsection (b), the state chemist shall certify and file with the board
commission a transcript of any record related to the petition, including
a transcript of any evidence received.
(d) Whenever a hearing is held under this section, the board
commission may designate one (1) or more persons as the board's
agent or representative to conduct the hearing. The agent or
representative shall conduct the hearing in the manner provided by
IC 4-21.5-3.
(e) After hearing the appeal, the board commission shall affirm, set
aside, or modify the action of the state chemist. However, the state
chemist's finding of facts that are supported by the substantial evidence
is considered conclusive.
(f) A person aggrieved by any action of the board commission may
obtain judicial review under IC 4-21.5-5.
SECTION 256. IC 15-16-5-71, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 71. (a) A political subdivision (as defined in
IC 36-1-2-13) does not have authority to regulate by ordinance the use
or application of pesticides.
(b) A political subdivision may, by resolution, petition the board
commission for a hearing to allow a variance from a rule of the board
commission because of special circumstances relating to the use or
application of a pesticide. If a petition is received, the board
commission shall hold a public hearing to consider allowing the
variance requested. The public hearing shall be conducted in an
informal manner. IC 4-21.5 does not apply to the public hearing under
this section.
(c) The board commission may grant a variance requested under
this section with or without changes.
SECTION 257. IC 15-16-10 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Invasive Species Council).
SECTION 258. IC 15-18-2-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "board" refers to
the creamery examining board established by section 9 of this chapter.
Indiana state board of animal health established by IC 15-17-3-1.
SECTION 259. IC 15-18-2-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 8. The creamery license division of Purdue
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

162
University, in cooperation with the board shall enforce this chapter.
SECTION 260. IC 15-18-2-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2014,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The creamery examining board is
established. The board consists of eight (8) members composed of the
following:
(1) Three (3) producers of milk and cream.
(2) Three (3) processors of milk and cream.
(3) One (1) member of the animal sciences department who shall
be appointed by the dean of agriculture of Purdue University.
(4) One (1) milk hauler.
The board shall elect a chairperson annually.
(b) Two (2) of the producer members shall be elected to the board
by the board of directors of the Indiana Dairy Producers, Inc. The third
producer member shall be elected to the board by the Indiana State
Dairy Association. If an organization is unable to elect a producer to
the board, then the other organization shall elect the producer to the
board. However, if both organizations are unable to elect a producer to
the board, the dean of agriculture of Purdue University shall appoint a
producer to fill the open position after consulting with dairy producers
in Indiana.
(c) The three (3) processor members shall be elected to the board by
the Midwest Dairy Products Association. If the Midwest Dairy
Products Association is not able to elect a processor to the board, the
dean of agriculture of Purdue University shall appoint a processor to
fill the open position after consulting with dairy processors in Indiana.
(d) The Midwest Dairy Products Association shall elect one (1)
member each year. The board of directors of the Indiana Dairy
Producers, Inc., shall elect a producer member to the board two (2) out
of every three (3) years and the Indiana State Dairy Association shall
select a producer member during the third year.
(e) The milk hauler member shall be appointed to the board by the
dean of agriculture of Purdue University.
(f) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 261. IC 15-18-2-10 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 10. (a) The term of a board member is three
(3) years.
(b) A vacancy in any membership of the board shall be filled by the
same process for the unexpired term.
SECTION 262. IC 15-18-2-11 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 11. Board members shall be reimbursed by
the creamery license division for actual traveling expenses and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

163
subsistence while attending a regular or called meeting.
SECTION 263. IC 15-18-2-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2014,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 13. On recommendation of the board and
with the approval of the dean of agriculture of Purdue University,
inspectors of the creamery license division With the approval of the
dean of agriculture of Purdue University, the board may inspect
records or collect data on the quality and quantity of milk and cream in
plants that:
(1) cooperate with Purdue University in the quality improvement
program; or
(2) assist in any other project that will be of mutual benefit to the
Indiana dairy industry and the Purdue University animal sciences
department.
SECTION 264. IC 15-18-2-14, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 14. (a) Milk and cream must be purchased
on the basis of weight or volume and:
(1) the butterfat content;
(2) the protein content; or
(3) a combination of butterfat and protein content;
as determined by any test or tests approved by the board, which may
also have been designated official by AOAC International.
(b) A payment for milk must be made either on the basis of:
(1) a fresh sample taken and tested according to procedures
established under rules adopted by the board; or
(2) a composite test.
A composite sample must cover a period of not more than sixteen (16)
days. In each plant, all composite samples must cover the same period
for each test and succeeding periods must be as nearly equal as
possible. All composite samples must cover the same period. A
uniform sample consisting of at least ten (10) cubic centimeters of milk
must be taken each day, except when milk is frozen or partly churned,
from the milk furnished by each person. An approved preservative
must be added to the sample and each composite sample must be held
in an approved, rubber stoppered, airtight bottle that is plainly labeled
to show the name or number of the person whose milk the composite
sample represents. The milk to be sampled must be poured into a weigh
tank approved by the creamery license division board meeting the
standards prescribed in rules, be run through a fine mesh or perforated
metal strainer, and be homogeneous in richness before any sample is
taken. The composite samples must be kept in a refrigerated cabinet or
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

164
cooler in or near the receiving room at a temperature of not more than
forty-two (42) degrees Fahrenheit, away from strong light, and must be
kept free of mold. The test must be made within seventy-two (72)
hours, excluding Sundays and holidays, after the last sample has been
added to the composite sample.
(c) If at the close of any composite period the composite samples are
inaccurate as determined by the creamery license division, board, three
(3) daily samples must be taken within the first five (5) days of the
following composite period. The average of the three (3) fresh samples
determines the basis of payment for the composite period in question.
(d) In each plant where composite samples of milk are taken, the
owner or manager shall delegate an individual who is responsible for
the care, condition, and accuracy of all composite samples.
(e) After the composite samples are emptied, the sample bottles
must be thoroughly washed, and all bottles and rubber stoppers shall
be sterilized before being used again.
(f) Composite samples may be removed from the plant for testing
elsewhere only on written permission from the creamery license
division. board.
SECTION 265. IC 15-18-2-18, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 18. (a) A dairy processing plant, a receiving
station, a milk shipping station, a milk factory, a milk distributor, a
cheese factory, a condensery, an ice cream factory, other processing
plant, person, or person's agent that handles, receives, buys, or pays for
milk or cream from a producer, a bargaining agent, or another plant
shall obtain a license from the creamery license division. board.
(b) A license must be issued to the dairy, dairy processing plant,
receiving station, milk factory, milk distributor, cheese factory,
condensery, ice cream factory, other processing plant, person, or
person's agent by the creamery license division board upon:
(1) compliance with sections 14 through 17 of this chapter; and
(2) payment of a license fee as provided in sections 22 and 23 of
this chapter.
A license shall be revoked by Purdue University upon recommendation
of the board if the licensee fails to comply with the rules under which
the license was granted.
SECTION 266. IC 15-18-2-19, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2014,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 19. (a) A person who does testing in
connection with the receiving, buying, or paying for milk or cream on
the basis of the total composition or the protein and fat components
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

165
contained in the milk or cream, either for the person or as an officer, a
servant, an agent, or an employee of any person, must hold a tester's
license.
(b) A dairy processing plant, receiving station, or other factory, or
person, or person's agent, that receives, buys, or pays for milk or cream
on the basis of the total composition or the protein and fat components
contained in the milk or cream shall employ a licensed tester to
supervise and is responsible for the operation of the testing of milk or
cream.
(c) A milk tester's license or cream tester's license shall be issued to
a person by the creamery license division board if the person:
(1) passes a satisfactory examination as provided for in the rules
adopted by the board and demonstrates that the person is
competent and qualified to test milk or cream; and
(2) pays a license fee as provided in section 24 of this chapter.
A license shall be revoked by the creamery license division upon
recommendation of the board if the licensee fails to comply with the
rules under which the license was granted.
(d) The board may refuse to issue or reissue a license under this
section to a person who:
(1) has:
(A) previously held a license under this section; and
(B) had the license revoked or suspended by the board; or
(2) has held a milk testing related license or permit that has been
suspended or revoked in another state.
SECTION 267. IC 15-18-2-20, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2014,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 20. (a) A person who does sampling in
connection with receiving, buying, or paying for milk or cream on the
basis of the total composition of milk or the protein and fat components
contained in the milk or cream, either for the person, or as officer,
servant, agent, or employee of any person, must hold a sampler's
license.
(b) A dairy processing plant, receiving station, other factory, person,
or person's agent, that receives, buys, or pays for milk or cream on the
basis of the amount of butterfat contained in the milk or cream shall
employ a licensed sampler to supervise and is responsible for the
sampling and weighing of milk or cream to obtain a representative
sample and make and record correct weights of the whole amount of
milk or cream delivered.
(c) A milk sampler's license or cream sampler's license shall be
issued to a person by the creamery license division board if the person:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

166
(1) passes a satisfactory examination as provided for in the rules
adopted by the board and demonstrates that the person is
competent and qualified to sample milk or cream; and
(2) pays a license fee as provided in section 25 of this chapter.
A license shall be revoked by the creamery license division upon
recommendation of the board if the licensee fails to comply with the
rules under which the license was granted.
(d) A license to test milk or cream includes the authority to sample
and weigh milk or cream.
(e) The board may refuse to issue or reissue a license under this
section to a person who:
(1) has:
(A) previously held a license under this section; and
(B) had the license revoked or suspended by the board; or
(2) has held a milk sampling related license or permit that has
been suspended or revoked in another state.
SECTION 268. IC 15-18-2-22, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 22. The creamery license division board
shall issue a plant license to every dairy processing plant, receiving
station, milk factory, cheese factory, condensery, ice cream factory, or
other person that complies with section 18 of this chapter and pays to
the creamery license division board seventy-five dollars ($75) plus a
fee of:
(1) twelve dollars ($12) per million on milk receipts of at least ten
million (10,000,000) but not more than fifty million (50,000,000)
pounds;
(2) nine dollars ($9) per million on milk receipts of at least fifty
million (50,000,000) but not more than one hundred million
(100,000,000) pounds; and
(3) five dollars ($5) per million on milk receipts of at least one
hundred million (100,000,000) pounds;
during the preceding year ending December 31. The maximum fee may
not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) regardless of volume
received. Out-of-state milk receipts are exempt from the payment of
fees.
SECTION 269. IC 15-18-2-23, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 23. A license shall be issued to a receiving
station or other milk or cream processing plant upon payment to the
creamery license division board a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25).
SECTION 270. IC 15-18-2-24, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

167
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 24. A license shall be issued to an applicant
for a milk tester's license or cream tester's license if the applicant:
(1) complies with section 19 of this chapter; and
(2) pays to the creamery license division board a fee of fifteen
dollars ($15).
SECTION 271. IC 15-18-2-25, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 25. A license shall be issued to an applicant
for a sampler's license if the applicant:
(1) complies with section 20 of this chapter; and
(2) pays to the creamery license division board a fee of ten
dollars ($10).
SECTION 272. IC 15-18-2-28, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 28. (a) To secure sufficient funds to
implement this chapter and to ensure accuracy to milk and cream
producers in the weighing, sampling, and testing of milk and cream:
(1) a dairy processing plant;
(2) a receiving station;
(3) a milk factory;
(4) a milk distributor;
(5) a cheese factory;
(6) a condensery;
(7) an ice cream factory;
(8) any other processing plant; or
(9) a person purchasing fluid milk or cream in Indiana directly
from producers or a producers' association or otherwise receiving
milk directly from producers;
shall, during the month of May of each year, pay to the treasurer of
Purdue University board for the fluid milk or cream delivered during
the month of May a sum equal in amount to two and one-half cents
($.025) per one hundred (100) pounds for all fluid milk purchased
during that time. For the financing of the producers' share of this
program, the processor shall charge the two and one-half cents ($.025)
per one hundred (100) pounds back to the producer association or
cooperative. For those patrons who do not belong to producer
associations or cooperatives, the processor shall make this charge
directly to the individual producer. Butterfat purchased from producers
other than in the form of fluid milk shall be converted for the purpose
of the deduction into four percent (4%) milk equivalent. Out-of-state
receipts are exempt from the payment of these fees.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

168
(b) All persons required to make payments under this section shall
make reports of all purchases of milk and cream at the times and in the
form as required by the creamery license division. board.
(c) It is a violation of this chapter for a person to fail to make:
(1) the payments required under this section; or
(2) an accurate accounting of the amount of fluid milk and cream
purchased.
SECTION 273. IC 15-18-2-29, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 29. Payments under section 28 of this
chapter shall be made to the treasurer of Purdue University board not
later than June 20 of each year. The money received is for the exclusive
use of the creamery license division. board. The money shall be
expended for the following:
(1) Salaries and traveling expenses of inspectors.
(2) Necessary equipment and supplies for the inspection of all
plants and stations.
(3) The examination of applicants for licenses.
(4) Disseminating information and instruction by means of
publication.
(5) All other expenses necessary in administering this chapter.
SECTION 274. IC 15-18-2-31, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 367, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 31. (a) The money for license
fees and for inspection fees as provided in this chapter shall be paid to
the treasurer of Purdue University. The Purdue University board of
trustees shall expend the collected fees, on proper vouchers to be filed
with the state comptroller, in meeting all necessary expenses in
carrying out this chapter, including the employment of inspectors,
traveling expenses of inspectors, expenses of issuing publications, and
glassware equipment, testing device, and factory inspection as provided
in this chapter.
(b) The treasurer's annual report to the governor must include a
classified report showing the total receipts and expenditures of all fees
received under this chapter. board for deposit in the creamery
inspection fund established by section 31.5 of this chapter.
SECTION 275. IC 15-18-2-31.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 31.5. (a) The creamery
inspection fund is established.
(b) The creamery inspection fund consists of license fees and
inspection fees paid under this chapter.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

169
(c) Money in the creamery inspection fund may be used to carry
out the purposes of this chapter.
SECTION 276. IC 15-18-2-32, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 32. Plants and stations covered by this
chapter as listed in section 18 of this chapter (dairy processing plant
and receiving station licenses) shall report before April 1 of each year
the amount of milk or cream, or both, purchased during the last
calendar year with the amount of butterfat in the milk or cream. Any
other data or statistics desired by the creamery license division board
pertaining to the purchase of milk or cream must be reported to the
creamery license division board by the person according to and on
forms furnished by the creamery license division. board. A person
providing information under this section shall keep complete and
accurate records of the person's business.
SECTION 277. IC 15-18-2-33, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 33. (a) For purposes of this chapter,
inspectors of the creamery license division board may do the
following:
(1) Enter at all reasonable hours all places where milk or cream
is being stored, bottled, or processed, or where milk or cream is
being bought, sold, or handled, to inspect records pertaining to the
purchase and payment of milk or cream.
(2) Inspect and copy the records pertaining to the purchase and
payment of milk or cream.
(3) Take testimony to ascertain facts pertaining to the purchase
and payment of milk or cream that in the judgment of the
creamery license division board are necessary to administer this
chapter.
(b) The board may determine the truth and accuracy of the books,
records, papers, documents, accounts, and reports required to be
furnished in accordance with this chapter.
SECTION 278. IC 15-18-2-34, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 34. (a) A person or an officer, a servant, an
agent, or an employee of a person may not interfere with an authorized
inspector of the creamery license division board who is:
(1) making an inspection; or
(2) taking a sample;
required under this chapter.
(b) A person that owns or operates or is in charge of a dairy
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

170
processing plant, a receiving station, a milk factory, a cheese factory,
a condensery, an ice cream factory, or other processing plant that is
subject to inspection or entry by an inspector of the creamery license
division board may not refuse to allow or may not obstruct an
inspector's entry or inspection.
SECTION 279. IC 16-18-2-37.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.3-2008,
SECTION 103, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 37.5. (a) "Board", for purposes of
IC 16-22-8, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-22-8-2.1.
(b) "Board", for purposes of IC 16-41-42.2, has the meaning set
forth in IC 16-41-42.2-1.
SECTION 280. IC 16-18-2-62, AS AMENDED BY P.L.143-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 62. (a) "Commission", for purposes of IC 16-27.5,
refers to the certified health care professions commission established
by IC 16-27.5-2-1.
(b) Before January 1, 2027, "commission", for purposes of
IC 16-31, refers to the Indiana emergency medical services
commission.
(c) After December 31, 2026, "commission", for purposes of
IC 16-31. refers to the Indiana fire and EMS standards and
education commission.
(c) (d) "Commission", for purposes of IC 16-46-11.1, has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-46-11.1-1. This subsection expires
December 31, 2026.
SECTION 281. IC 16-18-2-84, AS AMENDED BY P.L.129-2023,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 84. (a) "Council", for purposes of IC 16-46-6,
refers to the interagency state council on black and minority health.
This subsection expires December 31, 2026.
(b) "Council", for purposes of IC 16-46-17, refers to the rare disease
advisory council.
SECTION 282. IC 16-18-2-161.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 161.5. (a) "Health care
interpreter", for purposes of IC 16-46-11.1, has the meaning set forth
in IC 16-46-11.1-2.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 283. IC 16-18-2-163.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 163.5. (a) "Health care
translator", for purposes of IC 16-46-11.1, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-46-11.1-3.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

171
SECTION 284. IC 16-19-3-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 182, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The executive board may, by
an affirmative vote of a majority of its members, adopt reasonable rules
under IC 4-22-2 on behalf of the state department to protect or to
improve the public health in Indiana.
(b) The rules may concern but are not limited to the following:
(1) Nuisances dangerous to public health.
(2) The pollution of any water supply other than where
jurisdiction is in the environmental rules board and department of
environmental management.
(3) The disposition of excremental and sewage matter.
(4) The control of fly and mosquito breeding places.
(5) The detection, reporting, prevention, and control of diseases
that affect public health.
(6) The care of maternity and infant cases and the conduct of
maternity homes.
(7) The production, distribution, and sale of human food.
(8) Except as provided in section 4.4 of this chapter, the conduct
of camps.
(9) Standards of cleanliness of eating facilities for the public.
(10) Standards of cleanliness of sanitary facilities offered for
public use.
(11) The handling, disposal, disinterment, and reburial of dead
human bodies.
(12) Vital statistics.
(13) Sanitary conditions and facilities in public buildings and
grounds, including plumbing, drainage, sewage disposal, water
supply, lighting, heating, and ventilation, other than where
jurisdiction is vested by law in the fire prevention and building
safety commission department of homeland security or other
state agency.
(14) The design, construction, and operation of swimming and
wading pools. However, the rules governing swimming and
wading pools do not apply to a pool maintained by an individual
for the sole use of the individual's household and house guests.
(c) The executive board shall adopt reasonable rules to regulate the
following:
(1) The sanitary operation of tattoo parlors.
(2) The sanitary operation of body piercing facilities.
(d) The executive board may adopt rules on behalf of the state
department for the efficient enforcement of this title, except as
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

172
otherwise provided. However, fees for inspections relating to weights
and measures may not be established by the rules.
(e) The executive board may declare that a rule described in
subsection (d) is necessary to meet an emergency and adopt the rule
under IC 4-22-2.
(f) The rules of the state department may not be inconsistent with
this title and or any other state law.
SECTION 285. IC 16-19-3-27.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.151-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 27.5. (a) As used in this section and section
27.8 of this chapter, "technology new to Indiana" (referred to in this
section as "TNI") means sewage treatment or disposal methods,
processes, or equipment that are not described in the administrative
rules of the state department or the executive board concerning
residential onsite sewage systems (410 IAC 6-8.3) or commercial
onsite sewage systems (410 IAC 6-10.1).
(b) The state department shall establish and maintain a technical
review panel consisting of individuals with technical or scientific
knowledge relating to onsite sewage systems. The technical review
panel:
(1) shall decide under subsection (f) whether to approve:
(A) proprietary residential wastewater treatment devices; and
(B) proprietary commercial wastewater treatment devices;
for general use in Indiana;
(2) shall biannually review the performance of residential onsite
sewage systems and commercial onsite sewage systems;
(3) shall assist the state department in developing standards and
guidelines for proprietary residential wastewater treatment
devices and proprietary commercial wastewater treatment
devices;
(4) shall assist the executive board and the state department in
updating rules adopted under section 4 of this chapter concerning
residential onsite sewage systems and commercial onsite sewage
systems; and
(5) may exercise the powers granted by section 27.7 of this
chapter.
(c) The technical review panel shall include the following:
(1) A member of the staff of the state department, who shall serve
as the chair.
(2) A local health department environmental health specialist
appointed by the governor.
(3) An Indiana professional engineer registered under IC 25-31-1
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

173
IC 25-4-3 representing the American Council of Engineering
Companies.
(4) A representative of the Indiana Builders Association.
(5) An Indiana registered professional soil scientist (as defined in
IC 25-31.5-1-6) representing the Indiana Registry of Soil
Scientists.
(6) A representative of an Indiana college or university with a
specialty in engineering, soil science, environmental health, or
biology appointed by the governor.
(7) A representative of the Indiana Onsite Wastewater
Professionals Association.
(8) An Indiana onsite sewage system contractor appointed by the
governor.
(9) A representative of the Indiana State Building and
Construction Trades Council.
All members of the technical review panel are voting members, except
the member described in subdivision (1).
(d) In the case of a tie vote of the technical review panel, the
following shall occur:
(1) If the tie vote is in regard to a county, city, or town ordinance
concerning residential onsite sewage systems:
(A) the technical review panel shall send the ordinance back
to the county, city, or town not more than seven (7) days after
the day of the tie vote;
(B) the county, city, or town may revise and resubmit the
ordinance; and
(C) if the ordinance is revised and resubmitted, the technical
review panel shall consider the revised ordinance at its next
meeting.
(2) If the tie vote is in regard to a matter not described in
subdivision (1), the technical review panel shall, not more than
seven (7) days after the day of the tie vote:
(A) contact the applicant by phone call and by mail; and
(B) request more information or provide an explanation of how
the applicant can modify the application to make it more
complete.
The technical review panel shall review any new information
provided by the applicant and vote again on the application not
more than thirty (30) days after receiving the information.
(e) The technical review panel shall do the following:
(1) Receive applications for the approval of TNI for general use
in:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

174
(A) residential onsite sewage systems under sections 4 and 27
of this chapter and IC 16-41-25; and
(B) commercial onsite sewage systems under sections 4 and 27
of this chapter and IC 16-19-3.5.
(2) Meet monthly as needed to assist the executive board and the
state department as described in subsection (b)(4) and to review
applications described in subdivision (1).
(3) Notify each person who submits an application described in
subdivision (1):
(A) that the person's application has been received by the
technical review panel; and
(B) of whether the application is complete;
not later than thirty (30) days after the technical review panel
receives the application.
(4) Inform each person who submits an application described in
subdivision (1) of:
(A) a tentative decision of the technical review panel; or
(B) the technical review panel's final decision under
subsection (f);
concerning the application not more than ninety (90) days after
the technical review panel notifies the person under subdivision
(3) that the panel has received the person's application.
(f) In response to each application described in subsection (e)(1),
the technical review panel shall make, and inform the applicant of, one
(1) of the following final decisions:
(1) That the TNI to which the application relates is approved for
general use in Indiana.
(2) That the TNI to which the application relates is approved for
use in Indiana with certain conditions, which may include:
(A) a requirement that the TNI be used initially only in a pilot
project;
(B) restrictions on the number or type of installations of the
TNI;
(C) sampling and analysis requirements for TNI involving or
comprising a secondary treatment system;
(D) requirements relating to training concerning the TNI;
(E) requirements concerning the operation and maintenance of
the TNI; or
(F) other requirements.
(3) That the TNI to which the application relates is approved on
a project-by-project basis.
(4) That the TNI is not approved for use in Indiana, which must
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

175
be accompanied by a statement of the reason for the decision.
(g) If the technical review panel makes a decision under subsection
(f)(4) that the TNI is not approved for use in Indiana, the applicant
may:
(1) submit a new application to the technical review panel under
this section; or
(2) file a petition for review of the technical review panel's
decision under IC 4-21.5-3.
(h) If the technical review panel fails to notify a person who submits
an application of the technical review panel's tentative decision or final
recommendation within ninety (90) days after receiving the application
as required by subsection (e)(4), the person who submitted the
application may use the TNI to which the application relates in a single
residential onsite sewage system or commercial onsite sewage system,
as if the TNI had been approved only for use in a pilot project.
(i) The technical review panel shall decide that the TNI to which an
application relates is approved for general use in Indiana if:
(1) the TNI has been certified as meeting the NSF/ANSI 40
Standard;
(2) a proposed Indiana design and installation manual for the TNI
is submitted with the permit application; and
(3) the technical review panel certifies that the proposed Indiana
design and installation manual meets the vertical and horizontal
separation, sizing, and soil loading criteria of the state
department.
(j) Subsection (k) applies if:
(1) a particular TNI meets the requirements of NSF/ANSI 40,
NSF/ANSI 245, or NSF/ANSI 350;
(2) the proposed Indiana design and installation manual for the
TNI meets the vertical and horizontal separation, sizing, and soil
loading criteria of the state department; and
(3) an Indiana professional engineer registered under IC 25-31-1
IC 25-4-3 prepares site specific plans for the use of the TNI for
a residential or commercial application.
(k) In a case described in subsection (j):
(1) if the TNI is to be used in a residential application, the site
specific plans prepared under subsection (j)(3), after being
submitted to the local health department of the county, city, or
multiple county unit in which the TNI would be installed, may be
approved by the local health department within the period set
forth in IC 16-41-25-1(a); and
(2) if the TNI is to be used in a commercial application, the site
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

176
specific plans prepared under subsection (j)(3) shall be approved
by the state department upon submission of the site specific plans.
(l) A local health department may not refuse an application for a
permit for the construction or installation of a residential onsite sewage
system (as defined in IC 16-41-25-0.4) solely because the residential
onsite sewage system has not been used previously in the jurisdiction
of the local health department or is unfamiliar to the local health
department, if either of the following apply:
(1) The residential onsite sewage system has been approved by
the technical review panel under this section for general use in
Indiana.
(2) The residential onsite sewage system:
(A) is based on one (1) or more sewage treatment or disposal
methods or processes; or
(B) incorporates equipment;
approved by the technical review panel under this section for
general use in Indiana.
SECTION 286. IC 16-19-3-27.6, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2022,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 27.6. (a) As used in this section, "type of
residential onsite sewage system" means an onsite sewage system that:
(1) has a particular design;
(2) consists of particular components; and
(3) is installed or constructed in a particular way.
(b) For purposes of this section, the following are different types of
residential onsite sewage systems:
(1) A conventional septic system consisting of a septic tank and
a gravel or stone soil absorption field.
(2) A chamber system in which wastewater is piped from the
septic tank to a series of connected chambers backfilled with soil.
(3) A subsurface drip distribution system in which wastewater is
pumped from the septic tank to a dose tank and then gradually
delivered to drip laterals in the soil.
(4) An aerobic treatment unit in which oxygen is injected into the
wastewater to accelerate the biological processes used to treat the
wastewater before being discharged to a soil absorption field.
(5) A recirculating sand filter system in which wastewater flows
from a septic tank to a pump chamber and then is recirculated
through a sand filter before being discharged to a soil absorption
field.
(6) An evapotranspiration system that includes a drain field
having a watertight liner and in which wastewater, after entering
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

177
the drain field, evaporates into the air.
(7) A constructed wetland system in which wastewater from a
septic tank enters a wetland cell containing an impermeable liner,
gravel, sand fill, and wetland plants that remove pathogens and
nutrients from the wastewater before being discharged to a soil
absorption field.
(8) A sand-lined system in which wastewater flows from a septic
tank to a combined treatment and dispersal soil absorption field
containing piping laterals surrounded by sand.
(c) If:
(1) the local health department of a county, city, or multiple
county unit has issued a permit for construction or installation of
a type of residential onsite sewage system;
(2) the use of the same type of residential onsite sewage system
at a location in a different county, city, or multiple county unit has
been approved by:
(A) a professional engineer registered under IC 25-31-1;
IC 25-4-3;
(B) a registered soil scientist (as defined in IC 25-31.5-1-7);
(C) an individual or entity engaged in the business of
constructing and installing residential onsite sewage systems;
and
(D) the designer of the system, if the system was designed by
someone other than a person referred to in clause (A) or (C);
and
(3) all of the persons referred to in subdivision (2) attest that the
same type of residential onsite sewage system, if constructed or
installed at the location referred to in subdivision (2), would
satisfy the requirements of the rule of the state department
concerning residential onsite sewage systems;
the local health department of the county, city, or multiple county unit
referred to in subdivision (2) may not refuse to issue a permit for the
construction or installation of a residential onsite sewage system of the
type referred to in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) at the location referred
to in subdivision (2).
SECTION 287. IC 16-19-3.5-11, AS ADDED BY P.L.49-2016,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. The state department may not deny a
construction permit based upon noncompliance or suspected
noncompliance with a rule adopted under the authority of the fire
prevention and building safety commission established by
IC 22-12-2-1. department of homeland security.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

178
SECTION 288. IC 16-19-13-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.51-2021,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. The office is established for the following
purposes:
(1) To educate and advocate for women's health by requesting that
the state department, either on its own or in partnership with other
entities, establish appropriate forums, programs, or initiatives
designed to educate the public regarding women's health, with an
emphasis on preventive health and healthy lifestyles.
(2) To assist the state health commissioner in identifying,
coordinating, and establishing priorities for programs, services,
and resources the state should provide for women's health issues
and concerns relating to the reproductive, menopausal, and
postmenopausal phases of a woman's life, with an emphasis on
postmenopausal health.
(3) To serve as a clearinghouse and resource for information
regarding women's health data, strategies, services, and programs
that address women's health issues, including the following:
(A) Diseases that significantly impact women, including heart
disease, cancer, and osteoporosis.
(B) Menopause.
(C) Mental health.
(D) Substance abuse.
(E) Sexually transmitted diseases.
(F) Sexual assault and domestic violence.
(G) Female genital mutilation (as defined in IC 35-42-2-10).
(4) To collect, classify, and analyze relevant research information
and data conducted or compiled by:
(A) the state department; or
(B) other entities in collaboration with the state department;
and to provide interested persons with information regarding the
research results, except as prohibited by law.
(5) To develop and recommend funding and program activities for
educating the public on women's health initiatives, including the
following:
(A) Health needs throughout a woman's life.
(B) Diseases that significantly affect women, including heart
disease, cancer, and osteoporosis.
(C) Access to health care for women.
(D) Poverty and women's health.
(E) The leading causes of morbidity and mortality for women.
(F) Special health concerns of minority women.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

179
(6) To make recommendations to the state health commissioner
regarding programs that address women's health issues for
inclusion in the state department's biennial budget and strategic
planning.
(7) To seek funding from private or governmental entities to carry
out the purposes of this chapter.
(8) To prepare materials for publication and dissemination to the
public on women's health.
(9) To conduct public educational forums in Indiana to raise
public awareness and to educate citizens about women's health
programs, issues, and services.
(10) To coordinate the activities and programs of the office with
other entities that focus on women's health or women's issues,
including the Indiana commission for women (IC 4-23-25-3).
Indiana cultural commission established by IC 4-23-36.
(11) To represent the state health commissioner, upon request,
before the general assembly and the Indiana commission for
women established by IC 4-23-25-3. Indiana cultural
commission established by IC 4-23-36.
(12) To provide an annual report to the governor, the legislative
council, and the Indiana commission for women Indiana cultural
commission established by IC 4-23-36 regarding the successes
of the programs of the office, priorities and services needed for
women's health in Indiana, and areas for improvement. A report
provided under this subdivision to the legislative council must be
in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
This section does not allow the director or any employees of the office
to advocate, promote, refer to, or otherwise advance abortion or
abortifacients.
SECTION 289. IC 16-20-2-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.164-2023,
SECTION 23, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. (a) For a county with a population of at
least two hundred thousand (200,000), the members of a local board of
health shall be chosen as follows:
(1) Five (5) persons knowledgeable in clinical and public health,
at least two (2) of whom are licensed physicians, and appointed
by the county executive. The other appointees may be any of the
following:
(A) A registered nurse licensed under IC 25-23.
(B) A registered pharmacist licensed under IC 25-26.
(C) A dentist licensed under IC 25-14.
(D) A hospital administrator.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

180
(E) A social worker.
(F) An attorney with expertise in health matters.
(G) A school superintendent.
(H) A veterinarian licensed under IC 25-38.1.
(I) A professional engineer registered under IC 25-31.
IC 25-4-3.
(J) An environmental scientist.
(K) A physician assistant licensed under IC 25-27.5.
(L) A public health professional, including an epidemiologist.
(2) One (1) representative of the general public, appointed by the
county executive.
(3) One (1) individual appointed by the county fiscal body who
either:
(A) has public health knowledge; or
(B) is a member of the general public.
(4) Two (2) representatives appointed by the county executive,
one (1) each from a list of three (3) recommendations from each
executive of the county's two (2) most populous municipalities in
the county of individuals described in subdivision (1)(B) through
(1)(K).
(b) For a county with a population of less than two hundred
thousand (200,000), the members of a local board of health shall be
chosen as follows:
(1) Five (5) persons knowledgeable in clinical and public health,
at least one (1) of whom is a physician, and appointed by the
county executive. The other appointees may be any of the
following:
(A) A physician licensed under IC 25-22.5.
(B) A registered nurse licensed under IC 25-23.
(C) A registered pharmacist licensed under IC 25-26.
(D) A dentist licensed under IC 25-14.
(E) A hospital administrator.
(F) A social worker.
(G) An attorney with expertise in health matters.
(H) A school superintendent.
(I) A veterinarian licensed under IC 25-38.1.
(J) A professional engineer registered under IC 25-31.
IC 25-4-3.
(K) An environmental scientist.
(L) A physician assistant licensed under IC 25-27.5.
(M) A public health professional, including an epidemiologist.
(2) One (1) person who either has public health knowledge or is
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

181
a member of the general public, and is appointed by the county
fiscal body.
(3) One (1) person appointed by the county executive from a list
of three (3) recommendations by the executive of the most
populous municipality in the county of individuals described in
subdivision (1)(C) through (1)(M).
SECTION 290. IC 16-20-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.164-2023,
SECTION 29, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. (a) There must be at least seven (7)
members of a multiple county board of health.
(b) The county executives establishing a multiple county health
department shall determine the following for the multiple county board
of health:
(1) The number of members.
(2) The qualifications of members.
(3) The number of appointments made by each county.
(c) The county executive of each county participating in a multiple
county board of health shall appoint the members of the multiple
county board of health, except that the executive of the most populous
municipality of the participating counties of the multiple county board
of health shall appoint one (1) member to the multiple county board of
health.
(d) The appointments made by the county executives must meet the
following requirements:
(1) At least five (5) individuals appointed to the multiple county
board of health must be knowledgeable in clinical and public
health and also be one (1) of the following:
(A) A physician licensed under IC 25-22.5.
(B) A registered nurse licensed under IC 25-23.
(C) A registered pharmacist licensed under IC 25-26.
(D) A dentist licensed under IC 25-14.
(E) A hospital administrator.
(F) A social worker.
(G) An attorney with expertise in health matters.
(H) A school superintendent.
(I) A veterinarian licensed under IC 25-38.1.
(J) A professional engineer registered under IC 25-31.
IC 25-4-3.
(K) An environmental scientist.
(L) A physician assistant licensed under IC 25-27.5.
(M) A public health professional, including an epidemiologist.
(2) At least one (1) individual who either has public health
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

182
knowledge or is a member of the public and is recommended by
any of the participating county fiscal bodies.
SECTION 291. IC 16-28-1-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2014,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. The state department shall do the following:
(1) Adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 governing the following:
(A) Health and sanitation standards necessary to protect the
health, safety, security, rights, and welfare of patients.
(B) Qualifications of applicants for licenses issued under this
article to assure the proper care of patients.
(C) Operation, maintenance, management, equipment, and
construction of facilities required to be licensed under this
article if jurisdiction is not vested in any other state agency.
(D) Manner, form, and content of the license, including rules
governing disclosure of ownership interests.
(E) Levels of medical staffing and medical services in
cooperation with the office of Medicaid policy and planning,
division of family resources, and other agencies authorized to
pay for the services.
(2) Recommend to the fire prevention and building safety
commission department of homeland security fire safety rules
necessary to protect the health, safety, security, rights, and welfare
of patients.
(3) Classify health facilities in health care categories.
SECTION 292. IC 16-29-2-6 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 6. A certificate of
need for a project to construct, add, or convert beds that receives final
approval of the state department under this chapter or IC 16-10-4
(before its repeal) becomes void eighteen (18) months after the
determination becomes final unless the following conditions are met:
(1) Construction plans for the project are approved by the state
department and the department of fire and building safety.
(2) The applicant has completed construction of the project's
foundation in conformity with the approved plans as certified by
an independent architect licensed under IC 25-4 or an
independent professional engineer licensed under IC 25-31.
IC 25-4-3.
(3) Construction work on the project is continuous and in
conformity with the approved plans.
SECTION 293. IC 16-29-7-15, AS ADDED BY P.L.202-2018,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 15. A certificate of need that is approved
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

183
under this chapter is valid for eighteen (18) months after approval is
final. The certificate of need becomes void after eighteen (18) months
unless:
(1) construction plans for the project are approved by the state
department and the department of fire and building safety;
(2) the applicant has completed construction of the project's
foundation in conformity with the approval plans and an
independent:
(A) architect licensed under IC 25-4; or
(B) professional engineer licensed under IC 25-31; IC 25-4-3;
has certified the completion; and
(3) construction work on the project is continuous and conforms
with the approved plans.
However, modification of the approved plans to make technical
changes, correct errors or omissions, or comply with zoning or other
requirements of a governmental entity are allowable.
SECTION 294. IC 16-31-1-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. (a) The general
assembly declares that the provision of emergency medical services is
a matter of vital concern affecting the public health, safety, and welfare
of the people of Indiana.
(b) It is the purpose of this article:
(1) to promote the establishment and maintenance of an effective
system of emergency medical service, including the necessary
equipment, personnel, and facilities to ensure that all emergency
patients receive prompt and adequate medical care throughout the
range of emergency conditions encountered;
(2) that the emergency medical services Indiana fire and EMS
standards and education commission established under
IC 16-31-2 shall cooperate with other agencies empowered to
license persons engaged in the delivery of health care so as to
coordinate the efforts of the commission and other agencies; and
(3) to establish standards and requirements for the furnishing of
emergency medical services by persons not licensed or regulated
by other appropriate agencies.
SECTION 295. IC 16-31-2-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The Indiana
emergency medical services commission is created.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 296. IC 16-31-2-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) This section applies after
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

184
December 31, 2026.
(b) The Indiana fire and EMS standards and education
commission is created. The commission consists of the following
eleven (11) members who must reside in Indiana:
(1) The director of the Indiana department of homeland
security or the director's designee.
(2) The commissioner of the Indiana department of health.
(3) The state emergency medical services medical director.
(4) Three (3) members representing the fire services
appointed as follows:
(A) One (1) member appointed by the Indiana fire chiefs
association.
(B) One (1) member appointed by the professional fire
fighters union of Indiana.
(C) One (1) member appointed by the Indiana volunteer
firefighters association.
(5) Three (3) members appointed as follows who are
knowledgeable in the training of emergency medical services
providers:
(A) A provider of emergency medical services appointed by
the Indiana fire chiefs association.
(B) A provider of emergency medical services appointed by
the professional fire fighters union of Indiana.
(C) A provider of emergency medical services appointed by
the Indiana volunteer firefighters association.
(6) A licensed physician appointed by the governor who is a
member of the national association of EMS physicians.
(7) An individual appointed by the governor who is an
executive employed by a hospital that provides emergency
medical services.
(c) This subsection applies to a member of the commission
appointed under subsection (b)(4) through (b)(7). The initial term
of each member begins January 1, 2027. Except as provided in
subsection (d), a member of the commission serves a four (4) year
term.
(d) The initial terms of the members described in subsection (c)
expire as follows:
(1) The terms of the members appointed under subsection
(b)(4)(A), (b)(5)(B), and (b)(6) expire December 31, 2030.
(2) The terms of the members appointed under subsection
(b)(4)(B), (b)(5)(B), and (b)(7) expire December 31, 2029.
(3) The terms of the members appointed under subsection
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

185
(b)(4)(C) and (b)(5)(C) expire December 31, 2028.
(e) Members of the commission may be reappointed to
successive terms. The appropriate appointing authority shall fill a
vacancy on the commission for the duration of the unexpired term.
(f) The director of the Indiana department of homeland security
or the director's designee shall serve as the chairperson of the
commission. The commissioner of the Indiana department of
health shall serve as the vice chairperson of the commission.
(g) The director of the Indiana department of homeland security
shall assist the appointing authorities in appointing members of the
commission from throughout Indiana to ensure balanced
representation from every region of Indiana.
(h) After December 31, 2026, the rules of the Indiana emergency
medical services commission shall be considered the rules of the
Indiana fire and EMS standards and education commission.
SECTION 297. IC 16-31-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.170-2022,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The commission is composed of fourteen
(14) members. The governor shall appoint the members for four (4)
year terms as follows:
(1) One (1) must be appointed from a volunteer fire department
that provides emergency medical service.
(2) One (1) must be appointed from a full-time municipal fire or
police department that provides emergency medical service.
(3) One (1) must be a nonprofit provider of ambulance services
organized on a volunteer basis other than a volunteer fire
department.
(4) One (1) must be a provider of private ambulance services.
(5) One (1) must be a state licensed paramedic.
(6) One (1) must be a licensed physician who:
(A) has a primary interest, training, and experience in
emergency medical services; and
(B) is currently practicing in an emergency medical services
facility.
(7) One (1) must be a chief executive officer of a hospital that
provides ambulance services.
(8) One (1) must be a registered nurse who has supervisory or
administrative responsibility in a hospital emergency department.
(9) One (1) must be a licensed physician who:
(A) has a primary interest, training, and experience in trauma
care; and
(B) is practicing in a trauma facility.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

186
(10) One (1) must be a state certified emergency medical service
technician.
(11) One (1) must be an individual who:
(A) represents the public at large; and
(B) is not in any way related to providing emergency medical
services.
(12) One (1) must be a program director (as defined in 836
IAC 4-2-2(12)(B)(iii)) for a commission certified advanced life
support training institution.
(13) One (1) must be the executive director of the department of
homeland security appointed under IC 10-19-3-1 or the designee
of the executive director.
(14) One (1) must be a representative of an entity that provides air
ambulance services.
(b) The chief executive officer of a hospital appointed under
subsection (a)(7) may designate another administrator of the hospital
to serve for the chief executive officer on the commission.
(c) Not more than eight (8) members may be from the same political
party.
(d) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 298. IC 16-31-2-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 3. An appointment to fill a vacancy
occurring on the commission is for the unexpired term.
SECTION 299. IC 16-41-25-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2022,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. (a) The authority of a local health
department to administer the rule of the state department concerning
residential onsite sewage systems is subject to this section.
(b) If a professional engineer registered under IC 25-31-1 IC 25-4-3
certifies that the:
(1) location;
(2) design;
(3) proposed construction; and
(4) proposed installation;
of a planned residential onsite sewage system comply with the
administrative rule of the state department concerning residential onsite
sewage systems, a local health department may not disapprove an
application for a permit for the residential onsite sewage system on the
grounds that the location, design, construction, or installation of the
residential onsite sewage system is faulty.
(c) If a professional engineer registered under IC 25-31-1 IC 25-4-3
certifies that the:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

187
(1) design;
(2) construction;
(3) installation;
(4) location;
(5) maintenance; and
(6) operation;
of an existing residential onsite sewage system comply with the
administrative rule of the state department concerning residential onsite
sewage systems, a local health department may not issue an order
based on a finding that the residential onsite sewage system is a failed
system.
(d) If a professional engineer registered under IC 25-31-1 IC 25-4-3
certifies that an existing residential onsite sewage system is not
functioning properly but can be restored to proper functioning through
repair, a local health department must allow the repair of the residential
onsite sewage system to be made in accordance with the certification
of the professional engineer.
SECTION 300. IC 16-41-25-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.232-2023,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 8. (a) If:
(1) an application has been filed with a local health department
for a permit for the installation of a residential onsite sewage
system;
(2) a professional soil scientist registered under IC 25-31.5-4 has
conducted an onsite evaluation, including a description of the soil
profile, and has determined that the proposed site of the
residential onsite sewage system is suitable for the installation of
the residential onsite sewage system; and
(3) the design and specifications for the residential onsite sewage
system proposed for installation at the site described in
subdivision (2) have been approved by either:
(A) the local health department; or
(B) at the option and expense of the property owner:
(i) a professional engineer registered under IC 25-31-1;
IC 25-4-3;
(ii) a septic system installer or inspector registered with the
county in which the residential onsite sewage system would
be installed; and
(iii) the designer of the system, if the system was designed
by someone other than a person referred to in item (i) or (ii);
the local health department shall issue a permit for the residential
onsite sewage system not later than thirty (30) business days after
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

188
receiving a complete application for the permit.
(b) Subject to IC 16-19-3-27.5, IC 16-19-3-27.6, and sections 5 and
6 of this chapter, this section does not affect the authority of a local
health department to inspect an onsite sewage system before or after
the system's installation.
SECTION 301. IC 16-41-25-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.160-2024,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 10. (a) Neither an officer or employee of a
local health department nor another agency, officer, or employee of a
county, city, or town may enter property on which a residential onsite
sewage system is located for the purpose of inspecting the residential
onsite sewage system if, not more than one hundred eighty (180) days
before the date of the inspection, the owner or occupant of the
residence served by the residential onsite sewage system and:
(1) a septic system installer or inspector registered with the
county in which the residential onsite sewage system is located;
(2) an onsite sewage system technician; or
(3) an Indiana professional engineer registered under IC 25-31-1;
IC 25-4-3;
state in a writing transmitted to the local health department, county,
city, or town that the residential onsite sewage system is functioning
properly.
(b) Subject to subsection (d), if subsection (a) does not apply, an
officer or employee of a local health department or another officer or
employee of a county, city, or town may not enter property on which a
residential onsite sewage system is located for the purpose of
inspecting the residential onsite sewage system unless the owner or
occupant of the residence served by the residential onsite sewage
system is given notice of the inspection by first class mail addressed to
the residence at least seven (7) days before the day of the inspection.
(c) Subject to subsection (d), an officer or employee of a local health
department may inspect residential onsite sewage systems and
nonresidential onsite sewage systems (as defined in IC 16-19-3.5-3.5):
(1) after installation if:
(A) the manufacturer of a residential onsite sewage system
recommends inspection of the system multiple times a year;
(B) an owner of the property on which a residential onsite
sewage system is located requests an officer or employee of a
local health department or another agency, officer, or
employee of a county, city, or town to inspect the residential
onsite sewage system located on the owner's property; or
(C) a complaint is filed with the local health department
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

189
requiring an inspection or inspections to protect the health of
the community;
(2) to verify compliance with a permit issued under best judgment
pursuant to rules adopted under IC 4-22-2 not more than once per
year; or
(3) to verify compliance with an operating permit issued pursuant
to rules adopted under IC 4-22-2 at least once per year.
(d) An advance notice to the owner or occupant of the residence is
not required under subsection (b) in an urgent situation caused by a
malfunction of the residential onsite sewage system that creates a clear
and immediate danger to the public's health, safety, or property.
(e) This section shall not be interpreted as prohibiting or restricting
the periodic:
(1) inspection;
(2) servicing;
(3) testing; or
(4) maintenance;
of an onsite residential sewage discharging disposal system (as defined
in IC 13-11-2-144.7).
SECTION 302. IC 16-41-25-11, AS ADDED BY P.L.232-2023,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 11. (a) As used in this section, "residential
onsite sewage system failure" means a residential onsite sewage system
that exhibits one (1) or more of the following:
(1) The onsite sewage system refuses to accept sewage at the rate
of design application and interferes with the normal use of
residential plumbing fixtures.
(2) Effluent discharge exceeds the absorptive capacity of the soil,
resulting in ponding, seepage, or other discharge of the effluent
to the ground surface or to surface waters.
(3) Effluent is discharged from the onsite sewage system causing
contamination of a potable water supply, ground water, or surface
waters.
(b) A local health department that determines that a residential
onsite sewage system is in residential onsite sewage system failure may
issue an order requiring that the failure be corrected. However, an order
issued under this subsection is stayed if the owner or occupant of the
residence served by the residential onsite sewage system, within
fourteen (14) days after the date of the order, enters into a contract
with:
(1) a septic system installer or inspector registered with the
county in which the residential onsite sewage system is located;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

190
(2) an onsite sewage system technician; or
(3) an Indiana professional engineer registered under IC 25-31-1;
IC 25-4-3;
under which the installer or inspector, onsite sewage system technician,
or professional engineer agrees to conduct an inspection to determine
whether the residential onsite sewage system is in residential onsite
sewage system failure.
(c) An order is stayed under subsection (b) until the earlier of the
following:
(1) The date on which the installer or inspector, technician, or
engineer performs the inspection and presents the results of the
inspection in writing to:
(A) the owner or occupant of the residence served by the
residential onsite sewage system; and
(B) the local health department.
(2) The expiration of forty-five (45) days after the date of the
order issued under subsection (b).
(d) If the installer or inspector, onsite sewage system technician, or
professional engineer states in the report provided to the local health
department that the residential onsite sewage system is not in
residential onsite sewage system failure, the local health department
shall:
(1) withdraw the order issued under subsection (b); or
(2) conduct an investigation of the residential onsite sewage
system to make a new determination whether the residential
onsite sewage system is in residential onsite sewage system
failure.
(e) If the local health department conducts an investigation under
subsection (d)(2), the order issued under subsection (b) is stayed
pending the new determination of the local health department based on
the investigation.
SECTION 303. IC 16-41-26-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.181-2018,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the
state department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 necessary to protect
the health, safety, and welfare of persons living in agricultural labor
camps, prescribing standards for living quarters at agricultural labor
camps, including provisions relating to construction of camps, sanitary
conditions, light, air, safety protection from fire hazards, equipment,
maintenance and operation of the camp, sewage disposal through septic
tank absorption fields or other approved methods, and other matters
appropriate for the security of the life and health of occupants.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

191
(b) The environmental rules board shall adopt rules under
IC 13-14-9 pertaining to water supplies required for agricultural labor
camps.
(c) In the preparation of rules, the state department:
(1) shall consult with and request technical assistance from other
appropriate state agencies; and
(2) may appoint and consult with committees of technically
qualified persons and of representatives of employers and
employees.
(d) If a conflict exists between rules adopted under this chapter and
rules adopted by the fire prevention and building safety commission,
department of homeland security, the rules authorized in this section
apply.
(e) A copy of every rule adopted under this chapter shall be sent to
each health officer in Indiana and to the heads of other state agencies
with specific or related responsibility affecting agricultural labor camps
and to any person requesting the rules. The rules affecting agricultural
labor camps adopted under this chapter shall be published periodically
in the manner the state department determines.
SECTION 304. IC 16-41-31-6 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. The fire prevention
and building safety commission department of homeland security
shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to establish fire safety standards for
bed and breakfast establishments.
SECTION 305. IC 16-41-37.5-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.79-2008,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4. (a) An individual conducting an indoor air
quality test under this chapter must be:
(1) a professional engineer (as defined in IC 25-31-1-2);
IC 25-4-0.5-10);
(2) an industrial hygienist; or
(3) a supervisor or technician certified by a national organization
that:
(A) writes and adheres to standards for:
(i) testing, adjusting, and balancing of heating, ventilation,
and air conditioning equipment or exhaust systems; and
(ii) indoor air quality testing procedures and requirements;
and
(B) certifies supervisors and technicians to perform:
(i) testing, adjusting, and balancing of heating, ventilation,
and air conditioning equipment or exhaust systems; and
(ii) indoor air quality testing procedures and requirements.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

192
(b) The report of a test conducted under this chapter must be
certified by the person conducting the test. If the person uses a
professional seal on documents, the certification must include the
person's seal.
SECTION 306. IC 16-41-42.2-1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "board" refers to
the spinal cord and brain injury research board established by section
5 of this chapter.
SECTION 307. IC 16-41-42.2-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.200-2015,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4. The fund is to be used for the following
purposes:
(1) Establishing and maintaining a state medical surveillance
registry for traumatic spinal cord and brain injuries.
(2) Fulfilling the duties of the board established by section 5 of
this chapter.
(3) (2) Funding research related to the treatment and cure of
spinal cord and brain injuries, including acute management,
medical complications, rehabilitative techniques, and neuronal
recovery. Research must be conducted in compliance with all
state and federal laws.
(4) (3) Concerning spinal cord injuries, funding of at least ten
percent (10%) and not more than fifteen percent (15%) of money
in the fund for:
(A) post acute extended treatment and services for an
individual with a spinal cord injury; or
(B) facilities that offer long term activity based therapy
services at affordable rates to an individual with a spinal cord
injury that requires extended post acute care.
(5) (4) Concerning brain injuries, funding of at least ten percent
(10%) and not more than fifteen percent (15%) of money in the
fund for:
(A) post acute extended treatment and services for an
individual with a brain injury; or
(B) facilities that offer long term activity based therapy
services at affordable rates to an individual with a brain injury
that requires extended post acute care.
(6) (5) Develop a statewide trauma system. However, not more
than fifty percent (50%) of money in the fund may be used for
purposes of developing a statewide trauma system.
SECTION 308. IC 16-41-42.2-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.29-2016,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

193
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. (a) The spinal cord and brain injury
research board is established for the purpose of administering the fund.
The board is composed of eleven (11) members.
(b) The following six (6) members of the board shall be appointed
by the governor:
(1) One (1) member who has a spinal cord or head injury or who
has a family member with a spinal cord or head injury.
(2) One (1) member who is a physician licensed under IC 25-22.5
who has specialty training in neuroscience and surgery.
(3) One (1) member who is a physiatrist holding a board
certification from the American Board of Physical Medicine and
Rehabilitation.
(4) One (1) member representing the technical life sciences
industry.
(5) One (1) member who is a physical therapist licensed under
IC 25-27 who treats individuals with traumatic spinal cord
injuries or brain injuries.
(6) One (1) member who owns or operates a facility that provides
long term activity based therapy services at affordable rates to
individuals with traumatic spinal cord injuries or brain injuries.
(c) Five (5) members of the board shall be appointed as follows:
(1) One (1) member representing Indiana University to be
appointed by Indiana University.
(2) One (1) member representing Purdue University to be
appointed by Purdue University.
(3) One (1) member representing the National Spinal Cord Injury
Association to be appointed by the National Spinal Cord Injury
Association.
(4) One (1) member representing the largest freestanding
rehabilitation hospital for brain and spinal cord injuries in Indiana
to be appointed by the Rehabilitation Hospital of Indiana located
in Indianapolis.
(5) One (1) member representing the Brain Injury Association of
America to be appointed by the Brain Injury Association of
Indiana.
(d) The term of a member is four (4) years. A member serves until
a successor is appointed and qualified. If a vacancy occurs on the board
before the end of a member's term, the appointing authority appointing
the vacating member shall appoint an individual to serve the remainder
of the vacating member's term.
(e) A majority of the members appointed to the board constitutes a
quorum. The affirmative votes of a majority of the members are
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

194
required for the board to take action on any measure.
(f) Each member of the board is entitled to the minimum salary per
diem provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member is also entitled to
reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4
and other expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's
duties as provided in the state policies and procedures established by
the Indiana department of administration and approved by the budget
agency.
(g) The board shall annually elect a chairperson who shall be the
presiding officer of the board. The board may establish other officers
and procedures as the board determines necessary.
(h) The board shall meet at least two (2) times each year. The
chairperson may call additional meetings.
(i) The state department shall provide staff for the board. The state
department shall maintain a registry of the members of the board. An
appointing authority shall provide written confirmation of an
appointment to the board to the state department in the form and
manner specified by the state department.
(j) The board state department shall do the following:
(1) Consider policy matters relating to spinal cord and brain
injury research projects and programs under this chapter.
(2) Consider research applications and make grants for approved
research projects under this chapter.
(3) Consider applications and make grants to health care clinics
that:
(A) are exempt from federal income taxation under Section
501 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(B) employ physical therapists licensed under IC 25-27; and
(C) provide in Indiana long term activity based therapy
services at affordable rates to individuals with spinal cord
injuries or brain injuries that require extended post acute care.
(4) Consider the application's efficacy in providing significant and
sustained improvement to individuals with spinal cord injuries or
brain injuries.
(5) Formulate policies and procedures concerning the operation
of the board. state department.
(6) Review and authorize spinal cord and brain injury research
projects and programs to be financed under this chapter. For
purposes of this subdivision, the board state department may
establish an independent scientific advisory panel composed of
scientists and clinicians who are not members of the board state
department to review proposals submitted to the board state
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

195
department and make recommendations to the board. state
department. Collaborations are encouraged with other
Indiana-based researchers as well as researchers located outside
Indiana, including researchers in other countries.
(7) Review and approve progress and final research reports on
projects authorized under this chapter, including any other
information the board state department has required to be
submitted as a condition of receiving a grant.
(8) Review and make recommendations concerning the
expenditure of money from the fund.
(9) Take other action necessary for the purpose stated in
subsection (a).
(10) Provide to the governor, the general assembly, and the
legislative council an annual report not later than January 30 of
each year showing the status of funds appropriated under this
chapter. The report to the general assembly and the legislative
council must be in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(k) A member of the board is exempt from civil liability arising or
thought to arise from an action taken in good faith as a member of the
board.
(l) The department shall annually present to the board a financial
statement that includes the following information for the current and
previous fiscal year:
(1) The amount of money deposited into the fund.
(2) The amount of money expended from the fund.
(3) The amount of money, including any reserves, available for
grants from the fund.
SECTION 309. IC 16-46-6-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this
chapter, "council" refers to the interagency state council on black and
minority health.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 310. IC 16-46-6-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The state
department shall establish the interagency state council on black and
minority health.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 311. IC 16-46-6-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2024,
SECTION 126, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The council consists of the
following twenty-one (21) members:
(1) Two (2) members of the house of representatives from
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

196
different political parties appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(2) Two (2) members of the senate from different political parties
appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate.
(3) The governor or the governor's designee.
(4) The state health commissioner or the commissioner's
designee.
(5) The director of the division of family resources established by
IC 12-13-1-1 or the director's designee.
(6) The director of the office of Medicaid policy and planning
established by IC 12-8-6.5-1 or the director's designee.
(7) The director of the division of mental health and addiction
established by IC 12-21-1-1 or the director's designee.
(8) The commissioner of the department of correction or the
commissioner's designee.
(9) One (1) representative of a local health department appointed
by the governor.
(10) One (1) representative of a public health care facility
appointed by the governor.
(11) One (1) psychologist appointed by the governor who:
(A) is licensed to practice psychology in Indiana; and
(B) has knowledge and experience in the special health needs
of minorities.
(12) One (1) member appointed by the governor based on the
recommendation of the Indiana State Medical Association.
(13) One (1) member appointed by the governor based on the
recommendation of the National Medical Association.
(14) One (1) member appointed by the governor based on the
recommendation of the Indiana Hospital and Health Association.
(15) One (1) member appointed by the governor based on the
recommendation of the American Cancer Society.
(16) One (1) member appointed by the governor based on the
recommendation of the American Heart Association.
(17) One (1) member appointed by the governor based on the
recommendation of the American Diabetes Association.
(18) One (1) member appointed by the governor based on the
recommendation of the Black Nurses Association.
(19) One (1) member appointed by the governor based on the
recommendation of the Indiana Minority Health Coalition.
(b) At least fifty-one percent (51%) of the members of the council
must be minorities.
(c) This section expires December 31, 2026.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

197
SECTION 312. IC 16-46-6-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
all appointments to the council are for two (2) years. A legislative
member's term expires on June 30 of an odd-numbered year.
(b) The term of a member appointed by the governor is four (4)
years and expires as follows:
(1) June 30, 2025, and each fourth year thereafter for a member
appointed under section 4(a)(9) through 4(a)(14) of this chapter.
(2) December 31, 2025, and each fourth year thereafter for a
member appointed under section 4(a)(15) through 4(a)(19) of this
chapter.
(c) A member may be reappointed to the commission for succeeding
terms.
SECTION 313. IC 16-46-6-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 6. The council shall select a chairman from
the membership annually.
SECTION 314. IC 16-46-6-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 7. Appointments to fill a vacancy are for the
remainder of an unexpired term and are made by the authority who
made the original appointment.
SECTION 315. IC 16-46-6-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 8. The state department shall provide staff
for the council.
SECTION 316. IC 16-46-6-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 9. The council shall hold at least four (4)
meetings annually.
SECTION 317. IC 16-46-6-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 10. The council
state department shall do the following:
(1) Identify and study the special health care needs and health
problems of minorities.
(2) Examine the factors and conditions that affect the health of
minorities.
(3) Examine the health care services available to minorities in the
public and private sector and determine the extent to which these
services meet the needs of minorities.
(4) Study the state and federal laws concerning the health needs
of minorities.
(5) Examine the coordination of services to minorities and
recommend improvements in the delivery of services.
(6) Examine funding sources for minority health care.
(7) Examine and recommend preventive measures concerning the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

198
leading causes of death or injury among minorities, including the
following:
(A) Heart disease.
(B) Stroke.
(C) Cancer.
(D) Intentional injuries.
(E) Accidental death and injury.
(F) Cirrhosis.
(G) Diabetes.
(H) Infant mortality.
(I) HIV and acquired immune deficiency syndrome.
(J) Mental Health.
(K) Substance Abuse.
(8) Examine the impact of the following on minorities:
(A) Adolescent pregnancy.
(B) Sexually transmitted and other communicable diseases.
(C) Lead poisoning.
(D) Long term disability and aging.
(E) Sickle cell anemia.
(9) Monitor the Indiana minority health initiative and other public
policies that affect the health status of minorities.
(10) Develop and implement a comprehensive plan and time line
to address health disparities and health issues of minority
populations in Indiana.
SECTION 318. IC 16-46-6-11 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 11. The council shall submit a report in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6 to the general assembly before
November 1 of each year. The report must include the following:
(1) The findings and conclusions of the council.
(2) Recommendations of the council.
SECTION 319. IC 16-46-6-12 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 12. (a) Except as otherwise provided, a
person who recklessly violates or fails to comply with this chapter
commits a Class B misdemeanor.
(b) Each day a violation continues constitutes a separate offense.
SECTION 320. IC 16-46-6-13 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 13. (a) Each member of the council who is
not a state employee is entitled to the minimum salary per diem
provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The council member is also entitled to
reimbursement for mileage, traveling expenses as provided under
IC 4-13-1-4, and other expenses actually incurred in connection with
the member's duties as provided in the state policies and procedures
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

199
established by the Indiana department of administration and approved
by the budget agency.
(b) Each member of the council who is a state employee is entitled
to reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4
and other expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's
duties as provided in the state policies and procedures established by
the Indiana department of administration and approved by the budget
agency.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), expenses incurred under
this section must be paid out of the funds appropriated to the state
department.
(d) Each member of the council who is a member of the general
assembly is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage, and travel
allowances paid to legislative members of interim study committees
established by the legislative council. Per diem, mileage, and travel
allowances paid under this subsection shall be paid from appropriations
made to the legislative council or the legislative services agency.
SECTION 321. IC 16-46-11-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 171, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The office of minority health and
the state department, in partnership with the Indiana Minority Health
Coalition, Inc., shall do the following:
(1) Staff, coordinate, and assist in the implementation of the
comprehensive health plan developed by the interagency state
council on black and minority health established under
IC 16-46-6. This subdivision expires December 31, 2026.
(2) Expand, develop, and implement a community based state
structure that is conducive to addressing the health disparities of
the minority populations in Indiana.
(3) Monitor minority health progress.
(4) Establish policy.
(5) Fund minority health programs, research, and other initiatives.
(6) Provide the following through interdepartmental coordination:
(A) The data and technical assistance needs of the local
minority health coalitions.
(B) Measurable minority health objectives to local minority
health coalitions for the development of health intervention
programs.
(7) Provide through the state health data center established by
IC 16-19-10-3 minority health research and resource information
addressing the following:
(A) Research within minority populations.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

200
(B) A resource database that can be disseminated to local
organizations interested in minority health.
(C) Racial and ethnic specific databases including morbidity,
diagnostic groups, social/economic, education, and population.
(D) Attitude, knowledge, and belief information.
(8) Staff a minority health hotline that establishes linkages with
other health and social service hotlines and local coalitions.
(9) Develop and implement an aggressive recruitment and
retention program to increase the number of minorities in the
health and social services professions.
(10) Develop and implement an awareness program that will
increase the knowledge of health and social service providers to
the special needs of minorities.
(11) Develop and implement culturally and linguistically
appropriate health promotion and disease prevention programs
that would emphasize avoiding the health risk factors for
conditions affecting minorities and incorporate an accessible,
affordable, and acceptable early detection and intervention
component.
(12) Provide the state support necessary to ensure the continued
development of the existing minority health coalitions and to
develop coalitions in other areas targeted for minority health
intervention.
(13) Coordinate each of the counties with existing local minority
health coalitions to:
(A) provide community planning and needs assessment
assistance to the local minority health coalitions; and
(B) assist the local minority health coalitions in the
development of local minority health intervention plans. The
plans shall be developed to coincide with the state fiscal year.
(14) Establish a liaison between the state department and the
Indiana Minority Health Coalition, Inc., to:
(A) coordinate the state department resources needed for the
development of local coalitions;
(B) provide assistance to and monitor the local coordinators in
the development of local intervention plans;
(C) serve as the barometer to the state department on the
minority health concerns of local coalitions;
(D) assist in coordinating the minority community input on
state policies and programs;
(E) serve as the linkage with the state department and the local
minority health coordinators; and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

201
(F) monitor the progress of the fulfilling of their
responsibilities.
(15) Provide funding, within the limits of appropriations, to
support preventive health, education, and treatment programs in
the minority communities that are developed, planned, and
evaluated by approved organizations.
(16) Provide assistance to local communities to obtain funding for
the development of a health care delivery system to meet the
needs, gaps, and barriers identified in the local plans.
SECTION 322. IC 16-46-11.1-7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. This chapter expires December
31, 2026.
SECTION 323. IC 20-20-38-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 163, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4. (a) The state board shall
develop and implement a long range state plan for a comprehensive
secondary level career and technical education program in Indiana.
(b) The plan developed under this section must be updated as
changes occur. The state board shall make the plan and any revisions
made to the plan available to:
(1) the governor;
(2) the general assembly;
(3) the department of workforce development;
(4) the commission for higher education; and
(5) the board for proprietary education; and
(6) (5) any other appropriate state or federal agency.
A plan or revised plan submitted under this section to the general
assembly must be in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(c) The plan developed under this section must set forth specific
goals for secondary level public career and technical education and
must include the following:
(1) The preparation of each graduate for both employment and
further education.
(2) Accessibility of career and technical education to individuals
of all ages who desire to explore and learn for economic and
personal growth.
(3) Projected employment opportunities in various career and
technical education fields.
(4) A study of the supply of and the demand for a labor force
skilled in particular career and technical education areas.
(5) A study of technological and economic change affecting
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

202
Indiana.
(6) An analysis of the private career and education sector in
Indiana.
(7) Recommendations for improvement in the state career and
technical education program.
(8) The educational levels expected of career and technical
education programs proposed to meet the projected employment
needs.
(d) When making any revisions to the plan, the state board shall
consider the workforce needs and training and education needs
identified in the occupational demand report prepared by the
department of workforce development under IC 22-4.1-4-10.
(e) The state board shall use data from the department of workforce
development to develop and implement a plan or make revisions to a
plan under this section.
SECTION 324. IC 20-20-38-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 164, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 6. (a) The state board shall do
the following:
(1) Make recommendations to the general assembly concerning
the development, duplication, and accessibility of employment
training and career and technical education on a regional and
statewide basis.
(2) Consult with any state agency, commission, or organization
that supervises or administers programs of career and technical
education concerning the coordination of career and technical
education, including the following:
(A) The Indiana economic development corporation.
(B) A private industry council (as defined in 29 U.S.C. 1501
et seq.).
(C) The department of labor.
(D) The commission for higher education.
(E) The department of workforce development.
(F) The board for proprietary education.
(G) (F) The Indiana department of veterans' affairs.
(3) Review and make recommendations concerning plans
submitted by the commission for higher education. The state
board may request the resubmission of plans or parts of plans that:
(A) are not consistent with the long range state plan of the
state board;
(B) are incompatible with other plans within the system; or
(C) duplicate existing services.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

203
(4) Report to the general assembly on the state board's
conclusions and recommendations concerning interagency
cooperation, coordination, and articulation of career and technical
education and employment training. A report under this
subdivision must be in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(5) Study and develop a plan concerning the transition between
secondary level career and technical education and postsecondary
level career and technical education.
(b) The state board shall use data from the department of workforce
development in carrying out the state board's duties under this section.
SECTION 325. IC 20-20-40-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "commission"
refers to the commission on seclusion and restraint in schools
established by section 11 of this chapter.
SECTION 326. IC 20-20-40-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. As used in this chapter,
"council" refers to the state advisory council established by
IC 20-35-3-1.
SECTION 327. IC 20-20-40-11 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 11. (a) The commission on seclusion and
restraint in schools is established.
(b) The commission has the following ten (10) members:
(1) The designee of the secretary of education, who serves at the
pleasure of the secretary of education.
(2) A representative of the Autism Society of Indiana, chosen by
the organization, who serves a two (2) year term.
(3) A representative of the Arc of Indiana, chosen by the
organization, who serves a two (2) year term.
(4) A representative of the Indiana Council of Administrators of
Special Education, chosen by the organization, who serves a two
(2) year term.
(5) A representative of Mental Health America of Indiana, chosen
by the organization, who serves a two (2) year term.
(6) A parent of a student with a disability, nominated by a
member described in subdivisions (2), (3), and (5) and approved
by a majority of the members described in subdivisions (1)
through (5) and (8) through (10), who serves a two (2) year term.
(7) A parent of a student who does not have a disability,
nominated by a member described in subdivisions (2), (3), and (5)
and approved by a majority of the members described in
subdivisions (1) through (5) and (8) through (10), who serves a
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

204
two (2) year term.
(8) One (1) state accredited nonpublic school administrator
nominated by the Indiana Non-public Education Association, who
serves a two (2) year term.
(9) One (1) public school superintendent nominated by the
Indiana Association of Public School Superintendents, who serves
a two (2) year term.
(10) One (1) member of the Indiana School Resource Officers
Association chosen by the organization, who serves a two (2) year
term.
(c) Each member of the commission who is not a state employee is
entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b).
A member who is not a state employee is also entitled to
reimbursement for traveling expenses and other expenses actually
incurred in connection with the member's duties, as provided in the
state travel policies and procedures established by the Indiana
department of administration and approved by the budget agency.
SECTION 328. IC 20-20-40-12 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 12. (a) The designee of the secretary of
education under section 11(b)(1) of this chapter serves as chairperson
of the commission.
(b) The commission shall meet at least biannually on the call of the
chairperson, and may meet as often as is necessary. The chairperson
shall provide not less than fourteen (14) days notice of a meeting to the
members of the commission and to the public.
(c) The affirmative votes of at least five (5) members of the
commission are necessary for the commission to take action. The votes
of the commission must be recorded.
(d) All commission meetings shall be open to the public, and each
meeting must include opportunities for public comment.
(e) The department shall provide staff support for the commission.
SECTION 329. IC 20-20-40-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.162-2024,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 13. (a) The commission council has the
following duties:
(1) To adopt rules concerning the following:
(A) The use of restraint and seclusion in a school corporation
or a state accredited nonpublic school, with an emphasis on
eliminating or minimizing the use of restraint and seclusion.
(B) The prevention of the use of types of restraint or seclusion
that may harm a student, a school employee, a school
volunteer, or the educational environment of the school.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

205
(C) Requirements for notifying parents.
(D) Training regarding the use of restraint and seclusion,
including the frequency of training and what employees must
be trained.
(E) The distribution of the seclusion and restraint policy to
parents and the public.
(F) Requirements for the reporting of incidents of restraint and
seclusion in the annual school performance report, including
incidents of restraint and seclusion involving school resource
officers (as defined in IC 20-26-18.2-1).
(G) Circumstances that may require more timely incident
reporting and the requirements for such reporting.
(2) To develop, maintain, and revise a model restraint and
seclusion plan for schools that includes the following elements:
(A) A statement on how students will be treated with dignity
and respect and how appropriate student behavior will be
promoted and taught.
(B) A statement ensuring that the school will use prevention,
positive behavior intervention and support, and conflict
de-escalation to eliminate or minimize the need for use of any
of the following:
(i) Seclusion.
(ii) Chemical restraint.
(iii) Mechanical restraint.
(iv) Physical restraint.
(v) Time-out.
(C) A statement ensuring that any behavioral intervention used
will be consistent with the student's most current behavioral
intervention plan, or individualized education program, if
applicable.
(D) Definitions for restraint and seclusion, as defined in this
chapter.
(E) A statement ensuring that if a procedure listed in clause
(B) is used, the procedure will be used:
(i) as a last resort safety procedure, employed only after
another, less restrictive procedure has been implemented
without success; and
(ii) in a situation in which there is an imminent risk of injury
to the student, other students, school employees, or visitors
to the school.
(F) An indication that restraint or seclusion may be used only
for a short time period, or until the imminent risk of injury has
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

206
passed.
(G) A documentation and recording requirement governing
instances in which procedures listed in clause (B) are used,
including:
(i) how every incident will be documented and debriefed;
(ii) how responsibilities will be assigned to designated
employees for evaluation and oversight; and
(iii) designation of a school employee to be the keeper of
such documents.
(H) A requirement that the student's parent must be notified as
soon as possible when an incident involving the student occurs
that includes use of procedures listed in clause (B).
(I) A requirement that a copy of an incident report must be
sent to the student's parent after the student is subject to a
procedure listed in clause (B).
(J) Required recurrent training for appropriate school
employees on the appropriate use of effective alternatives to
physical restraint and seclusion, including the use of positive
behavioral intervention and support and conflict de-escalation.
The training must include the safe use of physical restraint and
seclusion in incidents involving imminent danger or serious
harm to the student, school employees, or others.
Consideration must be given to available school resources and
the time commitments of school employees.
(3) To accept and review reports from the public and make
nonbinding recommendations to the department of any suggested
action to be taken.
(4) To biannually provide a report to the state advisory council on
the education of children with disabilities appointed under
IC 20-35-3-1 regarding the:
(A) execution of the commission's duties under this section;
and
(B) review of incident reports under section 13.6 of this
chapter.
(b) The model policy developed by the commission council must
take into consideration that implementation and reporting requirements
for state accredited nonpublic schools may vary, and the model plan
must provide state accredited nonpublic schools flexibility with regards
to accountability under and implementation of the plan adopted by a
state accredited nonpublic school under section 14 of this chapter.
(c) The commission council will assist the department in enabling
training required by this section to be provided after June 30, 2024,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

207
January 1, 2027, through the online platform established or licensed
for use under IC 20-19-3-29, if the online platform is established.
SECTION 330. IC 20-20-40-13.6, AS AMENDED BY
P.L.162-2024, SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 13.6. (a) The department shall
biannually review incident reports under rules established by the
commission council under IC 4-22-2 and submit summary findings to
the commission council in compliance with the federal Family
Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. 1232g and 34 CFR Part
99).
(b) The commission council shall biannually review summary
findings submitted by the department under subsection (a) and may
make nonbinding recommendations to the department or other entities.
(c) If the department receives a recommendation from the
commission council under subsection (b), the department shall provide
the commission council a response with regard to the commission's
council's recommendation in a manner prescribed by the department
within a reasonable time after the department receives the
recommendation from the commission. council.
SECTION 331. IC 20-20-40-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2020,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 15. (a) Nothing in this chapter may be
construed to prevent a school employee from stopping a physical
altercation, acting to prevent physical harm to a student or another
individual, or acting to address an emergency until the emergency is
over, whether or not the school employee has received training under
this chapter.
(b) This chapter may not be construed to give rise to a cause of
action, either civil or criminal, against the state, the department, a
school corporation, a state accredited nonpublic school, the
commission, council, or a member of the commission. council.
(c) In all matters relating to the plan adopted under section 14 of this
chapter, school corporation or state accredited nonpublic school
personnel have qualified immunity with respect to an action taken to
promote student conduct under a plan adopted under section 14 of this
chapter if the action is taken in good faith and is reasonable.
SECTION 332. IC 20-20-40-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 139, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 16. The commission council
shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.
SECTION 333. IC 20-20-40-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

208
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) The commission on
seclusion and restraint in schools established by section 11 of this
chapter (before its repeal) is abolished on December 31, 2026.
(b) The following are transferred on January 1, 2027, from the
commission on seclusion and restraint in schools to the state
advisory council established by IC 20-35-3-1:
(1) All real and personal property of the commission on
seclusion and restraint in schools.
(2) All powers, duties, assets, and liabilities of the commission
on seclusion and restraint in schools.
(3) All appropriations to the commission on seclusion and
restraint in schools.
(c) All rules or policies that were adopted by the commission on
seclusion and restraint in schools before December 31, 2026, shall
be treated as though the rules were adopted by the state advisory
council established by IC 20-35-3-1 until the council adopts new
rules or policies.
(d) After December 31, 2026, a reference to the commission on
seclusion and restraint in schools in a statute or rule shall be
treated as a reference to the state advisory council established by
IC 20-35-3-1.
SECTION 334. IC 20-26-5-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 177, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. All powers delegated to the
governing body of a school corporation under section 1 or 4 of this
chapter are subject to all laws subjecting the school corporation to
regulation by a state agency, including the secretary of education, state
board of accounts, state police department, fire prevention and building
safety commission, department of homeland security, department of
local government finance, environmental rules board, state school bus
committee, Indiana department of health, and any local governmental
agency to which the state has been delegated a specific authority in
matters other than educational matters and other than finance,
including plan commissions, zoning boards, and boards concerned with
health and safety.
SECTION 335. IC 20-37-2-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.168-2022,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) As used in this section, "applicable high
school" means a high school at which all the students participate in a
work based learning course (as defined in IC 20-43-8-0.7) or school
based enterprise.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

209
(b) As used in this section, "primary use of the building" means an
occupancy classification that is:
(1) most closely related to the intended use of the building; and
(2) determined by the rules of the fire prevention and building
safety commission established by IC 22-12-2-1 department of
homeland security that apply to the building immediately
preceding the date that the applicable high school agrees to use
the building.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), an applicable high school
shall comply with all rules of the fire prevention and building safety
commission department of homeland security applicable to the
primary use of the building.
(d) The fire prevention and building commission department of
homeland security may grant a variance under IC 22-13-2-11 to the
rules applicable to the primary use of the building necessary to
implement this section.
SECTION 336. IC 21-7-13-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.11-2023,
SECTION 70, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 6. (a) "Approved postsecondary educational
institution", for purposes of this title (except section 15 of this chapter
and IC 21-12-6) means the following:
(1) A postsecondary educational institution that operates in
Indiana and:
(A) provides an organized two (2) year or longer program of
collegiate grade directly creditable toward a baccalaureate
degree;
(B) is either operated by the state or operated nonprofit; and
(C) is accredited by a recognized regional accrediting agency,
including:
(i) Ancilla College;
(ii) Anderson University;
(iii) Bethel University;
(iv) Butler University;
(v) Calumet College of St. Joseph;
(vi) DePauw University;
(vii) Earlham College;
(viii) Franklin College;
(ix) Goshen College;
(x) Grace College and Seminary;
(xi) Hanover College;
(xii) Holy Cross College;
(xiii) Huntington University;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

210
(xiv) Indiana Institute of Technology;
(xv) Indiana Wesleyan University;
(xvi) Manchester University;
(xvii) Marian University;
(xviii) Martin University;
(xix) Oakland City University;
(xx) Rose-Hulman Institute of Technology;
(xxi) Saint Mary-of-the-Woods College;
(xxii) Saint Mary's College;
(xxiii) Taylor University;
(xxiv) Trine University;
(xxv) University of Evansville;
(xxvi) University of Indianapolis;
(xxvii) University of Notre Dame;
(xxviii) University of Saint Francis;
(xxix) Valparaiso University; and
(xxx) Wabash College;
or is accredited by the board for proprietary education
commission for higher education under IC 21-18.5-6 or an
accrediting agency recognized by the United States
Department of Education.
(2) Ivy Tech Community College.
(3) A hospital that operates a nursing diploma program that is
accredited by the Indiana state board of nursing.
(4) A postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution that meets the following requirements:
(A) Is incorporated in Indiana, or is registered as a foreign
corporation doing business in Indiana.
(B) Is fully accredited by and is in good standing with the
board for proprietary education commission for higher
education under IC 21-18.5-6.
(C) Is accredited by and is in good standing with a regional or
national accrediting agency.
(D) Offers a course of study that is at least eighteen (18)
consecutive months in duration (or an equivalent to be
determined by the board for proprietary education commission
for high education under IC 21-18.5-6) and that leads to an
associate or a baccalaureate degree recognized by the board
for proprietary education commission for higher education
under IC 21-18.5-6.
(E) Is certified by the board for proprietary education
commission for higher education as meeting the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

211
requirements of this subdivision.
(5) A postsecondary SEI affiliated educational institution.
(b) "Approved postsecondary educational institution" for purposes
of section 15 of this chapter and IC 21-12-6, means the following:
(1) A state educational institution.
(2) A nonprofit college or university.
(3) A postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution that is accredited by an accrediting agency recognized
by the United States Department of Education.
(4) A postsecondary SEI affiliated educational institution.
SECTION 337. IC 21-7-13-26.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.217-2017,
SECTION 142, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 26.5. (a) "Postsecondary SEI
affiliated educational institution" means a degree granting and credit
bearing institution that:
(1) is organized as a public benefit corporation (as described in
IC 23-17-2-23) and controlled by a state educational institution;
(2) is authorized under procedures approved by the executive
officer of the commission under IC 21-18-12.4 to provide
instructional or educational services or training in Indiana using
onsite, online, or any combination of these or other instructional
modalities;
(3) is accredited by a recognized regional accrediting agency or
is seeking or progressing toward accreditation by a recognized
regional accrediting agency; and
(4) has its debts and liabilities backed by the controlling state
educational institution described in subdivision (1) in the form of
a contribution, bond, or other surety consisting solely of eligible
property (as defined in IC 21-27-10-4).
(b) The term does not include the following:
(1) A state educational institution.
(2) A postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution approved or regulated by the board for proprietary
education commission for higher education under IC 21-18.5-6.
(3) Any educational institution or educational training that:
(A) is maintained or provided by an employer or employers at
no charge for employees or potential employees;
(B) is maintained or provided by a labor organization at no
charge for its members or apprentices; or
(C) offers instruction that is exclusively focused on
self-improvement or exclusively intended to be motivational
or avocational, including instruction in dance, music,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

212
self-defense, and private tutoring.
(4) A public or nonprofit degree granting institution organized or
incorporated in a jurisdiction other than Indiana that offers
instructional or educational services or training in Indiana.
(5) A religious institution that offers educational instruction or an
educational program of a clearly religious nature.
SECTION 338. IC 21-9-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.43-2021,
SECTION 139, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The board of directors of the
authority is established. The board consists of the following:
(1) The following four (4) ex officio members or directors:
(A) The treasurer of state.
(B) The secretary of education.
(C) The Indiana commissioner for higher education.
(D) The budget director.
(2) Five (5) appointed members or directors who:
(A) are appointed by the governor; and
(B) who have knowledge, skill, and experience in academic,
business, financial, or education fields appointed as follows:
(A) One (1) member appointed by the governor.
(B) Two (2) members appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate.
(3) Two (2) members appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(b) During a member's term of service on the board, an appointed
member of the board may not be an official or employee of the state.
(c) Not more than three (3) of the appointed members of the board
may belong to the same political party.
(d) (c) An appointed member serves a four (4) year term. An
appointed member shall hold over after the expiration of the member's
term until the member's successor is appointed and qualified. A
member may be appointed to successive terms.
(e) The governor may reappoint an appointed member of the board.
(f) (d) A vacancy shall be filled by the appropriate appointing
authority for the balance of an unexpired term in the same manner as
the original appointment.
(g) (e) The treasurer of state shall serve as chairman of the board.
The board shall annually elect one (1) of its ex officio members as vice
chairman, and may elect any other officer that the board desires.
(h) (f) The governor appointing authority may remove an
appointed member for misfeasance, malfeasance, willful neglect of
duty, or other cause after notice and a public hearing, unless the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

213
member expressly waives the notice and hearing in writing.
SECTION 339. IC 21-12-1-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.157-2023,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 8. "Eligible institution", for the purposes of:
(1) IC 21-12-6, refers to a postsecondary educational institution
that qualifies as an eligible institution under IC 21-12-6-4; and
(2) IC 21-12-8, refers to a postsecondary educational institution
that:
(A) operates in Indiana;
(B) is either operated by the state or operated nonprofit;
(C) operates an organized program of postsecondary education
leading to a technical certificate, nursing diploma, or associate
or baccalaureate degree; and
(D) is authorized by the department of workforce development
under IC 22-4.1-21 or accredited by:
(i) a recognized regional accrediting agency;
(ii) the board for proprietary education commission for
higher education under IC 21-18.5-6; or
(iii) the Indiana state board of nursing.
SECTION 340. IC 21-12-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.281-2013,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. A person is eligible for a freedom of
choice grant if:
(1) the person is qualified for a higher education award under the
terms of IC 21-12-3-1, IC 21-12-3-2, and IC 21-12-3-3 or
IC 21-12-3-4, even if lack of funds prevents the award or grant;
(2) for a freedom of choice grant awarded before September 1,
2014, the person has a financial need that exceeds the award, as
determined in accordance with:
(A) this chapter, IC 21-18.5-4, IC 21-12-2, and IC 21-12-3;
and
(B) the rules of the commission; and
(3) the person will attend an approved postsecondary educational
institution that:
(A) either:
(i) operates in Indiana, provides an organized two (2) year or
longer program of collegiate grade directly creditable toward
a baccalaureate degree, is operated by a nonprofit entity, and
is accredited by a recognized regional accrediting agency or
the board for proprietary education commission for higher
education under IC 21-18.5-6; or
(ii) is a hospital that operates a nursing diploma program
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

214
that is accredited by the Indiana state board of nursing; and
(B) is operated privately and not administered or controlled by
any state agency or entity.
SECTION 341. IC 21-12-6-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.107-2012,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4. A scholarship recipient may apply a
scholarship under this chapter to the educational costs of a
postsecondary educational institution only if the postsecondary
educational institution qualifies under this section. For a postsecondary
educational institution to qualify under this section, the postsecondary
educational institution must satisfy the following requirements:
(1) Be an approved postsecondary educational institution.
(2) Be accredited by an agency that is recognized by the Secretary
of the United States Department of Education.
(3) Operate an organized program of postsecondary education
leading to an associate or a baccalaureate degree on a campus
located in Indiana.
(4) Be approved by the commission:
(A) under rules adopted under IC 4-22-2; and
(B) in consultation with the board for proprietary education
established by IC 21-18.5-5-1, commission for higher
education, if appropriate.
SECTION 342. IC 21-13-6-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.170-2009,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 7. The medical graduate and education
board shall annually make available to the commission the most recent
information concerning the number of primary care physicians who are
serving as medical residents in Indiana.
SECTION 343. IC 21-13-6.5-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.190-2015,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. The medical graduate and education
board shall annually make available to the commission the most recent
information concerning the number of current residency program slots
in Indiana.
SECTION 344. IC 21-16-4-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.152-2018,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 7. The commission may remove an eligible
institution's qualified status upon finding, after reasonable notice and
hearing, that the eligible institution fails to meet the standards
established by the commission. The commission may direct the
department of workforce development or the board for proprietary
education to review a school under its jurisdiction, or a comparable
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

215
school outside Indiana that is an eligible institution under this chapter.
The commission may use the results of the review to determine
whether to remove an eligible institution's qualified status.
SECTION 345. IC 21-18-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 245, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. The general purposes of the
commission are the following:
(1) Plan for and coordinate Indiana's state supported system of
postsecondary education.
(2) Review appropriation requests of state educational
institutions.
(3) Make recommendations to the governor, budget agency, or the
general assembly concerning postsecondary education.
(4) Perform other functions assigned by the governor or the
general assembly.
(5) Administer state financial aid programs under IC 21-18.5-4.
(6) Provide staff and office space for the board for proprietary
education established by IC 21-18.5-5-1.
SECTION 346. IC 21-18-12-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2020,
SECTION 106, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. (a) The Indiana e-transcript
program is created to allow students at all state accredited high schools
accredited under IC 20-31-4.1 located in Indiana to request that the
student's school transcripts be transmitted electronically to state
educational institutions, participating Indiana not-for-profit or privately
endowed institutions, and participating Indiana institutions authorized
by the board for proprietary education established by IC 21-18.5-5-1.
commission for higher education.
(b) The commission shall administer the program.
(c) Beginning July 1, 2013, the department of education established
by IC 20-19-3-1, in collaboration with the state educational institutions
and the commission, shall develop a common electronic transcript,
using common data fields and formats that are required by state
educational institutions.
(d) Not later than July 1, 2015, all public secondary schools shall
use the common electronic transcript developed by the department of
education.
(e) The governing body of a state accredited nonpublic secondary
school may elect to use the common electronic transcript developed by
the department of education.
SECTION 347. IC 21-18.5-1-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.152-2018,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

216
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. Any reference to the Indiana commission
for postsecondary proprietary education or the Indiana commission on
proprietary education in any statute or rule shall be treated:
(1) after June 30, 2012, as a reference to the board for proprietary
education established by IC 21-18.5-5-1 (before its expiration)
if the reference pertains to a postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution; or
(2) if the reference pertains to a postsecondary proprietary
educational institution (as defined in IC 22-4.1-21-9):
(A) after June 30, 2012, and before July 1, 2016, as a reference
to the state workforce innovation council established by
IC 22-4.1-22-3 (before its repeal); or
(B) after June 30, 2016, as a reference to the department of
workforce development established by IC 22-4.1-2-1.
SECTION 348. IC 21-18.5-1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.152-2018,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4. (a) Changes made by P.L.218-1987 do not
affect:
(1) rights or liabilities accrued;
(2) penalties incurred;
(3) crimes committed; or
(4) proceedings begun;
before July 1, 1987. These rights, liabilities, penalties, crimes, and
proceedings continue and shall be imposed and enforced under prior
law as if P.L.218-1987 had not been enacted.
(b) The abolishment of the Indiana commission on proprietary
education on July 1, 2012, by P.L.107-2012 does not affect:
(1) rights or liabilities accrued;
(2) penalties incurred;
(3) crimes committed; or
(4) proceedings begun;
before July 1, 2012, that pertain to a postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution. These rights, liabilities, penalties,
crimes, and proceedings continue and shall be imposed and enforced
by the board for proprietary education established by IC 21-18.5-5-1
(before its expiration).
(c) The abolishment of the Indiana commission on proprietary
education on July 1, 2012, by P.L.107-2012 does not affect:
(1) rights or liabilities accrued;
(2) penalties incurred;
(3) crimes committed; or
(4) proceedings begun;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

217
before July 1, 2012, that pertain to a postsecondary proprietary
educational institution (as defined in IC 22-4.1-21-9). After June 30,
2012, and before July 1, 2016, these rights, liabilities, penalties, crimes,
and proceedings continue and shall be imposed and enforced by the
state workforce innovation council established under IC 22-4.1-22-3
(before its repeal). After June 30, 2016, these rights, liabilities,
penalties, crimes, and proceedings continue and shall be imposed and
enforced by the department of workforce development established by
IC 22-4.1-2-1.
SECTION 349. IC 21-18.5-1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.152-2018,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. (a) The Indiana commission on
proprietary education is abolished on July 1, 2012.
(b) Unless otherwise specified in a memorandum of understanding
described in subsection (e), the following are transferred on July 1,
2012, from the Indiana commission on proprietary education to the
commission for higher education established by IC 21-18-2-1:
(1) All real and personal property of the Indiana commission on
proprietary education.
(2) All assets and liabilities of the Indiana commission on
proprietary education.
(3) All appropriations to the Indiana commission on proprietary
education.
(c) All powers and duties of the Indiana commission on proprietary
education before its abolishment pertaining to the accreditation of a
postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational institution are
transferred to the board for proprietary education established by
IC 21-18.5-5-1 (before its expiration).
(d) All powers and duties of the Indiana commission on proprietary
education before its abolishment pertaining to the accreditation of a
postsecondary proprietary educational institution (as defined in
IC 22-4.1-21-9) are transferred to the state workforce innovation
council established by IC 22-4.1-22-3 (before its repeal). After June 30,
2016, all powers and duties transferred to the state workforce
innovation council by this subsection are transferred to the department
of workforce development established by IC 22-4.1-2-1.
(e) The commission for higher education established by
IC 21-18-2-1 may enter into a memorandum of understanding with the
state workforce innovation council established by IC 22-4.1-22-3
(before its repeal) to implement the transition of the responsibilities
and obligations of the Indiana commission on proprietary education
before its abolishment to the commission for higher education and the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

218
state workforce innovation council. After June 30, 2016, the rights,
powers, duties, and obligations of the state workforce innovation
council under a memorandum of understanding entered into by the
state workforce innovation council under this subsection are transferred
to the department of workforce development established by
IC 22-4.1-2-1.
(f) Rules that were adopted by the Indiana commission on
proprietary education before July 1, 2012, shall be treated as though the
rules were adopted by the state workforce innovation council
established by IC 22-4.1-22-3 (before its repeal) until the state
workforce innovation council or the department of workforce
development adopts rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement IC 22-4.1-21.
Rules that were adopted by the state workforce innovation council after
June 30, 2012, and before July 1, 2016, to implement IC 22-4.1-21
shall be treated as though the rules were adopted by the department of
workforce development until the department of workforce development
adopts rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement IC 22-4.1-21.
(g) An accreditation granted or a permit issued under IC 21-17-3
(repealed) by the Indiana commission on proprietary education before
July 1, 2012, shall be treated after June 30, 2012, as an authorization
granted by the:
(1) board for proprietary education established by IC 21-18.5-5-1
(before its expiration) if the accreditation pertains to a
postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational institution
(as defined in IC 21-18.5-2-12); or
(2) department of workforce development if the accreditation
pertains to a postsecondary proprietary educational institution (as
defined in IC 22-4.1-21-9).
(h) An accreditation granted or a permit issued before May 15,
2013, under IC 21-17-3 (repealed):
(1) by the board for proprietary education established by
IC 21-18.5-5-1 (before its expiration) shall be treated as an
authorization granted by the board for proprietary education; and
(2) by the state workforce innovation council shall be treated as
an authorization granted by the department of workforce
development.
(i) Proceedings pending before the Indiana commission on
proprietary education on July 1, 2012, shall be transferred from the
Indiana commission on proprietary education to:
(1) the board for proprietary education established by
IC 21-18.5-5-1 (before its expiration) for a proceeding
pertaining to a postsecondary credit bearing proprietary
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

219
educational institution (as defined in IC 21-18.5-2-12); or
(2) the state workforce innovation council if the proceeding
pertains to a postsecondary proprietary educational institution (as
defined in IC 22-4.1-21-9).
(j) Proceedings that pertain to a postsecondary proprietary
educational institution (as defined in IC 22-4.1-21-9) pending before
the state workforce innovation council on July 1, 2012, shall be
transferred from the state workforce innovation council to the
department of workforce development established by IC 22-4.1-2-1.
SECTION 350. IC 21-18.5-1-7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 7. All of the rights, duties,
obligations, and responsibilities transferred from the Indiana
commission on proprietary education to the board for proprietary
education established by IC 21-18.5-5-1 (before its expiration)
under this chapter are transferred to the commission for higher
education, including the following:
(1) The rights, liabilities, penalties, crimes, and proceedings
described in section 4(b) of this chapter continue and are
imposed and enforced by the commission for higher
education.
(2) The powers and duties described in section 5(c) of this
chapter are transferred to the commission for higher
education.
(3) An accreditation granted or a permit issued as described
in sections 5(g) of this chapter is treated as an authorization
by the commission for higher education.
(4) Any proceedings pending as described in section 5(i) of this
chapter are transferred to the commission for higher
education.
SECTION 351. IC 21-18.5-2-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.273-2013,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. "Application", for purposes of
IC 21-18.5-6, means a written request for authorization on forms
supplied by the board for proprietary education. commission for
higher education.
SECTION 352. IC 21-18.5-2-5.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.273-2013,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5.5. "Authorization", for purposes of
IC 21-18.5-6, means certification of a status of approval or
authorization by the board for proprietary education commission for
higher education to conduct business as a postsecondary credit
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

220
bearing proprietary educational institution.
SECTION 353. IC 21-18.5-2-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.273-2013,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 12. (a) "Postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution" means a degree granting and credit
bearing institution that provides instructional or educational services
or training, whether onsite, online, or through any combination of these
or other instructional modalities, and is accredited by an accrediting
agency recognized by the United States Department of Education or is
seeking and progressing toward accreditation by an accrediting agency
recognized by the United States Department of Education.
(b) The term does not include the following:
(1) An Indiana state educational institution or another Indiana
educational institution established by law and financed in whole
or in part by public funds.
(2) A postsecondary proprietary educational institution approved
or regulated by any other state regulatory board, agency, or
commission other than the board for proprietary education.
commission for higher education.
(3) An elementary or secondary school attended by students in
kindergarten or grades 1 through 12 and supported in whole or in
part by private tuition payments.
(4) Any educational institution or educational training that:
(A) is maintained or given by an employer or a group of
employers, without charge, for employees or for individuals
the employer anticipates employing;
(B) is maintained or given by a labor organization, without
charge, for its members or apprentices;
(C) offers exclusively instruction that is clearly
self-improvement, motivational, or avocational in intent
(including instruction in dance, music, or self-defense, and
private tutoring); or
(D) is a Montessori or nursery school.
(5) A privately endowed two (2) or four (4) year degree granting
institution that is regionally accredited and whose principal
campus is located in Indiana.
(6) Out-of-state public and nonprofit degree granting institutions
offering instructional or educational services or training in
Indiana.
(7) A religious institution that offers educational instruction or an
educational program of a clearly religious nature.
SECTION 354. IC 21-18.5-4-11 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

221
JANUARY 1, 2027]. The commission may cooperate in developing
training programs concerning grant program requirements with the
board for proprietary education.
SECTION 355. IC 21-18.5-5-1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 1. The board for proprietary education is
established.
SECTION 356. IC 21-18.5-5-2 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 2. (a) The board for proprietary education
consists of the following seven (7) members:
(1) The secretary of education or the secretary's designee.
(2) The executive officer of the commission for higher education
or the executive officer's designee.
(3) Five (5) members appointed by the governor.
(b) The members appointed by the governor under subsection (a)
serve for a term of four (4) years.
(c) Not more than three (3) of the members appointed by the
governor may be members of the same political party.
(d) Of the five (5) members appointed by the governor:
(1) one (1) must have been engaged for a period of at least five
(5) years immediately preceding appointment in an executive or
a managerial position in a postsecondary proprietary educational
institution subject to IC 21-18.5-6;
(2) one (1) must have been engaged in administering or managing
an industrial employee training program for a period of at least
five (5) years immediately preceding appointment; and
(3) three (3) must be representatives of the public at large who are
not representatives of the types of postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institutions to be authorized.
For purposes of subdivision (3), an elected or appointed state or local
official or a member of a private or public school may not be appointed
as a representative of the public at large.
(e) An appointment to fill a vacancy occurring on the board for
proprietary education is for the unexpired term.
SECTION 357. IC 21-18.5-5-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 3. (a) A member of the board for proprietary
education who is not a state employee is entitled to the minimum salary
per diem provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member is also entitled
to reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4
and other expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's
duties as provided in the state policies and procedures established by
the Indiana department of administration and approved by the budget
agency.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

222
(b) Each member of the board for proprietary education who is a
state employee is entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses as
provided under IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in
connection with the member's duties as provided in the state policies
and procedures established by the Indiana department of administration
and approved by the budget agency.
SECTION 358. IC 21-18.5-5-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 4. (a) The board for proprietary education
may select officers from the board for proprietary education's
membership as the board for proprietary education considers necessary.
(b) The board for proprietary education may adopt reasonable rules
under IC 4-22-2 to implement this chapter and IC 21-18.5-6.
(c) The board for proprietary education:
(1) may meet as necessary upon call of the chairperson; and
(2) shall meet at least four (4) times a year.
SECTION 359. IC 21-18.5-5-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 5. An associate commissioner of the
commission (as defined in IC 21-18.5-2-7) shall serve as the executive
director of the board for proprietary education.
SECTION 360. IC 21-18.5-5-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6 (a) The board for proprietary
education established by section 1 of this chapter (before its repeal)
expires on December 31, 2026.
(b) The following are transferred on January 1, 2027, from the
board for proprietary education to the commission for higher
education:
(1) All real and personal property of the board for
proprietary education.
(2) All powers, duties, assets, and liabilities of the board for
proprietary education.
(3) All appropriations to the board for proprietary education.
(c) All rules or policies that were adopted by the board for
proprietary education before December 31, 2026, are treated as
through the rules were adopted by the commission for higher
education until the commission adopts new rules or policies.
(d) After December 31, 2026, a reference to the board for
proprietary education in a statute or a rule is treated as a reference
to the commission for higher education.
SECTION 361. IC 21-18.5-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.273-2013,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. A person may not do business as a
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

223
postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational institution in
Indiana without having obtained authorization by the board for
proprietary education commission for higher education under this
chapter, except for a religious institution that offers educational
instruction or an educational program of a clearly religious nature.
SECTION 362. IC 21-18.5-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.273-2013,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. Applications for authorization under this
chapter must be filed with the board for proprietary education
commission for higher education and accompanied by an application
fee of at least one hundred dollars ($100) for processing the application
and evaluating the postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution.
SECTION 363. IC 21-18.5-6-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.273-2013,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. The board for proprietary education
commission for higher education shall require each postsecondary
credit bearing proprietary educational institution to include in each
curriculum catalog and promotional brochure the following:
(1) A statement indicating that the postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution is authorized by the board for
proprietary education commission for higher education under
this chapter.
(2) The board for proprietary education's commission for higher
education's mailing address and telephone number.
SECTION 364. IC 21-18.5-6-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.273-2013,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 6. (a) The career college student assurance
fund is established to provide indemnification to a student or an
enrollee of a postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution who suffers loss or damage as a result of:
(1) the failure or neglect of the postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution to faithfully perform all
agreements, express or otherwise, with the student, enrollee, one
(1) or both of the parents of the student or enrollee, or a guardian
of the student or enrollee as represented by the application for the
institution's authorization and the materials submitted in support
of that application;
(2) the failure or neglect of the postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution to maintain and operate a
course or courses of instruction or study in compliance with the
standards of this chapter; or
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

224
(3) an agent's misrepresentation in procuring the student's
enrollment.
(b) The board for proprietary education commission for higher
education shall administer the fund.
(c) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(d) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public funds may be invested.
(e) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not revert
to the state general fund but remains available to be used for providing
money for reimbursements allowed under this chapter.
(f) Upon the fund acquiring fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the
balance in the fund must not become less than fifty thousand dollars
($50,000). If:
(1) a claim against the fund is filed that would, if paid in full,
require the balance of the fund to become less than fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000); and
(2) the board for proprietary education commission for higher
education determines that the student is eligible for a
reimbursement under the fund;
the board for proprietary education commission for higher education
shall prorate the amount of the reimbursement to ensure that the
balance of the fund does not become less than fifty thousand dollars
($50,000), and the student is entitled to receive that balance of the
student's claim from the fund as money becomes available in the fund
from contributions to the fund required under this chapter.
(g) The board for proprietary education commission for higher
education shall ensure that all outstanding claim amounts described in
subsection (f) are paid as money in the fund becomes available in the
chronological order of the outstanding claims.
(h) A claim against the fund may not be construed to be a debt of the
state.
SECTION 365. IC 21-18.5-6-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.107-2012,
SECTION 58, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 7. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this
section, each postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution shall make quarterly contributions to the fund. The quarters
begin January 1, April 1, July 1, and October 1.
(b) For each quarter, each postsecondary credit bearing proprietary
educational institution shall make a contribution equal to the STEP
THREE amount derived under the following formula:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

225
STEP ONE: Determine the total amount of tuition and fees earned
during the quarter.
STEP TWO: Multiply the STEP ONE amount by one-tenth of one
percent (0.1%).
STEP THREE: Add the STEP TWO amount and sixty dollars
($60).
(c) After June 30, 2012, upon the career college student assurance
fund achieving at least an initial balance of five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000), a postsecondary credit bearing proprietary
educational institution that contributes to the career college student
assurance fund when the initial quarterly contribution is required under
this chapter after the fund's establishment is not required to make
contributions to the fund.
(d) The board for proprietary education commission for higher
education shall determine the number of quarterly contributions
required for the career college student assurance fund to initially
accumulate five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
(e) Except as provided in subsections (a), (b), and (f), a
postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational institution that
begins making contributions to the career college student assurance
fund after the initial quarterly contribution as required under this
section shall make contributions to the fund for the same number of
quarters as determined by the board for proprietary education
commission for higher education under subsection (d).
(f) If, after a career college student assurance fund acquires five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), the balance in the fund becomes
less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), all
postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational institutions not
required to make contributions to the career college student assurance
fund as described in subsection (c) or (e) shall make contributions to
the career college student assurance fund for the number of quarters
necessary for the fund to accumulate five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000).
SECTION 366. IC 21-18.5-6-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.273-2013,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 8. (a) Upon receipt of an application for
authorization under this chapter, the board for proprietary education
commission for higher education shall make an investigation to
determine the accuracy of the statements in the application to
determine if the postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution meets the minimum standards for authorization.
(b) During the investigation under subsection (a), the board for
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

226
proprietary education commission for higher education may grant a
temporary status of authorization. The temporary status of authorization
is sufficient to meet the requirements of this chapter until a
determination on authorization is made.
SECTION 367. IC 21-18.5-6-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2021,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 10. (a) A postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution shall maintain at least the following
records for each student:
(1) The program in which the student enrolls.
(2) The length of the program.
(3) The date of the student's initial enrollment in the program.
(4) A transcript of the student's academic progress.
(5) The amount of the student's tuition and fees.
(6) A copy of the enrollment agreement.
(b) Upon the request of the board for proprietary education,
commission for higher education, a postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution shall submit the records described
in subsection (a) to the board for proprietary education. commission
for higher education.
(c) If a postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution ceases operation, the postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution shall submit the records described
in subsection (a) to the Indiana archives and records administration not
later than thirty (30) days after the institution ceases to operate,
regardless of any outstanding debts owed to the institution.
SECTION 368. IC 21-18.5-6-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.273-2013,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 11. Full authorization under this chapter may
not be issued unless and until the board for proprietary education
commission for higher education finds that the postsecondary credit
bearing proprietary educational institution meets minimum standards
that are appropriate to that type or class of postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution, including the following minimum
standards:
(1) The postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution has a sound financial structure with sufficient
resources for continued support.
(2) The postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution has satisfactory training or educational facilities with
sufficient tools, supplies, or equipment and the necessary number
of work stations or classrooms to adequately train, instruct, or
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

227
educate the number of students enrolled or proposed to be
enrolled.
(3) The postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution has an adequate number of qualified instructors or
teachers, sufficiently trained by experience or education, to give
the instruction, education, or training contemplated.
(4) The advertising and representations made on behalf of the
postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational institution
to prospective students are truthful and free from
misrepresentation or fraud.
(5) The charge made for the training, instruction, or education is
clearly stated and based upon the services rendered.
(6) The premises and conditions under which the students work
and study are sanitary, healthful, and safe according to modern
standards.
(7) The postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution has and follows a refund policy approved by the board
for proprietary education. commission for higher education.
(8) The owner or chief administrator of the postsecondary credit
bearing proprietary educational institution is subject to a
background check by the board for proprietary education
commission for higher education and has not been convicted of
a felony.
(9) The owner or chief administrator of the postsecondary credit
bearing proprietary educational institution has not been the owner
or chief administrator of a postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution that has had its authorization
revoked or has been closed involuntarily in the five (5) year
period preceding the application for authorization. However, if
the owner or chief administrator of the postsecondary credit
bearing proprietary educational institution has been the owner or
chief administrator of a postsecondary credit bearing proprietary
educational institution that has had its authorization revoked or
has been closed involuntarily more than five (5) years before the
application for authorization, the board for proprietary education
commission for higher education may issue full authorization at
the board for proprietary education's discretion.
SECTION 369. IC 21-18.5-6-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.273-2013,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 12. (a) After an investigation and a finding
that the information in the application is true and that the
postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational institution meets
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

228
the minimum standards, the board for proprietary education
commission for higher education shall issue an authorization to the
postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational institution upon
payment of an additional fee of at least twenty-five dollars ($25). An
applicant's market research may not be considered or required by the
board for proprietary education commission for higher education as
a condition for authorizing or renewing the accreditation of or for
authorization of the programs of a postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution.
(b) The board for proprietary education commission for higher
education may waive inspection of a postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution that has been authorized by an
accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
Education whose standards are approved by the board for proprietary
education commission for higher education as meeting or exceeding
the requirements of this chapter.
(c) A valid license, authorization to operate, or other form of
authorization issued to a postsecondary credit bearing proprietary
educational institution by another state may be accepted, instead of
inspection, if:
(1) the requirements of that state meet or exceed the requirements
of this chapter; and
(2) the other state will, in turn, extend reciprocity to
postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational institutions
authorized by the board for proprietary education. commission
for higher education.
(d) The board for proprietary education commission for higher
education may join interstate reciprocity agreements and authorize an
institution to operate in Indiana, if the:
(1) institution; and
(2) state in which both the institution's:
(A) principal campus is located; and
(B) institutional accreditation is provided;
are members of the interstate reciprocity agreement.
(e) An authorization issued under this section expires one (1) year
following the authorization's issuance.
(f) An authorized postsecondary credit bearing proprietary
educational institution may renew the institution's authorization
annually upon:
(1) the payment of a fee of at least twenty-five dollars ($25); and
(2) continued compliance with this chapter.
SECTION 370. IC 21-18.5-6-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.273-2013,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

229
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 13. Authorization may be revoked by the
board for proprietary education: commission for higher education:
(1) for cause upon notice and an opportunity for a hearing before
the board for proprietary education; commission for higher
education; and
(2) for the authorized postsecondary credit bearing proprietary
educational institution failing to make the appropriate quarterly
contributions to the career college student assurance fund not
later than forty-five (45) days after the end of a quarter.
SECTION 371. IC 21-18.5-6-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.273-2013,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 14. (a) A postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution, after notification that the
institution's authorization has been refused, revoked, or suspended, may
apply for a hearing before the board for proprietary education
commission for higher education concerning the institution's
qualifications. The application for a hearing must be filed in writing
with the board for proprietary education commission for higher
education not more than thirty (30) days after receipt of notice of the
denial, revocation, or suspension.
(b) The board for proprietary education commission for higher
education shall give a hearing promptly and with not less than ten (10)
days notice of the date, time, and place. The postsecondary credit
bearing proprietary educational institution is entitled to be represented
by counsel and to offer oral and documentary evidence relevant to the
issue.
(c) Not more than fifteen (15) days after a hearing, the board for
proprietary education commission for higher education shall make
written findings of fact, a written decision, and a written order based
solely on the evidence submitted at the hearing, either granting or
denying authorization to the postsecondary credit bearing proprietary
educational institution.
SECTION 372. IC 21-18.5-6-20, AS AMENDED BY P.L.13-2013,
SECTION 62, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 20. (a) This section applies to claims against
the balance of the career college student assurance fund.
(b) A student or enrollee of a postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution who believes that the student or
enrollee has suffered loss or damage resulting from any of the
occurrences described in section 6(a) of this chapter may file a claim
with the board for proprietary education commission for higher
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

230
education against the balance of the fund.
(c) A claim under this section is limited to a refund of the claimant's
applicable tuition and fees.
(d) All claims must be filed not later than five (5) years after the
occurrence resulting in the loss or damage to the claimant occurs.
(e) Upon the filing of a claim under this section, the board for
proprietary education commission for higher education shall review
the records submitted by the appropriate postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution described under section 12 of this
chapter and shall investigate the claim.
(f) Upon a determination by the board for proprietary education
commission for higher education that a claimant shall be reimbursed
under the career college student assurance fund, the board for
proprietary education commission for higher education shall
prioritize the reimbursements under the following guidelines:
(1) A student's educational loan balances.
(2) Federal grant repayment obligations of the student.
(3) Other expenses paid directly by the student.
SECTION 373. IC 21-18.5-6-23, AS ADDED BY P.L.107-2012,
SECTION 58, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 23. The prosecuting attorney of the county
in which an offense under this chapter occurred shall, at the request of
the board for proprietary education commission for higher education
or on the prosecuting attorney's own motion, bring any appropriate
action, including a mandatory and prohibitive injunction.
SECTION 374. IC 21-18.5-6-24, AS AMENDED BY P.L.273-2013,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 24. An action of the board for proprietary
education commission for higher education concerning the issuance,
denial, or revocation of an authorization under this chapter is subject
to review under IC 4-21.5.
SECTION 375. IC 21-18.5-6-26, AS AMENDED BY P.L.273-2013,
SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 26. (a) As used in this section, "fund" means
the postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational institution
authorization fund established by subsection (b).
(b) The postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution authorization fund is established.
(c) The fund shall be administered by the commission (as defined
in IC 21-18.5-2-7.).
(d) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not revert
to the general fund.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

231
(e) All fees collected by the board for proprietary education
commission for higher education under this chapter shall be
deposited in the fund.
(f) Money in the fund shall be used by the board for proprietary
education commission for higher education to administer this
chapter.
SECTION 376. IC 21-18.5-6-27, AS ADDED BY P.L.107-2012,
SECTION 58, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 27. The board for proprietary education
commission for higher education may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
SECTION 377. IC 21-38-1-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. "Commission" refers to the
commission for higher education of the state of Indiana established
by IC 21-18-2.
SECTION 378. IC 21-38-1-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2007,
SECTION 279, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) "Council" refers to the
Indiana excellence in teaching council.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 379. IC 21-38-8-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2007,
SECTION 279, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The Indiana excellence in
teaching council is established. The council consists of nine (9)
members as follows:
(1) One (1) representative of the commission for higher
education.
(2) One (1) representative of the budget agency.
(3) One (1) representative from each state educational institution.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 380. IC 21-38-8-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.234-2007,
SECTION 56, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The Indiana excellence in teaching
endowment is established to provide state educational institutions with
grants to match interest income generated by an endowment to attract
and retain distinguished teachers. The fund shall be administered by
the council. commission.
(b) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(c) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet obligations of the fund in the same manner as
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

232
other public funds may be invested.
(d) Money in the fund at the end of the state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund but remains available to be used for
providing money for grants as allowed under this chapter.
SECTION 381. IC 21-38-8-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2007,
SECTION 279, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. A state educational institution
must apply for a matching grant in the manner prescribed by the
council. commission.
SECTION 382. IC 21-38-8-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2007,
SECTION 279, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. When determining a
distinguished teacher's prominence, the council commission shall
consider the following criteria when distributing endowment funds:
(1) Evidence of excellent teaching ability.
(2) Distinguished accomplishments.
(3) Either:
(A) productive scholarship; or
(B) artistic achievement and superior talent.
The council commission may consider any other criteria for
distributing endowment funds that the council commission determines
appropriate.
SECTION 383. IC 21-38-8-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2007,
SECTION 279, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The council commission
shall approve or disapprove a matching grant application within sixty
(60) days after the application is received by the council. commission.
(b) The council commission may approve a grant application with
an amount that is the same or less than the amount requested by the
state educational institution.
SECTION 384. IC 21-38-8-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2007,
SECTION 279, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Each matching grant from the
fund is intended to be used to supplement, and may not be used instead
of, a distinguished teacher's regular annual salary.
(b) The council commission may not approve a matching grant from
the fund that exceeds income generated from the endowment of the
institution.
SECTION 385. IC 21-38-8-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2007,
SECTION 279, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Staff for the council shall be
provided by the commission for higher education.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

233
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 386. IC 21-38-8-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2007,
SECTION 279, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The council may:
(1) develop guidelines; and
(2) adopt rules under IC 4-22-2;
to administer the fund and this chapter.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 387. IC 21-44-1-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2015,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. (a) "Board", for purposes of IC 21-44-5
and IC 21-44-7, refers to the medical graduate and education board
established by IC 21-44-5-1.
(b) "Board", for purposes of IC 21-44-6, refers to the mental health
and addiction services development programs board established by
IC 21-44-6-1.
(c) "Board", for purposes of IC 21-44-7, refers to the graduate
medical education board established by IC 21-44-7-2.
SECTION 388. IC 21-44-1-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.170-2009,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 12. "Intern, residency, and graduate
program", for purposes of IC 21-44-5, refers to an intern, residency,
and graduate program for which the medical graduate and education
board establishes policies under IC 21-44-5.
SECTION 389. IC 21-44-5-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2007,
SECTION 285, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. There is established a
medical graduate and education board. consisting of seven (7)
persons.
SECTION 390. IC 21-44-5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 202, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. (a) The board consists of
the following members:
(1) The dean of the Indiana University School of Medicine, who
serves as an ex officio member of the board. The dean of the
Indiana University School of Medicine shall serve as the
chairman of the board.
(2) The commissioner of the Indiana department of health, who
serves as an ex officio member of the board.
(3) Five (5) members appointed by the governor as follows:
(A) One (1) member appointed by the governor who is a
director of medical education of an Indiana hospital not owned
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

234
or operated by Indiana University.
(B) One (1) member who:
(i) is a hospital administrator in a hospital not owned or
operated by Indiana University; and
(ii) is not the hospital administrator for the hospital that
employs the member appointed under clause (A).
(C) One (1) member who:
(i) is a citizen of Indiana; and
(ii) is not a physician and not a hospital administrator.
(D) Two (2) members who are physicians holding unlimited
licenses to practice medicine in Indiana. The two (2)
physicians appointed under this subdivision may not be
directors of medical education. One (1) of the members
appointed under this subdivision must practice in the specialty
of family practice.
(b) The terms of the five (5) members appointed to the board by the
governor are for three (3) years beginning January 1 of the year of
appointment and continuing until the member's successor is appointed
and qualified. If a membership on the board becomes vacant before the
expiration of the term, the governor shall appoint a replacement with
the same representative status to fill the unexpired term.
(c) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 391. IC 21-44-5-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. (a) This section applies after
December 31, 2026.
(b) The board consists of the following fourteen (14) members:
(1) The dean of the Indiana University School of Medicine,
who serves as the chairperson of the board.
(2) The following thirteen (13) members appointed by the
governor:
(A) One (1) member representing a regional medical school
campus of the Indiana University School of Medicine.
(B) One (1) member representing the Marian University
College of Osteopathic Medicine.
(C) One (1) member representing the Indiana state medical
association.
(D) One (1) member representing the Indiana osteopathic
medical association.
(E) One (1) member representing the Indiana primary
health care association.
(F) One (1) member representing a teaching hospital that
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

235
is a member of the Indiana hospital association.
(G) One (1) member representing a non-teaching hospital
that is a member of the Indiana hospital association.
(H) Two (2) members who are medical directors of
residency programs.
(I) One (1) member who is the director of medical
education of an Indiana hospital that is not owned by,
operated by, or affiliated with Indiana University.
(J) One (1) member who is:
(i) a hospital administrator employed by a hospital not
owned by, operated by, or affiliated with Indiana
University; and
(ii) not employed by the hospital that employs the
member appointed under clause (I).
(K) Two (2) members who are physicians holding
unlimited licenses to practice medicine in Indiana. The
following apply to the members appointed under this
clause:
(i) Neither member may be employed as a director of
medical education.
(ii) At least one of the members must practice in the
specialty of family medicine.
(c) The terms of the appointed to the board by the governor are
for three (3) years beginning January 1 of the year of appointment
and continuing until the member's successor is appointed and
qualified. If a membership on the board becomes vacant before the
expiration of the term, the governor shall appoint a replacement
with the same representative status to fill the unexpired term.
(d) A member may be reappointed to successive terms.
SECTION 392. IC 21-44-5-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3.5. The chairperson of the
board is permitted to vote only to break a tie.
SECTION 393. IC 21-44-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2014,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) There is established the mental health and
addiction services development programs board.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 394. IC 21-44-6-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. As used in this chapter,
"commission" refers to the commission for higher education of the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

236
state of Indiana established by IC 21-18-2.
SECTION 395. IC 21-44-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 203, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The board consists of the
following ten (10) members:
(1) The dean of the Indiana University School of Medicine or the
dean's designee. The dean of the Indiana University School of
Medicine or the dean's designee shall serve as the chairperson of
the board.
(2) The chairperson of the department of psychiatry of the Indiana
University School of Medicine or the chairperson's designee.
(3) The director of the division of mental health and addiction
created by IC 12-21-1-1 or the director's designee.
(4) The commissioner of the Indiana department of health or the
commissioner's designee.
(5) The dean of the department of family practice of the Marian
University College of Osteopathic Medicine or the dean's
designee.
(6) The administrator of a graduate program in an institution of
higher education in Indiana engaged in training psychologists.
(7) The administrator of a program in an institution of higher
education in Indiana engaged in training advanced practice
psychiatric nurses.
(8) One (1) psychiatrist who practices psychiatry in Indiana.
(9) The administrator of a program in an institution of higher
education in Indiana engaged in training addiction counselors.
(10) The director of the Indiana department of veterans' affairs or
the director's designee.
The governor shall appoint the members of the board described in
subdivisions (6) through (9).
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 396. IC 21-44-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2014,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The board shall meet at least quarterly each
year at the call of the chairperson.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 397. IC 21-44-6-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Each board member who is not a state
employee is not entitled to a salary per diem. The member is, however,
entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under
IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in connection with
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

237
the member's duties as provided in the state policies and procedures
established by the Indiana department of administration and approved
by the budget agency.
(b) Each member of the board who is a state employee is entitled to
reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4
and other expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's
duties as provided in the state policies and procedures established by
the Indiana department of administration and approved by the budget
agency.
(c) The affirmative votes of a majority of the members appointed to
the board are required for the board to take action on any measure.
(d) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 398. IC 21-44-6-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.209-2015,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. The purpose of the board is to commission
shall do the following:
(1) To Establish and oversee a loan forgiveness program designed
to increase the number of professional mental health care
providers, including addiction health care professionals, in areas
with health professional shortages, as determined by the board,
commission, by assisting professionals in the following
occupational categories to pay off loans incurred in the training
needed to practice in Indiana:
(A) Psychiatrists.
(B) Addiction psychiatrists, including psychiatrists pursuing
fellowship training and certification in addiction psychiatry.
(C) Psychologists.
(D) Psychiatric nurses.
(E) Addiction counselors.
(F) Mental health professionals.
(2) To Establish and oversee an integrated behavioral health and
addiction treatment development program to attract and train
psychiatrists, psychologists, psychiatric nurses, addiction
counselors, or mental health professionals who will engage in the
practice of integrated behavioral health and addiction treatment
in:
(A) state mental health institutions;
(B) community mental health centers;
(C) state funded addiction treatment centers; or
(D) other behavioral health and addiction treatment settings
determined by the board commission to be mental health and
addiction dual diagnoses treatment settings.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

238
(3) To Develop and oversee an integrated behavioral health and
addiction treatment training track program through the Indiana
University School of Medicine, Department of Psychiatry
residency training program. The training track program must
provide an opportunity for residents to work in mental health and
addiction dual diagnoses treatment settings, including:
(A) state psychiatric hospitals;
(B) community mental health centers;
(C) state funded addiction treatment centers; or
(D) other behavioral health and addiction treatment settings
determined by the board commission to be mental health and
addiction dual diagnoses treatment settings.
(4) To Develop standards for participation in the training track
program that include:
(A) guidelines for the amounts of grants and other assistance
a participant receives;
(B) guidelines for the type of training in integrated behavioral
health and addiction treatment the participant receives;
(C) guidelines for agreements with mental health hospitals,
community mental health centers, and other entities
participating in the training track program; and
(D) other guidelines and standards necessary for governing the
training track program.
SECTION 399. IC 21-44-6-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2014,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. The board commission shall establish
guidelines for the repayment of the loans incurred by a psychiatrist,
psychologist, psychiatric nurse, addiction counselor, or mental health
professional, including the following:
(1) A participant may not receive more than twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000) in a year.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (3), a participant may not
receive grants for more than four (4) years.
(3) A participant who is a psychiatrist pursuing fellowship
training and certification in addiction psychiatry may not receive
grants for more than five (5) years.
(4) A participant must commit to a full year of service in an
integrated behavioral health and addiction treatment setting as
described in section 5(2) or 5(3) of this chapter for each year of
loan repayment.
(5) A participant must be a practitioner who:
(A) is:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

239
(i) from Indiana; and
(ii) accepting a new position in Indiana; or
(B) is:
(i) from outside Indiana;
(ii) not currently practicing in Indiana and has not practiced
in Indiana for three (3) years before applying for the
program; and
(iii) establishing a new practice in Indiana.
SECTION 400. IC 21-44-6-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2014,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) As used in this section, "account" refers to
the mental health and addiction services loan forgiveness account
established in subsection (b).
(b) The mental health and addiction services loan forgiveness
account within the state general fund is established for the purpose of
providing grants for loan repayment under this chapter. The account
shall be administered by the board. commission. Money in the account
shall be used to fund loan forgiveness grants under this chapter.
(c) The account consists of:
(1) appropriations made by the general assembly;
(2) grants; and
(3) gifts and bequests.
(d) The expenses of administering the account shall be paid from
money in the account.
(e) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the account not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the account in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that accrues
from these investments shall be deposited in the account.
(f) Money in the account at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
SECTION 401. IC 21-44-6-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2014,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) As used in this section, "account" refers to
the integrated behavioral health and addiction treatment development
program account established in subsection (b).
(b) The integrated behavioral health and addiction treatment
development program account within the state general fund is
established for the purpose of providing funding for the integrated
behavioral health and addiction treatment development program
established under this chapter. The account shall be administered by
the division of mental health and addiction. Money in the account shall
be used to fund residency positions, fellowship training, and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

240
certification in addiction psychiatry, including:
(1) educational expenses;
(2) grants and scholarships;
(3) salaries; and
(4) benefits.
(c) The account consists of:
(1) appropriations made by the general assembly;
(2) grants; and
(3) gifts and bequests.
(d) The expenses of administering the account shall be paid from
money in the account.
(e) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the account not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the account in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that accrues
from these investments shall be deposited in the account.
(f) Money in the account at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
(g) The board division of mental health and addiction, in
consultation with the commission, shall give due consideration to
annually funding two (2) psychiatrists pursuing fellowship training and
certification in addiction psychiatry. A participant who is a psychiatrist
pursuing fellowship training and certification in addiction psychiatry
must agree to establish a new practice in Indiana for at least five (5)
years upon completion of the fellowship training and certification in
addiction psychiatry.
SECTION 402. IC 21-44-6-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 9. The division of mental health and
addiction shall provide administrative support for the board.
SECTION 403. IC 21-44-7-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.190-2015,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. The following definitions apply
throughout this chapter:
(1) "Board" refers to the graduate medical graduate and
education board established by section 2 of this chapter.
IC 21-44-5-1.
(2) "Fund" refers to the graduate medical education fund
established by section 8 of this chapter.
SECTION 404. IC 21-44-7-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.190-2015,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The graduate medical education board is
established for the following purposes:
(1) To provide funding for residents not funded by the federal
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

241
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(2) To provide technical assistance for entities that wish to
establish a residency program, including the following:
(A) Entities that are not licensed hospitals.
(B) Federally qualified health centers.
(3) To provide startup funding for entities that wish to establish
a residency program.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 405. IC 21-44-7-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.190-2015,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The board is comprised of ten (10) members
appointed by the governor as follows:
(1) One (1) member representing the Indiana University School
of Medicine.
(2) One (1) member representing a regional medical school
campus of the Indiana University School of Medicine.
(3) One (1) member representing the Marian University College
of Osteopathic Medicine.
(4) One (1) member representing the Indiana State Medical
Association.
(5) One (1) member representing the Indiana Osteopathic Medical
Association.
(6) One (1) member representing the Indiana Primary Health Care
Association.
(7) One (1) member representing a teaching hospital in the
Indiana Hospital Association.
(8) One (1) member representing a nonteaching hospital in the
Indiana Hospital Association.
(9) Two (2) members who are medical directors of residency
programs.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), a member appointed to the
board shall serve for a term of two (2) years. Except as provided in
subsection (c), the term of a member appointed under subsection (a)(1)
through (a)(4) begins on January 1 of an odd-numbered year. The term
of a member appointed under subsection (a)(5) through (a)(9) begins
on January 1 of an even-numbered year.
(c) This subsection applies to a member appointed under subsection
(a)(1) through (a)(4) before January 1, 2016. A member to whom this
subsection applies serves for a term of one (1) year beginning January
1, 2016.
(d) The governor shall make appointments to the board at the
following times:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

242
(1) The governor shall make the initial appointments to the board
before January 1, 2016.
(2) Before the end of each year after 2015, the governor shall
appoint members to the board to succeed those members whose
terms are scheduled to expire at the end of the year.
(3) When a member resigns or is otherwise unable to complete
the member's term, the governor shall appoint a member to serve
the remaining term of the member who has resigned or who is
otherwise unable to complete the member's term.
(e) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 406. IC 21-44-7-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 4. (a) The commission for higher education
shall provide staff for the board. The commission shall call the first
meeting of the board and notify members of the board.
(b) The board members shall designate a chairperson from among
themselves. The member designated as the chairperson continues to
serve as chairperson until the earlier of:
(1) the first anniversary of the chairperson's designation under this
section; or
(2) the date on which the chairperson's term expires.
(c) The board shall meet at the call of the chairperson or at the call
of a majority of the appointed members.
SECTION 407. IC 21-44-7-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 5. An affirmative vote of at least six (6)
members is necessary in order for the board to take any official action.
SECTION 408. IC 21-47-2-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.161-2025,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) There is established a geological and water
survey advisory council.
(b) The council consists of the following members:
(1) One (1) member appointed by the president of Indiana
University who is a faculty member of the Indiana University
School of Public and Environmental Affairs to serve for a period
of four (4) years. A member appointed under this subdivision
must have a background in energy, geology, water, or
environmental science.
(2) One (1) member appointed by the president of Indiana
University who is a faculty member of the earth sciences
department to serve for a period of four (4) years.
(3) The vice provost of research of Indiana University, or the vice
provost's designee.
(4) The chairperson of the house of representatives standing
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

243
committee tasked with studying utilities and energy, or the
chairperson's designee.
(5) The chairperson of the senate standing committee tasked with
studying utilities and energy, or the chairperson's designee.
(6) The director of the department of natural resources, or the
director's designee.
(7) The director of the Indiana department of environmental
management, or the director's designee.
(8) The director of the Indiana economic development
corporation, or the director's designee.
(9) The public finance director appointed under IC 5-1.2-3-6, or
the public finance director's designee.
(10) Two (2) individuals who:
(A) are appointed by the governor;
(B) represent private industry; and
(C) have a background in energy, geology, water, or
environmental science.
An individual appointed by the governor under this subdivision
serves for a term of four (4) years.
A designee under subdivision (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), or (9) must have
a background in energy, geology, water, or environmental science. The
members of the council shall annually elect a chair and vice chair from
among the membership of the council.
(c) A member who is appointed or designated to serve on the
council under subsection (b):
(1) in the case of an appointed member:
(A) holds the position for the term of the appointment;
(B) continues to serve after expiration of the appointment until
a successor is appointed and qualified; and
(C) subject to subdivision (2), is eligible for reappointment;
(2) may not serve on the council for a total of more than two (2)
consecutive terms; and
(3) serves at the pleasure of the appointing or designating
authority and may be removed by the appointing or designating
authority at any time.
The appointing or designating authority shall fill a vacancy that occurs
after a member appointed or designated by the authority resigns, is
removed, or is no longer qualified to serve.
(d) The state geologist shall serve as secretary of the council, shall
provide staff support to the council, and shall report on the following
at each meeting of the council:
(1) The staffing of the survey.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

244
(2) The finances of the survey.
(3) The outreach programs of the survey.
(4) The current research projects of the survey.
(5) Any other report requested by the council.
(e) The state geologist may cast the deciding vote to break a tie.
(f) Each member of the council who is not a state employee is
entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b).
A member is also entitled to reimbursement for mileage and traveling
expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's duties as
provided in the state policies and procedures established by the Indiana
department of administration and approved by the budget agency.
(g) Each member of the council who is a member of the general
assembly is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage, and travel
allowances paid to legislative members of interim study committees
established by the legislative council. Per diem, mileage, and travel
allowances paid under this section shall be paid from appropriations
made to the legislative council or the legislative services agency.
(h) Each member of the commission who is a state employee is
entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under
IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in connection with
the member's duties as provided in the state policies and procedures
established by the Indiana department of administration and approved
by the budget agency.
(i) Expenses paid under subsections (f) and (h) shall be paid from
appropriations made to the state geologist.
(j) The council shall meet quarterly in the first month of each
quarter. The date, time, and location of a meeting must be upon
agreement of the council.
(k) The council shall meet with the state geologist to make
recommendations concerning:
(1) the functions and performance of the survey; and
(2) appropriations and funding for the survey.
(l) The council may make recommendations concerning the
effectiveness and efficiency of the survey and other matters.
(m) Recommendations and reports of the council shall be directed
to the following:
(1) The governor.
(2) The budget agency.
(3) The president of Indiana University.
(4) The director of the department of natural resources.
(5) The commissioner of the department of environmental
management.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

245
(n) The terms of the members of the council described in subsection
(b)(1), (b)(2), and (b)(10) expire as follows:
(1) For the members described in subsection (b)(1) and (b)(2),
June 30, 2025, and each fourth year thereafter.
(2) For the members described in subsection (b)(10), June 30,
2027, and each fourth year thereafter.
(o) The terms of the members of the council who are members of
the general assembly designated under subsection (b)(4) and (b)(5)
expire June 30 of an odd-numbered year.
(p) On or before July 1, 2027, and July 1 biennially thereafter, the
council shall submit a report to the executive director of the legislative
services agency, in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6, for review by
the interim committee on government in accordance with IC 1-1-15.5-4
and IC 2-5-1.3-13(g). The report shall describe:
(1) official action taken; and
(2) actionable items considered;
by the council during the preceding two (2) years.
(p) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 409. IC 21-47-2-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2024,
SECTION 145, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 7. (a) As used in this section,
"center" refers to the center for water established by subsection (c). (b).
(b) As used in this section, "council" refers to the geological and
water survey advisory council established by section 4 of this chapter.
(c) (b) The center for water is established within the survey for the
purpose of:
(1) carrying out the survey's statutory duties concerning Indiana's
water resources;
(2) supporting long term studies of the state's water resources, as
requested by the Indiana finance authority; and
(3) upon request, providing resources to:
(A) state agencies;
(B) municipal agencies; and
(C) soil and water conservation groups.
(d) (c) The center shall be staffed
(1) by employees of the survey who have expertise in water
resources. and
(2) at staffing levels consistent with recommendations of the
council.
(e) The center shall report to the council before each quarterly
meeting of the council under section 4(j) of this chapter.
(f) (d) The state geologist shall oversee and manage the activities of
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

246
the center.
(g) (e) The center shall be funded by the available resources of the
survey.
SECTION 410. IC 21-47-2-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2024,
SECTION 146, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 8. (a) As used in this section,
"center" refers to the center for energy established by subsection (c).
(b).
(b) As used in this section, "council" refers to the geological and
water survey advisory council established by section 4 of this chapter.
(c) (b) The center for energy is established within the survey for the
purpose of:
(1) carrying out the survey's statutory duties concerning Indiana's
natural energy resources;
(2) supporting long term studies of the state's energy resources, as
requested by the state; and
(3) upon request, providing resources to:
(A) state agencies;
(B) municipal agencies; and
(C) energy stakeholders.
(d) (c) The center shall be staffed
(1) by employees of the survey who have expertise in energy
resources. and
(2) at staffing levels consistent with recommendations of the
council.
(e) The center shall report to the council before each quarterly
meeting of the council under section 4(j) of this chapter.
(f) (d) The state geologist shall oversee and manage the activities of
the center.
(g) (e) The center shall be funded by the available resources of the
survey.
SECTION 411. IC 22-1-1-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.113-2014,
SECTION 112, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 11. The commissioner of labor
is authorized and directed to do the following:
(1) To investigate and adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 prescribing
what safety devices, safeguards, or other means of protection shall
be adopted for the prevention of accidents in every employment
or place of employment, to determine what suitable devices,
safeguards, or other means of protection for the prevention of
industrial accidents or occupational diseases shall be adopted or
followed in any or all employments or places of employment, and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

247
to adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 applicable to either employers or
employees, or both for the prevention of accidents and the
prevention of industrial or occupational diseases.
(2) Annually forward the report received from the mining board
bureau of mines and mine safety under IC 22-10-1.5-5(a)(5) to
the legislative council in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6 and
request from the general assembly funding for necessary
additional mine inspectors.
(3) Administer the mine safety fund established under
IC 22-10-12-16.
SECTION 412. IC 22-4.1-21-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.174-2018,
SECTION 40, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 9. As used in this chapter, "postsecondary
proprietary educational institution" means a person doing business in
Indiana by offering to the public, for a tuition, fee, or charge,
instructional or educational services or training in a technical,
professional, mechanical, business, or industrial occupation, in the
recipient's home, at a designated location, or by mail. The term does
not include the following:
(1) A postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution accredited by the board for proprietary education
commission for higher education under IC 21-18.5-6.
(2) A state educational institution or another educational
institution established by law and financed in whole or in part by
public funds.
(3) A postsecondary proprietary educational institution approved
or regulated by any other state regulatory board, agency, or
commission.
(4) An elementary or secondary school attended by students in
kindergarten or grades 1 through 12 and supported in whole or in
part by private tuition payments.
(5) Any educational institution or educational training that:
(A) is maintained or given by an employer or a group of
employers, without charge, for employees or for individuals
the employer anticipates employing;
(B) is maintained or given by a labor organization, without
charge, for its members or apprentices;
(C) offers exclusively instruction that is clearly
self-improvement, motivational, or avocational in intent
(including instruction in dance, music, or self-defense, and
private tutoring); or
(D) is a Montessori or nursery school.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

248
(6) A privately endowed two (2) or four (4) year degree granting
institution that is regionally accredited and whose principal
campus is located in Indiana.
(7) All educational institutions offering programs requiring
approval by the Indiana state board of nursing under
IC 25-23-1-7.
SECTION 413. IC 22-8-1.1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.32-2008,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, unless otherwise
provided:
"Board" means the board of safety review created by this chapter.
"Commission" means the occupational safety standards commission
created by this chapter.
"Commissioner" means the commissioner of labor or the
commissioner's duly designated representative.
"Department" means the department of labor.
"Employee" means a person permitted to work by an employer in
employment.
"Employer" means any individual or type of organization, including
the state and all its political subdivisions, that has in its employ one (1)
or more individuals.
"INSafe" means the division of the department created by section 40
of this chapter.
"Safety order" refers to a notice issued to employers by the
commissioner of labor for alleged violations of this chapter, including
any health and safety standards.
"Standard" refers to both health and safety standards.
"Voluntary protection program" means a program offered by the
United States Occupational Safety and Health Administration to
employers subject to this chapter that exempts the employers from
general scheduled inspections.
SECTION 414. IC 22-8-1.1-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 7. An occupational safety standards
commission is created within the department to promulgate, modify, or
revoke safety and health standards in Indiana and to hear and determine
applications for temporary and permanent variances from those
standards.
SECTION 415. IC 22-8-1.1-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 8. Commission: Membership. The
commission shall be composed of nine (9) members, all of whom shall
be selected by the governor as follows: three (3) shall represent the
management of principal industries in the state, one (1) of which shall
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

249
represent agricultural industry: three (3) shall represent labor and three
(3) shall represent the public all of whom shall be recognized as
experienced in the field of occupational health and safety. The
commissioner shall serve as secretary of the commission. No member
of the commission having an economic interest in any application for
a temporary or permanent variance, shall be allowed to participate in
the decision.
SECTION 416. IC 22-8-1.1-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 9. Commission: Terms. Members of the
commission shall serve terms of three (3) years and until their
successors are appointed except that of the members first appointed,
three (3) members representing management, labor and the public shall
be appointed for three (3) years and three (3) members representing
management, labor and the public for two (2) years and three (3)
members representing management, labor and the public for one (1)
year. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for an unexpired term
by the governor in the same manner as the original appointments.
SECTION 417. IC 22-8-1.1-10 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 10. The commission shall meet annually at
the call of the commissioner and elect a chairman and such other
officers as they deem appropriate.
SECTION 418. IC 22-8-1.1-11 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 11. (Commission: Quorum) A majority of
the commission constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
SECTION 419. IC 22-8-1.1-12 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 12. (a) Each member of the commission who
is not a state employee is entitled to the minimum salary per diem
provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). Such a member is also entitled to
reimbursement for traveling expenses and other expenses actually
incurred in connection with the member's duties, as provided in the
state travel policies and procedures established by the department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
(b) Each member of the commission who is a state employee is
entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses and other expenses
actually incurred in connection with the member's duties, as provided
in the state travel policies and procedures established by the
department of administration and approved by the budget agency.
SECTION 420. IC 22-8-1.1-13 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 13. The commission shall meet at the call of
the commissioner or the chairman or upon the written request of any
four (4) members. However, the commission shall meet at least one (1)
time per year at the call of the commissioner to conduct the business
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

250
that comes before the commission.
SECTION 421. IC 22-8-1.1-15 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 15. (Standards:
Incorporation by reference) The commission board may adopt by
reference any standards, code, manuals or portions thereof, published
by any nationally recognized organizations or associations organized
or conducted in whole or in part for the purpose of developing
standards for the protection of the life, health or safety of employees.
SECTION 422. IC 22-8-1.1-15.1, AS AMENDED BY
P.L.123-2006, SECTION 33, IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 15.1. Any
interested person, including representatives of employers and
representatives of employees may propose a standard to the
commission, board, or the commission board may do so on its own
motion. Such proposals shall be in writing. In the development or
adoption of each standard proposed in this manner, the commission
board shall appoint and consult with an advisory committee. The
advisory committee shall include equal number of persons qualified to
present the viewpoint of employers involved and of persons similarly
qualified to present the viewpoint of the workers involved. All
members of the advisory committee shall be experienced in the field to
which the proposed standard will apply. The number of members of
any advisory committee shall be at the discretion of the commission.
board. Any standard developed shall not unduly burden interstate
commerce. Any such standard must be adopted by the commission
board in accordance with IC 4-22-2. The said standard shall be
published in a newspaper of general circulation published in Marion
County, Indiana, at least ten (10) days prior to the filing of said
standard with the publisher of the Indiana Register.
SECTION 423. IC 22-8-1.1-16.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 160, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 16.1. The commission board
may adopt emergency temporary standards under IC 4-22-2. The
emergency temporary standard shall be published in a newspaper of
general circulation published in Marion County, Indiana, at least ten
(10) days before the filing with the publisher of the Indiana Register.
In the exercise of this power, the commission board shall first
expressly determine:
(1) that employees are exposed to grave danger from exposure to
substances or agents determined to be toxic or physically harmful
or from new hazards; and
(2) that such emergency temporary standard is necessary to
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

251
protect employees from such danger.
SECTION 424. IC 22-8-1.1-16.2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 16.2. (a) A United
States Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA)
standard lawfully adopted by OSHA under federal law may be enforced
by the department without any further action by the commission.
board.
(b) The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall enforce
the federal standards described in subsection (a) not earlier than sixty
(60) days after the final standard by federal OSHA becomes effective.
(c) The commission board may adopt an alternate standard which
it finds is at least as effective in providing safe and healthful
employment as the federal standard under the procedures set forth in
IC 22-8-1.1-15, IC 22-8-1.1-15.1, and IC 22-8-1.1-16.1.
(d) Notwithstanding IC 4-22-7-7(a), the commission board shall
publish a statement describing a standard enforceable under this
section. The statement must make reference to the federal regulation.
The statement must be published under IC 4-22-7-7(b).
SECTION 425. IC 22-8-1.1-17.1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 17.1. (a) Any
standard promulgated under this chapter shall prescribe the use of
labels or other appropriate forms of warning as are necessary to insure
that employees are apprised of all hazards to which they are exposed,
relevant symptoms and appropriate emergency treatment, and proper
conditions and precautions of safe use or exposure. Where appropriate,
such a standard shall also prescribe suitable protective equipment and
control or technological procedures to be used in connection with the
hazards and shall provide for monitoring or measuring employee
exposure at such locations and intervals and in such manner as may be
necessary for the protection of employees. In addition where
appropriate, any standard shall prescribe the type or frequency of
medical examinations or other tests which shall be made available by
the employer, at employer's cost, to employees exposed to hazards in
order to most effectively determine whether the health of the
employees is adversely affected by the exposure. Upon request, the
results of examinations or tests shall be furnished to the department and
shall remain confidential within the department. At the request of the
employee, results shall be furnished to his physician.
(b) The commission, board, in promulgating standards dealing with
toxic materials or harmful physical agents, shall set the standard which
most adequately assures, to the extent feasible, on the basis of the best
available evidence, that no employee will suffer material impairment
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

252
of health or functional capacity even if the employee has regular
exposure to the hazard dealt with by the standard for the period of his
working life. Development of standards shall be based upon research,
demonstrations, experiments, and such other information as may be
appropriate. In addition to the attainment of the highest degree of
health and safety protection for the employee, other considerations
shall be the latest available scientific data in the field, the feasibility of
the standards, and experience gained under this and other health and
safety laws. Whenever practicable, the standard promulgated shall be
expressed in terms of objective criteria and of the performance desired.
(c) The commission, board, in promulgating standards, shall adopt
rules requiring employers to maintain accurate records of employee
exposures to potentially toxic material or harmful physical agents
which are required to be monitored or measured under the standards.
These rules shall provide employees or their representatives with an
opportunity to observe monitoring or measuring and to have access to
the records thereof. These rules shall also make appropriate provisions
for each employee to have access to such records as will indicate his
own exposure to toxic materials or harmful physical agents. Under
these rules, each employer shall notify any employee who is being
consistently exposed to toxic materials or harmful physical agents in
concentrations or at levels which exceed those prescribed by an
occupational safety and health standard and shall inform any employee
who is being thus exposed of the corrective action being taken.
SECTION 426. IC 22-8-1.1-19 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 19. Standards:
Declaratory Judgment. After promulgation of a safety standard by the
commission, board, any question as to its applicability or legal validity
may be adjudicated by an action for a declaratory judgment filed by an
affected person or firm under IC 34-14-1 (or IC 34-4-10 before its
repeal).
SECTION 427. IC 22-8-1.1-19.1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 19.1. Temporary
Variances. Any employer may apply to the commission board for a
temporary order granting a variance from a standard or any provision
thereof promulgated under this chapter. Such temporary order shall be
granted only if the employer establishes that he is unable to comply
with a standard by its effective date because of unavailability of
professional or technical personnel or of materials and equipment
needed to come into compliance with the standard or because necessary
construction or alteration of facilities cannot be completed by the
effective date; that he is taking all available steps to safeguard his
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

253
employees against the hazards covered by the standard; and that he has
an effective program for coming into compliance with a standard as
quickly as practicable. Any temporary order issued under this section
shall prescribe the practices, means, methods, operations and processes
which the employer must adopt and use while the order is in effect and
state in detail his program for coming into compliance with the
standard. Such a temporary order may be granted only after notice to
employees and an opportunity for a hearing. Said notice shall be given
to the authorized representative of the employees and be posted at or
near the location for which the variance is sought. No order for a
temporary variance may be in effect for longer than the period needed
by the employer to achieve compliance with the standard or one (1)
year, whichever is shorter, except that such an order may be renewed
not more than twice, so long as the requirements of this paragraph are
met and if an application for renewal is filed at least ninety (90) days
prior to the expiration date of the order.
SECTION 428. IC 22-8-1.1-20.1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 20.1. Any
affected employer may apply to the commission board for a permanent
variance from a standard promulgated under this chapter. Affected
employees shall be given notice of each such application by posting it
at or near the location for which the variance is sought, and an
opportunity to participate in a hearing. The commission board shall
issue such rule or order if it determines, after a hearing, including an
inspection, if appropriate, that the proponent of the variance has
demonstrated by a preponderance of the evidence that the conditions,
practices, means, methods, operations, or processes used or proposed
to be used by the employer will provide employment and places of
employment to his employees which are as safe and healthful as those
which would prevail if he complied with the standard. The rule or order
so issued shall prescribe the conditions the employer must maintain,
and the practices, means, methods, operations, and processes which he
must adopt and utilize to the extent they differ from the standard in
question. Such a rule or order may be modified or revoked upon
application by an employer, employees, the commissioner of labor, or
the commission board on its own motion, in the manner prescribed for
its issuance under this section at any time after six (6) months from its
issuance, provided that the moving party gives thirty (30) days notice
to the other parties, and a hearing is held at the request of any of the
parties.
SECTION 429. IC 22-8-1.1-21.1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 21.1. The commissioner and the department
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

254
shall provide such administrative services, including docketing,
stenographic, and recordkeeping services, as the commission may
require in discharging its function under this chapter.
SECTION 430. IC 22-8-1.1-22.1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 22.1.
Commissioner to Administer - Other Agencies. The commissioner and
such representatives as he may designate the commissioner's
designees shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter
and the safety standards adopted by the commission. board. The
commissioner may utilize other agencies of the state government and
its political subdivisions in carrying out his the commissioner's
functions under this chapter.
SECTION 431. IC 22-8-1.1-30.1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 30.1. (a) A board
of safety review is created within the department.
(b) The board shall conduct hearings on contests involving safety
orders, penalties, and notices of failure to correct a violation issued
under this chapter and may affirm, modify, or dismiss the action of the
commissioner in respect to the violation, the penalty, and the abatement
period. All enforcement action on a properly contested safety order
shall be suspended until a final decision has been rendered by the board
of safety review. If a petition for judicial review is filed under
IC 4-21.5-5, the person seeking review may seek a stay under
IC 4-21.5-5-9. If compliance with the safety order is a final decision,
the full abatement period shall commence from the date of the issuance
of the final decision of the board of safety review or of a court if a stay
has been granted.
(c) The board may promulgate, modify, or revoke safety and
health standards in Indiana and shall hear and determine
applications for temporary and permanent variances from those
standards.
SECTION 432. IC 22-8-1.1-48.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.32-2008,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 48.1. The commissioner of labor, the
occupational safety standards commission, the board of safety review,
and INSafe shall have the power to make rules governing functions
under this chapter, provided such rules shall not be inconsistent with
this chapter or other applicable statutes.
SECTION 433. IC 22-8-1.1-48.4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.32-2008,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 48.4. (a) All information reported to or
otherwise obtained by the commissioner, the designated representatives
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

255
of the commissioner, the department of labor, the occupational safety
standards commission, the board of safety review, INSafe, and the
agents and employees of any of them that contains or might reveal a
trade secret, shall be considered confidential and shall be disclosed
only to such other officers or employees concerned with the functions
set forth in this chapter as may be necessary for them to discharge their
duties under this chapter. In any proceeding, the commissioner, the
commission, the board, or a court shall issue such orders as may be
appropriate, including the impoundment of files, or portions of files, to
protect the confidentiality of trade secrets.
(b) No person may violate the confidentiality of trade secrets.
SECTION 434. IC 22-9.5-5-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A person may not
discriminate in the sale or rental or otherwise make unavailable or deny
a dwelling to any buyer or renter because of a disability of:
(1) the buyer or renter;
(2) a person residing in or intending to reside in the dwelling after
the dwelling is sold, rented, or made available; or
(3) any person associated with the buyer or renter.
(b) A person may not discriminate against any person in the terms,
conditions, or privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling or in the
provision of services or facilities in connection with the dwelling
because of a disability of:
(1) the person;
(2) a person residing in or intending to reside in the dwelling after
the dwelling is sold, rented, or made available; or
(3) any person associated with the person.
(c) For purposes of this section only, discrimination includes the
following:
(1) A refusal to permit, at the expense of the person with a
disability, reasonable modifications of existing premises occupied
or to be occupied by the person if the modifications may be
necessary to afford the person full enjoyment of the premises.
(2) A refusal to make reasonable accommodations in rules,
policies, practices, or services, when the accommodations may be
necessary to afford the person equal opportunity to use and enjoy
a dwelling.
(3) In connection with the design and construction of covered
multifamily dwellings for first occupancy after March 13, 1991,
a failure to design and construct those dwellings in a manner that:
(A) the public use and common use parts of the dwellings are
readily accessible to and usable by persons with disabilities;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

256
(B) all the doors are designed to allow passage into and within
all premises within the dwellings and are sufficiently wide to
allow passage by persons with disabilities in wheelchairs; and
(C) all premises within the dwellings contain the following
features of adaptive design:
(i) An accessible route into and through the dwelling.
(ii) Light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats, and other
environmental controls in accessible locations.
(iii) Reinforcements in bathroom walls to allow later
installation of grab bars.
(iv) Usable kitchens and bathrooms so that an individual in
a wheelchair can maneuver about the space.
(d) As used in subsection (c), "covered multifamily dwellings"
means:
(1) buildings consisting of four (4) or more units if the buildings
have one (1) or more elevators; and
(2) ground floor units in other buildings consisting of four (4) or
more units.
(e) Compliance with the rules of the fire prevention and building
safety commission department of homeland security that incorporate
by reference the appropriate requirements of the American National
Standard for buildings and facilities providing accessibility and
usability for people with physical disabilities (ANSI A117.1) satisfies
the requirements of subsection (c)(3)(C).
(f) This section does not require that a dwelling be made available
to an individual whose tenancy would constitute a direct threat to the
health or safety of other individuals or whose tenancy would result in
substantial physical damage to the property of others.
SECTION 435. IC 22-10-1.5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.35-2007,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. (a) This article applies to all mines.
(b) The bureau of mines and mine safety created under
IC 22-1-1-4(1) shall administer this chapter.
SECTION 436. IC 22-10-1.5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.35-2007,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The mining board is established. The board
is composed of five (5) members appointed by the governor. The
members must have the following qualifications:
(1) Two (2) members must be practical and experienced
nonsupervisory underground coal miners.
(2) Two (2) members must be practical and experienced
underground coal operators.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

257
(3) One (1) member must represent the general public and must
not be associated with the coal industry.
(b) The governor shall appoint each member to a four (4) year term.
The governor shall fill any vacancy occurring on the board for the
unexpired term of the member being replaced. The individual
appointed to fill a vacancy must have the same qualifications as the
member the individual is replacing.
(c) The governor may remove a member of the board for cause.
(d) The board shall organize by the election of a chairman for a one
(1) year term.
(e) The board may hold meetings on the call of the chairman or the
director.
(f) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 437. IC 22-10-1.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.35-2007,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a
member of the board is not entitled to the minimum salary per diem
provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member is, however, entitled to
reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4
and other expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's
duties, as provided in the state policies and procedures established by
the Indiana department of administration and approved by the budget
agency.
(b) Effective July 1, 2007, a member of the board who is not a state
employee is entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by
IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member also is entitled to reimbursement for
traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses
actually incurred in connection with the member's duties, as provided
in the state policies and procedures established by the Indiana
department of administration and approved by the budget agency.
(c) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 438. IC 22-10-1.5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.35-2007,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4. The board bureau of mines and mine
safety may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement this article.
Notwithstanding any other law, the rules may include the setting of fees
under:
(1) IC 22-10-3-10;
(2) IC 22-10-3-11; and
(3) IC 22-10-3-13.
SECTION 439. IC 22-10-1.5-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.35-2007,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

258
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. (a) The board bureau of mines and mine
safety shall:
(1) collect and distribute information concerning the nature,
causes, and prevention of mine accidents and the improvements
of methods, conditions, and equipment of mines with special
reference to health and safety and the conservation of mineral
resources and the economic conditions respecting mining and the
mining industry;
(2) promote the technical efficiency of all persons working in and
about the mines of this state and examine persons applying for
certificates under IC 22-10-3-10;
(3) submit any bills embodying legislation that the board may
agree upon to the general assembly;
(4) if appropriations from the general assembly are considered
insufficient by the board, bureau of mines and mine safety,
assess and collect from operators the amount necessary to
purchase and maintain underground mine rescue equipment for
the bureau of mines and mine safety created under IC 22-1-1-4
and deposit the assessment in the mine safety fund established
under IC 22-10-12-16; and
(5) annually report to the commissioner of the department of labor
concerning any need for additional mine inspectors.
(b) The board shall mail written notice to operators of a meeting of
the board at which assessments described in subsection (a)(4) are
discussed.
SECTION 440. IC 22-10-1.7-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 0.5. (a) On January 1, 2027,
all powers, duties, agreements, and liabilities of the mining board
are transferred to the bureau of mines and mine safety.
(b) On January 1, 2027, all records and property of the mining
board are transferred to the bureau of mines and mine safety,
including appropriations and other funds under the control or
supervision of the mining board, are transferred to the bureau of
mines and mine safety.
(c) After December 31, 2026, any amounts owed to the mining
board before December 31, 2026, are considered to be owed to the
bureau of mines and mine safety as the successor agency.
(d) After December 31, 2026, a reference to the mining board in
a statute, rule, or other document is considered a reference to the
bureau of mines and mine safety.
(e) The rules adopted by the mining board before December 1,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

259
2026, are considered, after January 1, 2027, rules of the bureau of
mines and mine safety.
SECTION 441. IC 22-10-3-1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 1. As used in this article:
"Active workings" means all places in a mine that are ventilated and
inspected regularly.
"Belt examiner" means an individual designated by the mine
foreman to perform the functions as required by 30 CFR Part 75 in
connection with examinations to ensure that the belt, belt drives, dump
points, air movement, roof, and ribs of a mine are in safe condition.
"Board" refers to the mining board established under
IC 22-10-1.5-2.
"Commercial mine" means any underground mine from which coal
is produced for sale, exchange, or commercial use.
"Director" means the director of the bureau of mines and mine
safety established under IC 22-1-1-4.
"Hoisting engineer" means an individual who is capable of
transporting people and material in and out of a mine by means of a
hoist.
"Interested persons" means the director, safety personnel designated
by the operator, state and federal coal mine inspectors, and, to the
extent required by law, any other person.
"Mine" means an underground commercial coal mine.
"Mine electrician" means a properly certified individual who can
perform electrical work in:
(1) a surface coal mine;
(2) surface areas of underground coal mines; and
(3) underground coal mines.
"Mine examiner" means a properly certified person designated by
the mine foreman to examine the mine for gas and other dangers. A
mine examiner may temporarily act as a section foreman if designated
to act as such by the mine foreman.
"Mine foreman" means the person charged with the responsibility
of the general supervision of the underground working of a mine and
the persons employed in the mine and for the health and safety of those
employees.
"Mine inspector" means the person appointed to assist in
administering this article.
"Mine Safety Administration" refers to the Mine Safety and Health
Administration, United States Department of Labor.
"Mining laws" means:
(1) this article;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

260
(2) IC 22-1-1-5(a);
(3) 30 CFR part 75; and
(4) 30 CFR part 77.
"Operator" means an individual, firm, association, partnership,
limited liability company, or corporation operating an underground
coal mine or any part of a mine.
"Shot-firer" means a properly certified person designated by the
mine foreman to perform the functions as required in this article in
connection with breaking down coal or rock.
SECTION 442. IC 22-10-3-1.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1.1. As used in this article,
the following terms have the following meanings:
(a) "Active workings" means all places in a mine that are
ventilated and inspected regularly.
(b) "Belt examiner" means an individual designated by the mine
foreman to perform the functions as required by 30 CFR Part 75
in connection with examinations to ensure that the belt, belt drives,
dump points, air movement, roof, and ribs of a mine are in safe
condition.
(c) "Bureau" refers to the bureau of mines and mine safety
created under IC 22-1-1-4(1).
(d) "Commercial mine" means any underground mine from
which coal is produced for sale, exchange, or commercial use.
(e) "Director" means the director of the bureau of mines and
mine safety established under IC 22-1-1-4.
(f) "Hoisting engineer" means an individual who is capable of
transporting people and material in and out of a mine by means of
a hoist.
(g) "Interested persons" means the director, safety personnel
designated by the operator, state and federal coal mine inspectors,
and, to the extent required by law, any other person.
(h) "Mine" means an underground commercial coal mine.
(i) "Mine electrician" means a properly certified individual who
can perform electrical work in:
(1) a surface coal mine;
(2) surface areas of underground coal mines; and
(3) underground coal mines.
(j) "Mine examiner" means a properly certified person
designated by the mine foreman to examine the mine for gas and
other dangers. A mine examiner may temporarily act as a section
foreman if designated to act as such by the mine foreman.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

261
(k) "Mine foreman" means the person charged with the
responsibility of the general supervision of the underground
working of a mine and the persons employed in the mine and for
the health and safety of those employees.
(l) "Mine inspector" means the person appointed to assist in
administering this article.
(m) "Mine Safety Administration" refers to the Mine Safety and
Health Administration, United States Department of Labor.
(n) "Mining laws" means:
(1) this article;
(2) IC 22-1-1-5(a);
(3) 30 CFR part 75; and
(4) 30 CFR part 77.
(o) "Operator" means an individual, firm, association,
partnership, limited liability company, or corporation operating an
underground coal mine or any part of a mine.
(p) "Shot-firer" means a properly certified person designated
by the mine foreman to perform the functions as required in this
article in connection with breaking down coal or rock.
SECTION 443. IC 22-10-3-9, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 9. (a) The director bureau shall keep a
record of the board's official actions concerning certificates issued
under this chapter and file the record together with questions and
answers pertaining to examinations established by the board, including
the grade given for the answer to each question. The record shall be
open for inspection by interested persons. If applications for
certification are received, the board shall meet at least quarterly at such
time and place as it shall consider advisable for the purpose of
examining applicants for certificates. These quarterly meetings shall be
held in January, April, July, and October. The date, time, and place of
examination shall be published at all coal mines in this state and posted
on the website maintained by the bureau of mines and mine safety at
least thirty (30) days before the examination. By a majority vote, the
board shall establish its rules of procedure and provide suitable
certificates. The board shall adopt rules establishing standards for the
competent practice of mine foreman, belt examiner, mine examiner,
shot-firer, mine electrician, and hoisting engineer.
(b) A person desiring certification for mine foreman, belt examiner,
mine examiner, shot-firer, mine electrician, or hoisting engineer must
make written application to the board on forms supplied by the board
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

262
not later than ten (10) days prior to the examination date. do the
following:
(1) Keep a record of official actions concerning certificates
issued under this chapter.
(2) File the record together with questions and answers
pertaining to examinations established by the bureau,
including the grade given for the answer to each question.
(3) Ensure that the record is open for inspection by interested
persons.
(4) Establish a criteria for the purpose of examining
applicants for certificates
(5) Publish the date, time, and place of examination at all coal
mines in this state and posted on the website maintained by
the bureau at least thirty (30) days before the examination.
(6) Adopt rules establishing standards for the competent
practice of mine foreman, belt examiner, mine examiner,
shot-firer, mine electrician, and hoisting engineer.
(b) A person desiring certification for mine foreman, belt
examiner, mine examiner, shot-firer, mine electrician, or hoisting
engineer must make written application to the bureau on forms
supplied by the bureau not later than ten (10) days prior to the
examination date.
SECTION 444. IC 22-10-3-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.10-2012,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 10. (a) It is the duty of the board bureau to
examine any person applying for a certificate for mine foreman,
shot-firer, mine examiner, hoisting engineer, mine electrician, or belt
examiner and to issue certificates of competency to the applicants who,
upon examination, prove themselves competent and qualified.
(b) A certificate is valid only when the examination for certification
has been held in the presence of a member of the board and signed by
the chairman of the board. an employee of the bureau. A certificate
of competency may not be issued to any person whose grade is less
than seventy-five percent (75%) for any certification other than that of
a certificate for mine electrician, which requires a passing grade of not
less than eighty percent (80%). The board bureau shall observe the
requirements set forth in this section in conducting the examinations.
(b) (c) An applicant for a mine foreman certificate must have at
least four (4) years of experience underground in coal mines. However,
a person who has graduated and holds a degree in engineering or an
approved four (4) year program in coal mining technology from an
accredited school, college, or university is required to have only two (2)
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

263
years of practical underground mining experience to qualify for the
examination. A person who has graduated and holds a two (2) year
associate in applied science degree in coal mining technology from an
accredited school, college, or university is required to have only three
(3) years of practical underground mining experience to qualify for the
examination. An applicant must prove to the board bureau by written
and oral examination and by demonstration, where applicable, that the
applicant has a thorough knowledge of:
(1) the theory and practice of coal mining;
(2) the nature and properties of poisonous, noxious, and explosive
gases and methods for their detection and control;
(3) the requirements of the coal mining laws of this state; and
(4) the responsibilities and duties of a mine foreman under such
laws;
and that the applicant is otherwise qualified by law.
(c) (d) An applicant for a mine examiner certificate must have at
least three (3) years of experience underground in coal mines.
However, a person who has graduated and holds a degree in
engineering or an associate in applied science degree in coal mining
technology from an accredited school, college, or university is required
to have only two (2) years of practical underground mining experience
to qualify for the examination. An applicant must prove to the board
bureau by written and oral examination and by demonstration, where
applicable, that the applicant has a thorough knowledge of:
(1) the nature and properties of poisonous, noxious, and explosive
gases and methods for their detection and control;
(2) the practical aspects of coal mining pertaining especially to
ventilation and roof control; and
(3) the responsibilities of a mine examiner under coal mining laws
of this state;
and that the applicant is otherwise qualified by law.
(d) (e) An applicant for a shot-firer certificate must have at least one
(1) year of underground experience and must have been properly
trained in a course approved by the director in the safe use and
handling of explosives. An applicant must prove to the board bureau
by written and oral examination and by demonstration, where
applicable, that the applicant has a working knowledge of:
(1) the proper handling and use of explosives and blasting devices
and the danger connected therewith;
(2) the nature and properties of poisonous, noxious, and explosive
gases and methods for their detection;
(3) the coal mining laws of the state pertaining to ventilation, roof
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

264
control, and blasting; and
(4) the responsibilities of a shot-firer under applicable mining
laws;
and that the applicant is otherwise qualified by law.
(e) (f) An applicant for a hoisting engineer certificate must prove to
the board bureau by written and oral examination and by
demonstration, where applicable, that the applicant:
(1) is capable of operating a hoist;
(2) has a thorough knowledge of the coal mining laws of this state
pertaining to hoisting operations;
(3) has at least one (1) year mining experience;
(4) has at least twenty (20) hours practical experience under the
supervision of a certified hoisting engineer; and
(5) is otherwise qualified by law.
(f) (g) An applicant for a belt examiner certificate must have at least
one (1) year of experience in belt maintenance or installation work. The
applicant must prove to the board bureau by written and oral
examination and by demonstration, where applicable, that the applicant
has a thorough knowledge of:
(1) the requirements of the coal mining laws of this state with
particular emphasis upon those laws pertaining to the use of
electrical or belt equipment and the transmission of electrical
energy into coal mines; and
(2) the responsibilities of a belt examiner under those laws;
and that the applicant is otherwise qualified by law.
(g) (h) An applicant for a mine electrician certificate must have
sufficient (but not less than one (1) year of) experience in performing
electrical work. The applicant must prove to the board bureau by
written and oral examination and by demonstration, where applicable,
that the applicant has a thorough knowledge of:
(1) the requirements of the coal mining laws of this state, with
particular emphasis upon laws pertaining to electrical energy in
coal mines;
(2) direct and alternating current theory and application;
(3) electric equipment and electrical circuits in coal mines;
(4) permissibility of electric equipment;
(5) 30 CFR 75 subparts F-K; and
(6) 30 CFR 77 subparts F-J and S.
(h) (i) An applicant for an examination under this section must pay
the bureau of mines and mine safety an examination fee of twenty-five
dollars ($25). All fees collected under this subsection shall be
deposited in the mine safety fund established by IC 22-10-12-16. The
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

265
board bureau may set a different fee by rule under IC 22-10-1.5-4.
(i) (j) A mine foreman, mine examiner, shot-firer, hoisting engineer,
mine electrician, or belt examiner certificate issued before September
1, 1979, is valid under the mining laws of Indiana.
(j) (k) A person who was issued a fire-boss certificate before July 1,
2007, shall be issued a replacement mine examiner certificate upon
request to the director.
(k) (l) A person designated as mine superintendent or assistant mine
superintendent, or acting in either capacity, must hold a mine foreman
certificate.
(l) (m) A certificate may be granted to an applicant who presents to
the board satisfactory evidence that the applicant has not been
convicted of:
(1) an act which would constitute a ground for disciplinary
sanction under section 11.1(b) of this chapter; or
(2) a felony that has a direct bearing on the applicant's ability to
act competently as a mine foreman, shot-firer, mine examiner,
hoisting engineer, mine electrician, or belt examiner.
(m) (n) For the purpose of safety, the board bureau may refuse to
examine an applicant who cannot:
(1) readily understand the written English language; or
(2) express himself or herself in the English language.
SECTION 445. IC 22-10-3-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.10-2012,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 11. (a) In event of loss or destruction of any
certificate issued under the mining laws of this state, the board, bureau
upon satisfactory proof of such loss or destruction, shall issue a
duplicate certificate upon receipt of five dollars ($5). The fee shall be
deposited into the mine safety fund established by IC 22-10-12-16. The
board bureau may set a different fee by rule under IC 22-10-1.5-4.
(b) The holder of a mine foreman, mine examiner, shot-firer,
hoisting engineer, mine electrician, or belt examiner certificate must
present the same or a photostatic copy to the official of the mine where
the holder is employed, who shall file it in the office at such mine, and
such file shall be available for inspection by interested persons.
SECTION 446. IC 22-10-3-11.1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 11.1. (a) As used
in this section, "practitioner" means an individual who holds a
certificate issued under this chapter.
(b) A practitioner shall conduct his duties as he is so the
practitioner's duties as certified in accordance with the standards
established by the board bureau under section 9(a) section 9 of this
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

266
chapter and is subject to the exercise of the disciplinary sanctions
under subsection (e), if after a hearing, the board finds:
(1) the practitioner has employed or knowingly cooperated in
fraud or material deception in order to obtain a certificate, or has
engaged in fraud or material deception in the course of
professional services or activities, or has advertised services in a
false or misleading manner;
(2) the practitioner has been convicted of a crime which has a
direct bearing on the practitioner's ability to continue to practice
competently;
(3) a practitioner has knowingly violated section 12 of this
chapter, or any rule adopted by the board under section 9(A)
under this chapter; bureau under section 9 of this chapter;
(4) a practitioner has continued to practice as certified although
he the practitioner has become unfit to practice due to:
(A) professional incompetence;
(B) failure to keep abreast of current professional theory or
practice;
(C) physical or mental disability; or
(D) addiction or severe dependency upon alcohol or other
drugs which endangers the public by impairing a practitioner's
ability to practice safely;
(5) a practitioner has engaged in a course of lewd or immoral
conduct in connection with the delivery of services to clients; or
(6) a practitioner has allowed his name or certificate issued to him
the practitioner's name or the practitioner's certificate issued
under this chapter to be used in connection with any individual
who renders mining services beyond the scope of his the
individual's training, experience or competence.
(c) The board bureau may order a practitioner to submit to a
reasonable physical or mental examination if his physical or mental
capacity to practice safely is at issue in a disciplinary proceeding.
(d) Failure to comply with a board bureau order to submit to a
physical or mental examination shall render a practitioner liable to the
summary revocation procedures under subsection (f).
(e) The board bureau may impose any of the following sanctions,
singly or in combination, when it finds that a practitioner is guilty of
any offense under subsection (b):
(1) permanently revoke a practitioner's certificate;
(2) suspend a practitioner's certificate;
(3) censure a practitioner;
(4) issue a letter of reprimand; or
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

267
(5) place a practitioner on probation status and require the
practitioner to:
(A) report regularly to the board bureau upon the matters
which are the basis of probation;
(B) limit practice to those areas prescribed by the board;
bureau; or
(C) continue or renew professional education under a
practitioner approved by the board bureau until satisfactory
degree of skill has been attained in those areas which are the
basis of the probation.
The board bureau may withdraw the probation if it finds that the
deficiency which required disciplinary action has been remedied.
(f) The board bureau may summarily suspend a practitioner's
certificate for a period of ninety (90) days in advance of a final
adjudication or during the appeals process if the board bureau finds
that a practitioner represents a clear and immediate danger to the public
health and safety if he is allowed to continue to practice. The summary
suspension may be renewed upon a hearing before the board, bureau,
and each renewal may be for a period of ninety (90) days or less.
(g) A certificate issued under this chapter is automatically
suspended upon the conviction of the practitioner of a felony under 30
U.S.C. 820. A practitioner whose certificate is suspended under this
subsection may apply for reinstatement under subsection (h) if at least
five (5) years have elapsed from the practitioner's date of discharge
from probation, imprisonment, or parole from the felony.
(h) The board bureau may reinstate a certificate which has been
suspended under this chapter if, after a hearing, the board bureau is
satisfied that the applicant is able to practice with reasonable skill and
safety. As a condition for reinstatement, the board bureau may impose
disciplinary or corrective measures authorized under this chapter.
(i) The board bureau shall seek to achieve consistency in the
application of the sanctions authorized in this section, and significant
departures from prior decisions involving similar conduct shall be
explained in the board's findings or orders.
SECTION 447. IC 22-10-3-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.10-2012,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 12. (a) It is unlawful for any person to serve
in the capacity of mine foreman, mine examiner, shot-firer, hoisting
engineer, mine electrician, or belt examiner at any time unless the
person is properly certified. However, any person who meets the
appropriate experience requirements of this chapter and who is
properly certified in one (1) of these capacities or its equivalent in
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

268
another state which recognizes the certification of Indiana may serve
in such a capacity until the next examination by the board, bureau,
when the person must apply to the board bureau for certification in the
person's particular classification. A mine electrician who is properly
certified:
(1) by the federal Mine Safety and Health Administration; or
(2) in another state that recognizes the mine electrician
certification in Indiana;
may serve in the individual's certified capacity and be issued a mine
electrician certificate by the director in Indiana without the requirement
of applying to the board bureau for examination. However, the
individual must obtain an Indiana miner's certificate of competency
from the director.
(b) It is unlawful for an operator in this state to employ any person
in the capacity of mine superintendent, assistant mine superintendent,
mine foreman, mine examiner, shot-firer, hoisting engineer, mine
electrician, or belt examiner at any time unless the person is properly
certified.
(c) Before any person certified in another state may perform in the
capacity of mine superintendent, assistant mine superintendent, mine
foreman, mine examiner, shot-firer, hoisting engineer, mine electrician,
or belt examiner in Indiana, the person must present personally to the
director evidence of the out-of-state certificate or certificates.
(d) Every inexperienced miner is required to wear an orange hard
hat until the miner receives a certificate of competency.
SECTION 448. IC 22-10-3-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.35-2007,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 13. (a) A person may not be employed
underground in any coal mine in this state unless the person possesses
a certificate of competency issued by the director, except that a person
who does not possess a certificate may be employed to work under the
supervision of a person who does possess a certificate for the purpose
of becoming qualified to obtain a certificate. A person who intends to
work underground in a coal mine to obtain a certificate must first
obtain a permit from the director by stating the person's date of birth
and residence address. The director shall grant a permit to an applicant
who is of legal age and who has intelligence and character such that the
person will not be a danger to life and property.
(b) A certificate of competency shall be granted to an applicant who
has at least six (6) months experience underground in coal mines,
subject to subsection (f).
(c) The director's record shall include the names of applicants for
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

269
certificates and the names of persons to whom certificates are issued,
correlated with the certificate numbers.
(d) An applicant for a certificate must pay the director at the time of
application a fee of five dollars ($5). All money received under this
subsection shall be deposited in the mine safety fund established by
IC 22-10-12-16. The board bureau may set a different fee by rule
under IC 22-10-1.5-4.
(e) The board director of the bureau shall report to the director the
record the names of all persons issued certificates, the amount of
money received, the names of all persons refused certificates, and the
reasons for the refusals, and such reports shall be open for inspection
by interested persons.
(f) If a person has been convicted of a felony under 30 U.S.C. 820
and fewer than five (5) years have elapsed from the person's date of
discharge from probation, imprisonment, or parole, the person may not:
(1) obtain a certificate of competency;
(2) be employed to work with a person who does possess a
certificate; or
(3) obtain a permit to work toward a certificate of competency;
under subsection (a).
SECTION 449. IC 22-10-12-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.35-2007,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 11. (a) The bureau of mines and mine safety
shall maintain either one (1) or two (2) mine rescue teams. Each team
must consist of at least five (5) members and two (2) alternate
members. At the discretion of the commissioner of labor, the
requirement to maintain either one (1) or two (2) mine rescue teams
may be met by using an operator to provide the team members,
equipment, and supplies necessary for not more than one (1) team. The
board bureau shall:
(1) require active underground mines to provide personnel for the
mine rescue teams; and
(2) consult with operators to determine the number of personnel
that each operator of an active underground mine is required to
furnish for the mine rescue teams.
The director, in consultation with the board, director shall determine
the training and retraining requirements for the mine rescue teams,
consistent with Mine Safety Administration requirements.
(b) When practical, members of a mine rescue team shall be made
up of supervisory and nonsupervisory employees.
(c) A member of a mine rescue team shall be fully compensated by
the owner or operator for wages lost and expenses incurred while being
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

270
trained under this section if the employee elects to be compensated.
(d) Compensation for damages arising from the injury or death of a
member of a mine rescue team while performing rescue operations
shall be limited to the rights and remedies provided by the injured
person's employer. However, the employer of the injured or fatally
injured mine rescue team member is entitled to reimbursement from
the operator whose mine is the subject of the rescue attempt for the
actual cost to the employer that is attributable to the injury or death.
(e) The operator of the mine that is the subject of the rescue attempt
shall reimburse the bureau for the actual cost of a mine rescue
operation, including compensation for all mine rescue team members.
SECTION 450. IC 22-10-12-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.10-2012,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 16. (a) The mine safety fund is established
to provide funding for the purchase and maintenance of underground
mine rescue equipment.
(b) The department of labor shall administer the fund.
(c) The fund consists of:
(1) assessments collected by the mining board bureau under
IC 22-10-1.5-5(a)(4) and deposited into the fund;
(2) fees:
(A) from examinations under IC 22-10-3-10(h);
IC 22-10-3-10(i);
(B) for duplicate certificates under IC 22-10-3-11(a); and
(C) from applicants for a certificate under IC 22-10-3-13(d);
and
(3) interest from investments as accrued and deposited under
subsection (d).
(d) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that
accumulates from these investments shall be deposited into the fund.
(e) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not revert
to the state general fund.
SECTION 451. IC 22-11-14-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 63, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The fire prevention and building safety
commission department of homeland security shall:
(1) adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 for the granting of permits for
supervised public displays of fireworks by municipalities, fair
associations, amusement parks, and other organizations or groups
of individuals; and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

271
(2) establish by rule the fee for the permit, which shall be paid
into the fire and building services fund created under
IC 22-12-6-1.
(b) The application for a permit required under subsection (a) must:
(1) name a competent operator who is to officiate at the display;
(2) set forth a brief resume of the operator's experience;
(3) be made in writing or an electronic format; and
(4) be received with the applicable fee by the department of
homeland security at least five (5) business days before the
display.
No operator who has a prior conviction for violating this chapter may
operate any display for one (1) year after the conviction.
(c) Every display shall be handled by a qualified operator approved
by the chief of the fire department of the municipality in which the
display is to be held. A display shall be located, discharged, or fired as,
in the opinion of:
(1) the chief of the fire department of the city or town in which
the display is to be held; or
(2) the township fire chief or the fire chief of the municipality
nearest the site proposed, in the case of a display to be held
outside of the corporate limits of any city or town;
after proper inspection, is not hazardous to property or person.
(d) A permit granted under this section is not transferable.
(e) A denial of a permit by a municipality shall be issued in writing
before the date of the display.
(f) A person may not possess, transport, or deliver special fireworks,
except as authorized under this section.
SECTION 452. IC 22-11-14-3.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.187-2006,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. The fire prevention and building safety
commission department of homeland security may adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 that specify the conditions under which the chief of a
municipal or township fire department may grant a permit to a person
to sponsor a special discharge location in the municipality or township.
SECTION 453. IC 22-11-14-4.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 64, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) A retailer may sell consumer fireworks
and items referenced in section 8(a) of this chapter from a tent under
the following conditions:
(1) The tent may not be larger than one thousand five hundred
(1,500) square feet.
(2) There may be only one (1) tent for each registration granted
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

272
under section 11(a) of this chapter.
(3) The tent may not be located closer than one hundred (100) feet
from a permanent structure.
(4) A vehicle may not be parked closer than twenty (20) feet from
the edge of the tent.
(5) The tent must be fire retardant.
(6) The sales site must comply with all applicable local zoning
and land use rules.
(7) Sales of fireworks may be made from the tent for not more
than forty-five (45) days in a year.
(8) The weight of consumer fireworks in a tent may not exceed
three thousand (3,000) gross pounds of consumer fireworks.
(9) A retailer that legally operated a tent with a registration in
2005 may continue operation in a tent in 2006 and the following
years. A registration under section 11(a) of this chapter is
required for operation in 2006 and following years. For purposes
of this subdivision, a retailer includes a resident wholesaler who
supplied consumer fireworks to an applicant for a tent registration
in 2005.
(10) The retailer holds a valid registration under section 11(a) of
this chapter.
(b) A retailer may sell consumer fireworks and items referenced in
section 8(a) of this chapter from a Class 1 structure (as defined in
IC 22-12-1-4) if the Class 1 structure meets the requirements of any of
the following subdivisions:
(1) The structure complied with the rules for a B-2 or M building
occupancy classification before July 4, 2003, under the Indiana
building code adopted by the fire prevention and building safety
commission established under IC 22-12-2-1 (before its repeal):
(A) in which consumer fireworks were sold or stored on or
before July 4, 2003; and
(B) in which no subsequent intervening nonfireworks sales or
storage use has occurred.
(2) The structure complied with the rules for a B-2 or M building
occupancy classification before July 4, 2003, under the Indiana
building code adopted by the fire prevention and building safety
commission established under IC 22-12-2-1 (before its repeal):
(A) in which consumer fireworks were sold or stored on or
before July 4, 2003;
(B) in a location at which the retailer was registered as a
resident wholesaler in 2005; and
(C) in which the retailer's primary business is not the sale of
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

273
consumer fireworks.
(3) The structure complies with the rules for an H-3 building
occupancy classification under the Indiana building code adopted
by the fire prevention and building safety commission established
under IC 22-12-2-1, or the equivalent occupancy classification
adopted by subsequent rules of the fire prevention and building
safety commission. department of homeland security.
(4) The structure complies with the rules adopted after July 3,
2003, by the fire prevention and building safety commission
established under IC 22-12-2-1 department of homeland
security for an M building occupancy classification under the
Indiana building code.
A registration under section 11(a) of this chapter is required for
operation in 2006 and following years.
(c) This subsection does not apply to a structure identified in
subsection (b)(1), (b)(2), (b)(3), or (b)(4). A retailer may sell consumer
fireworks and items referenced in section 8(a) of this chapter from a
structure under the following conditions:
(1) The structure must be a Class 1 structure in which consumer
fireworks are sold and stored.
(2) The sales site must comply with all applicable local zoning
and land use rules.
(3) The weight of consumer fireworks in the structure may not
exceed three thousand (3,000) gross pounds of consumer
fireworks.
(4) The retailer holds a valid registration under section 11(a) of
this chapter.
(5) A retailer that sold consumer fireworks and operated from a
structure with a registration in 2005 may continue in operation in
the structure in 2006 and the following years. A registration under
section 11(a) of this chapter is required for operation in 2006 and
following years.
(d) The state fire marshal or a member of the department of
homeland security staff shall, under section 9 of this chapter, inspect
tents and structures in which fireworks are sold. The state fire marshal
may delegate this responsibility to a responding fire department with
jurisdiction over the tent or structure, subject to the policies and
procedures of the state fire marshal.
(e) A retailer shall file an application for each retail location on a
form to be provided by the state fire marshal.
(f) This chapter does not limit the quantity of items referenced in
section 8(a) of this chapter that may be sold from any Class 1 structure
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

274
that complied with the rules of the fire prevention and building safety
commission (before its repeal) in effect before May 21, 2003.
SECTION 454. IC 22-11-14-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2006,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) A person shall not sell at retail, offer for sale
at retail, or deliver the following items to a person less than eighteen
(18) years of age:
(1) Dipped sticks or wire sparklers. However, total pyrotechnic
composition may not exceed one hundred (100) grams per item.
Devices containing chlorate or perchlorate salts may not exceed
five (5) grams in total composition per item.
(2) Cylindrical fountains.
(3) Cone fountains.
(4) Illuminating torches.
(5) Wheels.
(6) Ground spinners.
(7) Flitter sparklers.
(8) Snakes or glow worms.
(9) Smoke devices.
(10) Trick noisemakers, which include:
(A) Party poppers.
(B) Booby traps.
(C) Snappers.
(D) Trick matches.
(E) Cigarette loads.
(F) Auto burglar alarms.
(b) A retailer or wholesaler of consumer fireworks may sell
consumer fireworks to a person at least eighteen (18) years of age.
(c) An individual who sells consumer fireworks must be at least
eighteen (18) years of age.
(d) An individual who sells an item set forth in subsection (a) must
be at least sixteen (16) years of age.
(e) The fire prevention and building safety commission department
of homeland security may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 establishing
procedures to ensure compliance with the age limitations set forth in
this section.
SECTION 455. IC 22-11-14-15, AS ADDED BY P.L.187-2006,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. The fire prevention and building safety
commission department of homeland security and the department of
state revenue shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to carry out this
chapter.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

275
SECTION 456. IC 22-11-14.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.101-2006,
SECTION 30, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. The fire prevention and building safety
commission department of homeland security shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 to implement a statewide code concerning displays of indoor
pyrotechnics. The rules:
(1) must require that a certificate of insurance be issued that
provides general liability coverage of at least five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000) for the injury or death of any number
of persons in any one (1) occurrence and five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000) for property damage in any one (1) occurrence
by an intended display of indoor pyrotechnics arising from any
acts of the operator of the display or the operator's agents,
employees, or subcontractors;
(2) must require the person intending to present the display to
give, at least twenty four (24) hours before the time of the display,
written notice of the intended display to the chief of the
responding fire department of the location proposed for the
display of the indoor pyrotechnics and to include with the written
notice a certification from the person intending to display the
indoor pyrotechnics that the display will be made in accordance
with:
(A) the rules adopted under this section; and
(B) any ordinance or resolution adopted under section 4 of this
chapter;
(3) must include and adopt NFPA 1126, Standard for the Use of
Pyrotechnics before a Proximate Audience, 2001 Edition,
published by the National Fire Protection Association, 1
Batterymarch Park, Quincy, Massachusetts 02169;
(4) must be amended to adopt any subsequent edition of NFPA
Standard 1126, including addenda, within eighteen (18) months
after the effective date of the subsequent edition; and
(5) may provide for amendments to NFPA Standard 1126 as a
condition of the adoption under subdivisions (3) and (4).
SECTION 457. IC 22-11-16-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The fire
prevention and building safety commission department of homeland
security shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 governing fire safety in
certain buildings as specified in subsection (b).
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) and subsection (d), this
chapter and the rules adopted under it apply to:
(1) all hotels, motels, apartments (in buildings containing three
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

276
(3) or more apartments), and buildings containing three (3) or
more sleeping rooms that rent for a fee; and
(2) all buildings occupied after September 14, 1982, as hotels,
motels, apartments (in buildings containing three (3) or more
apartments), and buildings containing three (3) or more sleeping
rooms that rent for a fee.
(c) This chapter does not apply to hotels and motels that have no
interior corridors and whose individual rooms have only exterior exits.
(d) This chapter does not apply to an apartment in an apartment
building from which apartment there is immediate ground level access
to the outside.
(e) Compliance with this chapter and the rules adopted under it does
not relieve the owner of a building covered by this chapter from the
requirements of any other applicable law, rule, regulation, or ordinance.
SECTION 458. IC 22-11-17-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 65, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Commission" refers to the Indiana fire prevention and
building safety commission. "Department" refers to the
department of homeland security.
(2) "Exit" means a continuous and unobstructed means of egress
to a public way designated as an exit pursuant to the rules of the
commission. department. The term includes doorways, corridors,
exterior exit balconies, ramps, stairways, smokeproof enclosures,
horizontal exits, exit passageways, exit courts, and yards.
(3) "Owner" means a person having control or custody of any
building covered by this chapter.
(4) "Public building" means any structure used in whole or in part
as a place of resort, assemblage, lodging, trade, traffic,
occupancy, or use by the public, or by three (3) or more tenants.
It also means all educational buildings, day care centers,
hospitals, institutions, health facilities, residential-custodial care
facilities, mercantile occupancies, and office occupancies.
(5) "Special egress control device" means an electronically
controlled exit locking system that:
(A) allows a delay in exiting through an exit in a
nonemergency situation; and
(B) complies with rules adopted by the commission.
department.
SECTION 459. IC 22-11-17-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 66, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

277
(d) and section 2.5 of this chapter, an owner of a public building shall
not permit an exit to be locked or obstructed in any manner that denies
the public a continuous and unobstructed means of egress while
lawfully occupied by anyone who is not an officer or an employee.
(b) The commission department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
that:
(1) allow the owner of a public building to equip an exit with a
special egress control device;
(2) limit the circumstances under which a special egress control
device may be used; and
(3) allow an exit that was in compliance with the rules of the
commission department when the exit was constructed to be
equipped with a special egress control device.
(c) An owner of a public building shall not permit a fire alarm to be
disconnected or otherwise rendered inoperative, except in cases of
routine maintenance or for repair.
(d) A school that has one (1) or more employees shall develop a
plan to address unplanned fire alarm activation as part of its emergency
operations plan.
(e) A school's emergency operations plan for unplanned fire alarm
activation shall include procedures for the following:
(1) Evacuation of the building when the fire alarm is heard. A
school with a fire alarm panel that allows for a positive fire alarm
sequence may:
(A) develop a plan to investigate an unplanned fire alarm
activation before activating the audible and visual alarms
requiring evacuation;
(B) designate school officials to acknowledge that an alarm
has been activated and initiate an investigation within fifteen
(15) seconds;
(C) secure-in-place for up to three (3) minutes in order for a
designated school official to determine, by investigation, if an
active shooter is on the property; and
(D) following the three (3) minute period under clause (C), the
school must evacuate, unless an active shooter has been
verified to be on the school's property.
(2) Compliance with all provisions of 675 IAC 28-1-28.
SECTION 460. IC 22-12-1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2013,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) "Class 1 structure" means any part of the
following:
(1) A building or structure that is intended to be or is occupied or
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

278
otherwise used in any part by any of the following:
(A) The public.
(B) Three (3) or more tenants.
(C) One (1) or more persons who act as the employees of
another.
(2) A site improvement affecting access by persons with physical
disabilities to a building or structure described in subdivision (1).
(3) Outdoor event equipment.
(4) Any class of buildings or structures that the commission
department determines by rules to affect a building or structure
described in subdivision (1), except buildings or structures
described in subsections (c) through (f).
(b) Subsection (a)(1) includes a structure that contains three (3) or
more condominium units (as defined in IC 32-25-2-9) or other units
that:
(1) are intended to be or are used or leased by the owner of the
unit; and
(2) are not completely separated from each other by an
unimproved space.
(c) Subsection (a)(1) does not include a building or structure that:
(1) is intended to be or is used only for an agricultural purpose on
the land where it is located; and
(2) is not used for retail trade or is a stand used for retail sales of
farm produce for eight (8) or less consecutive months in a
calendar year.
(d) Subsection (a)(1) does not include a Class 2 structure.
(e) Subsection (a)(1) does not include a vehicular bridge.
(f) Subsection (a)(1) does not include a structure that is intended to
be or is occupied solely to provide periodic maintenance or repair of:
(1) the structure; or
(2) mechanical or electrical equipment located within and affixed
to the structure.
SECTION 461. IC 22-12-1-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 6. "Commission" refers to the fire prevention and
building safety commission.
SECTION 462. IC 22-12-1-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) "Control" means
authority to create, change, or eliminate a condition or to initiate,
regulate, or terminate conduct that is based on any of the following:
(1) An agency, employment, or contractual relationship.
(2) A possessory or nonpossessory ownership or leasehold interest
in property.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

279
(3) A contractual right to possess or use property.
(b) The term does not apply to IC 22-12-2.1-1.
SECTION 463. IC 22-12-1-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) "Education
board" refers to the board of firefighting personnel standards and
education.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 464. IC 22-12-1-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 10.5. "Education
commission" refers to the Indiana fire and EMS standards and
education commission established by IC 16-31-2-1.5.
SECTION 465. IC 22-12-2 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Fire Prevention and Building Safety Commission).
SECTION 466. IC 22-12-2.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 2.1. Transition of Responsibilities for Fire Prevention
and Building Safety
Sec. 1. (a) On July 1, 2026, all powers, duties, agreements, and
liabilities of the fire prevention and building safety commission are
transferred to the department.
(b) On July 1, 2026, all records and property of the fire
prevention and building safety commission, including
appropriations and other funds under the control or supervision of
the fire prevention and building safety commission, are transferred
to the department.
(c) After June 30, 2026, any amounts owed to the fire prevention
and building safety commission before July 1, 2026, are considered
to be owed to the department as the successor agency.
(d) After June 30, 2026, a reference to the fire prevention and
building safety commission in a statute, rule, or other document is
considered a reference to the department.
(e) Proceedings pending before the fire prevention and building
safety commission on July 1, 2026, shall be transferred from the
fire prevention and building safety commission to the department
and treated as if initiated by the department.
(f) A license or permit issued by the fire prevention and building
safety commission before July 1, 2026, shall be treated after June
30, 2026, as a certification issued by the department.
(g) The rules adopted by the fire prevention and building safety
commission before July 1, 2026, are considered, after June 30,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

280
2026, rules of the department. For purposes of applying IC 4-22-2.6
to the readoption of rules transferred by this subsection, the rules
shall be treated as not expiring until January 1, 2031. In the
interim, except as permitted under IC 4-22-2-38 to make
nonsubstantive technical corrections, the department may not
revise or repeal the transferred rules, including matters
incorporated by reference, until the rules are codified by the
general assembly or otherwise authorized by act of the general
assembly.
(h) Not later than July 1, 2027, and each year thereafter, the
department shall submit a report to the legislative council in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6 making recommendations for
codification and amendment of the rules of the fire prevention and
building safety commission. The legislative council shall assign the
report to be reviewed by an study committee established under
IC 2-5-1.3. In preparing the report required by this subsection, the
department shall consult with industry experts, professionals, and
interested stakeholders who have indicated an interest in the
subject matter of the recommendations contained in the report.
SECTION 467. IC 22-12-2.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. (Building Codes and Standards; Review and Implementation
of Rules; Taking Effect of Rules).
SECTION 468. IC 22-12-3-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The board of
firefighting personnel standards and education is established.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 469. IC 22-12-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 67, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The education board consists of thirteen
(13) voting members as follows:
(1) The state fire marshal or the state fire marshal's designee.
(2) The executive director of the department of homeland security
appointed under IC 10-19-3-1 or the executive director's designee.
(3) Eleven (11) members appointed by the governor, each serving
a four (4) year term.
(b) Each appointed member of the education board must be
qualified by experience or education in the field of fire protection and
related fields.
(c) Each appointed member of the education board must be a
resident of Indiana.
(d) The education board must include the following appointed
members:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

281
(1) Seven (7) individuals who are members of fire departments.
Appointments under this subdivision must include the following:
(A) At least one (1) individual who is a full-time firefighter (as
defined in IC 36-8-10.5-3).
(B) At least one (1) individual who is a volunteer firefighter
(as defined in IC 36-8-12-2).
(C) At least one (1) individual who is a fire department officer.
(2) Two (2) citizens who are not members of a fire department.
(3) One (1) emergency management director.
(4) One (1) paramedic licensed under IC 16-31-3.
(e) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 470. IC 22-12-3-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The governor
may remove a member of the education board for inefficiency or
neglect of duty.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 471. IC 22-12-3-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) If a vacancy
occurs on the education board, the governor shall appoint an individual
to serve the unexpired term of the vacating member.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 472. IC 22-12-3-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The education
board shall annually elect a chairperson, a vice chairperson, and a
secretary from among its members.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 473. IC 22-12-3-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.40-2015,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The education board shall meet as it
determines necessary.
(b) Meetings of the education board shall be called upon the request
of its chairperson or the written request of seven (7) of its members.
(c) Meetings of the education board must be held in Indiana.
(d) A quorum of the education board consists of seven (7) voting
members. IC 4-21.5-3-3 applies to an education board action governed
by IC 4-21.5. The education board may take other actions by an
affirmative vote of:
(1) seven (7) members, if less than twelve (12) members are
present and voting on the action; or
(2) eight (8) members, if at least twelve (12) members are present
and voting on the action.
(e) This section expires December 31, 2026.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

282
SECTION 474. IC 22-12-3-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 68, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The department of homeland security shall
provide facilities and staff to carry out the responsibilities of the
education board.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 475. IC 22-12-3-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Each member of
the education board who is not a state employee is entitled to the
minimum salary per diem provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b) for attendance
at meetings of the education board where at least a quorum of its
members are present, unless the member is a state employee. Such a
member of the education board is also entitled to reimbursement for
travel expenses and other expenses actually incurred in connection with
attending a meeting of the education board where at least a quorum of
its members are present, as provided in the state travel policies and
procedures established by the department of administration and
approved by the state budget agency.
(b) Each member of the education board who is a state employee is
entitled to reimbursement for travel expenses and other expenses
actually incurred in connection with the member's duties, as provided
in the state travel policies and procedures established by the
department of administration and approved by the state budget agency.
(c) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 476. IC 22-12-3-9, AS ADDED BY P.L.220-2011,
SECTION 375, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) A variance from a rule
adopted by the board of firefighting personnel standards and education
that was granted by the board before July 1, 1996, is valid.
(b) The expiration of the board of firefighting personnel
standards and education on December 31, 2026, does not affect the
validity of a variance described in subsection (a).
SECTION 477. IC 22-12-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 69, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The fire and building services fund is
established for the purpose of defraying the personal services, other
operating expense, and capital outlay of the following:
(1) The department.
(2) The education board. commission.
(3) The commission.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the department. Money
collected for deposit in the fund shall be deposited at least monthly
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

283
with the treasurer of state.
(c) The treasurer of state shall deposit the following collected
amounts in the fund:
(1) Fire insurance policy premium taxes assessed under section 5
of this chapter.
(2) Except as provided in section 6(d) of this chapter, all fees
collected under this chapter.
(3) Any money not otherwise described in this subsection but
collected by the department commission, or education board and
designated for distribution to the fund by statute or the executive
director of the department.
(4) A fee collected by the education board for the issuance of a
certification under IC 22-14-2-7.
(d) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public funds may be invested.
(e) Money in the fund at the end of a fiscal year does not revert to
the state general fund.
SECTION 478. IC 22-12-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 70, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The statewide fire and building safety
education fund is established to provide money to:
(1) local fire and building inspection departments for enrollment
in education and training programs approved by the department;
and
(2) the department for:
(A) enrollment in education and training programs approved
by the department; and
(B) the sponsoring of training conferences.
(b) The department shall administer the fund. The department shall
distribute money from the fund in accordance with the rules adopted
under IC 4-22-2 by the commission. department.
(c) The fund consists of:
(1) money allocated under section 6(d) of this chapter; and
(2) fees collected under subsection (e).
(d) Money in the fund at the end of a fiscal year does not revert to
the state general fund.
(e) The department may charge a fee for a person's participation in
a training conference. The department shall deposit the fees collected
under this subsection in the fund. The department shall pay all
expenses associated with training conferences out of the fund.
SECTION 479. IC 22-12-6-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2019,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

284
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The commission department may adopt
rules under IC 4-22-2 setting a fee schedule for the following:
(1) Fireworks display permits issued under IC 22-11-14-2.
(2) Explosives magazine permits issued under IC 35-47.5-4.
(3) Design releases issued under IC 22-15-3 and IC 22-15-3.2.
(4) Certification of industrialized building systems and mobile
structures under IC 22-15-4.
(5) Inspection of regulated amusement devices under IC 22-15-7.
(6) Application fees for variance requests under IC 22-13-2-11
and inspection fees for exemptions under IC 22-13-4-5.
(7) Except as provided in section 6.5 of this chapter, permitting
and inspection of regulated lifting devices under IC 22-15-5.
(8) Permitting and inspection of regulated boiler and pressure
vessels under IC 22-15-6.
(9) Licensing of boiler and pressure vessel inspectors under
IC 22-15-6-5.
(10) Licensing of elevator contractors, elevator inspectors, and
elevator mechanics under IC 22-15-5-6 through IC 22-15-5-16.
(b) Fee schedules set under this section must be sufficient to pay all
of the costs, direct and indirect, that are payable from the fund into
which the fee must be deposited, after deducting other money deposited
in the fund. In setting these fee schedules, the commission department
may consider differences in the degree or complexity of the activity
being performed for each fee.
(c) The fee schedule set for design releases issued under subsection
(a)(3) may not be changed more than one (1) time each year. The
commission department may include in this fee schedule a fee for the
review of plans and specifications and, if a political subdivision does
not have a program to periodically inspect the construction covered by
the design release, a fee for inspecting the construction.
(d) The fee schedule set under subsection (a) for design releases
may provide that a portion of the fees collected shall be deposited in
the statewide fire and building safety education fund established under
section 3 of this chapter.
SECTION 480. IC 22-12-6-6.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.230-2019,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) The commission department may adopt
rules under IC 4-22-2 to set fees for a permit issued under
IC 22-15-5-4(c) if the acceptance inspection of the regulated lifting
device required by IC 22-15-5-4(c)(1)(A) is conducted by an inspector
who is not employed by the department.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

285
(b) A fee under subsection (a) must be a lesser fee than that set
under section 6(a)(7) of this chapter.
(c) When determining a fee under subsection (a), the commission
department shall consider any savings the department will experience
as a result of a permit applicant using an inspector who is not employed
by the department, including savings related to department inspector
salaries, travel, and administrative costs.
SECTION 481. IC 22-12-6-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 71, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) This section does not apply to a nonpublic
school (as defined in IC 20-18-2-12) or a school operated by a school
corporation (as defined in IC 20-18-2-16).
(b) The department shall charge an application fee set by rules
adopted by the commission department under IC 4-22-2 for
amusement and entertainment permits issued under IC 22-14-3.
(c) The department shall collect an inspection fee set by rules
adopted by the commission department under IC 4-22-2 whenever the
department conducts an inspection for a special event endorsement
under IC 22-14-3.
(d) Halls, gymnasiums, or places of assembly in which contests,
drills, exhibitions, plays, displays, dances, concerts, or other types of
amusement are held by colleges, universities, social or fraternal
organizations, lodges, farmers organizations, societies, labor unions,
trade associations, or churches are exempt from the fees charged or
collected under subsections (b) and (c), unless rental fees are charged
or collected.
(e) The fees set for applications or inspections under this section
must be sufficient to pay all the direct and indirect costs of processing
an application or performing an inspection for which the fee is set. In
setting the fees, the commission department may consider differences
in the degree or complexity of the activity being performed for each
fee.
SECTION 482. IC 22-12-6-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The application
fee for a fireworks manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, or importer
permit issued under IC 22-11-14-5 shall be set by rules adopted by the
commission department under IC 4-22-2.
(b) The application fee for a fireworks retail stand permit issued
under IC 22-11-14-7 shall be set by rules adopted by the commission
department under IC 4-22-2. The rules must exempt a nonprofit
corporation incorporated under IC 23-7-1.1 (before its repeal on
August 1, 1991) or IC 23-17 from the fee.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

286
(c) The fees set for applications under this section must be sufficient
to pay all the direct and indirect costs of processing an application for
which the fee is set. In setting the fees, the commission department
may consider differences in the degree or complexity of the activity
being performed for each fee.
SECTION 483. IC 22-12-6-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 205, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) As used in this section,
"credit card" means a bank card, debit card, charge card, prepaid card,
or other similar device used for payment.
(b) In addition to other methods of payment allowed by law, the
department may accept payment by credit card for certifications,
licenses, and fees, and other amounts payable to the following:
(1) The department.
(2) The fire prevention and building safety commission (before
its repeal).
(3) The Indiana homeland security foundation (before its repeal).
(c) The department may enter into appropriate agreements with
banks or other organizations authorized to do business in Indiana to
enable the department to accept payment by credit card.
(d) The department may recognize net amounts remitted by the bank
or other organization as payment in full of amounts due the department.
(e) The department may pay any applicable credit card service
charge or fee.
SECTION 484. IC 22-12-7-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 64, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. This chapter applies to the commission, the
education board commission, and every officer, employee, and agent
of an office or division within the department whenever the person has
authority to administer or enforce a law under IC 22-11 through
IC 22-15, IC 35-47.5, or IC 36-8-10.5.
SECTION 485. IC 22-12-7-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 66, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) This section applies to an order issued by
an officer, employee, or agent of an office or division within the
department.
(b) The office or division issuing an order shall give a person who:
(1) is aggrieved by the order; and
(2) requests review of the order in verbal or written form;
an opportunity to informally discuss the order with the office or
division. Review under this subsection does not suspend the running of
the time period in which a person must petition under IC 4-21.5-3-7 to
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

287
appeal the order.
(c) The office or division issuing the order may, on its own initiative
or at the request of any person, modify its order or reverse the order.
(d) An order issued by an office or a division may be appealed to the
commission department under IC 4-21.5-3-7. A decision to deny a
request to modify or reverse an order under subsection (c) is not
appealable. However, orders issued under IC 22-14-2-7,
IC 22-14-2-7.5, or IC 36-8-10.5 are appealed to the education board.
commission.
(e) If an order is appealed, the agency that is responsible for
reviewing the order under subsection (d) or its designee shall conduct
all administrative proceedings under IC 4-21.5. In its proceedings, the
agency conducting the proceeding may modify the order to impose any
requirement authorized under this article or reverse the order.
SECTION 486. IC 22-12-7-15, AS ADDED BY P.L.160-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) Except as provided by subsection (c), if a
property is inspected by the department or plans were reviewed by the
department, neither the department nor a political subdivision may
require compliance with a new or different set of building, fire safety,
or equipment laws than were originally enforced by the department:
(1) before July 1, 2025; or
(2) two (2) years after the earlier of the date of the:
(A) initial inspection; or
(B) plan review.
(b) A child care home (as defined in IC 12-7-2-28.6) that was
licensed to operate in a Class 2 structure by the office of the secretary
of family and social services before July 1, 2025, may continue to
operate in the structure notwithstanding the provisions of this article
and 675 IAC 13.
(c) Subsection (a) does not apply to any of the following:
(1) Any:
(A) fraud;
(B) material misrepresentation; or
(C) other act of bad faith;
that results in misapplication of the appropriate requirements.
(2) A change of use or occupancy of the structure or equipment.
(3) A condition imposed in a variance issued by the:
(A) department; or
(B) commission. state building commissioner.
(4) Any new construction, addition, or alteration of the structure
or equipment.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

288
(5) A violation that would qualify for an emergency order under
section 6(a)(1) of this chapter.
(6) Any maintenance requirements.
SECTION 487. IC 22-13-1-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. "Building rule"
means a rule that:
(1) is adopted by the commission; department; and
(2) qualifies as a building law under IC 22-12-1-3.
SECTION 488. IC 22-13-1-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. "Fire safety rule"
means a rule that:
(1) is adopted by the commission; department; and
(2) qualifies as a fire safety law under IC 22-12-1-13.
SECTION 489. IC 22-13-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2019,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as provided in section 3.5 of this
chapter, the commission department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to adopt a statewide code of fire safety laws and building laws.
(b) The commission Subject to IC 22-12-2.6, the department shall
adopt the following national codes or their equivalent by rules under
IC 4-22-2 and IC 22-13-2.5 (before its repeal):
(1) ANSI A10.4 (Safety Requirements for Personnel Hoists).
(2) ASME A17.1 (Safety Code for Elevators and Escalators, an
American National Standard).
(3) ASME A18.1 (Safety Standard for Platform Lifts and Stairway
Chairlifts, American National Standard).
(4) ASME QEI-1 (Standard for the Qualification of Elevator
Inspectors, an American National Standard).
(5) The American Society of Civil Engineers (ASCE) Automated
People Mover Standard 21.
(6) ANSI A90.1 Safety Code for Manlifts.
(7) ASME A17.3 (Safety Code for Existing Elevators and
Escalators, an American National Standard).
(8) ASME A17.6 (Standard for Elevator Suspension,
Compensation, and Governor Systems).
(c) The commission shall review the subsequent edition of each
code adopted under subsection (b) within twenty-four (24) months after
the effective date of the subsequent edition.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e), the commission may
amend the national codes as a condition of the adoption under
subsections (b) and (c).
(e) An amendment to the national code under subsection (d) may
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

289
not unreasonably impair public safety.
SECTION 490. IC 22-13-2-2.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 2.5. (a) Before January 1, 2020, the commission shall
adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to replace the statewide residential code
for Class 2 structures that is included within the statewide code of fire
safety laws and building laws adopted under section 2 of this chapter.
(b) If the commission uses a national code as part of the adoption of
a replacement statewide residential code under subsection (a), the
commission shall amend the national code as a condition of the
adoption under subsection (a).
(c) The commission shall submit a report to the general assembly
not later than January 1, 2019, regarding the commission's work during
the previous year related to adoption of a replacement statewide
residential code under subsection (a). The report to the general
assembly must be submitted in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
SECTION 491. IC 22-13-2-2.6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 2.6. Before January 1, 2021, the commission may adopt
rules under IC 4-22-2 to exempt a bunkhouse from being required to be
equipped with an automatic fire sprinkler system.
SECTION 492. IC 22-13-2-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.155-2023,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The rules adopted under section 2 of this
chapter take precedence over:
(1) any rule adopted by a state agency that conflicts with the
commission's department's fire safety rules or building rules; and
(2) any ordinance or other regulation adopted by a political
subdivision that covers the same subject matter as the
commission's department's fire safety rules or building rules.
(b) State agencies and political subdivisions may incorporate the
rules adopted by the commission department by reference into a rule,
ordinance, or other regulation. Notwithstanding IC 4-22-9-6, a
reference to the rules adopted by the commission, department, by
citation to the Indiana Administrative Code (IAC), shall be construed
to include all amendments as of the date that the reference is written
and any later amendments to that provision, unless accompanied by a
reference to a specific edition or supplement to the Indiana
Administrative Code.
(c) A city, town, or county may not adopt an ordinance that conflicts
with or includes more stringent or detailed requirements than the
commission's department's rules.
SECTION 493. IC 22-13-2-3.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.104-2018,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

290
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. (a) The following may not adopt rules
requiring the installation of an automatic fire sprinkler system in a
Class 2 structure:
(1) The commission. department.
(2) Another state agency.
(b) A political subdivision may not adopt an ordinance or other
regulation requiring the installation of an automatic fire sprinkler
system in a Class 2 structure.
SECTION 494. IC 22-13-2-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. If the commission
department finds duplication, conflict, or overlapping of responsibility
between:
(1) this article, IC 22-12, IC 22-14, IC 22-15, a fire safety rule, or
a building rule; and
(2) the rules adopted by another state agency;
the commission department shall notify the state agency, and the state
agency shall revise its rules to eliminate the duplication, conflict, or
overlap.
SECTION 495. IC 22-13-2-4.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 74, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.1. (a) This section applies only to a plan review
for a design release performed:
(1) before construction of a Class 1 structure; and
(2) to determine compliance with the rules of the commission.
department.
(b) This section does not apply to a plan review for the issuance of
a building permit, an improvement permit, a fire protection system
permit, or any other permit issued by a state agency or a city, town, or
county.
(c) A plan review for a design release must be:
(1) authorized under IC 22-15-3; and
(2) performed in compliance with the rules and objective criteria
adopted by the commission department under IC 22-15-3-1.
(d) If the commission department has certified that a city, town, or
county is qualified to perform a plan review for a design release under
IC 22-15-3, both of the following may perform the plan review for a
design release:
(1) The department.
(2) The city, town, or county.
However, only the entity described in subdivision (1) or (2) that
performs the initial plan review for a design release may charge a fee
for the plan review for a design release. The other entity shall not
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

291
charge a fee for the plan review for a design release.
SECTION 496. IC 22-13-2-5.6, AS ADDED BY P.L.155-2023,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.6. (a) As used in this section, "building code"
means a building code and includes the standards related to a building
code.
(b) As used in this section, "unit" means a county, city, or town.
(c) Beginning January 1, 2024, A unit may submit a proposal to the
commission department to amend any building code. that the
commission adopts or updates after December 31, 2023. A unit may
submit the proposal in hard copy or in an electronic form that is
acceptable to the commission. department. A proposal must include
the following:
(1) A resolution adopted by the unit to request an amendment to
the building code that:
(A) specifies the building code language to be amended; and
(B) states the safety issue that is the basis for the proposed
amendment.
(2) A fiscal analysis of the estimated cost or savings resulting
from the proposed building code amendment.
(d) The commission department shall hold one (1) meeting each
year to review and consider all proposals submitted by units at least
annually. A unit may submit a proposal at any time. However, the
commission shall review and consider only complete proposal
submissions that are received not later than sixty (60) days before the
date of a meeting in which proposals are considered.
(e) The commission shall:
(1) place a proposal on the meeting agenda not later than thirty
(30) days before the date of the meeting in which the proposal is
considered; and
(2) take public testimony at the meeting.
(f) The commission may only adopt a proposed amendment upon an
affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the
commission present and voting as provided in IC 22-12-2-6.
(g) A building code amendment adopted by the commission under
this section is subject to IC 22-12-2.5-2.
SECTION 497. IC 22-13-2-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The commission
department may review and modify or reverse any variance or other
order that:
(1) is issued by a state agency or political subdivision; and
(2) covers a subject governed by this article, IC 22-12, IC 22-14,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

292
IC 22-15, a fire safety rule, or a building rule.
(b) The commission department shall review variances granted by
a political subdivision to the fire safety laws and building laws adopted
in its ordinances. The variance is not effective until it is approved by
the commission. department.
(c) The commission department shall review orders under this
section that:
(1) are issued by a political subdivision; and
(2) concern a Class 2 structure;
if a person aggrieved by the order petitions for review under
IC 4-21.5-3-7 within thirty (30) days after the political subdivision has
issued the order.
(d) A copy of the petition under subsection (c) shall be delivered to
the political subdivision issuing the order.
(e) Review of an order under this section does not suspend the
running of the time period under any statute in which a person must
petition a court for judicial review of the order.
SECTION 498. IC 22-13-2-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 161, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The commission department
shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to create equipment laws applicable
to regulated lifting devices.
(b) The commission department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to create equipment laws applicable to regulated boilers and pressure
vessels.
(c) The commission department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to adopt by reference all or part of the following national boiler and
pressure vessel codes:
(1) The American Society of Mechanical Engineers Boiler and
Pressure Vessel Code.
(2) The National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors
Inspection Code.
(3) The American Petroleum Institute 510 Pressure Vessel
Inspection Code.
(4) Any subsequent editions of the codes listed in subdivisions (1)
through (3).
(d) The commission department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to create equipment laws applicable to regulated amusement devices.
SECTION 499. IC 22-13-2-8.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 162, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. (a) The commission
department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 for outdoor event
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

293
equipment at outdoor performances to protect the safety of persons at
the outdoor performances. The commission department may:
(1) exempt small assemblies of outdoor event equipment, as
defined by the commission, department, from some or all fees or
other requirements that otherwise would apply to outdoor event
equipment under a rule adopted under this section or another
building law; or
(2) establish alternative procedures, fees, or other requirements,
or any combination, for small assemblies of outdoor event
equipment, as defined by the commission. department.
(b) Subject to this section, a city, town, or county that regulated
outdoor event equipment before March 15, 2012, under an ordinance
adopted before March 15, 2012, may, if the ordinance is in effect on
March 15, 2012, continue to regulate outdoor event equipment under
the ordinance after March 14, 2012, in the same manner that the city,
town, or county applied the ordinance before March 15, 2012.
However, a statewide code of fire safety laws or building laws
governing outdoor event equipment that is adopted by the commission
department under this section after March 14, 2012, takes precedence
over any part of a city, town, or county ordinance that is in conflict with
the commission's department's adopted code. The ordinances to which
this section applies include Chapter 536 of the Revised Code of the
Consolidated City and County Indianapolis/Marion, Indiana Codified
through Ordinance No. 36, 2011, passed August 15, 2011. (Supp. No.
27). A city, town, or county to which this subsection applies need not
be certified or approved under IC 22-15-3-1 or another law to continue
to regulate outdoor event equipment after March 14, 2012.
(c) This subsection applies to cities, towns, and counties described
in subsection (b) and any other city, town, or county that, after March
14, 2012, adopts an ordinance governing outdoor event equipment that
is approved by the commission department or the state building
commissioner. The city, town, or county shall require compliance with:
(1) the rules adopted under this section;
(2) orders issued under IC 22-13-2-11 that grant a variance to the
rules adopted under this section;
(3) orders issued under IC 22-12-7 that apply the rules adopted
under this section; and
(4) a written interpretation of the rules adopted under this section
binding on the unit under IC 22-13-5-3 or IC 22-13-5-4;
on both private and public property located within the boundaries of
the city, town, or county, including, in the case of a consolidated city,
the state fairgrounds. This subsection does not limit the authority of a
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

294
unit (as defined in IC 36-1-2-23) under IC 36-7-2-9 to enforce building
laws and orders and written interpretations related to building laws.
SECTION 500. IC 22-13-2-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 75, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) A county, city, or town may regulate
regulated lifting devices if the unit's regulatory program is approved by
the commission. department.
(b) A unit must submit its ordinances and other regulations that
regulate lifting devices to the commission department for approval.
The ordinance or other regulation is not effective until it is approved by
the commission. department. If any of these ordinances or regulations
conflict with the commission's department's rules, the commission's
department's rules supersede the local ordinance or other regulation.
(c) A unit may issue permits only to applicants who qualify under
IC 22-15-5. However, the unit may specify a lesser fee than that set
under IC 22-12-6-6(a)(7).
(d) A unit must inspect regulated lifting devices with inspectors who
possess the qualifications necessary to be employed by the department
of homeland security as a regulated lifting device inspector.
SECTION 501. IC 22-13-2-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 163, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) The department or the
commission may grant a variance to any rule adopted by the
commission. department. However, the commission may grant a
variance under this section only if the department places the
application for the variance on the commission's agenda.
(b) To qualify for a variance, an applicant must pay the fee set under
IC 22-12-6-6 and file an application, on a form approved by the
department, that contains facts demonstrating that:
(1) compliance with the rule will impose an undue hardship upon
the applicant or prevent the preservation of an architecturally
significant or historically significant part of a building or other
structure; and
(2) either:
(A) noncompliance with the rule; or
(B) compliance with an alternative requirement approved by
the body considering the variance application;
will not be adverse to the public health, safety, or welfare.
(c) A variance granted under this section is conditioned upon
compliance with an alternative standard approved under subsection
(b)(2)(B).
(d) A variance granted under this section takes precedence over
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

295
conflicting rules adopted by a state agency and conflicting ordinances
and other regulations adopted by a political subdivision.
(e) Variances granted by the boiler and pressure vessel rules board
and the regulated amusement device safety board prior to July 1, 2019,
are valid and remain in full force and effect.
(f) The department shall make all variance applications available for
review on a public portal.
(g) Local fire and building officials shall receive notice of variance
applications filed under this section within their respective
jurisdictions.
(h) A local fire official, local building official, or other interested
party may submit documentation regarding a variance application to
the department or commission for review and consideration prior to an
initial determination being made on the application by the department.
or the commission.
(i) The department or commission shall wait at least five (5)
business days after a variance application is filed before making an
initial determination on the application.
(j) The commission department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to implement this section.
SECTION 502. IC 22-13-2-11.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 164, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.5. (a) As used in this section,
"NFPA 72" refers to NFPA 72, National Fire Alarm and Signaling
Code, 2010 Edition, published by the National Fire Protection
Association, 1 Batterymarch Park, Quincy, Massachusetts 02169-7471.
(b) It is the intent of the general assembly that NFPA 72, as may be
amended by the commission department under subsection (c), be
incorporated into the Indiana Administrative Code. Not later than July
1, 2014, the commission department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to amend 675 IAC 28-1-28 to incorporate NFPA 72 into the Indiana
Administrative Code, subject to subsection (c)(1) and (c)(2).
(c) In adopting rules to incorporate NFPA 72 into the Indiana
Administrative Code, as required by subsection (b), the commission
department may amend NFPA 72 as the commission department
considers appropriate. However, the rules finally adopted by the
commission department to comply with this section must do the
following:
(1) Incorporate the definition of, and associated requirements for:
(A) a managed facilities-based voice network (MFVN); and
(B) a public switched telephone network (PSTN);
as set forth in NFPA 72.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

296
(2) Allow digital alarm communicator systems that make use of
a managed facilities-based voice network (MFVN) to transmit
signals from a fire alarm system to an offsite monitoring facility,
subject to the requirements for those systems set forth in NFPA
72.
(d) If the commission department does not comply with subsection
(b), the following apply: on July 1, 2014:
(1) The definition of, and associated requirements for:
(A) a managed facilities-based voice network (MFVN); and
(B) a public switched telephone network (PSTN);
as set forth in NFPA 72, are considered incorporated into the
Indiana Administrative Code. Any provisions of 675 IAC 28-1-28
(or any rules adopted by a state agency, or any ordinances or other
regulations adopted by a political subdivision) that conflict with
the definitions and requirements described in this subdivision are
superseded by the definitions and requirements described in this
subdivision. This subdivision continues to apply until the
commission department adopts rules that amend 675
IAC 28-1-28 to incorporate NFPA 72 into the Indiana
Administrative Code and that comply with subsection (c)(1) and
(c)(2).
(2) A person that after June 30, 2014, installs or uses a digital
alarm communicator system that:
(A) makes use of a managed facilities-based voice network
(MFVN) to transmit signals from a fire alarm system to an
offsite monitoring facility; and
(B) meets the requirements for such a system set forth in
NFPA 72;
is not required to obtain a variance under section 11 of this
chapter for the installation or use.
SECTION 503. IC 22-13-2-12 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) This section
applies if the commission department is authorized by statute to enter
into agreements with the federal government, another state, or foreign
country.
(b) An agreement under this section must be submitted to the
attorney general for approval. The attorney general shall approve the
agreement unless the attorney general finds that it does not comply
with the statutes. If the attorney general disapproves the agreement, the
attorney general shall give the commission department a detailed
statement indicating the basis for the disapproval. If the attorney
general fails to approve or disapprove the agreement within sixty (60)
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

297
days after it is submitted, it is considered approved.
SECTION 504. IC 22-13-2-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 76, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) The commission department may adopt
rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement this article, IC 22-12, IC 22-14, and
IC 22-15.
(b) Any power of the state fire marshal or the department to adopt
rules to implement this article, IC 22-12, IC 22-14, and IC 22-15 shall
be exercised by the commission. department.
SECTION 505. IC 22-13-2-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2019,
SECTION 26, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. The commission or department may engage
in studies and consult with any person to implement this article,
IC 22-12, IC 22-14, and IC 22-15.
SECTION 506. IC 22-13-2-14.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 77, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14.1. (a) The commission or department shall
consult with an industry expert to discuss a variance application or an
update to a rule or safety standard concerning:
(1) a boiler or pressure vessel; or
(2) a regulated amusement device.
(b) An industry expert for the purposes of consulting under
subsection (a)(1) must be:
(1) a professional engineer registered under IC 25-31; IC 25-4-3;
and
(2) knowledgeable in and have experience with boiler and
pressure vessels.
SECTION 507. IC 22-13-2-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) This section applies to any
property regulated by IC 22-12, IC 22-13, IC 22-14, IC 22-15, or a
rule of the department.
(b) The department shall authorize compliance with a more
recent version of a model code than that which is currently
incorporated int the building, fire safety, or equipment laws of
Indiana.
(c) To make an authorization under subsection (b), the
department must:
(1) specifically identify, by name and version, the model code
that is being authorized;
(2) include a finding that compliance with the more recent
version of the model code is not adverse to the health, safety,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

298
or welfare of the public;
(3) identify any other associated model codes that must also be
complied with in lieu of the Indiana version; and
(4) file a notice in the Indiana Register containing the
information described in subdivisions (1) through (3).
(d) The department may impose conditions on an authorization
issued under this section necessary to ensure that the following are
maintained:
(1) The health, safety, or welfare of the public.
(2) The integrity of Indiana's regulatory program.
(e) The department may modify or eliminate any authorization
made under this section by filing an updated notice in the Indiana
Register. The modification or elimination of an authorization may
not take effect sooner than one hundred eighty (180) days after the
date of posting in the Indiana Register. The modification or
elimination of an authorization is subject to IC 4-21.5.
(f) Compliance with an authorization made under this section is
voluntary. However, if a person elects to comply with an
authorization, the failure to comply with any provision of the
authorization is a violation of the building, fire safety, or
equipment laws of Indiana.
SECTION 508. IC 22-13-3-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The commission
department shall adopt fire safety rules that prohibit the following:
(1) The storage of regulated explosives (as defined in
IC 35-47.5-2-13) in quantities exceeding the maximum quantity
specified by the commission. department.
(2) The storage of regulated explosives (as defined in
IC 35-47.5-2-13) at a site that is located less than the minimum
distance specified by the commission department from a
railroad, highway, or other place of habitation or assembly.
(3) The use of a receptacle, burning fixture or equipment, heating
fixture or equipment, or structure for an explosive, flammable, or
other combustible matter that does not meet the design and
composition standards specified by the commission. department.
(4) The keeping, storage, use, manufacture, sale, handling,
transportation, or disposition of an explosive, flammable, or other
combustible matter in violation of any other requirements
specified by the commission. department.
SECTION 509. IC 22-13-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 78, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) This section applies to the following
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

299
laboratories:
(1) Analytical laboratories approved by the department under the
alternative criteria established by the commission department in
its rules.
(2) Laboratories that are:
(A) operated by a college, university, school, or other
educational entity for the purpose of instruction or research;
and
(B) approved by the department under the alternative criteria
established by the commission department in the rules.
(b) The commission department may:
(1) apply different rules to the manufacture of regulated
explosives (as defined in IC 35-47.5-2-13) in a laboratory
described in subsection (a) than apply to other places where
regulated explosives (as defined in IC 35-47.5-2-13) are
manufactured; and
(2) adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to exempt laboratories described
in subsection (a) from the regulated explosive magazines permit
requirement under IC 35-47.5-4.
SECTION 510. IC 22-13-3-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. The commission
department shall adopt fire safety rules that prohibit the occupancy or
use of Class 1 structures that do not comply with the commission's
department's rules governing the number, type, location,
identification, repair, and maintenance of emergency exits, smoke
detection devices, and other emergency communication devices.
SECTION 511. IC 22-13-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Standards for Building Rules; Exemption From Design Release
Requirement).
SECTION 512. IC 22-13-5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 79, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as provided under subsection (c),
upon the written request of an interested person, the state building
commissioner of the department shall issue a written interpretation of
a building law or a fire safety law not later than ten (10) business days
after the date of receiving a request. An interpretation issued by the
state building commissioner must be consistent with building laws and
fire safety laws enacted by the general assembly or adopted by the
commission. department.
(b) The state building commissioner shall issue a written
interpretation of a building law or fire safety law under subsection (a)
whether or not the county or municipality has taken any action to
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

300
enforce the building law or fire safety law.
(c) If:
(1) an interested person submits a written or electronic request to
the state building commissioner for a written interpretation of a
building law or fire safety law applicable to a Class 2 structure;
and
(2) the state building commissioner is absent and unable to issue
a written interpretation within the time specified under subsection
(a);
the chair of the commission, or, if the chair is absent, the vice chair of
the commission, department shall issue the written interpretation not
later than ten (10) business days after the date of receiving the request.
SECTION 513. IC 22-13-5-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A written
interpretation issued under section 2 of this chapter binds the interested
person and the county or municipality with whom the interested person
has the dispute until the written interpretation is overruled in a
proceeding under IC 4-21.5.
(b) For purposes of IC 4-21.5, the commission department is the
ultimate authority regarding a written interpretation issued under
section 2 of this chapter.
SECTION 514. IC 22-13-5-4, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) A written interpretation of a building law or
fire safety law binds all counties and municipalities if the state building
commissioner publishes the written interpretation of the building law
or fire safety law in the Indiana Register under IC 4-22-7-7(b). For
purposes of IC 4-22-7-7, a written interpretation of a building law or
fire safety law published by the state building commissioner is
considered adopted by an agency.
(b) A written interpretation of a building law or fire safety law
published under subsection (a) binds all counties and municipalities
until the earlier of the following:
(1) The general assembly enacts a statute that substantively
changes the building law or fire safety law interpreted or voids the
written interpretation.
(2) The commission department adopts a rule under IC 4-22-2 to
state a different interpretation of the building law or fire safety
law.
(3) The written interpretation is found to be an erroneous
interpretation of the building law or fire safety law in a judicial
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

301
proceeding.
(4) The state building commissioner publishes a different written
interpretation of the building law or fire safety law.
(c) The department or the state building commissioner shall create
an electronic data base for the purpose of cataloging all available
variance rulings by the commission or the department for the purpose
of making the information available to the public on the Internet web
site website of the department or the state building commissioner.
SECTION 515. IC 22-14-2-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 83, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The department shall carry out a program to
provide public information concerning fire prevention and maintain
data and statistics concerning fires and fire prevention activities.
(b) The department shall provide a copy of the fire safety rules
adopted by the commission department to the chief of each fire
department. The department may exclude, from the rules distributed
under this subsection, any text that is incorporated by reference into the
rules published in the Indiana Administrative Code.
SECTION 516. IC 22-14-2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 84, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 6. (a) The department may establish the fire
and public safety academy training system to create and conduct
programs to train public safety personnel.
(b) The department may develop programs to train:
(1) fire department personnel and volunteers;
(2) emergency medical services personnel;
(3) telecommunicators;
(4) emergency management personnel; and
(5) chemical, biological, radiological, nuclear, and explosives
personnel.
(c) The department may develop training programs in cooperation
with:
(1) any accredited educational institution;
(2) any fire fighting association;
(3) the Indiana emergency response commission established by
IC 13-25-1-1;
(4) the Indiana emergency medical services fire and EMS
standards and education commission established by
IC 16-31-2-1; IC 16-31-2-1.5; or
(5) the board of firefighting personnel standards and education
established by IC 22-12-3-1; or
(6) (5) any other public safety agency of the state or political
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

302
subdivision of the state, or public safety organization or
association.
The academy or the accredited educational institution under
subdivision (1) may conduct the programs.
(d) The programs developed under this section must cover the areas
of:
(1) fire prevention;
(2) enforcement of fire safety laws;
(3) firefighting;
(4) emergency medical services; and
(5) other areas of public safety.
(e) The department shall establish inspection training requirements
for members of volunteer fire companies and certify individuals who
meet these requirements.
(f) If the department establishes a training program under subsection
(a), the academy shall collaborate with public safety boards and
commissions of the state to establish criteria for certification and
credentialing of public safety personnel.
(g) The academy may provide programs for research, professional
development, and accreditation.
(h) The department shall provide staff and meeting facilities to the
education board to carry out section 7 of this chapter.
SECTION 517. IC 22-14-2-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 68, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 7. (a) This section does not limit the powers,
rights, duties, and other responsibilities of municipal or county
governments or impose requirements affecting pension laws or any
other laws.
(b) This section does not require a member of a fire department to
be certified. However, under the authority provided in subsection (c),
the education board commission may, by rule, establish a program
requiring certification of fire service personnel or nonfire service
personnel.
(c) The education board commission may establish a program to be
administered by the department to:
(1) certify firefighting training and education programs that meet
the standards set by the education board; commission;
(2) certify fire department instructors who meet the qualifications
set by the education board; commission;
(3) direct research in the field of firefighting and fire prevention
and accept gifts and grants to direct this research;
(4) recommend curricula for advanced training courses and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

303
seminars in fire science or fire engineering training to public and
private postsecondary educational institutions;
(5) certify fire service personnel and nonfire service personnel
who meet the qualifications set by the education board;
commission;
(6) require fire service personnel certified at any level to fulfill
continuing education requirements in order to maintain
certification; or
(7) contract or cooperate with any person and adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2, and as authorized under IC 36-8-10.5-7, to carry out its
responsibilities under this section.
(d) The education board commission may impose a reasonable fee
for the issuance of a certification described in subsection (c). The
department shall deposit the fee in the fire and building services fund
established by IC 22-12-6-1.
(e) The education board commission is the ultimate authority for
orders issued by the department under this section.
(f) After December 31, 2026, the rules of the board of
firefighting personnel standards and education shall be considered
the rules of the Indiana fire and EMS standards and education
commission.
SECTION 518. IC 22-14-2-7.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.249-2019,
SECTION 31, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 7.5. (a) The department may grant a variance
to a rule the education board commission has adopted.
(b) The education board commission is the ultimate authority for
orders issued under this section.
SECTION 519. IC 22-14-3-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 93, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The department may modify an amusement
and entertainment permit with a special event endorsement that covers
one (1) or more events not specified in the initial permit.
(b) To qualify for a special event endorsement, an applicant must:
(1) provide the information required by the commission;
department;
(2) demonstrate through an inspection that the special events
covered by the application will be conducted in compliance with
applicable fire safety laws; and
(3) pay the inspection fee set under IC 22-12-6-7.
SECTION 520. IC 22-14-7-17, AS ADDED BY P.L.82-2008,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. The commission department may adopt a
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

304
subsequent ASTM Standard Test Method for Measuring the Ignition
Strength of Cigarettes upon a finding that the subsequent method does
not result in a change in the percentage of full length burns exhibited
by any tested cigarette when compared to the percentage of full length
burns the same cigarette would exhibit when tested in accordance with
ASTM Standard E2187-04 and the performance standard in section
13(c) of this chapter.
SECTION 521. IC 22-14-7-21, AS ADDED BY P.L.82-2008,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 21. (a) Except as provided in subsection (d), each
manufacturer shall submit to the state fire marshal a written
certification attesting that:
(1) each cigarette listed in the certification has been tested as
required under section 13 or 15 of this chapter; and
(2) each cigarette listed in the certification meets the performance
standard in section 13(c) or 15 of this chapter.
(b) Each cigarette listed in the certification must include the
following information:
(1) Brand, or trade name on the package.
(2) Style, such as light or ultra light.
(3) Length in millimeters.
(4) Circumference in millimeters.
(5) Flavor, such as menthol, if applicable.
(6) Filter or nonfilter.
(7) Package description, such as soft pack or box.
(8) Marking under section 23 of this chapter.
(9) The name, address, and telephone number of the laboratory,
if different than the manufacturer that conducted the test.
(10) The date that the testing occurred.
(c) The certifications must be made available to the attorney general
for purposes consistent with this chapter and the department of state
revenue and the alcohol and tobacco commission for the purposes of
ensuring compliance with this section.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the state fire marshal may
accept as evidence of compliance with this chapter a certification
issued to:
(1) the New York State Department of State's Office of Fire
Prevention and Control; or
(2) the responsible entity of another state that has:
(A) substantially equivalent certification requirements relating
to reduced ignition propensity cigarettes; and
(B) the same test method and performance standard
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

305
requirements as provided in sections 13 and 15 of this chapter.
(e) Each cigarette listed in a certification submitted under this
section must be recertified every three (3) years.
(f) For each brand family listed in a certification submitted under
subsection (a) or (d), a manufacturer shall pay a fee to the state fire
marshal of eight hundred dollars ($800). The state fire marshal may
adjust the fee every three (3) years to ensure that the fee defrays the
actual costs of the processing, testing, enforcement, and oversight
activities required by this chapter under rules adopted by the fire
prevention and building safety commission. department. However, the
fee for each brand family may not exceed one thousand dollars
($1,000).
(g) If a manufacturer has certified a cigarette under this section, and
after submitting the certification, makes a change to the cigarette that
is likely to alter the cigarette's compliance with the reduced cigarette
ignition propensity standards required by this chapter, that cigarette
may not be sold or offered for sale in Indiana until the manufacturer
retests the cigarette under the testing standards in section 13 or 15 of
this chapter and maintains records of that retesting as required by
section 16 of this chapter. An altered cigarette that does not meet the
performance standard in section 13 or 15 of this chapter may not be
sold in Indiana.
SECTION 522. IC 22-14-7-29, AS ADDED BY P.L.82-2008,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 29. The commission department may adopt rules
under IC 4-22-2 to implement this chapter.
SECTION 523. IC 22-14-8-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.217-2023,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "NFPA 855" refers to:
(1) the 2023 edition of NFPA 855, Standard for the Installation of
Stationary Energy Storage Systems, as adopted by the National
Fire Protection Association; or
(2) if the commission department adopts a rule under IC 4-22-2
to amend:
(A) the 2023 edition; or
(B) any subsequent edition;
of NFPA 855, the version of NFPA 855 as amended by the
commission. department.
SECTION 524. IC 22-14-8-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.217-2023,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. The total capacity of the batteries contained
within a single enclosure in:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

306
(1) a utility scale battery energy storage system installation of
which is subject to department approval under section 4(a)(1) of
this chapter; or
(2) an installation added to an existing utility scale battery energy
storage system in an expansion for which department approval is
required under section 4(a)(2) of this chapter;
may not exceed ten (10) megawatt hours unless authorized under rules
adopted by the commission department under this chapter.
SECTION 525. IC 22-14-8-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 166, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The commission
department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement this chapter
and to specify standards for the installation and operation of utility
scale battery energy storage systems consistent with:
(1) this chapter; and
(2) NFPA 855.
(b) Rules adopted by the commission department under subsection
(a) must include standards for:
(1) chemical spill prevention and control; and
(2) appropriate setbacks from surface water resources;
for the installation and expansion of utility scale battery energy storage
systems, as necessary to protect soil and surface water resources from
chemicals contained in or produced by utility scale battery energy
storage systems. In establishing the standards described in this
subsection, the commission department shall consult with the
department of environmental management or the department of natural
resources, as appropriate.
SECTION 526. IC 22-15-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.22-2005,
SECTION 42, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) This section applies to a provision of this
article, IC 22-12, IC 22-13, IC 22-14, or a rule of the department
that requires an applicant for a release, certification, registration,
permit, approval, or other license to:
(1) demonstrate that the person is in compliance with all building
laws, fire safety laws, or equipment laws; or
(2) submit proof or certify that a person is acting or will act in
conformity with all building laws, fire safety laws, or equipment
laws.
(b) Compliance with either:
(1) the conditions of a variance issued under IC 22-13-2-11; or
(2) an authorization made under IC 22-13-2-15;
shall be treated under this article as compliance with the building law,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

307
fire safety law, or equipment law from which the variance or
authorization is granted.
SECTION 527. IC 22-15-2-5.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 96, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5.5. (a) The governor shall appoint a state
building commissioner. The state building commissioner shall serve:
(1) at the pleasure of the governor; and
(2) as a full-time employee of the department of homeland
security established by IC 10-19-2-1.
(b) The state building commissioner must be a registered or licensed
design professional under IC 25-4 or IC 25-31, IC 25-4-3, as
appropriate, with at least ten (10) years of experience in the building
trades industry.
SECTION 528. IC 22-15-2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 97, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) To carry out the department's
responsibilities, the department or an employee or another agent of the
department may:
(1) exercise any program of supervision that is approved by the
commission, department, if the responsibility involves the
administration or enforcement of a building law;
(2) enter and inspect any property, at a reasonable hour;
(3) issue and enforce administrative orders under IC 22-12-7 and
apply for judicial orders under IC 22-12-7-13; and
(4) cooperate with law enforcement officers and political
subdivisions that have jurisdiction over a matter.
(b) To carry out the state building commissioner's responsibilities,
the state building commissioner shall issue a written interpretation of
any building law under IC 22-13-5.
SECTION 529. IC 22-15-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 99, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The state building commissioner or a city,
town, or county certified under subsection (d) shall issue a design
release for the construction of a Class 1 structure to an applicant who
qualifies under section 2 or 3 of this chapter.
(b) The state building commissioner shall issue a design release for
the fabrication of an industrial building system or mobile structure
under section 4 of this chapter.
(c) A design release issued under this chapter expires on the date
specified in the rules adopted by the commission. department.
(d) The commission department may certify a city, town, or county
as qualified to issue design releases, if the city, town, or county:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

308
(1) is competent under the commission's department's objective
criteria; and
(2) has adopted the rules of the commission department under
IC 22-13-2-3.
(e) A city, town, or county that is certified by the commission
department under subsection (d) may issue design releases. A design
release issued by a certified city, town, or county must be:
(1) in accordance with the commission's department's objective
criteria; and
(2) for a construction type for which the city, town, or county is
certified.
All records held by a certified city, town, or county that pertain to the
design release must be submitted to the department to be held in a
central repository.
SECTION 530. IC 22-15-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 100, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. To qualify for a design release
under this section, an applicant must:
(1) demonstrate, through the submission of plans and
specifications for the construction covered by the application, that
the construction will comply with all applicable building laws and
fire safety laws;
(2) pay the fees set under IC 22-12-6-6;
(3) have the plans and specifications:
(A) prepared by a registered architect or professional engineer
who is:
(i) competent to design the construction covered by the
application as determined by the department; and
(ii) registered under IC 25-4 or IC 25-31; IC 25-4-1 or
IC 25-4-3;
(B) include on each page of all drawings and the title page of
all specifications the seal of the registered architect or
professional engineer described by clause (A) or the person's
technical or professional staff; and
(C) filed by the registered architect or professional engineer
described by clause (A) or the person's technical or
professional staff; and
(4) submit a certificate prepared on a form provided by the
department and sworn or affirmed under penalty of perjury by the
registered architect or professional engineer described in
subdivision (3)(A):
(A) providing an estimate of the cost of the construction
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

309
covered by the application, its square footage, and any other
information required under the rules of the commission;
department;
(B) stating that the plans and specifications submitted for the
application were prepared either by or under the immediate
supervision of the person making the statement;
(C) stating that the plans and specifications submitted for the
application provide for construction that will meet all building
laws; and
(D) stating that the construction covered by the application
will be subject to inspection at intervals appropriate to the
stage of the construction by a registered architect or
professional engineer identified in the statement for the
purpose of determining in general if work is proceeding in
accordance with the released plans and specifications.
SECTION 531. IC 22-15-3-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.87-2020,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) This section applies only to an application
for a design release to construct:
(1) a Class 1 structure with thirty thousand (30,000) or fewer
cubic feet of space;
(2) an addition to a Class 1 structure, if the addition adds thirty
thousand (30,000) or fewer cubic feet of space;
(3) an alteration to a Class 1 structure, if the alteration does not
involve changes affecting the structural safety of the Class 1
structure; or
(4) an installation or alteration of an automatic fire sprinkler
system in a Class 1 structure by persons qualified pursuant to
rules set forth by the fire prevention and building safety
commission. department.
(b) The design release requirements under subsection (c) do not
apply for any construction that is otherwise exempted under 675
IAC 12-6-4(b), even if the construction is:
(1) a part of;
(2) supplemental to; or
(3) an accessory of;
any other construction that would otherwise require a design release.
(c) To qualify for a design release under this section, an applicant
must do the following:
(1) Demonstrate, through the submission of plans and
specifications for the construction covered by the application, that
the construction will comply with all applicable building laws and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

310
fire safety laws.
(2) Pay the fees set under IC 22-12-6-6.
SECTION 532. IC 22-15-3-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.22-2005,
SECTION 47, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) This section applies to a design release for
the fabrication of a model or other series of similar industrialized
building systems or mobile structures.
(b) To qualify for a design release under this section, an applicant
must:
(1) demonstrate, through the submission of plans and
specifications for the construction covered by the application, that
the construction will comply with all applicable building laws and
fire safety laws;
(2) have the submitted plans and specifications prepared by an
architect registered under IC 25-4 or a professional engineer
registered under IC 25-31, IC 25-4-3, if required under the rules
adopted by the commission; department; and
(3) pay the fees set under IC 22-12-6-6.
SECTION 533. IC 22-15-3-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 101, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) This section does not
authorize a variance from any rule adopted by the commission.
department.
(b) The rules adopted by the commission department do not
prevent the use of:
(1) materials;
(2) methods of construction; or
(3) design procedures;
if they are not specifically prohibited in the rules and if they are
approved under subsection (c).
(c) The state fire marshal and the department may, in the review of
an application for a design release, consider as evidence of compliance
with the rules adopted by the commission department any evaluation
report that:
(1) contains limitations, conditions, or standards for alternative
materials, methods of construction, or design procedures; and
(2) is published by an independent, nationally recognized testing
laboratory or other organization that is approved under the rules
adopted by the commission. department.
SECTION 534. IC 22-15-3-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) This section does
not apply to construction that is exempted from this section in the rules
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

311
adopted by the commission under IC 22-13-4. department.
(b) This section applies to the following:
(1) Each person who engages in the construction.
(2) Each person who has control over the construction.
(3) Each person who has control over the Class 1 structure
industrialized building system or mobile home that is constructed.
(c) A person described in subsection (b) commits a Class C
infraction if:
(1) a Class 1 structure is constructed, or construction is begun, at
the site where it is to be used; and
(2) no design release issued under section 2 or 3 of this chapter
covers the construction.
(d) A person described in subsection (b) commits a Class C
infraction if:
(1) an industrialized building system or a mobile structure is
fabricated; and
(2) no design release issued under section 4 of this chapter covers
the fabrication.
SECTION 535. IC 22-15-3.2-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.218-2014,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "design
professional" means:
(1) an architect registered under IC 25-4-1; or
(2) a professional engineer registered under IC 25-31. IC 25-4-3.
SECTION 536. IC 22-15-3.2-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.238-2025,
SECTION 70, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7. (a) A design release shall be issued to an
applicant without a plan review if:
(1) the applicant submits a complete application and (2) the
department does not select the application for a plan review under
this section; or
(2) the applicant self-certifies as provided in IC 22-15-3.5.
(b) The department may select any application for design release to
be subject to a plan review. The department has complete discretion in
the criteria used by the department to select a design release
application for a plan review. A criterion used by the department may
be whether the design professional has received disciplinary sanctions
under IC 25-1-11-12 within the preceding five (5) years.
(c) The following types of plans qualify for a release without a
plan review:
(1) Plans approved by the department or another
governmental jurisdiction.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

312
(2) Plans for a structure that is not traditionally occupied or
is classified as a storage building.
(3) Plans for an open-air pavilion.
(4) Plans for a remodel, renovation, or repair of a structure
that is not undergoing a change of use.
(c) (d) Not later than July 1, 2025, 2026, the department shall
identify and publish a complete list of projects the types of plans that
qualify under subsection (a)(2) (a)(1) for release without a plan review.
SECTION 537. IC 22-15-3.2-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 109, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) This section applies if the
results of a plan review reveal that a design professional knowingly or
recklessly submitted plans or specifications containing one (1) or more
violations of the rules of the commission department that are
determined by the department and the commission to pose a wanton
and willful disregard for the public health, safety, or welfare.
(b) The provisions regarding the time limitations for review and
notice under this chapter do not apply, and the department is not
required to issue a design release and confirmation number for
providing notice. The department shall send written notice of its
determination to:
(1) the design professional's licensing or registration authority
under IC 25-4-1 or IC 25-31, IC 25-4-3, as appropriate, for the
purpose of conducting a hearing under IC 4-21.5 to determine if
action under IC 4-21.5-3-8 is appropriate;
(2) the design professional; and
(3) the project owner or general contractor on whose behalf the
application was submitted.
(c) An applicant that receives notice under subsection (b) may
withdraw the application and submit a new application and plans to the
department that are prepared by a different design professional.
Withdrawal of an application does not affect any disciplinary action
against the professional of record that prepared the plans described in
subsection (a).
SECTION 538. IC 22-15-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 3.5. Self-certification by Design Professional
Sec. 1. The definitions in IC 22-15-3.2 apply throughout this
chapter.
Sec. 2. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, an applicant for a
construction project requiring a design release for a Class 1
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

313
structure under IC 22-12-3 may satisfy the design release
requirement through self-certification.
(b) Self-certification may be used only for projects that are
required to be signed and sealed by an Indiana registered design
professional. The department may exclude projects from
self-certification that involve high-hazard occupancies, essential
facilities, or other structures determined to pose an elevated risk
to life safety.
Sec. 3. To self-certify a project, an applicant for a design release
must:
(1) be an Indiana registered design professional in good
standing with the applicable registration board;
(2) be a registered design professional for at least two (2)
years;
(3) have completed at least five (5) projects in Indiana as the
registered design professional of record or as the registered
design professional responsible for the production of the
construction documents; and
(4) maintain professional liability insurance of at least five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per claim and one
million dollars ($1,000,000) aggregate.
Sec. 4. The department shall develop an electronic application
form for self-certifying applicants.
Sec. 5. The certifying design professional shall:
(1) perform a comprehensive review of the construction
documents; and
(2) submit to the department a signed certification, under
penalty of perjury, affirming that the plans comply with all
applicable state building codes and rules.
Sec. 6. Upon receipt of a complete certification and required
documentation, the department shall, not later than the next
business day, provide to the applicant:
(1) a copy of the design release; or
(2) a confirmation number that serves as a temporary design
release until the applicant receives a copy of the design
release;
without conducting a technical plan review.
Sec. 7. The department may:
(1) audit self-certified projects;
(2) require corrective action for non-compliance;
(3) revoke or suspend a professional's authority to provide
certifications; and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

314
(4) refer violations to the appropriate licensing board or
impose civil penalties as authorized by law.
Sec. 8. The department may collect plan review fees for projects
that are released without a plan review.
Sec. 9. Nothing in this chapter limits the authority of state or
local inspection officials to conduct inspections or enforce
compliance during construction.
Sec. 10. An applicant who is qualified to self-certify may apply
for a design release under:
(1) this chapter; or
(2) IC 22-15-3.
Sec. 11. Participation in the self-certification program is
voluntary. Nothing in this chapter prohibits the department from
reviewing or not reviewing an application in accordance with
IC 22-15-3.
SECTION 539. IC 22-15-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 112, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The department shall certify
an industrialized building system for use in Indiana to an applicant who
qualifies under this section. If an applicant qualifies for certification
under this section, the department shall provide the applicant with a
seal for the certified industrial building system.
(b) To qualify for a certification under this section, an applicant
must:
(1) submit proof that the department has issued a design release
under IC 22-15-3 for the model or series of industrialized building
systems being constructed;
(2) demonstrate, in an in-plant inspection, that the industrialized
building system covered by the application has been constructed
in conformity with all applicable building laws and fire safety
laws; and
(3) pay the fee set by the commission department under
IC 22-12-6-6.
(c) The exemption under IC 22-13-4-2 applies to an industrialized
building system certified under this section.
SECTION 540. IC 22-15-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 113, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The department shall certify
a mobile structure for sale and use in Indiana for an applicant who
qualifies under this section. If an applicant qualifies for certification
under this section, the department shall provide the applicant with a
seal for the certified mobile structure.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

315
(b) To qualify for certification under this section, an applicant must:
(1) submit proof that the department has issued a design release
under IC 22-15-3 for the model or series of mobile structures
being constructed;
(2) demonstrate, in an in-plant inspection, that the mobile
structure covered by the application has been constructed in
conformity with all applicable building laws and fire safety laws;
(3) certify in an affidavit that a seal provided by the department
will not be attached to a mobile structure that does not conform
to the requirements adopted by the commission department in its
rules; and
(4) pay the fee set by the commission department under
IC 22-12-6-6.
(c) The exemption under IC 22-13-4-2 applies to a mobile structure
certified under this chapter.
SECTION 541. IC 22-15-4-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. The commission
department may authorize any qualified person to conduct inspections
and issue certifications under this chapter.
SECTION 542. IC 22-15-4-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. A person who offers
to sell or sells for money or other consideration a mobile structure that:
(1) is manufactured after:
(A) January 1, 1972, if the mobile structure is designed to be
a dwelling; or
(B) June 30, 1987, if the mobile structure is not designed to be
a dwelling; and
(2) is kept or transported without:
(A) a seal issued under IC 9-8-1.5 (before its repeal on July 1,
1987) or section 2 or 4 of this chapter; and
(B) an affidavit from the manufacturer (if the mobile structure
was manufactured in Indiana or the mobile structure was
manufactured outside Indiana and has not been used by its
owner) or a dealer who has sold at least three (3) mobile
structures in the previous twelve (12) month period (if the
mobile structure was manufactured outside Indiana and the
mobile structure has been used by its owner) that states that
the mobile structure meets or exceeds the applicable
requirements adopted by the commission department in its
rules or an agreement under IC 22-13-2-12;
commits a Class C infraction.
SECTION 543. IC 22-15-4-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

316
SECTION 114, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. A person who offers to sell or
sells a mobile structure that:
(1) was certified under IC 9-8-1.5 (before its repeal on July 1,
1987) or certified by the department under section 2 or 4 of this
chapter; and
(2) has been altered or converted in violation of a rule adopted by
the commission; department;
commits a Class C infraction.
SECTION 544. IC 22-15-5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 115, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The department shall issue a
regulated lifting device installation or alteration permit to an applicant
who qualifies under this section.
(b) To qualify for a permit under this section, an applicant must
meet the following requirements:
(1) Demonstrate through the submission of complete plans,
including:
(A) copies of specifications and accurately scaled and fully
dimensioned plans showing the location of the installation in
relation to the plans and elevation of the building;
(B) plans showing the location of the machine room and the
equipment to be installed, relocated, or altered;
(C) plans showing the structural supporting members,
including foundations; and
(D) a specification of all materials employed and loads to be
supported or conveyed;
that the installation or alteration covered by the application will
comply with all applicable equipment laws. All plans and
specifications must be sufficiently complete to illustrate all details
of construction and design.
(2) Pay the fee set under IC 22-12-6-6(a)(7).
(3) Be the holder of a current elevator contractor license, if
applicable, as set forth under IC 22-15-5-7.
(c) A copy of the permit shall be kept at the construction site at all
times while the work is in progress.
(d) The regulated lifting device must be installed or altered in
compliance with:
(1) applicable codes; and
(2) the details of the application, plans, specifications, and
conditions of the permit.
(e) The regulated lifting device must be installed or altered under
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

317
the direction and control of a licensed contractor. The elevator
contractor does not have to be present at the site.
(f) The responsibilities of the department under this section may be
carried out by a political subdivision that is approved by the
commission department under IC 22-13-2-10.
SECTION 545. IC 22-15-5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 116, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) All regulated lifting devices
shall be registered under this section.
(b) The department shall issue a registration for a regulated lifting
device to an applicant who qualifies under this section.
(c) To register a regulated lifting device under this section, an
applicant must submit, on a form approved by the department, the
following information:
(1) Type, rated load and speed, name of manufacturer, location,
and the nature of the use of the regulated lifting device.
(2) Any information required under the rules adopted by the
commission. department.
SECTION 546. IC 22-15-5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 117, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The department shall carry
out a program for the periodic inspection of regulated lifting devices
being operated in Indiana. A regulated lifting device may not be
operated without an operating certificate that covers the operation of
the regulated lifting device.
(b) A permit issued under this section expires on the earlier of:
(1) one (1) year after issuance; or
(2) when the regulated lifting device is altered.
(c) After a regulated lifting device has been installed or altered, an
applicant shall apply for an initial operating certificate. The department
shall issue an initial operating certificate for a regulated lifting device
if:
(1) the applicant demonstrates:
(A) through an acceptance inspection made by an elevator
inspector licensed under section 11 of this chapter that the
regulated lifting device covered by the application complies
with the laws governing its construction, repair, maintenance,
and operation; and
(B) that the applicant has paid the fee set under
IC 22-12-6-6(a)(7); and
(2) the department verifies, through an inspection, that the
regulated lifting device complies with the laws governing the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

318
construction, repair, maintenance, and operation of the regulated
lifting device.
(d) The department shall issue a renewal operating certificate if the
applicant:
(1) demonstrates through the completion of applicable safety tests
that the regulated lifting device complies with the laws governing
the construction, repair, maintenance, and operation of the
regulated lifting device;
(2) submits results of all applicable safety tests, including failed
safety tests for the regulated lifting device; and
(3) has paid the fee set under IC 22-12-6-6(a)(7).
(e) The department may issue a temporary operating permit to an
applicant under this section who does not comply with subsection
(c)(1)(A) for a new or altered regulated lifting device or subsection
(d)(1) for an existing unaltered regulated lifting device. The applicant
must pay the fee set under IC 22-12-6-6(a)(7) to qualify for the
temporary operating permit. Except as provided in subsection (f), the
permit, including all renewal periods, is limited to sixty (60) days.
(f) The department may renew a temporary operating permit issued
under subsection (e) for thirty (30) day periods during the construction
of a building if the regulated lifting device is used for the transportation
of construction personnel, tools, and materials.
(g) The responsibilities of the department under this section may be
carried out by a political subdivision that is approved by the
commission department under IC 22-13-2-10.
(h) A copy of the operating certificate shall be displayed in or on
each regulated lifting device or in an associated machine room. In
addition to the requirements of this subsection, the two-dimensional bar
code assigned to an elevator shall be displayed in or on each elevator
in a location that is easily viewed and scanned by a person riding on the
elevator.
(i) A licensed elevator mechanic shall perform the maintenance on
a regulated lifting device.
SECTION 547. IC 22-15-5-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2007,
SECTION 309, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The following definitions
apply to sections 7 through 16 of this chapter:
(1) "Competency examination" means an examination that
thoroughly tests the scope of the knowledge and skill of the
applicant for the license.
(2) "Elevator apprentice" means an individual who works under
the direct supervision of a licensed elevator mechanic. The term
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

319
includes an individual commonly known as an elevator helper
while working under the direct supervision of a licensed elevator
mechanic.
(3) "Elevator contractor" means a person who alone or with other
persons, constructs, repairs, alters, remodels, adds to, subtracts
from, or improves a regulated lifting device and who is
responsible for substantially all the regulated lifting devices
within the entire project, or who fabricates elevator lifting devices
substantially completed and ready for installation.
(4) "Elevator inspector" means an individual who conducts the
acceptance inspection of a regulated lifting device required by
section 4(c)(1)(A) of this chapter.
(5) "Elevator mechanic" means an individual who engages in the
construction, reconstruction, alteration, maintenance, mechanical,
or electrical work or adjustments of a regulated lifting device.
(6) "License" means a certificate issued by the department that
confers upon the holder the privilege to act as an elevator
contractor, elevator inspector, or elevator mechanic.
(7) "Licensing program" means the program for licensing elevator
contractors, elevator inspectors, and elevator mechanics
established under this section and sections 7 through 16 of this
chapter.
(8) "Municipality" has the meaning set forth in IC 36-1-2-11.
(9) "Person" means:
(A) a natural person;
(B) the partners or members of a partnership or a limited
partnership;
(C) a state educational institution; or
(D) a corporation or the officers, directors, and employees of
the corporation.
(10) "Practitioner" means a person that holds:
(A) an unlimited license;
(B) a limited or probationary license;
(C) a temporary license;
(D) an emergency license; or
(E) an inactive license.
(b) The commission and the department shall establish a program
to license elevator contractors, elevator mechanics, and elevator
inspectors.
(c) The department shall issue a license as an elevator contractor, an
elevator mechanic, or an elevator inspector to a person who qualifies
and complies with the provisions of the licensing program. A person
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

320
who receives a license under this chapter is subject to the supervision
and control of the department.
(d) The department may contract with public and private
institutions, agencies, businesses, and organizations to implement all
or part of its duties established under this chapter.
(e) The commission department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to implement the licensing program.
SECTION 548. IC 22-15-5-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2019,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) An individual may not act as an elevator
contractor unless the individual:
(1) holds an elevator contractor license issued under this chapter;
or
(2) is an employee of a partnership, a limited partnership, a
corporation, or a state educational institution that holds an
elevator contractor license issued under this chapter.
(b) A partnership, a limited partnership, a corporation, or a state
educational institution may not act as an elevator contractor unless it
holds an elevator contractor license issued under this chapter.
(c) An individual who is an applicant for an elevator contractor
license shall:
(1) hold a valid elevator contractor license issued by another state
that has a licensing program that, as determined by the
department, or the commission, is equivalent to the elevator
contractor licensing program established under this chapter; or
(2) except as otherwise provided, satisfy both of the following
requirements:
(A) Have at least five (5) years of documented work
experience in the elevator industry in construction,
maintenance, and service or repair in Indiana.
(B) Successfully complete a written competency examination
approved by the commission. department.
(d) A corporation or a state educational institution that is an
applicant for an elevator contractor license must have at least one (1)
officer or employee of the corporation or a state educational institution
that holds a valid elevator contractor license issued under this chapter.
A license granted to a corporation or a state educational institution to
act as an elevator contractor under this chapter becomes invalid when
an officer or employee of the corporation or state educational
institution no longer holds a valid elevator contractor license issued
under this chapter.
(e) A partnership or limited partnership that is an applicant for an
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

321
elevator contractor license must have at least one (1) partner or general
partner that holds a valid elevator contractor license issued under this
chapter. A license granted to a partnership or limited partnership to act
as an elevator contractor under this chapter becomes invalid when the
partner of a partnership or general partner of a limited partnership
named in the application no longer holds a valid elevator contractor
license as provided by this chapter.
SECTION 549. IC 22-15-5-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2019,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) An individual may not act as an elevator
inspector unless the individual holds an elevator inspector license
issued under this chapter.
(b) An individual who is an applicant for an elevator inspector
license shall meet the standards set forth in American Society of
Mechanical Engineers (ASME) American National Standard QEI-1
(Standard for the Qualification of Elevator Inspectors) or other
nationally accepted standard qualifying authority that the commission
department has determined has equivalent requirements as ASME
QEI-1 for obtaining and retaining certification.
(c) An applicant for an initial elevator inspector license must do the
following:
(1) Submit to the department an application provided by the
department that contains the following information:
(A) The name, address, telephone number, and electronic mail
address of the applicant.
(B) Any other information the department requires.
(2) Submit to the department any proof of eligibility the
department requires.
(3) Demonstrate proof of insurance as required by section 14 of
this chapter.
(4) Pay the license fee established under IC 22-12-6-6. The
license fee is nonrefundable and must be paid each time an
applicant submits an application.
(5) Affirm under penalty of perjury that all information provided
to the department is true to the best of the applicant's knowledge
and belief.
(d) An applicant for a renewal elevator inspector license shall:
(1) Submit to the department an application provided by the
department that contains the following information:
(A) The name, address, telephone number, and electronic mail
address of the applicant.
(B) Any other information the department requires.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

322
(2) Submit proof of completion of the continuing education
required by section 15 of this chapter.
(3) Demonstrate proof of insurance as required by section 14 of
this chapter.
(4) Pay the license fee established under IC 22-12-6-6. The
license fee is nonrefundable and must be paid each time an
applicant submits an application.
(5) Affirm under penalty of perjury that all information provided
to the department is true to the best of the applicant's knowledge
and belief.
(e) An initial elevator inspector license issued under this chapter
expires on December 31 of the second year after the license was issued.
(f) A renewal of an elevator inspector license is valid for two (2)
years.
(g) An individual who engages in the business of an elevator
inspector shall carry the individual's license and present the license for
inspection by a representative of the department upon request.
(h) If the QEI-1 certification or other certification standard approved
by the commission department that made the individual eligible for an
inspector license under subsection (b):
(1) is terminated;
(2) expires; or
(3) becomes invalid for any other reason;
the elevator inspector's license immediately becomes invalid.
SECTION 550. IC 22-15-5-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2019,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) An individual may not act as an elevator
mechanic unless the individual holds an elevator mechanic license
issued under this chapter. A license is not required for an elevator
apprentice.
(b) An individual who is an applicant for an elevator mechanic
license must meet one (1) of the following eligibility criteria:
(1) Hold an active elevator mechanic license issued by a state that
the commission department has determined has a licensing
program that is at least equivalent to the elevator mechanic
licensing program established under this chapter.
(2) Satisfy both of the following:
(A) Have at least one (1) of the following types of work
experience or training:
(i) Have at least three (3) years of documented work
experience in the elevator industry in construction,
maintenance, and service or repair.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

323
(ii) Have at least eighteen (18) months experience in the
elevator industry in construction, maintenance, and service
or repair and have at least three (3) years experience in a
related field that is certified by a licensed elevator
contractor.
(iii) Complete an apprenticeship program that is registered
with the Bureau of Apprenticeship and Training of the
United States Department of Labor or a state apprenticeship
program and that the commission department determines
is at least equivalent to three (3) years of work experience in
the elevator industry in construction, maintenance, and
service or repair.
(B) Successfully complete a written competency examination
approved by the commission. department.
(3) Successfully complete an elevator mechanic's program that
consists of a combination of extensive training and a
comprehensive examination that the commission department has
determined is at least equivalent to both the work experience
required under subdivision (2)(A)(i) and the competency
examination established under subdivision (2)(B).
(c) An applicant for an initial elevator mechanic license must do the
following:
(1) Submit to the department an application provided by the
department that contains the following information:
(A) The name, business address, telephone number, and
electronic mail address of the applicant.
(B) Any other information the department requires.
(2) Submit to the department any proof of eligibility the
department requires.
(3) Pay the nonrefundable and nontransferable license fee
established under IC 22-12-6-6.
(4) Affirm under penalty of perjury that all information provided
to the department is true to the best of the applicant's knowledge
and belief.
(d) An applicant for a renewal elevator mechanic license must do
the following:
(1) Submit to the department an application provided by the
department that contains the following information:
(A) The name, business address, telephone number, and
electronic mail address of the applicant.
(B) Any other information the department requires.
(2) Submit proof of completion of the continuing education
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

324
required by section 15 of this chapter.
(3) Pay the nonrefundable and nontransferable license fee
established under IC 22-12-6-6.
(4) Affirm under penalty of perjury that all information provided
to the department is true to the best of the applicant's knowledge
and belief.
(e) An initial elevator mechanic license issued under this chapter
expires on December 31 of the second year after the license was issued.
(f) A renewal of an elevator mechanic license is valid for two (2)
years.
(g) An individual engaged in the business of an elevator mechanic
shall carry the individual's license and present the license for inspection
by a representative of the department upon request.
SECTION 551. IC 22-15-5-15 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) This section
does not apply to a licensed elevator contractor that is not an
individual.
(b) To renew a license issued under this licensing program, the
license holder must satisfy the continuing education requirement and
submit a proof of completion of training to the department.
(c) The continuing education requirement is at least eight (8) hours
of instruction that must be attended and completed within one (1) year
before a license renewal.
(d) The continuing education courses designed to ensure the
continuing education of an individual holding a license regarding new
and existing provisions of the rules of the commission department
may include:
(1) programs sponsored by the commission; department;
(2) trade association seminars;
(3) labor training programs; or
(4) joint labor management apprenticeship and journeyman
upgrade training programs.
For an individual's completion of a continuing education course to
satisfy the individual's continuing education requirement under this
chapter, the continuing education provider, instructor and the
curriculum must have been approved by the department.
(e) All instructors of continuing education courses must be approved
by the department. If an instructor is approved by the department, has
worked as an instructor teaching a curriculum approved by the
department at any time within the year preceding the expiration date of
the license, and submits proof of this work to the department, the
instructor is exempt from the requirements of subsection (c).
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

325
(f) Continuing education providers shall keep uniform records of
attendance at approved continuing education courses for at least ten
(10) years on forms designed and distributed by the department.
(g) A license holder who is unable to complete the continuing
education required under this chapter before the expiration of the
individual's license due to temporary physical or mental disability may
apply for a waiver from the department in accordance with the
following:
(1) A waiver application must be submitted to the department on
a form established by the department.
(2) A waiver application must be signed and accompanied by an
affidavit signed by the physician of the applicant attesting to the
applicant's temporary disability.
(h) After the cessation of the temporary disability, the applicant
must submit to the department a certification from the same physician,
if the physician is still the treating physician of the applicant, or from
a subsequent treating physician attesting to the termination of the
temporary disability.
(i) Upon the submission of the certification under subsection (h), the
department shall issue a temporary waiver of the continuing education
requirement. A temporary waiver is valid for ninety (90) days after the
date of issue and allows the individual to work as an elevator
contractor, elevator inspector, or elevator mechanic without the
completion of the continuing education requirement for ninety (90)
days.
(j) A temporary waiver of the continuing education requirement may
not be renewed.
SECTION 552. IC 22-15-5-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 123, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) A practitioner shall comply
with the standards established under this licensing program. A
practitioner is subject to the exercise of the disciplinary sanctions under
IC 22-12-7-7 if the department finds that a practitioner has:
(1) engaged in or knowingly cooperated in fraud or material
deception in order to obtain a license to practice, including
cheating on a licensing examination;
(2) engaged in fraud or material deception in the course of
professional services or activities;
(3) advertised services or goods in a false or misleading manner;
(4) falsified or knowingly allowed another person to falsify
attendance records or certificates of completion of continuing
education courses provided under this chapter;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

326
(5) been convicted of a crime that has a direct bearing on the
practitioner's ability to continue to practice competently;
(6) knowingly violated a state statute or rule or federal statute or
regulation regulating the profession for which the practitioner is
licensed;
(7) continued to practice although the practitioner has become
unfit to practice due to:
(A) professional incompetence;
(B) failure to keep abreast of current professional theory or
practice;
(C) physical or mental disability; or
(D) addiction to, abuse of, or severe dependency on alcohol or
other drugs that endanger the public by impairing a
practitioner's ability to practice safely;
(8) engaged in a course of lewd or immoral conduct in connection
with the delivery of services to the public;
(9) allowed the practitioner's name or a license issued under this
chapter to be used in connection with an individual or business
who renders services beyond the scope of that individual's or
business's training, experience, or competence;
(10) had disciplinary action taken against the practitioner or the
practitioner's license to practice in another state or jurisdiction on
grounds similar to those under this chapter;
(11) assisted another person in committing an act that would
constitute a ground for disciplinary sanction under this chapter;
or
(12) allowed a license issued by the department to be:
(A) used by another person; or
(B) displayed to the public when the license has expired, is
inactive, is invalid, or has been revoked or suspended.
For purposes of subdivision (10), a certified copy of a record of
disciplinary action constitutes prima facie evidence of a disciplinary
action in another jurisdiction.
(b) If an applicant or a practitioner has engaged in or knowingly
cooperated in fraud or material deception to obtain a license to
practice, including cheating on the licensing examination, the
department may rescind the license if it has been granted, void the
examination or other fraudulent or deceptive material, and prohibit the
applicant from reapplying for the license for a length of time
established by the department.
(c) The department may deny licensure to an applicant who has had
disciplinary action taken against the applicant or the applicant's license
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

327
to practice in another state or jurisdiction or who has practiced without
a license in violation of the law. A certified copy of the record of
disciplinary action is conclusive evidence of the other jurisdiction's
disciplinary action.
(d) The department may order a practitioner to submit to a
reasonable physical or mental examination if the practitioner's physical
or mental capacity to practice safely and competently is at issue in a
disciplinary proceeding. Failure to comply with a department order to
submit to a physical or mental examination makes a practitioner liable
to temporary suspension under subsection (h).
(e) Except as provided under subsection (f) or (g), a license may not
be denied, revoked, or suspended because the applicant or holder has
been convicted of an offense. The acts from which the applicant's or
holder's conviction resulted may, however, be considered as to whether
the applicant or holder should be entrusted to serve the public in a
specific capacity.
(f) The department may deny, suspend, or revoke a license issued
under this chapter if the individual who holds the license is convicted
of any of the following:
(1) Possession of cocaine or a narcotic drug under IC 35-48-4-6.
(2) Possession of methamphetamine under IC 35-48-4-6.1.
(3) Possession of a controlled substance under IC 35-48-4-7(a).
(4) Fraudulently obtaining a controlled substance under
IC 35-48-4-7(b) (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or
IC 35-48-4-7(c) (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014).
(5) Manufacture of paraphernalia as a Class D felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 6 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014) under IC 35-48-4-8.1(c).
(6) Dealing in paraphernalia as a Class D felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 6 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014) under IC 35-48-4-8.5(b).
(7) Possession of paraphernalia as a Class D felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 6 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014) under IC 35-48-4-8.3(b) (before
its amendment on July 1, 2015).
(8) Possession of marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia as a Class
D felony (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level
6 felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014) under
IC 35-48-4-11.
(9) A felony offense under IC 35-48-4 involving possession of a
synthetic drug (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-321), possession of a
controlled substance analog (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-8), or
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

328
possession of a synthetic drug lookalike substance (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-321.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019)) as a:
(A) Class D felony for a crime committed before July 1, 2014;
or
(B) Level 6 felony for a crime committed after June 30, 2014;
under IC 35-48-4-11.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019).
(10) Maintaining a common nuisance under IC 35-48-4-13
(repealed) or IC 35-45-1-5, if the common nuisance involves a
controlled substance.
(11) An offense relating to registration, labeling, and prescription
forms under IC 35-48-4-14.
(g) The department shall deny, revoke, or suspend a license issued
under this chapter if the individual who holds the license is convicted
of any of the following:
(1) Dealing in a controlled substance resulting in death under
IC 35-42-1-1.5.
(2) Dealing in cocaine or a narcotic drug under IC 35-48-4-1.
(3) Dealing in methamphetamine under IC 35-48-4-1.1.
(4) Manufacturing methamphetamine under IC 35-48-4-1.2.
(5) Dealing in a schedule I, II, or III controlled substance under
IC 35-48-4-2.
(6) Dealing in a schedule IV controlled substance under
IC 35-48-4-3.
(7) Dealing in a schedule V controlled substance under
IC 35-48-4-4.
(8) Dealing in a substance represented to be a controlled
substance under IC 35-48-4-4.5 (repealed).
(9) Knowingly or intentionally manufacturing, advertising,
distributing, or possessing with intent to manufacture, advertise,
or distribute a substance represented to be a controlled substance
under IC 35-48-4-4.6.
(10) Dealing in a counterfeit substance under IC 35-48-4-5.
(11) Dealing in marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia as a felony
under IC 35-48-4-10.
(12) An offense under IC 35-48-4 involving the manufacture or
sale of a synthetic drug (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-321), a
synthetic drug lookalike substance (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-321.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019)) under
IC 35-48-4-10.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019), a controlled
substance analog (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-8), or a substance
represented to be a controlled substance (as described in
IC 35-48-4-4.6).
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

329
(13) A violation of any federal or state drug law or rule related to
wholesale legend drug distributors licensed under IC 25-26-14.
(h) The department may temporarily suspend a practitioner's license
under IC 4-21.5-4 before a final adjudication or during the appeals
process if the department finds that a practitioner represents a clear and
immediate danger to the public's health, safety, or property if the
practitioner is allowed to continue to practice.
(i) On receipt of a complaint or an information alleging that a person
licensed under this chapter has engaged in or is engaging in a practice
that jeopardizes the public health, safety, or welfare, the department
shall initiate an investigation against the person.
(j) Any complaint filed with the office of the attorney general
alleging a violation of this licensing program shall be referred to the
department for summary review and for its general information and any
authorized action at the time of the filing.
(k) The department shall conduct a fact finding investigation as the
department considers proper in relation to the complaint.
(l) A practitioner may petition the department to accept the
surrender of the practitioner's license. The practitioner may not
surrender the practitioner's license without the written approval of the
department, and the department may impose any conditions appropriate
to the surrender or reinstatement of a surrendered license.
(m) A practitioner who has been subjected to disciplinary sanctions
may be required by the commission department to pay the costs of the
proceeding. The practitioner's ability to pay shall be considered when
costs are assessed. If the practitioner fails to pay the costs, a suspension
may not be imposed solely upon the practitioner's inability to pay the
amount assessed. The costs are limited to costs for the following:
(1) Court reporters.
(2) Transcripts.
(3) Certification of documents.
(4) Photo duplication.
(5) Witness attendance and mileage fees.
(6) Postage.
(7) Expert witnesses.
(8) Depositions.
(9) Notarizations.
SECTION 553. IC 22-15-6-0.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2019,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. This chapter applies to a regulated boiler and
pressure vessel as set forth in rules adopted by the commission
department under IC 4-22-2.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

330
SECTION 554. IC 22-15-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2019,
SECTION 33, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. Sections 2 through 3 of this chapter do not
apply to any regulated boiler or pressure vessel exempted by a rule
adopted by the commission department under IC 4-22-2.
SECTION 555. IC 22-15-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 167, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The department may conduct
a program of inspections of regulated boilers and pressure vessels.
(b) The department shall do the following:
(1) Issue a regulated boiler and pressure vessel operating permit
to an applicant who qualifies under this section.
(2) Perform an operating permit inspection of a boiler or pressure
vessel owned by the state.
(3) Conduct a program to audit boiler and pressure vessel
inspectors licensed under section 5 of this chapter.
(4) Conduct a program to audit inspections completed by a boiler
and pressure vessel inspector licensed under section 5 of this
chapter.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (e), an operating permit issued
under this section expires one (1) year after it is issued.
(d) To qualify for an operating permit or to renew an operating
permit under this section, an applicant must do the following:
(1) Apply for an operating permit on a form approved by the
department.
(2) Demonstrate through an inspection, performed by an inspector
licensed under section 5 of this chapter, that the regulated boiler
or pressure vessel covered by the application complies with the
rules adopted by the commission. department.
(3) Submit a report of the inspection conducted under subdivision
(2) to the department.
(4) Pay the fee set under IC 22-12-6-6(a)(8).
(e) The commission department may, by rule adopted under
IC 4-22-2, specify:
(1) a period between inspections of more than one (1) year; and
(2) an expiration date for an operating permit longer than one (1)
year from the date of issuance.
However, the commission department may not set an inspection
period of greater than five (5) years or issue an operating permit valid
for a period of more than five (5) years for regulated pressure vessels
or steam generating equipment that is an integral part of a continuous
processing unit.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

331
(f) For any inspection conducted by the department under this
section, the department may designate an inspector licensed under
section 5 of this chapter to act as the department's agent for purposes
of the inspection.
(g) The commission department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to implement this chapter.
SECTION 556. IC 22-15-6-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 120, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The department shall issue a
boiler and pressure vessel inspector license to an applicant who
qualifies under this section.
(b) To qualify for a license under this section an applicant must:
(1) meet the qualifications set by the commission department in
its rules;
(2) pass an examination approved by the commission department
and conducted, supervised, and graded as prescribed by the
commission; department; and
(3) pay the fee set under IC 22-12-6-6(a)(9).
(c) The commission department may exempt an applicant from any
part of the examination required by subsection (b) if the applicant has:
(1) a boiler and pressure vessel inspector's license issued by
another state with qualifications substantially equal to the
qualifications for a license under this section; or
(2) a commission as a boiler and pressure vessel inspector issued
by the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors.
(d) The commission department may sanction a boiler and pressure
vessel inspector under IC 22-12-7 if the boiler and pressure vessel
inspector violates this chapter or rules adopted by the commission.
department.
SECTION 557. IC 22-15-7-0.6, AS ADDED BY P.L.80-2024,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.6. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), the
department shall not inspect, and operating permits are not required
for, the following regulated amusement devices:
(1) A barrel train pulled by a garden tractor or a rubber tired farm
tractor propelled by a motor of not more than forty (40)
horsepower.
(2) A regulated amusement device exempt from the operating
permit and inspection requirements by a rule of the commission.
department.
(b) A regulated amusement device covered by this section shall
comply with all other requirements applicable to regulated amusement
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

332
devices under this chapter.
(c) The department may perform an inspection of a regulated
amusement device covered by this section only if a valid complaint or
incident is reported to the department concerning the regulated
amusement device.
SECTION 558. IC 22-15-7-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 122, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The department shall issue a
regulated amusement device operating permit to an applicant who
qualifies under this section. If an applicant qualifies for a permit under
this section, an inspector shall place an inspection seal on the device
that is covered by the permit.
(b) A permit issued under this section:
(1) expires one (1) year from the date the permit was issued; and
(2) may be renewed if the applicant continues to qualify for a
permit under this section.
(c) To qualify for a permit under this section, an applicant or an
authorized officer of the applicant shall pay the inspection fee set under
IC 22-12-6-6 and execute an application form affirming under penalties
for perjury the following:
(1) That all information provided in the application is true to the
best of the applicant's or officer's knowledge and belief after
reasonable investigation.
(2) That all personnel employed by the applicant having
maintenance responsibility for the amusement devices have or
will have sufficient background, knowledge, skills, and training
to adequately maintain the amusement devices under the rules of
the commission. department.
(3) That all persons employed by the applicant having operational
responsibility for the amusement devices have or will have
sufficient background, knowledge, skills, and training to
adequately operate the amusement devices under the rules of the
commission. department.
(4) That adequate training will be provided or otherwise made
available on an ongoing basis to maintenance and operational
personnel to ensure the continuous compliance of the personnel
with the standards set forth in subdivisions (2) and (3).
(5) That all maintenance and operational personnel will be trained
to recognize and report any condition that would prohibit the safe
operation of the amusement device.
(6) That, upon discovering a condition that would prohibit the
safe operation of an amusement device, both operational and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

333
maintenance personnel must possess the requisite authority to
immediately shut down the amusement device and report the
condition of the amusement device to supervisory personnel. An
amusement device that is shut down under this subdivision may
not be returned to operation until the amusement device complies
with ASTM standards for operation.
(7) That the applicant assumes full financial responsibility for:
(A) any condition or circumstance occasioned by, caused by,
or resulting from noncompliance with the maintenance and
operational standards set forth in subdivisions (2) through (6);
and
(B) any death, injury, or other loss occasioned by, caused by,
or resulting from noncompliance with the maintenance and
operational standards set forth in subdivisions (2) through (6).
(d) The execution of an application under subsection (c) by an
officer of an applicant corporation does not create individual financial
liability for the officer.
(e) The applicant must satisfy an inspector for the department that
the regulated amusement device meets the safety requirements set by
the commission. department.
SECTION 559. IC 22-15-7-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 124, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The commission department
shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to define appropriate training for a
person who inspects regulated amusement devices.
(b) The rules required under this section must, at a minimum,
provide the following:
(1) The adoption by reference of:
(A) ASTM F 698 (1994 edition) ("Specification for Physical
Information to be Provided to Amusement Rides and
Devices");
(B) ASTM F 770 (1993 edition) ("Practice for Operation
Procedures for Amusement Rides and Devices");
(C) ASTM F 846 (1992 edition) ("Guide for Testing
Performance of Amusement Rides and Devices");
(D) ASTM F 853 (1993 edition) ("Practice for Maintenance
Procedures for Amusement Rides and Devices");
(E) ASTM F 893 (1987 edition) ("Guide for Inspection of
Amusement Rides and Devices");
(F) ASTM F 1305 (1994 edition) ("Standard Guides for the
Classification of Amusement Ride and Device Related Injuries
and Illnesses"); or
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

334
(G) any subsequent published editions of the ASTM standards
described in clauses (A) through (F).
(2) A requirement that inspectors employed or contracted by the
department:
(A) have and maintain at least:
(i) a Level 1 certification from the National Association of
Amusement Ride Safety Officials or an equivalent
organization approved by the commission; department; or
(ii) an equivalent certification under a process or system
approved by the commission; department; and
(B) conduct inspections that conform to the rules of the
commission. department.
(3) A requirement that regulated amusement devices be operated
and maintained in accordance with the rules of the commission.
department.
(4) The commission's department's chief inspector or supervisor
of regulated amusement device inspectors must have and
maintain a Level I certification.
SECTION 560. IC 22-15-7-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. In addition to a
regularly scheduled inspection of a regulated amusement device, the
commission department may, upon demand by the commission,
department, inspect a regulated amusement device at any time
following:
(1) the report of an accident involving the regulated amusement
device; or
(2) a complaint concerning the regulated amusement device.
SECTION 561. IC 23-1.5-1-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.57-2013,
SECTION 22, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. "Architectural or engineering
professional" means an individual who is registered as:
(1) an architect under IC 25-4-1;
(2) a landscape architect under IC 25-4-2;
(3) a professional engineer under IC 25-31-1; IC 25-4-3; or
(4) a professional surveyor under IC 25-21.5.
SECTION 562. IC 23-1.5-1-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.48-2022,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 9. "Licensing authority" means the
following:
(1) In the case of an accounting professional, the Indiana state
board of public accountancy.
(2) In the case of an architectural professional, the board of
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

335
registration for architects and landscape architects. Indiana
board of registration for design professionals.
(3) In the case of an engineering professional, the state board of
registration for professional engineers.
(4) In the case of an attorney, the Indiana supreme court.
(5) In the case of a health care professional, the board (as defined
in IC 25-1-9-1) that issues the individual's license, certification,
or registration.
(6) In the case of a veterinarian, the Indiana board of veterinary
medicine.
(7) In the case of a professional surveyor, the state board of
registration for professional surveyors.
(8) In the case of a real estate professional, the Indiana real estate
commission.
SECTION 563. IC 24-5-0.5-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.48-2022,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 12. (a) It is an incurable deceptive act for an
individual, while soliciting or performing a consumer transaction, to
claim, either orally or in writing, to possess a doctorate degree or use
a title, a word, letters, an insignia, or an abbreviation associated with
a doctorate degree, unless the individual:
(1) has been awarded a doctorate degree from an institution that
is:
(A) accredited by a regional or professional accrediting agency
recognized by the United States Department of Education or
the Council on Postsecondary Accreditation;
(B) a religious seminary, institute, college, or university whose
certificates, diplomas, or degrees clearly identify the religious
character of the educational program; or
(C) operated and supported by a governmental agency; or
(2) meets the requirements approved by one (1) of the following
boards:
(A) Medical licensing board of Indiana.
(B) State board of dental examiners.
(C) Indiana optometry board.
(D) Board of podiatric medicine.
(E) (D) State psychology board.
(F) (E) Board of chiropractic examiners.
(G) (F) Indiana board of veterinary medicine.
(H) (G) Indiana board of pharmacy.
(I) (H) Indiana state board of nursing.
(b) It is an incurable deceptive act for an individual, while soliciting
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

336
or performing a consumer transaction, to claim to be a:
(1) physician unless the individual holds an unlimited license to
practice medicine under IC 25-22.5;
(2) chiropractic physician unless the individual holds a license as
a chiropractor under IC 25-10-1; or
(3) podiatric physician unless the individual holds a license as a
podiatrist under IC 25-29.
(c) The attorney general shall enforce this section in the same
manner as any other incurable deceptive act under this chapter.
SECTION 564. IC 25-0.5-3-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. IC 25-1-2-6(b) applies to the board of
registration for architects and landscape architects. Indiana board of
registration for design professionals.
SECTION 565. IC 25-0.5-3-18 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 18. IC 25-1-2-6(b) applies to the board of
podiatric medicine.
SECTION 566. IC 25-0.5-3-20 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 20. IC 25-1-2-6(b) applies to the state board
of registration for professional engineers.
SECTION 567. IC 25-0.5-3-26, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 26. IC 25-1-2-6(b) applies to the mining
board. bureau of mines and mine safety.
SECTION 568. IC 25-0.5-3-41 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 41. IC 25-1-2-6(b) applies to the midwifery
committee.
SECTION 569. IC 25-0.5-4-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. The board of registration for architects
and landscape architects Indiana board of registration for design
professionals (IC 25-4-1-2) is a board under IC 25-1-4.
SECTION 570. IC 25-0.5-4-10 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 10. The state board of registration for
professional engineers (IC 25-31-1-3) is a board under IC 25-1-4.
SECTION 571. IC 25-0.5-4-25 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 25. The board of podiatric medicine
(IC 25-29-2-1) is a board under IC 25-1-4.
SECTION 572. IC 25-0.5-5-9, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 9. The Indiana professional licensing agency
shall perform administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

337
the board of podiatric medicine (IC 25-29-2-1) under IC 25-1-5-3(a)
for the medical licensing board of Indiana in the performance of its
duties under IC 25-29.
SECTION 573. IC 25-0.5-5-21 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 21. The Indiana professional licensing
agency shall perform administrative functions, duties, and
responsibilities for the midwifery committee (IC 25-23.4-2-1) under
IC 25-1-5-3(a).
SECTION 574. IC 25-0.5-6-9, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 9. An individual licensed, certified,
registered, or permitted by the board of podiatric medicine
(IC 25-29-2-1) medical licensing board of Indiana under IC 25-29
is a provider under IC 25-1-5-10.
SECTION 575. IC 25-0.5-6-20, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 20. An individual licensed, certified,
registered, or permitted by the midwifery committee (IC 25-23.4-2-1)
under IC 25-23.4 is a provider under IC 25-1-5-10.
SECTION 576. IC 25-0.5-7-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. The Indiana professional licensing agency
shall perform administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for
the board of registration for architects and landscape architects Indiana
board of registration for design professionals (IC 25-4-1-2) under
IC 25-1-6-3(a).
SECTION 577. IC 25-0.5-7-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 7. The Indiana professional licensing agency
shall perform administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for
the state board of registration for professional engineers (IC 25-31-1-3)
under IC 25-1-6-3(a).
SECTION 578. IC 25-0.5-8-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. An occupation for which a person is
licensed, certified, or registered by the board of registration for
architects and landscape architects Indiana board of registration for
design professionals (IC 25-4-1-2) is a regulated occupation under
IC 25-1-7.
SECTION 579. IC 25-0.5-8-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 9. An occupation for which a person is
licensed, certified, or registered by the state board of registration for
professional engineers (IC 25-31-1-3) is a regulated occupation under
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

338
IC 25-1-7.
SECTION 580. IC 25-0.5-8-16, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 16. An occupation for which a person is
licensed, certified, or registered by the board of podiatric medicine
(IC 25-29-2-1) medical licensing board of Indiana under IC 25-29
is a regulated occupation under IC 25-1-7.
SECTION 581. IC 25-0.5-8-36, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 36. An occupation for which a person is
licensed, certified, or registered by the midwifery committee
(IC 25-23.4-2-1) under IC 25-23.4 is a regulated occupation under
IC 25-1-7.
SECTION 582. IC 25-0.5-9-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. The board of registration for architects
and landscape architects Indiana board of registration for design
professionals (IC 25-4-1-2) is a board under IC 25-1-8.
SECTION 583. IC 25-0.5-9-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 9. The state board of registration for
professional engineers (IC 25-31-1-3) is a board under IC 25-1-8.
SECTION 584. IC 25-0.5-9-12 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 12. The mining board (IC 22-10-1.5-2) is a
board under IC 25-1-8.
SECTION 585. IC 25-0.5-9-31 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 31. The board of podiatric medicine
(IC 25-29-2-1) is a board under IC 25-1-8.
SECTION 586. IC 25-0.5-10-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. The board of registration for architects
and landscape architects Indiana board of registration for design
professionals (IC 25-4-1-2) is a board under IC 25-1-8-6.
SECTION 587. IC 25-0.5-10-10 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 10. The state board of registration for
professional engineers (IC 25-31-1-3) is a board under IC 25-1-8-6.
SECTION 588. IC 25-0.5-10-25 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 25. The board of podiatric medicine
(IC 25-29-2-1) is a board under IC 25-1-8-6.
SECTION 589. IC 25-0.5-11-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 9. The board of podiatric medicine
(IC 25-29-2-1) is a board under IC 25-1-9.
SECTION 590. IC 25-0.5-12-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

339
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. The board of registration for architects
and landscape architects Indiana board of registration for design
professionals (IC 25-4-1-2) is a board under IC 25-1-11.
SECTION 591. IC 25-0.5-12-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 8. The state board of registration for
professional engineers (IC 25-31-1-3) is a board under IC 25-1-11.
SECTION 592. IC 25-1-2-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 7. Section 6 of this chapter applies to the
mining board (IC 22-10-1.5-2).
SECTION 593. IC 25-1-5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2023,
SECTION 79, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The agency shall employ necessary staff,
including specialists and professionals, to carry out the administrative
duties and functions of the boards, including but not limited to:
(1) notice of board meetings and other communication services;
(2) recordkeeping of board meetings, proceedings, and actions;
(3) recordkeeping of all persons licensed, regulated, or certified
by a board;
(4) administration of examinations; and
(5) administration of license or certificate issuance or renewal.
(b) In addition, the agency:
(1) shall prepare a consolidated statement of the budget requests
of all the boards described in IC 25-0.5-5;
(2) may coordinate licensing or certification renewal cycles,
examination schedules, or other routine activities to efficiently
utilize agency staff, facilities, and transportation resources, and to
improve accessibility of board functions to the public;
(3) may consolidate, where feasible, office space, recordkeeping,
and data processing services;
(4) shall operate and maintain the electronic registry of
professions established under IC 25-1-5.5;
(5) shall post each board's public meeting agenda on the
applicable board's website not less than seventy-two (72) hours
before a board's public meeting;
(6) shall post each board's public meeting minutes on the
applicable board's website not more than fourteen (14) calendar
days after adoption of the minutes by the board;
(7) shall post any vacancy on a board on the applicable board's
website within fourteen (14) calendar days of the vacancy;
(8) notwithstanding any other law:
(A) shall prescribe the application form and manner for each
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

340
board; and
(B) shall make any new application form publicly available on
the applicable board's website for sixty (60) calendar days
before being adopted by the agency; and
(9) shall send notification of incomplete items in an application
to the applicant every fourteen (14) calendar days after the
applicant initiates the application until the earlier of the
following:
(A) The date the application is completed.
(B) One (1) calendar year after the applicant initiates the
application; and
(10) may adopt and enforce procedural rules under
IC 25-1-6-3.
(c) In administering the renewal of licenses or certificates under this
chapter, the agency shall send a notice of the upcoming expiration of
a license or certificate to each holder of a license or certificate at least
ninety (90) days before the expiration of the license or certificate. The
notice must inform the holder of the license or certificate of the need
to renew and the requirement of payment of the renewal fee. If this
notice of expiration is not sent by the agency, the holder of the license
or certificate is not subject to a sanction for failure to renew if, once
notice is received from the agency, the license or certificate is renewed
within forty-five (45) days after receipt of the notice.
(d) In administering an examination for licensure or certification,
the agency shall make the appropriate application forms available at
least thirty (30) days before the deadline for submitting an application
to all persons wishing to take the examination.
(e) The agency may require an applicant for license renewal to
submit evidence proving that:
(1) the applicant continues to meet the minimum requirements for
licensure; and
(2) the applicant is not in violation of:
(A) the statute regulating the applicant's profession; or
(B) rules adopted by the board regulating the applicant's
profession.
(f) The agency shall process an application for renewal of a license
or certificate:
(1) not later than ten (10) days after the agency receives all
required forms and evidence; or
(2) within twenty-four (24) hours after the time that an applicant
for renewal appears in person at the agency with all required
forms and evidence.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

341
This subsection does not require the agency to issue a renewal license
or certificate to an applicant if subsection (g) applies.
(g) The agency may delay issuing a license renewal for up to one
hundred twenty (120) days after the renewal date for the purpose of
permitting the board to investigate information received by the agency
that the applicant for renewal may have committed an act for which the
applicant may be disciplined. If the agency delays issuing a license
renewal, the agency shall notify the applicant that the applicant is being
investigated. Except as provided in subsection (h), before the end of the
one hundred twenty (120) day period, the board shall do one (1) of the
following:
(1) Deny the license renewal following a personal appearance by
the applicant before the board.
(2) Issue the license renewal upon satisfaction of all other
conditions for renewal.
(3) Issue the license renewal and file a complaint under IC 25-1-7.
(4) Upon agreement of the applicant and the board and following
a personal appearance by the applicant before the board, renew
the license and place the applicant on probation status under
IC 25-1-9-9.
(h) If an individual fails to appear before the board under subsection
(g), the board may take action on the applicant's license allowed under
subsection (g)(1), (g)(2), or (g)(3).
(i) The applicant's license remains valid until the final determination
of the board is rendered unless the renewal is denied or the license is
summarily suspended under IC 25-1-9-10.
(j) The license of the applicant for a license renewal remains valid
during the one hundred twenty (120) day period unless the license
renewal is denied following a personal appearance by the applicant
before the board before the end of the one hundred twenty (120) day
period. If the one hundred twenty (120) day period expires without
action by the board, the license shall be automatically renewed at the
end of the one hundred twenty (120) day period.
(k) The board's renewal of a license does not preclude the board
from imposing sanctions on the licensee as a result of a complaint filed
by the attorney general after renewal of the license.
(l) Notwithstanding any other statute, the agency may stagger
license or certificate renewal cycles. However, if a renewal cycle for a
specific board or committee is changed, the agency must obtain the
approval of the affected board or committee.
(m) An application for a license, certificate, registration, or permit
is abandoned without an action of the board, if the applicant does not
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

342
complete the requirements to complete the application within one (1)
year after the date on which the application was filed. However, the
board may, for good cause shown, extend the validity of the application
for additional thirty (30) day periods. An application submitted after
the abandonment of an application is considered a new application.
SECTION 594. IC 25-1-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The licensing agency shall perform all
administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities assigned by law
or rule to the executive director, secretary, or other statutory
administrator of the entities described in IC 25-0.5-7.
(b) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to give the licensing
agency policy making authority for any professional standard of
practice, which remains with each board. The licensing agency may
adopt and enforce procedural rules in accordance with IC 4-22-2
for the administration of a board if the rule:
(1) will affect multiple boards; and
(2) is not inconsistent with any rule adopted by the affected
board.
SECTION 595. IC 25-1-11-6 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 6. A practitioner
registered as an architect or a landscape architect is subject to the
disciplinary sanctions under section 12 of this chapter if, after a
hearing, the board finds that the practitioner has:
(1) permitted the practitioner's seal to be affixed to plans,
specifications, or drawings that were not prepared by the
practitioner or under the practitioner's personal supervision by the
practitioner's regularly employed subordinates; or
(2) used the title "engineer" or advertised to practice engineering
and is not registered under IC 25-31-1. IC 25-4-3.
SECTION 596. IC 25-4-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]:
Chapter 0.5. Definitions
Sec. 1. The definitions in this chapter apply throughout this
article.
Sec. 2. "Approved engineering curriculum" means an
engineering curriculum of four (4) years or more that has been
approved by the board. In approving the engineering curriculum,
the board may take into consideration the standards of
accreditation adopted by the Engineering Accreditation
Commission of the Accreditation Board for Engineering and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

343
Technology.
Sec. 3. "Board" refers to the Indiana board of registration for
design professionals established by IC 25-4-1-2.
Sec. 4. "Engineering intern" means an individual who:
(1) is a graduate from an approved engineering curriculum of
four (4) years or more or who has acquired, through
engineering education and experience in engineering work,
knowledge and skill approximating that obtained by
graduation in an approved engineering curriculum of four (4)
years or more;
(2) has successfully passed an examination as prescribed in
IC 25-4-3-5; and
(3) has been issued by the board an appropriate certificate of
enrollment as an engineering intern.
Sec. 5. "Landscape architecture" means the practice of
professional services such as consultation, investigation,
reconnaissance, research, planning, design, or responsible
supervision to develop land areas for the dominant purpose of
preserving, enhancing, or determining:
(1) proper land uses;
(2) natural land features;
(3) ground cover and planting;
(4) naturalistic and aesthetic values;
(5) the settings and approaches to structures or other
improvements;
(6) the natural environment of a facility, an individual
building, or other structure;
(7) site specific natural surface and subsoil drainage systems;
(8) landscape grading, swales, curbs, and walkways; and
(9) any inherent problems of the land relating to erosion,
overuse, blight, or other hazards.
The term includes the location and arrangement of the proposed
tangible objects and features that are incidental and necessary to
accomplish the purposes of landscape architecture.
Sec. 6. "Licensing agency" means the Indiana professional
licensing agency established by IC 25-1-5-3.
Sec. 7. "Practice of engineering" means any service or creative
work that the adequate performance of requires engineering
education, training, and experience in the application of special
knowledge of the mathematical, physical, and engineering sciences
to services or creative work that includes the following:
(1) Consultation.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

344
(2) Investigation.
(3) Evaluation.
(4) Planning, including planning the use of land and water.
(5) The design of or the supervision of the design of
engineering works and systems.
(6) Engineering surveys and studies or the supervision of
engineering surveys and studies, including all surveying
activities required to support the sound conception, planning,
design, construction, maintenance, and operation of
engineered projects, but not including the surveying of real
property for the establishment of land boundaries,
subdivisions, rights-of-way, easements, and the dependent or
independent surveys or resurveys of the public land survey
system.
(7) Evaluation of construction for the purpose of assuring
compliance with specifications, plans, and designs, in
connection with any public or private utilities, structures,
buildings, machines, equipment, processes, work systems, or
projects.
The term "practice of engineering" does not include the work
ordinarily performed by persons who operate or maintain
machinery or equipment.
Sec. 8. "Practice or offer to practice engineering" means the act
of an individual or a business who by verbal claim, sign,
advertisement, letterhead, card, telephone listing, or in any other
way represents the individual or the business to be a professional
engineer or who performs, or offers to perform, any acts or work
involving the practice of engineering.
Sec. 9. "Practitioner" means an individual registered as a
landscape architect under this article.
Sec. 10. "Professional engineer" means an individual who, by
reason of that individual's special knowledge of the mathematical
and physical sciences and the principles and methods of
engineering analysis and design which are acquired by education
and practical experience, is qualified to engage in the practice of
engineering as attested by that individual's registration as a
professional engineer.
SECTION 597. IC 25-4-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2019,
SECTION 50, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. (a) There is hereby created and
established a board of registration for architects and landscape
architects, which shall consist of five (5) members, who shall be
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

345
appointed by the governor. The Indiana board of registration for
design professionals is established.
(b) All appointments:
(1) before July 1, 2019, shall be made for terms of three (3) years,
ending on December 31, serving the term for which the member
shall have been appointed and until the member's successor shall
have been appointed and shall have qualified; and
(2) after June 30, 2019, shall be made according to IC 25-1-6.5.
The board consists of nine (9) members, appointed by the governor
as follows:
(1) Four (4) registered professional engineers.
(2) Three (3) registered architects under this article.
(3) One (1) registered landscape architect under this article.
(4) One (1) member of the public who:
(A) is a resident of Indiana; and
(B) has never been associated with the engineering,
architecture, or landscape architecture professions in any
way other than as a consumer.
(c) A member of the board may be removed under IC 25-1-6.5-4.
All appointments, terms, and removals are governed by
IC 25-1-6.5.
(d) Each member of the board shall be entitled to receive as
compensation for the member's services a salary per diem for each and
every day the member may be engaged in attending the meetings or
transacting the business of the board; in addition thereto each member
shall be entitled to receive as reimbursement all traveling and other
necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the member's duties
as a member of the board in accordance with travel policies and
procedures established by the department of administration and the
state budget agency.
(e) Subject to 25-1-6.5-3, Each member of the board described in
subsection (b)(1) through (b)(2) shall:
(1) be a citizen of the United States of America;
(2) and have been a resident of the state of Indiana for at least
five (5) years immediately before appointment;
(3) hold an active registration in the member's respective
profession; and
(4) have at least ten (10) years of active professional practice,
including at least five (5) years in charge of professional work
or professional teaching.
(f) Three (3) of the members must be registered architects under this
chapter. Preferably these members would have at least ten (10) years
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

346
of active architectural practice preceding the member's appointment.
To the extent possible, the governor shall appoint members who
serve or have served in diverse areas of professional practice.
(g) One (1) member of the board must be registered as a landscape
architect under this chapter. Preferably this member would have at least
ten (10) years of active landscape architectural practice preceding the
member's appointment. Each member shall receive a certificate of
appointment from the governor and, before beginning the
member's term, shall file with the board secretary a written oath
or affirmation for the faithful discharge of official duties.
(h) One (1) member of the board, to represent the general public,
shall be a resident of this state who has never been associated with the
architecture or landscape architecture profession in any way other than
as a consumer.
SECTION 598. IC 25-4-1-3.3, AS ADDED BY P.L.220-2011,
SECTION 406, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3.3. The rules adopted by the
board of registration for architects before July 1, 2000, are considered,
after June 30, 2000, to be rules of the board. of registration for
architects and landscape architects.
SECTION 599. IC 25-4-1-11 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 11. Any person
licensed to practice architecture in this state, or registered as an
architect under this chapter, shall be exempt from the provisions of any
and all statutes in force in this state regulating the practice of
engineering: provided further, that no provision of this chapter shall
apply to or affect any individual, firm, limited liability company, or
corporation registered as a professional engineer under provisions of
IC 25-31-1. IC 25-4-3. An engineer, however, who is registered under
the laws of this state, and exempted from the provisions of this chapter,
shall not use the designation "architect" in any form or manner unless
and until he shall be registered under the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 600. IC 25-4-1-18 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. Nothing contained
in this chapter shall prevent the draftsmen, students, clerks of works,
superintendents, and other employees of those lawfully practicing as
registered architects, under the provisions of this chapter, from acting
under the instruction, control, or supervision of their employers, or to
prevent the employment of superintendents of the construction,
enlargement, or alteration of buildings, or any parts thereof, or prevent
such superintendents from acting under the immediate personal
supervision of the registered architect by whom the plans and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

347
specifications of any building, enlargement, or alteration were
prepared. Nor shall anything contained in this chapter apply to the
making of plans or specifications or the supervision of construction,
enlargement or alteration of buildings or any parts thereof specifically
exempted from the rules of the fire prevention and building safety
commission department of homeland security or specifically
exempted from the fire prevention and building safety commission
department of homeland security requirements for preparation of
such plans and specifications by registered architects or registered
engineers.
SECTION 601. IC 25-4-1-22 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 22. Except where the context clearly
indicates a different meaning, the following terms, as used in this
chapter, shall be construed to have the meaning hereinafter indicated:
The term "board" shall be construed to mean the board of
registration for architects and landscape architects.
SECTION 602. IC 25-4-1-28 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 28. This chapter shall be known and cited as
"The Indiana Architectural and Landscape Architectural Act".
SECTION 603. IC 25-4-1-29 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 29. (a) Except as
hereinafter otherwise provided, the state of Indiana, nor any board,
department or agency thereof, nor any county, city, town, township,
school corporations, or other political subdivision of this state shall
engage in the construction, alteration, or maintenance of any public
building or public work involving the practice of architecture for which
plans, specifications and estimates have not been prepared, certified,
and sealed by, and the construction, alteration, or maintenance
executed under the direct supervision of an architect, which architect
shall be the holder in good standing of a certificate of registration from
the board of registration for architects and landscape architects Indiana
board of registration for design professionals entitling him to
practice architecture in this state.
(b) No official of this state, nor of any city, town, county, township,
or school corporation thereof, charged with the enforcement of any law,
ordinance, or rule relating to the construction or alteration of buildings
or structures, shall use or accept or approve any plans or specifications
that have not been prepared by, or under the supervision of, and
certified by a registered architect. This subsection shall not apply if
such plans or specifications have been prepared by, or under the
supervision of and certified by a professional engineer who is
registered under the laws of the state of Indiana. This subsection shall
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

348
not apply to the construction or alteration of any building or structures
specifically exempted from the rules of the fire prevention and building
safety commission department of homeland security or specifically
exempted from the fire prevention and building safety commission
department of homeland security requirements for preparation of
such plans and specifications by registered architects or registered
engineers. This section shall not be construed as to abridge, or
otherwise affect, the powers of the fire prevention and building safety
commission, department of homeland security, or any other state
board or department, to issue rules governing the safety of buildings or
structures.
SECTION 604. IC 25-4-1-30 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 30. The board of
registration of architects must grant an extension for a total time of not
less than eight (8) years for an applicant to complete any section or
division of a reexamination given under section 9 of this chapter if the
applicant was unable to meet the original final date established by the
board to take reexaminations due to a disability or medical condition
that substantially interferes with the applicant's ability to take the
examination.
SECTION 605. IC 25-4-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.57-2013,
SECTION 31, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "board" means
the board of registration for architects and landscape architects as
established under IC 25-4-1-2.
(b) As used in this chapter, "landscape architecture" means the
practice of professional services such as consultation, investigation,
reconnaissance, research, planning, design, or responsible supervision
to develop land areas for the dominant purpose of preserving,
enhancing, or determining:
(1) proper land uses;
(2) natural land features;
(3) ground cover and planting;
(4) naturalistic and aesthetic values;
(5) the settings and approaches to structures or other
improvements;
(6) the natural environment of a facility, an individual building,
or other structure;
(7) site specific natural surface and subsoil drainage systems;
(8) landscape grading, swales, curbs, and walkways; and
(9) any inherent problems of the land relating to erosion, overuse,
blight, or other hazards.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

349
The term includes the location and arrangement of the proposed
tangible objects and features that are incidental and necessary to
accomplish the purposes of landscape architecture.
(c) As used in this chapter, "practitioner" means an individual
registered as a landscape architect under this chapter.
(d) (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), IC 25-4-0.5-5, this
chapter does not authorize a practitioner to:
(1) engage in the design of mechanical lift stations, sewage
treatment facilities, sanitary and combined sewers, storm water
management projects, public, semi-public, and private utilities, or
other structures or facilities with separate and self-contained
purposes, if the design work is ordinarily included in the practice
of architecture or engineering;
(2) engage in the design of highways or traffic control devices;
(3) engage in the scientific analysis of hazardous material
contamination;
(4) engage in topographic mapping or the certification of land
surveys or final land plats for official approval or recording;
(5) otherwise engage in the practice of architecture (as defined in
IC 25-4-1);
(6) otherwise engage in the practice of professional engineering
(as defined in IC 25-31); IC 25-4-0.5-7);
(7) engage in the practice of surveying (as defined in IC 25-21.5);
or
(8) engage in the practice of professional geology (as defined in
IC 25-17.6).
(e) (b) This chapter, except section 10(a)(1) and 10(a)(2) of this
chapter, does not apply to:
(1) the practice of landscape architecture by any person who acts
under the supervision of a practitioner or by an employee of a
person lawfully engaged in the practice of landscape architecture
and who, in either event, does not assume responsible charge of
design or supervision;
(2) the practice of architecture or land planning and proper land
usage by a duly registered professional architect or the doing of
landscape architectural work by a registered architect or by an
employee under the supervision of a registered architect;
(3) the practice of engineering or land planning and proper land
usage by a duly registered professional engineer and the doing of
landscape architectural work by a registered professional engineer
or by an employee under supervision of a registered professional
engineer;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

350
(4) the practice of surveying or land planning and proper land
usage by a professional surveyor and the doing of landscape
architectural work by a professional surveyor or by an employee
under supervision of a professional surveyor;
(5) the practice of landscape architecture by employees of the
United States government while engaged within this state in the
practice of landscape architecture for the United States
government;
(6) the practice of planning as is customarily done by regional,
park, or urban planners;
(7) the practice of arborists, foresters, gardeners, turf managers,
home builders, horticulturists, farmers, and other similar persons;
(8) the practice of any nurseryman or general or landscape
contractor, including design, planning, location, planting and
arrangements of plantings or other ornamental features; or
(9) the practice of natural resource professionals, including
biologists, geologists, or soil scientists.
SECTION 606. IC 25-4-3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]:
Chapter 3. Regulation of Engineers
Sec. 1. The board shall enforce and administer the provisions of
this chapter, and adopt rules, not inconsistent with the Constitution
and laws of this state, as may be reasonably necessary for the
proper performance of its duties and the regulations of the
proceedings before it. The board shall adopt rules establishing
standards for the competent practice of engineering and for the
administration of the registered professional engineers and
registered engineering interns investigative fund established by
section 20 of this chapter. Any rulemaking by the board shall be in
accordance with IC 4-22-2.
Sec. 2. (a) Except as provided in IC 25-31-1-35 and subsection
(b), the licensing agency shall receive and account for all money
collected under the provisions of this chapter and shall deposit the
money with the treasurer of state to be deposited by the treasurer
of state in the general fund of the state.
(b) In addition to the registration fee established under section
13(c) of this chapter, the board shall establish a fee of not more
than twenty dollars ($20) for registered professional engineers and
registered engineering interns to be paid at the time of:
(1) issuance of a certificate of registration; and
(2) renewal of a certificate of registration;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

351
under this chapter to provide funds for administering and
enforcing this chapter, including investigating and taking action
against persons violating this chapter. All funds collected under
this subsection shall be deposited into the registered professional
engineers and registered engineering interns investigative fund
established by section 20 of this chapter.
Sec. 3. (a) The following under either subdivision (1) or (2) shall
be considered as minimum evidence that the applicant is qualified
for registration as a professional engineer:
(1) All of the following:
(A) Graduation in an approved engineering curriculum of
four (4) years or more.
(B) A specific record of four (4) years or more of
progressive experience on engineering projects of sufficient
quality acquired subsequent to graduation, which
experience indicates that the applicant is qualified to be
placed in responsible charge of engineering work requiring
the exercise of judgment in the application of engineering
sciences to the sound solution of engineering problems.
(C) The successful passing of an examination as provided
for in section 5 of this chapter.
(2) All of the following:
(A) A specific record of eight (8) years or more of
engineering education and experience in engineering work,
which indicates that the applicant has acquired knowledge
and skill and practical experience in engineering work
approximating that required for registration as a
professional engineer under subdivision (1).
(B) The successful passing of an examination as provided
for in section 5 of this chapter.
(b) The following under either subdivision (1) or (2) shall be
considered as minimum evidence that the applicant is qualified for
certification as an engineering intern:
(1) All of the following:
(A) Graduation in an approved engineering curriculum of
four (4) years or more.
(B) The successful passing of an engineering intern
examination as provided in section 5 of this chapter.
(2) All of the following:
(A) A specific record of four (4) years or more of
engineering education and experience in engineering work
indicating that the applicant has acquired knowledge and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

352
skill approximating that acquired through graduation in
an approved engineering curriculum of four (4) years or
more.
(B) The successful passing of an engineering intern
examination as provided in section 5 of this chapter.
(c) The board may waive the examination under section 5 of this
chapter to any applicant who has been granted a certificate of
registration under section 13 of this chapter.
(d) An individual is not eligible for registration as a professional
engineer or certification as an engineering intern if the individual
has been convicted of:
(1) an act which would constitute grounds for disciplinary
sanction under IC 25-1-11; or
(2) a felony that has a direct bearing on the individual's ability
to practice competently.
(e) In considering the qualifications of applicants, responsible
charge of engineering teaching shall be construed as responsible
charge of engineering work. An applicant who holds a degree of
master of science of engineering or the equivalent thereof from a
curriculum in engineering approved by the board may be given a
maximum credit of one (1) year of experience in addition to the
credit of four (4) years of education. An applicant who holds a
degree of doctor of philosophy or the equivalent thereof from a
curriculum in engineering approved by the board may be given a
maximum of credit of two (2) years of experience in addition to a
credit of four (4) years of education. Graduation in a course other
than engineering from a college or university acceptable to the
board may be considered as equivalent to two (2) years engineering
experience and education. The mere execution, as a contractor of
work designed by a professional engineer, or the supervision of the
construction of such work as a foreman or superintendent shall not
be deemed to be engineering experience.
(f) Any person having the necessary qualifications to be
registered under this chapter is eligible for registration although
the individual may not be engaged in the practice of engineering at
the time the application is made.
Sec. 4. (a) An individual applying for registration as a
professional engineer or for certification as an engineering intern
shall apply for registration or certification on a form prescribed
and provided by the board. Each application for registration shall
contain statements showing the education and qualifications of the
applicant and a detailed summary of the technical work performed
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

353
by the applicant. An application for registration as a professional
engineer shall be accompanied by the names of five (5) persons to
be used as references, at least three (3) of whom are professional
engineers who have a personal knowledge of the experience of the
applicant. Each application for a certification as an engineering
intern must contain statements showing the education of the
applicant, and except for an application for an examination to be
given during the applicant's senior year, the application shall be
accompanied by the names of three (3) persons to be used as
references. All applications shall be certified to by the applicant as
to the correctness of the statements contained in the application.
(b) A person who knowingly makes a false statement in the
application commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) The amount of registration fees for a professional engineer
and for an engineering intern shall be fixed and determined by the
board under IC 25-1-8-2. The board shall also in its rules prescribe
the manner and the time for the paying of registration fees.
(d) In the event the board refuses to issue a certificate of
registration to any person who has made proper application for
registration as a professional engineer, any initial fee prescribed by
the board and deposited with the board by an applicant shall be
retained by the board as an application fee.
(e) In the event the board refuses to issue a certificate to any
person who has made proper application for certification as an
engineering intern, the fee prescribed by the board and deposited
by the applicant with the board shall be retained as an application
fee.
Sec. 5. (a) The examination required of all applicants for
registration as a professional engineer shall be a written or
computer based examination which shall be divided into the
following two (2) parts:
(1) Engineering fundamentals.
(2) Principles and practice of engineering.
The board may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 establishing additional
examination requirements.
(b) The engineering fundamentals portion of the examination
shall be designed to test the applicant's knowledge of mathematics
and the physical and engineering sciences. The standards of
proficiency required shall approximate that attained by graduation
in an approved four (4) year engineering curriculum.
(c) The principles and practice of the engineering portion of the
examination shall be designed primarily to test the applicant's
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

354
understanding of, and judgment and ability to apply correctly, the
principles of:
(1) mathematics;
(2) the physical sciences;
(3) the engineering sciences; and
(4) engineering design analysis and synthesis;
to the practice of professional engineering. A part of the
examination may be designed to test the applicant's knowledge and
understanding of the ethical, economic, and legal principles
relating to the practices of professional engineering.
(d) An applicant for registration as a professional engineer who
holds an engineering intern certificate issued in Indiana or in any
other state or territory having equivalent standards may be
exempted from the engineering fundamentals portion of the
examination.
(e) An applicant must successfully pass the engineering
fundamentals portion of the examination before taking the
principles and practice portion of the examination.
(f) Examinations shall be held at times and places as determined
by the board at least two (2) times each year. Examinations for
certification as an engineering intern may be held separately from
the examinations for registration as a professional engineer.
(g) An applicant for registration as a professional engineer who
is presently registered in another state or territory may be assigned
a written or computer based examination as the board deems
necessary to meet the requirements of this chapter.
(h) An applicant shall have three (3) attempts to pass each part
of the examination within a time period established by the board
by rule. The board may specify by rule the time required between
examinations and the opportunity for future examination attempts
for an applicant who fails to appear at an examination. The
amount of the fee to be paid for each examination shall be
determined by the board under IC 25-1-8-2.
(i) If an applicant who has failed a part of the examination three
(3) times reapplies and submits evidence of acquiring additional
knowledge for the examination, the board may give the applicant
approval to take subsequent examinations or partial examinations.
Sec. 6. (a) The board shall issue a certificate of registration,
upon the payment of the fee prescribed by the board under
IC 25-1-8-2 and the fee established by section 2(b) of this chapter,
to any applicant who, in the opinion of the board, has satisfactorily
met all requirements of this chapter. In the case of a professional
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

355
engineer, the certificate shall authorize the practice of
"professional engineering". The certificate of registration shall:
(1) show the full name of the registrant;
(2) bear a serial number and date; and
(3) be signed by a designee of the board.
The issuance of any certificate of registration by the board under
this chapter is evidence that the individual named on the certificate
is entitled to all the rights and privileges of a registered
professional engineer from the date on the certificate until it
expires or is revoked.
(b) The board shall issue a certificate of enrollment upon the
payment of the certificate fee prescribed by the board under
IC 25-1-8-2 to any applicant who, in the opinion of the board, has
satisfactorily met all of the requirements of this chapter. In the
case of an engineering intern, the certificate shall state that the
applicant has successfully passed the examination in engineering
fundamentals and has been enrolled as an engineering intern. The
certificate of enrollment shall:
(1) show the full name of the enrollee;
(2) bear a serial number and date; and
(3) be signed by the director of the licensing agency.
The issuance of a certificate of enrollment by the board is evidence
that the individual named on the certificate is entitled to all the
rights and privileges of an engineering intern while the certificate
remains unrevoked or until it expires.
Sec. 7. (a) The granting of registration extends to the registrant
the authority to use a seal of a design approved by the board
bearing the registrant's name, registration number, and the legend
"professional engineer".
(b) During the period of time that a registrant's certificate is
valid, the registrant is authorized to apply the registrant's seal to
plans, specifications, studies, drawings, and reports. Applying the
registrant's seal attests that:
(1) the work embodies the engineering work of the registrant;
(2) the registrant or an employed subordinate supervised by
the registrant prepared the documents, and in the context of
engineered plans "prepared" refers to the registrant's control
and direction of the engineering work and design process;
(3) the registrant assumes full professional responsibility for
the documents; and
(4) the work meets standards of acceptable engineering
practice.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

356
(c) It is unlawful for any person to stamp or seal any document
with a seal after the certificate of the registrant named on the seal
has expired or has been revoked.
Sec. 8. (a) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), unless renewed, a certificate
issued under this chapter expires on a date specified by the
licensing agency under IC 25-1-6-4 and expires biennially after the
initial expiration date. An applicant for renewal shall submit an
application in the manner prescribed by the board and pay the
renewal fee established by the board under IC 25-1-8-2 on or
before the renewal date specified by the licensing agency.
(b) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), if the holder of a certificate does
not renew the certificate by the date specified by the licensing
agency, the certificate expires and becomes invalid without the
board taking any action.
(c) The failure on the part of a registrant to renew a certificate
does not deprive the registrant of the right of renewal.
(d) If a certificate has been expired for not more than three (3)
years, the certificate may be reinstated by the board if the holder
of the certificate meets the requirements for reinstatement under
IC 25-1-8-6(c).
(e) If a certificate has been expired for more than three (3)
years, the certificate may be reinstated by the board if the holder
of the certificate meets the requirements for reinstatement under
IC 25-1-8-6(d).
Sec. 9. (a) The board may adopt rules requiring a professional
engineer to obtain continuing education for renewal of a certificate
under section 8 of this chapter.
(b) If the board adopts rules under this section, the rules must
do the following:
(1) Establish an inactive certificate of registration that:
(A) does not require the holder of an inactive certificate to
obtain continuing education; and
(B) prohibits the holder of an inactive certificate from
practicing engineering.
(2) Establish requirements for reactivation of an inactive
certificate.
Sec. 10. (a) A registration certificate for a professional engineer
may be issued only to a natural person.
(b) A business, including a proprietorship, partnership, or
corporation, doing business in Indiana may not practice or offer to
practice engineering unless that practice is carried on under the
responsible direction and supervision of a registered professional
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

357
engineer who is a full-time employee of the business. All plans,
sheets of designs, specifications, reports, studies, or other
engineering documents that require certification and are prepared
by the personnel of a business must carry the signature and seal of
the registered professional engineer who is in responsible charge
of the professional engineering work.
Sec. 11. (a) A county, city, town, township, school corporation,
or other political subdivision of this state may not engage in the
construction or maintenance of any public work involving the
practice of engineering for which plans, specifications, and
estimates have not been prepared, certified, and sealed by, and the
construction and maintenance executed under the direct
supervision of, a professional engineer. Any contract executed in
violation of this section is void.
(b) An official of this state, or of any city, town, county,
township, or school corporation, charged with the enforcement of
any law, ordinance, or rule relating to the design, construction, or
alteration of buildings or structures may not use or accept or
approve any plans or specifications that have not been prepared
by, or under the supervision of and certified by, a registered
professional engineer. This subsection does not apply:
(1) to plans or specifications prepared by, or under the
supervision of and certified by, an architect who is registered
under IC 25-4-1;
(2) to structures and construction listed in IC 22-15-3-3(a); or
(3) to plans or specifications contained in a registration,
license, or permit application, including an application for an
initial permit, the renewal of a permit, the modification of a
permit, or a variance from a permit submitted to the
commissioner of the department of environmental
management under IC 13, unless the permit is for the
approval of plans or specifications for construction for which
a professional engineer's seal is required by operation of
either state or federal law, rule, or regulation. This subsection
does not require a professional engineer's seal for an
application for an air quality construction permit under 326
IAC 2-1-3.
This section shall not be construed as to abridge or otherwise affect
the powers of any state board or department to issue rules
governing the safety of buildings or structures.
(c) All maps required to show the underground workings of any
mine in Indiana must be prepared, certified, and sealed by a
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

358
professional engineer or professional surveyor.
Sec. 12. (a) An employee or a subordinate of any person who
holds a certificate of registration under the provisions of this
chapter is exempt from the provisions of this chapter if the practice
of the employee or subordinate does not include responsible charge
of design or supervision.
(b) This chapter does not require registration for the purpose of
practicing engineering by an individual or a business:
(1) on property owned or leased by that individual or business
unless the engineering practice involves the public health or
safety, or the health or safety of the employees of that
individual or business;
(2) for the performance of engineering which relates solely to
the design or fabrication of manufactured products; or
(3) that is registered as a landscape architect under IC 25-4-2
and while the individual or business is engaged in the practice
of landscape architecture planning the use of land or water.
Sec. 13. The board may, upon application and payment of a fee
established by the board in the board's rules, issue a certificate of
registration as a professional engineer to an individual who holds
a valid certificate of registration as a professional engineer, issued
to the applicant by the proper authority of any state or territory or
possession of the United States if the requirements for registration
of professional engineers that the certificate of registration was
issued under do not conflict with the provisions of this chapter. In
determining the qualifications of an applicant, the board may
accept the verified professional record of the applicant that is
certified by the National Council of Examiners for Engineers and
Surveyors. However, an applicant meets the experience
requirement under section 3 of this chapter if the applicant:
(1) has at least three (3) years of engineering work experience
after the applicant graduates from an approved engineering
curriculum but before the applicant successfully passes an
examination required under section 5 of this chapter; and
(2) has been registered or licensed as a professional engineer
in another state for at least ten (10) years.
Sec. 14. A certificate of registration, or a certification as an
engineering intern to replace a certificate which has been lost,
destroyed, or mutilated, may be issued subject to the rules of the
board and the fee established under IC 25-1-8-2.
Sec. 15. A person who:
(1) practices or offers to practice engineering without being
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

359
registered or exempted under the laws of this state;
(2) presents as the person's own the certificate of registration
or the seal of another;
(3) gives any false or forged evidence of any kind to the board
or to any member of the board in obtaining a certificate of
registration;
(4) impersonates any other registrant;
(5) uses an expired, suspended, or revoked certificate of
registration; or
(6) otherwise violates this chapter;
commits a Class B misdemeanor.
Sec. 16. (a) It is the duty of all law enforcement officers of this
state, or any political subdivision, to enforce the provisions of this
chapter and to apprehend and prosecute any person who violates
any of the provisions of this chapter.
(b) The attorney general shall act as the legal advisor of the
board and render any legal assistance as may be necessary in
carrying out the provisions of this chapter.
(c) The attorney general and the licensing agency may use the
registered professional engineers and registered engineering
interns investigative fund established by section 20 of this chapter
to hire investigators and other employees to enforce the provisions
of this chapter and to investigate and prosecute violations of this
chapter.
Sec. 17. (a) The attorney general, the prosecuting attorney of
any county, the board, or a citizen of any county where a person
who is not exempted engages in the practice of engineering without
first having obtained a certificate of registration or without first
having renewed an expired certificate of registration may, in
accordance with the provisions of the laws of this state governing
injunctions, file an action in the name of the state of Indiana to
enjoin that person from engaging in the practice of engineering
until a certificate of registration is secured or renewed.
(b) Any person who has been enjoined and violates an injunction
shall be punished for contempt of court. An injunction does not
relieve a person engaged in the practice of engineering without a
certificate of registration or without first having renewed an
expired certificate of registration from a criminal prosecution.
(c) The remedy by injunction is in addition to any remedy
provided for herein for the criminal prosecution of the offender. In
charging any person in a complaint for violation of the provisions
of this chapter by engaging in the practice of engineering without
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

360
a certificate of registration or without having renewed an expired
certificate of registration, it is sufficient to charge that the
offender:
(1) on a certain day in a certain county practiced or offered to
practice engineering; and
(2) was not registered or exempted under this chapter.
Sec. 18. (a) Except as provided in IC 25-4-1-11, a person
registered as a professional engineer under this chapter is exempt
from the provisions of any and all statutes in force in this state
regulating the practice of architecture.
(b) This chapter does not apply to an individual registered as an
architect under IC 25-4-1. An architect, however, who is registered
under IC 25-4-1 and exempted from this chapter may not use the
designation "engineer" in any form or manner unless the architect
is registered under this chapter.
Sec. 19. (a) This section does not apply to a job position filled by
the department of environmental management.
(b) Unless a job position is filled by a professional engineer, the
state or a political subdivision (as defined in IC 36-1-2-13) may not
use the word "engineer" in the position's job title.
Sec. 20. (a) The registered professional engineers and registered
engineering interns investigative fund is established to provide
funds for administering and enforcing the provisions of this
chapter, including investigating and taking enforcement action
against violators of this chapter. The fund shall be administered by
the attorney general and the licensing agency.
(b) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
the money in the fund. The fund consists of money from the fee
imposed upon registered professional engineers and registered
engineering interns under section 9(b) of this chapter.
(c) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested.
(d) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund. If the total amount in the fund
exceeds five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) at the end of a
state fiscal year after payment of all claims and expenses, the
amount that exceeds five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000)
reverts to the state general fund.
(e) Money in the fund is continually appropriated for use by the
attorney general and the licensing agency to administer and
enforce the provisions of this chapter and to conduct investigations
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

361
and take enforcement action against persons violating the
provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 21. The board shall send written notice to the department
of homeland security established by IC 10-19-2-1 of the
determination of the board in a disciplinary action against an
engineer under IC 25-1-11. The board shall send the notice not
later than three (3) business days after the date of the board's
determination.
SECTION 607. IC 25-17.6-7-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. The following
persons are exempt from the requirements of licensure under this
article:
(1) An officer or employee of the United States government, state
government, or local government while engaged in providing
geological services for the officer's or employee's employers.
(2) A person engaged solely in geological research or the
instruction of geology.
(3) A person not engaged in the public practice of geology.
(4) A professional engineer registered under IC 25-31 IC 25-4-3
who applies geology to the practice of engineering.
(5) A soil scientist who is certified as a soil classifier or soil
scientist by the American Registry of Certified Professionals in
Agronomy, Crops and Soils (ARCPACS) and the Indiana
Association of Professional Soil Classifiers (IAPSC) and who
applies geology in the practice of soil science.
SECTION 608. IC 25-20-1-1.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2019,
SECTION 87, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) Subject to IC 25-1-6.5-3, there is
established the committee of hearing aid dealer examiners which
consists of five (5) four (4) members all appointed by the governor to
a term under IC 25-1-6.5. Three (3) members must be hearing aid
dealers licensed under this chapter, who are residents of this state and
who have been practicing as hearing aid dealers for at least one (1) year
prior to their appointment. One (1) member must be an
otolaryngologist in this state, who is a resident of this state and who has
been engaged in the practice of otolaryngology for at least one (1) year
prior to appointment to the committee. One (1) member must be a
resident of this state who is in no way associated with the business of
hearing aid dealers, audiology, or speech-language pathology other
than as a consumer. Whenever a vacancy occurs on the committee, the
governor shall appoint a successor under IC 25-1-6.5.
(b) Three (3) members present constitute a quorum. The
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

362
chairperson of the committee is not allowed to cast a vote on any
matter before the committee unless the chairperson's vote is
necessary to break a tie.
(c) The members serve without compensation, except that each
member is entitled to the salary per diem as provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1
and to reimbursement for travel, lodging, meals, and other expenses as
provided in the state travel policies and procedures established by the
department of administration and approved by the state budget agency.
(d) A member may be removed under IC 25-1-6.5-4.
SECTION 609. IC 25-20.2-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.127-2012,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. (a) This article applies to an individual
who conducts home inspections for compensation.
(b) This article does not apply to the following:
(1) An individual who is acting within the scope of the
individual's employment as:
(A) a code enforcement official for the state or a political
subdivision of the state; or
(B) a representative of a state or local housing agency or
authority acting under the authority of the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development.
(2) An individual who is:
(A) either:
(i) registered as an architect under IC 25-4;
(ii) registered as a professional engineer under IC 25-31;
IC 25-4-3; or
(iii) licensed as a plumbing contractor or journeyman
plumber under IC 25-28.5; and
(B) acting within the scope of the individual's registration or
license.
(3) An individual who is licensed under IC 25-34.1 as a real estate
broker and is acting within the scope of the individual's license.
(4) An individual who is licensed or certified under IC 25-34.1 as
a real estate appraiser and is acting within the scope of the
individual's license or certificate.
(5) An individual who holds a certificate of authority under
IC 27-1-27-2 as a public adjuster and is acting within the scope of
the individual's certificate.
(6) An individual who holds a permit, certificate, or license to:
(A) use and apply pesticides; or
(B) make diagnostic inspections and reports for wood
destroying pests;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

363
under IC 15-16-5 and is acting within the scope of the individual's
certificate or license.
(7) An individual who holds a license from a political subdivision
as a tradesperson or home builder and is acting within the scope
of the individual's license.
SECTION 610. IC 25-20.7-2-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.177-2009,
SECTION 37, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. This article does not apply to a person
who:
(1) does not profess to be a registered interior designer; and
(2) is:
(A) an architect registered under IC 25-4; or
(B) a professional engineer registered under IC 25-31.
IC 25-4-3.
SECTION 611. IC 25-21.5-2-13 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 13. The state shall
provide the board suitable office quarters in Indianapolis. The office
may be shared with the state board of registration for professional
engineers. Indiana board of registration for design professionals.
SECTION 612. IC 25-21.5-3-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. The licensing
agency may assign joint personnel to work for both the board and the
state board of registration for professional engineers. Indiana board
of registration for design professionals.
SECTION 613. IC 25-22.5-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.128-2022,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. (a) This article, as it relates to the
unlawful or unauthorized practice of medicine or osteopathic medicine,
does not apply to any of the following:
(1) A student in training in a medical school approved by the
board, or while performing duties as an intern or a resident in a
hospital under the supervision of the hospital's staff or in a
program approved by the medical school.
(2) A person who renders service in case of emergency where no
fee or other consideration is contemplated, charged, or received.
(3) A paramedic (as defined in IC 16-18-2-266), an advanced
emergency medical technician (as defined in IC 16-18-2-6.5), an
emergency medical technician (as defined in IC 16-18-2-112), or
a person with equivalent certification from another state who
renders advanced life support (as defined in IC 16-18-2-7), or
basic life support (as defined in IC 16-18-2-33.5):
(A) during a disaster emergency declared by the governor
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

364
under IC 10-14-3-12 in response to an act that the governor in
good faith believes to be an act of terrorism (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-329); and
(B) in accordance with the rules adopted by the Indiana
emergency medical services fire and EMS standards and
education commission or the disaster emergency declaration
of the governor.
(4) Commissioned medical officers or medical service officers of
the armed forces of the United States, the United States Public
Health Service, and medical officers of the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs in the discharge of their official
duties in Indiana.
(5) An individual who is not a licensee who resides in another
state or country and is authorized to practice medicine or
osteopathic medicine there, who is called in for consultation by an
individual licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine
in Indiana.
(6) A person administering a domestic or family remedy to a
member of the person's family.
(7) A member of a church practicing the religious tenets of the
church if the member does not make a medical diagnosis,
prescribe or administer drugs or medicines, perform surgical or
physical operations, or assume the title of or profess to be a
physician.
(8) A school corporation and a school employee who acts under
IC 34-30-14 (or IC 34-4-16.5-3.5 before its repeal).
(9) A chiropractor practicing the chiropractor's profession under
IC 25-10 or to an employee of a chiropractor acting under the
direction and supervision of the chiropractor under IC 25-10-1-13.
(10) A dental hygienist practicing the dental hygienist's profession
under IC 25-13.
(11) A dentist practicing the dentist's profession under IC 25-14.
(12) A hearing aid dealer practicing the hearing aid dealer's
profession under IC 25-20.
(13) A nurse practicing the nurse's profession under IC 25-23.
However, a certified registered nurse anesthetist (as defined in
IC 25-23-1-1.4) may administer anesthesia if the certified
registered nurse anesthetist acts under the direction of and in the
immediate presence of a physician.
(14) An optometrist practicing the optometrist's profession under
IC 25-24.
(15) A pharmacist practicing the pharmacist's profession under
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

365
IC 25-26.
(16) A physical therapist practicing the physical therapist's
profession under IC 25-27.
(17) A podiatrist practicing the podiatrist's profession under
IC 25-29.
(18) A psychologist practicing the psychologist's profession under
IC 25-33.
(19) A speech-language pathologist or audiologist practicing the
pathologist's or audiologist's profession under IC 25-35.6.
(20) An employee of a physician or group of physicians who
performs an act, a duty, or a function that is customarily within
the specific area of practice of the employing physician or group
of physicians, if the act, duty, or function is performed under the
direction and supervision of the employing physician or a
physician of the employing group within whose area of practice
the act, duty, or function falls. An employee may not make a
diagnosis or prescribe a treatment and must report the results of
an examination of a patient conducted by the employee to the
employing physician or the physician of the employing group
under whose supervision the employee is working. An employee
may not administer medication without the specific order of the
employing physician or a physician of the employing group.
Unless an employee is licensed or registered to independently
practice in a profession described in subdivisions (9) through
(18), nothing in this subsection grants the employee independent
practitioner status or the authority to perform patient services in
an independent practice in a profession.
(21) A hospital licensed under IC 16-21 or IC 12-25.
(22) A health care organization whose members, shareholders, or
partners are individuals, partnerships, corporations, facilities, or
institutions licensed or legally authorized by this state to provide
health care or professional services as:
(A) a physician;
(B) a psychiatric hospital;
(C) a hospital;
(D) a health maintenance organization or limited service
health maintenance organization;
(E) a health facility;
(F) a dentist;
(G) a registered or licensed practical nurse;
(H) a certified nurse midwife or a certified direct entry
midwife;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

366
(I) an optometrist;
(J) a podiatrist;
(K) a chiropractor;
(L) a physical therapist; or
(M) a psychologist.
(23) A physician assistant practicing the physician assistant
profession under IC 25-27.5.
(24) A physician providing medical treatment under section 2.1
of this chapter.
(25) An attendant who provides attendant care services (as
defined in IC 16-18-2-28.5).
(26) A personal services attendant providing authorized attendant
care services under IC 12-10-17.1.
(27) A respiratory care practitioner practicing the practitioner's
profession under IC 25-34.5.
(b) A person described in subsection (a)(9) through (a)(18) is not
excluded from the application of this article if:
(1) the person performs an act that an Indiana statute does not
authorize the person to perform; and
(2) the act qualifies in whole or in part as the practice of medicine
or osteopathic medicine.
(c) An employment or other contractual relationship between an
entity described in subsection (a)(21) through (a)(22) and a licensed
physician does not constitute the unlawful practice of medicine or
osteopathic medicine under this article if the entity does not direct or
control independent medical acts, decisions, or judgment of the
licensed physician. However, if the direction or control is done by the
entity under IC 34-30-15 (or IC 34-4-12.6 before its repeal), the entity
is excluded from the application of this article as it relates to the
unlawful practice of medicine or osteopathic medicine.
(d) This subsection does not apply to a prescription or drug order for
a legend drug that is filled or refilled in a pharmacy owned or operated
by a hospital licensed under IC 16-21. A physician licensed in Indiana
who permits or authorizes a person to fill or refill a prescription or drug
order for a legend drug except as authorized in IC 16-42-19-11 through
IC 16-42-19-19 is subject to disciplinary action under IC 25-1-9. A
person who violates this subsection commits the unlawful practice of
medicine or osteopathic medicine under this chapter.
(e) A person described in subsection (a)(8) shall not be authorized
to dispense contraceptives or birth control devices.
(f) Nothing in this section allows a person to use words or
abbreviations that indicate or induce an individual to believe that the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

367
person is engaged in the practice of medicine or osteopathic medicine.
SECTION 614. IC 25-22.5-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2019,
SECTION 97, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The medical licensing board of Indiana is
created. It shall consist
(b) Before January 1, 2027, the board consists of seven (7)
members, not more than four (4) of whom shall be members of the
same political party. The members shall be appointed by the governor,
and all vacancies occurring on the board shall be filled by the governor.
Subject to IC 25-1-6.5-3, the membership of the board shall consist
consists of the following:
(1) Five (5) reputable physicians who:
(A) are graduates of a medical school;
(B) hold the degree of doctor of medicine or its equivalent;
and
(C) hold valid unlimited licenses to practice medicine in
Indiana.
(2) One (1) reputable osteopathic physician who:
(A) is a graduate of an accredited osteopathic medical school;
(B) holds the degree of doctor of osteopathy or its equivalent;
and
(C) holds a valid unlimited license to practice osteopathic
medicine in Indiana.
(3) One (1) member who:
(A) will represent the general public;
(B) is a resident of this state; and
(C) is in no way associated with the medical profession other
than as a consumer.
(c) After December 31, 2026, the board consists of nine (9)
members, not more than five (5) of whom may be members of the
same political party. The members are appointed by the governor,
and all vacancies occurring on the board must be filled by the
governor. Subject to IC 25-1-6.5-3, the membership of the board
consists of the following:
(1) Three (3) reputable physicians who:
(A) are graduates of a medical school;
(B) hold the degree of doctor of medicine or its equivalent;
(C) hold valid unlimited licenses to practice medicine in
Indiana;
(D) have been practicing physicians for at least five (5)
years; and
(E) are residents of Indiana.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

368
(2) One (1) reputable osteopathic physician who:
(A) is a graduate of an accredited osteopathic medical
school;
(B) holds the degree of doctor of osteopathy or its
equivalent;
(C) holds a valid unlimited license to practice osteopathic
medicine in Indiana;
(D) have been practicing osteopathic physicians for at least
five (5) years; and
(E) are residents of Indiana.
(3) Three (3) members must be licensed podiatrists who
actively practice podiatric medicine and meet the following
conditions:
(A) Be licensed in Indiana as a podiatrist under IC 25-29.
(B) Be a resident of Indiana.
(C) Have practiced podiatric medicine for at least five (5)
years.
(4) Two (2) members who are certified direct entry midwives
who:
(A) have been practicing certified direct entry midwives
for at least five (5) years; and
(B) are residents of Indiana.
(b) (d) Members are appointed under IC 25-1-6.5.
(c) (e) A member of the board may be removed under IC 25-1-6.5-4.
SECTION 615. IC 25-22.5-13-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.129-2018,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Before March 1, 2016, the:
(1) board, concerning physician assistants;
(2) board of podiatric medicine, concerning podiatrists;
(3) state board of dentistry, concerning dentists; and
(4) Indiana state board of nursing, concerning advanced practice
registered nurses;
shall adopt rules necessary to complement the rules for prescribing
opioid controlled substances for pain management treatment adopted
by the board under sections 1 and 2 of this chapter.
(b) Before December 31, 2015, each board specified in subsection
(a) shall provide a report in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6 to the
legislative council providing a status report on efforts to adopt the rules
required by subsection (a). The status report must include:
(1) a copy of the board's rulemaking docket required by
IC 4-22-2-22.5; and
(2) a reasonable estimate of the timetable for action required
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

369
under IC 4-22-2-22.5(d)(8).
(c) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 616. IC 25-23-1-7.2, AS ADDED BY P.L.148-2023,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 7.2. (a) As used in this section, "nursing
education program" means a nursing education program that is required
to be authorized by the board for proprietary education (established by
IC 21-18.5-5-1). commission for higher education established by
IC 21-18-2-1.
(b) The board may not prohibit a nursing education program from
submitting an application for accreditation to the board before being
authorized by the board for proprietary education (established by
IC 21-18.5-5-1). commission for higher education established by
IC 21-18-2-1.
(c) The board shall review and approve or deny a nursing education
program's application for accreditation within ninety (90) days of being
authorized by the board for proprietary education (established by
IC 21-18.5-5-1) commission for higher education established by
IC 21-18-2-1 unless the nursing education program, after receiving
authorization from the board of proprietary education, commission for
higher education, requests additional time from the board before the
board's review of the application.
SECTION 617. IC 25-23.4-1-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 5. "Committee" refers to the midwifery
committee established by IC 25-23.4-2.
SECTION 618. IC 25-23.4-2-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. This chapter expires December
31, 2026.
SECTION 619. IC 25-23.4-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]:
Chapter 2.5. Duties of the Medical Licensing Board of Indiana
Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the enactment
of this chapter must be construed as a recodification of prior law
that does not result in a substantive change to the powers and
duties of the board under this article.
(b) The board is released from any obligation to consult with the
midwifery committee established under IC 25-23.4-2 (before its
expiration) in carrying out its duties under this article.
Sec. 2. (a) The board shall do the following:
(1) Establish as a requirement for certification as a certified
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

370
direct entry midwife the Certified Professional Midwife
credentials developed by the North American Registry of
Midwives or a successor organization.
(2) Subject to IC 25-1-8-2, establish fees to administer this
article.
(3) Establish annual continuing education requirements to
renew a certified direct entry midwife's certificate, which
must include continuing education in pharmacology. The
requirements established under this subdivision must provide
for at least fifteen (15) hours of continuing education every
twelve (12) months.
(4) Develop a peer review procedure, using as guidelines the
peer review procedures established by:
(A) the Indiana Midwives Association or a successor
organization; and
(B) the North American Registry of Midwives or a
successor organization.
(b) The board shall do the following:
(1) In addition to the requirements under IC 25-23.4-5, adopt
rules under IC 4-22-2 to provide for adequate collaboration
between a certified direct entry midwife and a collaborating
physician.
(2) Adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 that define the competent
practice for certified direct entry midwives. Rules adopted
under this subdivision must limit the practice of certified
direct entry midwives to nonhospital settings.
(3) Adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 that establish standards for
an emergency plan of care, including that a plan must allow
for the timely provision of emergency care at a hospital.
(4) In addition to the requirements under IC 25-23.4-4-1(a)(6),
adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to set standards for determining
the geographic area close enough to the planned location of
the delivery to make the collaborating physician a reasonable
choice to provide backup care.
(5) In addition to the requirements under IC 25-23.4-5-1(b),
adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to establish standards or
conditions that require additional review of a certified direct
entry midwife's client encounters by the collaborating
physician.
(6) Adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to determine the number of
certified direct entry midwives with whom a physician may
collaborate.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

371
(7) In addition to the requirements under IC 25-23.4-6-1(b),
establish the conditions that require a certified direct entry
midwife to refer a client for an examination by a physician.
(8) Adopt rules under IC 4-22-2, establishing the health
conditions that require a referral to a physician under
IC 25-23.4-6-1(c).
(c) The board may not adopt rules to grant a certified direct
entry midwife prescriptive authority other than the authority
specified in IC 25-23.4-4-5.
Sec. 3. The board shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
administer this article.
SECTION 620. IC 25-23.4-3-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.232-2013,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. The board shall after receiving
recommendations from the committee, do the following:
(1) Determine the education that satisfies the requirements in
section 1 of this chapter.
(2) Establish formal education requirements in addition to those
required in section 1 of this chapter. The requirements must
include course material on:
(A) emergency life support procedures;
(B) identification of high risk births for mothers;
(C) identification of potential complications during labor; and
(D) other material the board specifies.
SECTION 621. IC 25-26-24-2 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "committee"
refers to the INSPECT oversight committee established by section 24
of this chapter.
SECTION 622. IC 25-26-24-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.17-2021,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 17. (a) The board shall provide for an
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, and controlled substance prescription
monitoring program that includes the following components:
(1) Each time ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or a controlled
substance designated by the board under IC 35-48-2-5 through
IC 35-48-2-10 is dispensed, the dispenser shall transmit to the
INSPECT program the following information:
(A) The ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or controlled substance
recipient's name.
(B) The ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or controlled substance
recipient's or the recipient representative's identification
number or the identification number or phrase designated by
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

372
the INSPECT program.
(C) The ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or controlled substance
recipient's date of birth.
(D) The national drug code number of the ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or controlled substance dispensed.
(E) The date the ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or controlled
substance is dispensed.
(F) The quantity of the ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
controlled substance dispensed.
(G) The number of days of supply dispensed.
(H) The dispenser's United States Drug Enforcement Agency
registration number.
(I) The prescriber's United States Drug Enforcement Agency
registration number.
(J) An indication as to whether the prescription was
transmitted to the pharmacist orally or in writing.
(K) Other data required by the board.
(2) The information required to be transmitted under this section
must be transmitted not more than twenty-four (24) hours after the
date on which ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or a controlled
substance is dispensed. However, if the dispenser's pharmacy is
closed the day following the dispensing, the information must be
transmitted by the end of the next business day. A dispenser who
is also authorized to prescribe is required only to report actual
dispensations within twenty-four (24) hours of the dispensation.
(3) A dispenser shall transmit the information required under this
section by:
(A) uploading to the INSPECT Internet web site; or
(B) another electronic method that meets specifications
prescribed by the board.
(4) The board may require that prescriptions for ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or controlled substances be written on a one (1)
part form that cannot be duplicated. However, the board may not
apply such a requirement to prescriptions filled at a pharmacy
with a Category II permit (as described in IC 25-26-13-17) and
operated by a hospital licensed under IC 16-21, or prescriptions
ordered for and dispensed to bona fide enrolled patients in
facilities licensed under IC 16-28. The board may not require
multiple copy prescription forms for any prescriptions written.
The board may not require different prescription forms for any
individual drug or group of drugs. Prescription forms required
under this subdivision must be approved by the Indiana board of
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

373
pharmacy created by IC 25-26-13-3.
(5) The costs of the program.
(6) As part of the information to be completed in the data base
and, if available, an entry where a dispenser indicates that a
patient is participating in a pain management contract with a
designated practitioner.
Beginning January 1, 2027, the board is responsible for
implementing policies and standards that promote the effective
operation of the program.
(b) The board shall consider the recommendations of the committee
concerning the INSPECT program.
(c) (b) This subsection applies only to a retail pharmacy. A
pharmacist, pharmacy technician, or person authorized by a pharmacist
to dispense ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or a controlled substance may
not dispense ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or a controlled substance to
a person who is not personally known to the pharmacist, pharmacy
technician, or person authorized by a pharmacist to dispense a
controlled substance unless the person taking possession of the
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or controlled substance provides
documented proof of the person's identification to the pharmacist,
pharmacy technician, or person authorized by a pharmacist to dispense
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or a controlled substance.
SECTION 623. IC 25-26-24-18, AS ADDED BY P.L.51-2019,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 18. (a) The INSPECT program must do the
following:
(1) Create a data base for information required to be transmitted
under section 17 of this chapter in the form required under rules
adopted by the board, including search capability for the
following:
(A) An ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or a controlled substance
recipient's name.
(B) An ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or a controlled substance
recipient's or recipient representative's identification number.
(C) An ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or a controlled substance
recipient's date of birth.
(D) The national drug code number of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or a controlled substance dispensed.
(E) The dates ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or a controlled
substance are dispensed.
(F) The quantities of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
controlled substance dispensed.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

374
(G) The number of days of supply dispensed.
(H) A dispenser's United States Drug Enforcement Agency
registration number.
(I) A prescriber's United States Drug Enforcement Agency
registration number.
(J) Whether a prescription was transmitted to the pharmacist
orally or in writing.
(K) An ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or a controlled substance
recipient's method of payment for the ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or controlled substance dispensed.
To the extent considered appropriate by the board, the data base
must be interoperable with other similar registries operated by
federal and state governments.
(2) Provide the board with continuing twenty-four (24) hour a day
online access to the data base.
(3) Secure the information collected and the data base maintained
against access by unauthorized persons.
(b) The board may not execute a contract with a vendor designated
by the board to perform any function associated with the administration
of the INSPECT program, unless the contract has been approved by the
committee.
(c) (b) The INSPECT program may gather prescription data from
the Medicaid retrospective and prospective drug utilization review
(DUR) program established under IC 12-15-35.
(d) (c) The board may accept and designate grants, public and
private financial assistance, and licensure fees to provide funding for
the INSPECT program.
SECTION 624. IC 25-26-24-24 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 24. (a) The INSPECT oversight committee
is established.
(b) The committee consists of the following members:
(1) The president of the board or the president's designee, who
shall serve as the chairperson of the committee.
(2) The commissioner of the Indiana department of health or the
commissioner's designee.
(3) The superintendent of the state police department or the
superintendent's designee.
(4) The attorney general or the attorney general's designee.
(5) Two (2) lay members who are authorized users of the
INSPECT program appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate, not more than one (1) of whom may be affiliated with the
same political party.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

375
(6) Two (2) lay members who are authorized users of the
INSPECT program appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, not more than one (1) of whom may be affiliated
with the same political party.
(c) The committee shall provide recommendations to the board
concerning the implementation of policies, standards, and rules that
promote the effective operation of the program.
(d) The committee shall meet:
(1) at least once each calendar year; and
(2) at the call of the chairperson.
(e) The term of a member of the committee appointed under this
section is four (4) years. The term of a member of the committee
expires July 1, but a member may continue to serve on the committee
until a successor is appointed.
(f) On or before July 1, 2027, and July 1 biennially thereafter, the
committee shall submit a report to the executive director of the
legislative services agency, in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6, for
review by the interim committee on government in accordance with
IC 1-1-15.5-4 and IC 2-5-1.3-13(g). The report shall describe:
(1) official action taken; and
(2) actionable items considered;
by the committee during the preceding two (2) years.
SECTION 625. IC 25-28.5-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2006,
SECTION 469, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Plumbing" means the practice of and the materials and fixtures
used in the installation, maintenance, extension, and alteration of all
piping, fixtures, appliances, and appurtenances in connection with any
of the following:
(A) Sanitary drainage or storm drainage facilities, the venting
system, and the public or private water supply systems, within or
adjacent to any building or structure.
(B) The practice and materials used in the installation,
maintenance, extension, or alteration of the stormwater, liquid
waste, or sewerage, and water supply systems of any premises to
the private property line or to their connection with any point of
public disposal or other acceptable terminal.
The term does not include the planning, designing, and installation of
sanitation and water systems in vehicles commonly known as mobile
homes, the drilling of wells, the installation of pumps, pressure tanks,
and piping incidental to the drilling or repair of a well system, the sale
or installation of water softening equipment and apparatuses and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

376
services of the same, or the business of manufacturing or selling
plumbing fixtures; appliances, equipment, or hardware; the installation
of automatic sprinklers, the overhead or underground water supplies or
standpipes when connected to an automatic sprinkler system or to their
related devices or appurtenances connecting thereto; nor does the term
include the work referred to in section 32(i) of this chapter; nor does
the term include the planning or design of water supply or sewage
systems which would ordinarily be performed as "the practice of
engineering", as defined in IC 25-31-1, IC 25-4-0.5-7, or the "practice
of architecture", as defined in IC 25-4-1.
(2) "Plumbing contractor" means any person who, for compensation,
undertakes to, or submits a bid to, or does himself or herself or by
others, construct, repair, alter, remodel, add to, subtract from, or
improve plumbing and who is responsible for substantially all the
plumbing within the entire project, or one who fabricates units or
plumbing substantially completed and ready for installation.
(3) "Journeyman plumber" means a person who engages or offers to
engage in, as an occupation or trade, the construction, installation,
alteration, maintenance, repair, remodeling, or removal and
replacement of plumbing under the supervision, direction, and
responsibility of a licensed plumbing contractor.
(4) "Maintenance man" means a person who is employed on a
permanent basis to keep the premises of a business establishment in
good repair.
(5) "Contracting" means, except as exempted in this chapter,
engaging in a business as a contractor.
(6) "Person" means a natural person, except in the case of a
plumbing contractor, in which case it may mean the partners or
members of a partnership, limited partnership, or any form of
unincorporated enterprise, owned by two (2) or more persons, and as
applied to "corporation" in addition to the corporate entity means the
officers or directors and employees thereof.
(7) "Commission" means the Indiana plumbing commission created
by this chapter.
(8) "License" means a certificate issued by the commission
established by this chapter which confers upon the holder the privilege
to act as a plumbing contractor or a journeyman plumber as defined in
this chapter.
(9) "Farmstead" means a farm dwelling together with other
buildings, structures, equipment, piping, and other plumbing materials
and supplies, located upon a parcel of real estate used primarily for
agricultural purposes located outside the corporate limits of a
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

377
municipality and not connected to a public water supply.
(10) "Licensing agency" means the Indiana professional licensing
agency established under IC 25-1-5-3.
(11) "Apprentice plumber" means an individual who:
(A) is learning the plumbing trade; and
(B) is under the direction and immediate supervision of a licensed
plumbing contractor or a licensed journeyman plumber.
(12) "Registration" means the granting of a certificate by the
commission that authorizes an individual to act as an apprentice
plumber.
SECTION 626. IC 25-29-1-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 10. "Board" refers
to the board of podiatric medicine established by IC 25-29-2-1.
medical licensing board of Indiana established by IC 25-22.5-2-1.
SECTION 627. IC 25-29-2-1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 1. The board of podiatric medicine is
established.
SECTION 628. IC 25-29-2-2 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 2. (a) The board consists of five (5) members
appointed by the governor.
(b) Subject to IC 25-1-6.5-3, four (4) members must be licensed
podiatrists who actively practice podiatric medicine and who meet the
following conditions:
(1) Be licensed in Indiana as a podiatrist under this article.
(2) Be a resident of Indiana.
(3) Have practiced podiatric medicine for at least five (5) years.
(c) Subject to IC 25-1-6.5-3, one (1) member of the board must meet
the following conditions:
(1) Be a resident of Indiana.
(2) Not be associated with the practice of podiatry other than as
a consumer.
SECTION 629. IC 25-29-2-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 3. A member of the board serves a term:
(1) if appointed before July 1, 2019, of three (3) years and until
the member's successor is appointed and qualified; and
(2) if appointed after June 30, 2019, a term under IC 25-1-6.5.
SECTION 630. IC 25-29-2-4 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 4. The governor may remove a member of
the board under IC 25-1-6.5-4.
SECTION 631. IC 25-29-2-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 5. A quorum of the board consists of a
majority of the appointed members. At least three (3) votes are
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

378
necessary for the board to take official action.
SECTION 632. IC 25-29-2-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 6. (a) The board shall hold at least one (1)
meeting each year. The board may hold additional meetings that the
board considers necessary.
(b) A meeting may be called by the chairman or by a majority of the
members of the board.
SECTION 633. IC 25-29-2-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 7. Each year the board shall elect a chairman
and any other officers from its members that the board considers
necessary.
SECTION 634. IC 25-29-2-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 8. Each member of the board is entitled to
receive the minimum salary per diem provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b).
The member is also entitled to reimbursement for traveling and
expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually
incurred in connection with the member's duties as provided in the state
policies and procedures prepared by the Indiana department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
SECTION 635. IC 25-30-1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2021,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. This chapter does not require any of the
following persons to be a licensee:
(1) A law enforcement officer of the United States, a state, or a
political subdivision of a state to the extent that the officer or
employee is engaged in the performance of the officer's or
employee's official duties.
(2) Any person to the extent that the person is engaged in the
business of furnishing and obtaining information concerning the
financial rating of other persons.
(3) A collection agency licensed by the secretary of state or its
employee acting within the scope of the employee's employment,
to the extent that the person is making an investigation incidental
to the business of the agency, including an investigation of the
location of a debtor or a debtor's assets in a property that the client
has an interest in or a lien upon.
(4) An attorney or employee of an attorney to the extent that the
person is engaged in investigative matters incident to the delivery
of professional services that constitute the practice of law.
(5) An insurance adjuster to the extent that the adjuster is
employed in the investigation and settlement of claims made
against insurance companies or persons insured by insurance
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

379
companies if the adjuster is a regular employee of the insurance
company and the insurance company is authorized to do business
in Indiana and is complying with the laws regulating insurance
companies in Indiana.
(6) A person primarily engaged in the business of furnishing
information for:
(A) business decisions and transactions in connection with
credit, employment, or marketing; or
(B) insurance underwriting purposes;
including a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair
Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. 1681 et seq.).
(7) A retail merchant or an employee of the retail merchant to the
extent that the person is hiring a private investigator for the
purposes of loss prevention investigations for the retail merchant's
retail establishment.
(8) A professional engineer registered under IC 25-31 IC 25-4-3
or a person acting under a registered professional engineer's
supervision, to the extent the professional engineer is engaged in
an investigation incident to the practice of engineering.
(9) An architect with a certificate of registration under IC 25-4, to
the extent the architect is engaged in an investigation incident to
the practice of architecture.
(10) A professional surveyor with a certificate of registration
under IC 25-21.5, to the extent the professional surveyor is
engaged in an investigation incident to the practice of surveying.
(11) A certified public accountant with a certificate under
IC 25-2.1-3, to the extent that the person is engaged in an
investigation incident to the practice of accountancy.
(12) An independent consultant employed by the attorney general
under IC 32-34-1.5-60, to the extent that the independent
consultant is engaged in providing services for the attorney
general.
SECTION 636. IC 25-31 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JANUARY
1, 2027]. (Professional Engineers).
SECTION 637. IC 25-31.5-1-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. This article
does not apply to the following individuals:
(1) An officer or employee of:
(A) the federal government;
(B) state government; or
(C) local government;
while providing soil science services for the officer's or
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

380
employee's employer.
(2) An individual engaged solely in soil science research or the
instruction of soil science.
(3) An individual not engaged in the public practice of soil
science.
(4) A professional engineer registered under IC 25-31 IC 25-4-3
who applies soil science to the practice of engineering.
(5) A professional geologist certified under IC 25-17.6 who
applies soil science to the practice of geology.
(6) A person who is a certified professional erosion and sediment
control specialist (CPESC) or soil conservationist who uses soil
science in making land use decisions for the conservation of soil
and water resources.
(7) A professional wetlands specialist who applies soil science to
make wetland delineations or determinations.
SECTION 638. IC 25-35.6-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2019,
SECTION 135, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) There is established the
speech-language pathology and audiology board.
(b) The board shall be comprised of five (5) four (4) members, who
shall be appointed by the governor. Subject to IC 25-1-6.5-3, four (4)
board members shall have been residents of this state for at least one
(1) year immediately preceding their appointment and shall have been
engaged in rendering services to the public, teaching, or research in
speech-language pathology or audiology for at least five (5) years
immediately preceding their appointment. At least two (2) board
members shall be speech-language pathologists and at least two (2)
shall be audiologists. Subject to IC 25-1-6.5-3, the fifth member of the
board, to represent the general public, shall be a resident of this state
who has never been associated with speech-language pathology or
audiology in any way other than as a consumer. Except for the member
representing the general public, All board members shall at all times be
holders of active and valid licenses for the practice of speech-language
pathology or audiology in this state.
(c) A member may be removed under IC 25-1-6.5-4.
(d) Appointments shall be:
(1) for members appointed before July 1, 2019, for a three year
term; and
(2) for members appointed after June 30, 2019, for a term under
IC 25-1-6.5.
(e) The governor may consider, but shall not be bound to accept,
recommendations for board membership made by a statewide
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

381
association for speech-language and hearing. A statewide association
for speech-language and hearing may submit to the governor its
recommendations for board membership not less than sixty (60) days
after a vacancy. In the event of a mid-term vacancy, such association
may make recommendations for filling such vacancy.
(f) At the first meeting of the board each year, members shall elect
a chairperson for the subsequent twelve (12) month period. Further
meetings may be convened at the call of the chairperson or the written
request of any two (2) board members. All meetings of the board shall
be open to the public, except that the board may hold closed sessions
to prepare, approve, grade, or administer examinations or, upon request
of an applicant who fails an examination, to prepare a response
indicating any reason for the applicant's failure. All meetings of the
board must be held in Indiana.
(g) A quorum of the board consists of a majority of the appointed
members. A majority of the quorum may transact business. The
chairperson of the board is not allowed to cast a vote on any matter
before the board unless the chairperson's vote is necessary to break
a tie.
SECTION 639. IC 27-1-15.7-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.158-2024,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4. (a) The commissioner shall approve and
disapprove continuing education courses. after considering
recommendations made by the insurance producer education and
continuing education commission established under section 6.5 of this
chapter.
(b) The commissioner may not approve a course under this section
if the course:
(1) is designed to prepare an individual to receive an initial
license under this chapter;
(2) concerns only routine, basic office skills, including filing,
keyboarding, and basic computer skills; or
(3) may be completed by a licensee without supervision by an
instructor, unless the course involves an examination process that
is:
(A) completed and passed by the licensee as determined by the
provider of the course; and
(B) approved by the commissioner.
(c) The commissioner shall approve a course under this section that
is submitted for approval by an insurance trade association or
professional insurance association if:
(1) the objective of the course is to educate a manager or an
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

382
owner of a business entity that is required to obtain an insurance
producer license under IC 27-1-15.6-6(d);
(2) the course teaches insurance producer management and is
designed to result in improved efficiency in insurance producer
operations, systems use, or key functions;
(3) the course is designed to benefit consumers; and
(4) the course is not described in subsection (b).
(d) Approval of a continuing education course under this section
shall be for a period of not more than two (2) years.
(e) A prospective provider of a continuing education course shall
pay:
(1) a fee of forty dollars ($40) for each course submitted for
approval of the commissioner under this section; or
(2) an annual fee of five hundred dollars ($500) not later than
January 1 of a calendar year, which entitles the prospective
provider to submit an unlimited number of courses for approval
of the commissioner under this section during the calendar year.
The commissioner may waive all or a portion of the fee for a course
submitted under a reciprocity agreement with another state for the
approval or disapproval of continuing education courses. Fees collected
under this subsection shall be deposited in the department of insurance
fund established under IC 27-1-3-28.
(f) A prospective provider of a continuing education course may
electronically deliver to the commissioner any supporting materials for
the course.
(g) The commissioner shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to establish
procedures for approving continuing education courses.
SECTION 640. IC 27-1-15.7-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.158-2024,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. (a) To qualify as a certified prelicensing
course of study for purposes of IC 27-1-15.6-6, an insurance producer
program of study must meet all of the following criteria:
(1) Be conducted or developed by an:
(A) insurance trade association;
(B) accredited college or university;
(C) educational organization certified by the insurance
producer education and continuing education commission;
commissioner; or
(D) insurance company licensed to do business in Indiana.
(2) Provide for self-study or instruction provided by an approved
instructor in a structured setting, as follows:
(A) For life insurance producers, not less than twenty (20)
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

383
hours of instruction in a structured setting or comparable
self-study on:
(i) ethical practices in the marketing and selling of
insurance;
(ii) requirements of the insurance laws and administrative
rules of Indiana; and
(iii) principles of life insurance.
(B) For health insurance producers, not less than twenty (20)
hours of instruction in a structured setting or comparable
self-study on:
(i) ethical practices in the marketing and selling of
insurance;
(ii) requirements of the insurance laws and administrative
rules of Indiana; and
(iii) principles of health insurance.
(C) For life and health insurance producers, not less than forty
(40) hours of instruction in a structured setting or comparable
self-study on:
(i) ethical practices in the marketing and selling of
insurance;
(ii) requirements of the insurance laws and administrative
rules of Indiana;
(iii) principles of life insurance; and
(iv) principles of health insurance.
(D) For property and casualty insurance producers, not less
than forty (40) hours of instruction in a structured setting or
comparable self-study on:
(i) ethical practices in the marketing and selling of
insurance;
(ii) requirements of the insurance laws and administrative
rules of Indiana;
(iii) principles of property insurance; and
(iv) principles of liability insurance.
(E) For personal lines producers, a minimum of twenty (20)
hours of instruction in a structured setting or comparable
self-study on:
(i) ethical practices in the marketing and selling of
insurance;
(ii) requirements of the insurance laws and administrative
rules of Indiana; and
(iii) principles of property and liability insurance applicable
to coverages sold to individuals and families for primarily
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

384
noncommercial purposes.
(F) For title insurance producers, not less than ten (10) hours
of instruction in a structured setting or comparable self-study
on:
(i) ethical practices in the marketing and selling of title
insurance;
(ii) requirements of the insurance laws and administrative
rules of Indiana;
(iii) principles of title insurance, including underwriting and
escrow issues; and
(iv) principles of the federal Real Estate Settlement
Procedures Act (12 U.S.C. 2608).
(G) For annuity product producers, not less than four (4) hours
of instruction in a structured setting or comparable self-study
on:
(i) types and classifications of annuities;
(ii) identification of the parties to an annuity;
(iii) the manner in which fixed, variable, and indexed
annuity contract provisions affect consumers;
(iv) income taxation of qualified and non-qualified
annuities;
(v) primary uses of annuities; and
(vi) appropriate sales practices, replacement, and disclosure
requirements.
(3) Instruction provided in a structured setting must be provided
only by individuals who meet the qualifications established by the
commissioner under subsection (b).
(b) The commissioner after consulting with the insurance producer
education and continuing education commission, shall adopt rules
under IC 4-22-2 prescribing the criteria that a person must meet to
render instruction in a certified prelicensing course of study.
(c) The commissioner shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 prescribing
the subject matter that an insurance producer program of study must
cover to qualify for certification as a certified prelicensing course of
study under this section.
(d) The commissioner may make recommendations that the
commissioner considers necessary for improvements in course
materials.
(e) The commissioner shall designate a program of study that meets
the requirements of this section as a certified prelicensing course of
study for purposes of IC 27-1-15.6-6.
(f) For each person that provides one (1) or more certified
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

385
prelicensing courses of study, the commissioner shall annually
determine, of all individuals who received classroom instruction in the
certified prelicensing courses of study provided by the person, the
percentage who passed the examination required by IC 27-1-15.6-5.
The commissioner shall determine only one (1) passing percentage
under this subsection for all lines of insurance described in
IC 27-1-15.6-7(a) for which the person provides classroom instruction
in certified prelicensing courses of study.
(g) The commissioner may, after notice and opportunity for a
hearing, do the following:
(1) Withdraw the certification of a course of study that does not
maintain reasonable standards, as determined by the
commissioner for the protection of the public.
(2) Disqualify a person that is currently qualified under
subsection (b) to render instruction in a certified prelicensing
course of study from rendering the instruction if the passing
percentage calculated under subsection (f) is less than forty-five
percent (45%).
(h) Current course materials for a prelicensing course of study that
is certified under this section must be submitted to the commissioner
upon request, but not less frequently than once every three (3) years.
SECTION 641. IC 27-1-15.7-6.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.158-2024,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) As used in this section, "commission"
refers to the insurance producer education and continuing education
commission established by subsection (b).
(b) The insurance producer education and continuing education
commission is established within the department. The commissioner
shall appoint the following seven (7) individuals:
(1) One (1) individual nominated by the Professional Insurance
Agents of Indiana or its successor organization.
(2) One (1) individual nominated by the Independent Insurance
Agents of Indiana or its successor organization.
(3) One (1) individual nominated by the Indiana Association of
Insurance and Financial Advisors or its successor organization.
(4) One (1) individual nominated by the Indiana State Association
of Health Underwriters or its successor organization.
(5) One (1) individual nominated by the Association of Life
Insurance Companies or its successor organization.
(6) One (1) individual nominated by the Insurance Institute of
Indiana or its successor organization.
(7) One (1) individual nominated by the Indiana Land Title
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

386
Association or its successor organization.
The commissioner shall solicit nominations from the entities set forth
in this subsection. The commissioner may deny to make the
appointment of an individual nominated under this subsection only if
the commissioner determines that the individual is not in good standing
with the department or is not qualified. If the commissioner denies the
appointment of an individual nominated under this subsection, the
commissioner shall provide the nominating entity with the reason for
the denial and allow the nominating entity to submit an alternative
nomination.
(c) A member of the commission serves for a term of three (3) years
that expires June 30, 2027, and every third year thereafter. A member
may not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.
(d) The commissioner shall appoint a member of the commission to
serve as chairperson, who serves at the will of the commissioner. The
commission shall meet:
(1) at the call of the chairperson; and
(2) at least semiannually.
The department shall staff the commission. Four (4) members
constitute a quorum of the commission.
(e) The commissioner shall fill a vacancy on the commission with
a nomination from the entity that nominated the predecessor or the
entity's successor. The individual appointed to fill the vacancy shall
serve for the remainder of the predecessor's term.
(f) A member of the commission is entitled to the minimum salary
per diem provided under IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). A member is also entitled
to reimbursement for traveling expenses and other expenses actually
incurred in connection with the member's duties, in accordance with
state travel policies and procedures established by the Indiana
department of administration and approved by the budget agency.
Money paid under this subsection shall be paid from amounts
appropriated to the department.
(g) The commission shall review and make recommendations to the
commissioner concerning the following:
(1) Course materials and curriculum and instructor credentials for
prelicensing courses of study for which certification by the
commissioner is sought under section 5 of this chapter.
(2) Continuing education requirements for insurance producers.
(3) Continuing education courses for which the approval of the
commissioner is sought under section 4 of this chapter.
(4) Rules proposed for adoption by the commissioner concerning
continuing education under this chapter.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

387
(h) A member of the commission or a designee of the commissioner
is permitted access to any classroom while instruction is in progress to
monitor the classroom instruction.
(i) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 642. IC 27-1-29-29, AS ADDED BY P.L.46-2023,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 29. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), This
chapter expires when the insurance commissioner certifies to the
executive director of the legislative services agency that:
(1) the fund has no remaining members;
(2) all payments of liabilities of former members of the fund have
been determined and finalized; and
(3) the balance in the fund has been distributed to former
members of the fund in accordance with section 28(c)(4) of this
chapter.
(b) This chapter does not expire under subsection (a) unless
IC 27-1-29.1:
(1) has previously expired under IC 27-1-29.1-24; or
(2) expires under IC 27-1-29.1-24 at the same time as this chapter
expires under subsection (a)(1) through (a)(3). December 31,
2026.
SECTION 643. IC 27-1-44.5-0.4, AS ADDED BY P.L.195-2021,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.4. (a) As used in this chapter, "advisory board"
means the all payer claims data base advisory board established under
IC 27-1-44.6-5.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 644. IC 27-1-44.6-13 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. This chapter expires
December 31, 2026.
SECTION 645. IC 27-8-6-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2025,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 8. (a) As used in this section, "emergency
medical services" has the meaning set forth in IC 16-18-2-110.
(b) As used in this section, "emergency medical services provider
organization" means a provider of emergency medical services that is
certified by the Indiana emergency medical services fire and EMS
standards and education commission as an advanced life support
provider organization under rules adopted under IC 16-31-3.
(c) As used in this section, "policy of accident and sickness
insurance" has the meaning set forth in IC 27-8-5-1. However, for
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

388
purposes of this section, the term does not include the following:
(1) Accident only, credit, dental, vision, Medicare supplement,
long term care, or disability income insurance.
(2) Coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance.
(3) Automobile medical payment insurance.
(4) A specified disease policy.
(5) A policy that provides a stipulated daily, weekly, or monthly
payment to an insured without regard to the actual expense of the
confinement.
(6) A short term insurance plan (as defined in IC 27-8-5.9-3).
(d) A policy of accident and sickness insurance that provides
coverage for emergency medical services must provide reimbursement
for emergency medical services that are:
(1) rendered by an emergency medical services provider
organization;
(2) within the emergency medical services provider organization's
scope of practice;
(3) performed or provided as advanced life support services; and
(4) performed or provided:
(A) during a response initiated through the 911 system; or
(B) as part of a mobile integrated healthcare program
described in IC 16-31-12;
regardless of whether the patient is transported.
(e) Reimbursement for basic and advanced life support services
through a policy to which this section applies must be provided on an
equal basis regardless of whether the services involve transportation of
the patient by ambulance.
(f) If multiple emergency medical services provider organizations
qualify and submit a claim for reimbursement under this section for an
encounter, the insurer:
(1) may reimburse under this section only for one (1) claim per
patient encounter; and
(2) shall reimburse the claim submitted by the emergency medical
services provider organization that performed or provided the
majority of advanced life support services for the patient.
(g) The department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement
this section.
(h) This section does not require a policy of accident and sickness
insurance to provide coverage for emergency medical services.
SECTION 646. IC 27-8-38-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.170-2022,
SECTION 38, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "emergency
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

389
medical services provider organization" means a provider of emergency
medical services that is certified by the Indiana emergency medical
services fire and EMS standards and education commission under
the rules adopted under IC 16-31-3 to provide advanced life support.
SECTION 647. IC 27-13-7-27, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2025,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 27. (a) This section applies to each of the
following:
(1) An individual contract.
(2) A group contract.
(b) As used in this section, "emergency medical services" has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-18-2-110.
(c) As used in this section, "emergency medical services provider
organization" means a provider of emergency medical services that is
certified by the Indiana emergency medical services fire and EMS
standards and education commission as an advanced life support
provider organization under rules adopted under IC 16-31-3.
(d) An individual contract and a group contract that provide
coverage for emergency medical services must provide reimbursement
for emergency medical services that are:
(1) rendered by an emergency medical services provider
organization;
(2) within the emergency medical services provider organization's
scope of practice;
(3) performed or provided as advanced life support services; and
(4) performed or provided:
(A) during a response initiated through the 911 system; or
(B) as part of a mobile integrated healthcare program
described in IC 16-31-12;
regardless of whether the patient is transported.
(e) Reimbursement for basic and advanced life support services
through a contract to which this section applies must be provided on an
equal basis regardless of whether the services involve transportation of
the patient by ambulance.
(f) If multiple emergency medical services provider organizations
qualify and submit a claim for reimbursement under this section, the
health maintenance organization:
(1) may reimburse under this section only for one (1) claim per
patient encounter; and
(2) shall reimburse the claim submitted by the emergency medical
services provider organization that performed or provided the
majority of advanced life support services.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

390
(g) The department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement
this section.
(h) This section does not require an individual contract or a group
contract to provide coverage for emergency medical services.
SECTION 648. IC 31-9-2-10.6, AS ADDED BY P.L.145-2006,
SECTION 175, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 10.6. (a) "Board", for
purposes of IC 31-25-4, has the meaning set forth in IC 31-25-4-34(a).
(b) "Board", for purposes of IC 31-26-4, has the meaning set forth
in IC 31-26-4-2.
SECTION 649. IC 31-9-2-21.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 21.5. "Commission", for purposes
of IC 31-26-4, has the meaning set forth in IC 31-26-4-2.1.
SECTION 650. IC 31-26-4-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.145-2006,
SECTION 272, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter,
"board" refers to the Indiana kids first trust fund board established by
section 5 of this chapter.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 651. IC 31-26-4-2.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.1. As used in this chapter,
"commission" refers to the commission on improving the status of
children in Indiana established by IC 2-5-36-3.
SECTION 652. IC 31-26-4-2.3, AS ADDED BY P.L.220-2011,
SECTION 506, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.3. (a) After June 30, 2003, and
before January 1, 2027, any reference in a statute or rule referring to
the Indiana children's trust fund board is considered a reference to the
board.
(b) This subsection does not apply after December 31, 2026. On
July 1, 2003, the board becomes the owner of all the personal property
and assets and assumes the obligations and liabilities of the Indiana
children's trust fund board, as it existed before July 1, 2003.
(c) After December 31, 2026, any reference in a statute or rule
referring to the Indiana children's trust fund board is considered
a reference to the commission.
(d) On January 1, 2027, the commission becomes the owner of
all the personal property and assets and assumes the obligations
and liabilities of the Indiana children's trust fund board, as it
existed before January 1, 2027.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

391
SECTION 653. IC 31-26-4-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2021,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The Indiana kids first trust fund board is
established.
(b) The purpose of the board is to determine whether proposed
projects under this chapter should be approved and to perform other
duties given to the board by this chapter. The board shall approve
projects and recommend to the department that the projects receive
funds under sections 12 and 14 of this chapter.
(c) The board shall, before January 1 of each year, prepare a budget
for expenditures from the fund for the following state fiscal year. The
budget must contain priorities for expenditures from the fund to
accomplish the projects that have been approved under this chapter.
The budget shall be submitted to the department and the budget
committee. The board shall submit its final budget under this
subsection before January 1, 2027.
(d) The board may employ staff necessary to carry out the duties of
the board.
(e) The board may establish a nonprofit subsidiary corporation
under section 17 of this chapter.
(f) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 654. IC 31-26-4-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. (a) The commission shall
determine whether proposed projects under this chapter should be
approved and to perform other duties as directed by this chapter.
The commission shall approve projects and recommend to the
department that the projects receive funds under sections 12 and
14 of this chapter.
(b) The commission shall annually prepare a budget for
expenditures from the fund for the following state fiscal year. The
budget must contain priorities for expenditures from the fund to
accomplish the projects that have been approved under this
chapter. The commission shall submit a budget to the department
and the budget committee before January 1, 2028, and each year
thereafter.
(c) The commission may employ staff necessary to carry out the
duties of the board.
(d) The commission may establish a nonprofit subsidiary
corporation under section 17 of this chapter.
SECTION 655. IC 31-26-4-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 298, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

392
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The board consists of the
following ten (10) members:
(1) Two (2) individuals who are not members of the general
assembly, appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate
with advice from the minority leader of the senate.
(2) Two (2) individuals who are not members of the general
assembly, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives with advice from the minority leader of the house
of representatives.
(3) The director of the department or the director's designee.
(4) Four (4) individuals appointed by the governor as follows:
(A) One (1) individual who represents the general public.
(B) Two (2) individuals who represent child advocacy
organizations.
(C) One (1) individual who represents the medical community.
(5) The commissioner of the Indiana department of health or the
commissioner's designee. An individual designated by the
commissioner under this subdivision must have knowledge of or
experience in issues relating to:
(A) the prevention of child abuse and neglect; and
(B) the reduction of infant mortality.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 656. IC 31-26-4-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.145-2006,
SECTION 272, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The members shall annually
choose a chairperson and vice chairperson from among the members
of the board under this section.
(b) The director of the department or the director's designee may not
serve as chairperson or vice chairperson.
(c) If the member chosen as chairperson was appointed as a member
by the president pro tempore of the senate or the speaker of the house
of representatives, the vice chairperson must be chosen from among the
members appointed by the governor. If the member chosen as
chairperson was appointed as a member by the governor, the vice
chairperson must be chosen from among the members appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate or the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(d) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 657. IC 31-26-4-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2021,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The board shall meet at least quarterly and
at the call of the chair.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

393
(b) A majority of the appointed members of the board constitutes a
quorum. The board may take action only in the presence of a quorum.
(c) The affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the board
participating in a board meeting is necessary for the board to take any
action at the meeting.
(d) The board shall post the minutes of a meeting on the board's
Internet web site not later than ten (10) days after the minutes are
approved by the board.
(e) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 658. IC 31-26-4-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2021,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The term of a board member begins on the
later of the following:
(1) The day the term of the member whom the individual is
appointed to succeed expires.
(2) The day the individual is appointed.
(b) The term of a member expires July 1 of the fourth year after the
member is appointed. However, a member serves at the pleasure of the
appointing authority.
(c) The appointing authority may reappoint a member for a new
term.
(d) The appointing authority shall appoint an individual to fill a
vacancy among the members.
(e) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 659. IC 31-26-4-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.145-2006,
SECTION 272, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) Each member of the board
who is not a state employee is entitled to the minimum salary per diem
provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member is also entitled to
reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4
and other expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's
duties as provided in the state policies and procedures established by
the Indiana department of administration and approved by the budget
agency.
(b) Each member of the board who is a state employee is entitled to
reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4
and other expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's
duties as provided in the state policies and procedures established by
the Indiana department of administration and approved by the budget
agency.
(c) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 660. IC 31-26-4-11, AS ADDED BY P.L.145-2006,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

394
SECTION 272, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. The board commission shall
adopt and make available to the public:
(1) a strategic plan to implement the purposes of this chapter; and
(2) a method for proposing projects and requesting funds from the
Indiana kids first trust fund.
SECTION 661. IC 31-26-4-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2021,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) The Indiana kids first trust fund is
established to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(b) The fund consists of the following:
(1) Appropriations made by the general assembly.
(2) Interest as provided in subsection (e).
(3) Fees from kids first trust license plates issued under
IC 9-18-30 (before its expiration) or IC 9-18.5-14.
(4) Money donated to the fund, including donations from a
nonprofit subsidiary corporation established under section 17 of
this chapter.
(5) Money transferred to the fund from other funds.
(c) The treasurer of state shall administer the fund.
(d) The expenses of administering the fund and this chapter shall be
paid from the fund.
(e) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public trust funds are invested. Interest that accrues
from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(f) An appropriation made by the general assembly to the fund shall
be allotted and allocated at the beginning of the fiscal period for which
the appropriation was made.
(g) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not revert
to the state general fund or any other fund.
(h) Subject to this chapter, there is annually appropriated to the
department all money in the fund for the purposes of this chapter.
However, the department may not request the allotment of money from
the appropriation for a project that has not been approved and
recommended by the board. commission.
SECTION 662. IC 31-26-4-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2011,
SECTION 40, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) The infant mortality account is established
within the fund for the purpose of providing money for education and
programs approved by the board commission under section 5(b) 5.5(a)
of this chapter to reduce infant mortality in Indiana. The account shall
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

395
be administered by the treasurer of state.
(b) Expenses of administering the account shall be paid from money
in the account. The account consists of the following:
(1) Appropriations to the account.
(2) Money donated to the account.
(c) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the account not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the account in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that accrues
from these investments shall be deposited in the account.
(d) Money in the account at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
SECTION 663. IC 31-26-4-15, AS ADDED BY P.L.145-2006,
SECTION 272, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) This subsection applies to
a calendar year ending before January 1, 2027. Before October 1 of
each year, the board shall prepare a report concerning the program
established by this chapter for the public and the general assembly. A
report prepared under this section for the general assembly must be in
an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
(b) This subsection applies to a calendar year beginning after
December 31, 2026. Before October 1 of each year, the commission
shall prepare a report concerning the program established by this
chapter for the public and the general assembly. The commission
shall submit the report to the general assembly in an electronic
format under IC 5-14-6.
SECTION 664. IC 31-26-4-17, AS ADDED BY P.L.93-2021,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) The board may establish a nonprofit
subsidiary corporation that is exempt from federal income taxation
under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to solicit and
accept private funding, gifts, donations, bequests, devises, and
contributions.
(b) The board shall study the topic of establishing a nonprofit
subsidiary corporation described in subsection (a). Not later than
December 31, 2021, the board shall submit a report to the general
assembly in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6 addressing the
board's findings and determinations under this subsection. If the board
determines to establish a nonprofit subsidiary corporation as described
in subsection (a), the report must also include an implementation plan
and estimated budget for the establishment of the nonprofit subsidiary
corporation.
(c) A subsidiary corporation established under this section is
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

396
governed by a board of directors comprised of members appointed by
the Indiana kids first trust fund board. Employees of the Indiana kids
first trust fund board may serve on the board of directors of the
subsidiary corporation. A subsidiary corporation established under this
section:
(1) shall use money received under subsection (a) to carry out, in
any manner, the purposes and programs of the board;
(2) shall report to the budget committee each year concerning:
(A) the use of money received; and
(B) the balances in any accounts or funds established by the
subsidiary corporation;
(3) may donate money received to the Indiana kids first trust fund;
and
(4) may deposit money received in an account or fund that is:
(A) administered by the subsidiary corporation; and
(B) not part of the state treasury.
(d) The board of directors of a subsidiary corporation established
under this section shall post the minutes of a meeting on the subsidiary
corporation's Internet web site not later than ten (10) days after the
minutes are approved by the board of directors.
(e) Employees of the Indiana kids first trust fund board shall provide
administrative support for a subsidiary corporation established under
this section. Employees of the board directly involved in the subsidiary
corporation may engage in fundraising activities on behalf of the
subsidiary corporation.
(f) The state board of accounts shall annually audit a subsidiary
corporation established under this section.
(g) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 665. IC 31-27-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 300, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The department may do the
following:
(1) Prescribe forms for reports, statements, notices, and other
documents required by this article or by the rules adopted under
this article.
(2) Increase public awareness of this article and the rules adopted
under this article by preparing and publishing manuals and guides
explaining this article and the rules adopted under this article.
(3) Facilitate compliance with and enforcement of this article
through the publication of materials under subdivision (2).
(4) Prepare reports and studies to advance the purpose of this
article.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

397
(5) Seek the advice and recommendations of state agencies whose
information and knowledge would be of assistance in writing,
revising, or monitoring rules developed under this article. These
agencies, including the office of the attorney general, Indiana
department of health, division of mental health and addiction,
division of family resources, the state police department, and fire
prevention and building safety commission, department of
homeland security, shall upon request supply necessary
information to the department.
(6) Make the directory of licensees available to the public for a
charge not to exceed the cost of reproducing the directory.
(7) Charge a reasonable processing fee for each license
application and renewal as follows:
(A) For a child caring institution or group home license, a fee
not to exceed three dollars ($3) for each licensed bed based on
total licensed bed capacity not to exceed a maximum fee of
one hundred fifty dollars ($150).
(B) For a child placing agency license, a fee not to exceed fifty
dollars ($50).
(8) Exercise any other regulatory and administrative powers
necessary to carry out the functions of the department.
SECTION 666. IC 31-27-2-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 223, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The department shall adopt
rules under IC 4-22-2 concerning the licensing and inspection of:
(1) child caring institutions, foster family homes, group homes,
and child placing agencies after consultation with the:
(A) Indiana department of health; and
(B) fire prevention and building safety commission;
department of homeland security; and
(2) child caring institutions and group homes that are licensed for
infants and toddlers after consultation with the division of family
resources.
(b) The rules adopted under subsection (a) shall be applied by the
department and state fire marshal in the licensing and inspection of
applicants for a license and licensees under this article.
(c) The rules adopted under IC 4-22-2 must establish minimum
standards for the care and treatment of children in a secure private
facility.
(d) The rules described in subsection (c) must include standards
governing the following:
(1) Admission criteria.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

398
(2) General physical and environmental conditions.
(3) Services and programs to be provided to confined children.
(4) Procedures for ongoing monitoring and discharge planning.
(5) Procedures for the care and control of confined persons that
are necessary to ensure the health, safety, and treatment of
confined children.
(e) The department shall license a facility as a secure private facility
if the facility:
(1) meets the minimum standards required under subsection (c);
(2) provides a continuum of care and services; and
(3) is licensed under IC 31-27-3.
(f) A waiver of the rules may not be granted for treatment and
reporting requirements.
SECTION 667. IC 31-27-2-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.145-2006,
SECTION 273, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Except as provided in
subsections (b) and (c), the department shall exempt from licensure a
child caring institution and a group home operated by a church or
religious ministry that is a religious organization exempt from federal
income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code
(as defined in IC 6-3-1-11) and that does not:
(1) accept for care:
(A) a child who is a delinquent child under IC 31-37-1-1 or
IC 31-37-2-1; or
(B) a child who is a child in need of services under
IC 31-34-1-1 through IC 31-34-1-9; or
(2) operate a residential facility that provides child care on a
twenty-four (24) hour basis for profit.
(b) The department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to govern the
inspection of a child caring institution and a group home operated by
a church or religious ministry with regard to sanitation.
(c) The fire prevention and building safety commission department
of homeland security shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to govern the
inspection of a child caring institution and a group home operated by
a church or religious ministry under this section. The rules must
provide standards for fire alarms and fire drills.
(d) A child caring institution and a group home operated by a
church or religious ministry under this section shall comply with the
rules established by the department and the fire prevention and
building safety commission department of homeland security under
this section.
SECTION 668. IC 31-27-2-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.183-2017,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

399
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Except as provided in subsection (f), the
department may grant a variance or waiver of a rule governing child
caring institutions, foster family homes, group homes, or child placing
agencies. A variance or waiver granted under this section must promote
statewide practices and must protect the rights of persons affected by
this article.
(b) The department may grant a variance to a rule if an applicant for
a license or a licensee under this article does the following:
(1) Submits to the department a written request for the variance
in the form and manner specified by the department.
(2) Documents that compliance with an alternative method of
compliance approved by the department will not be adverse to the
health, safety, or welfare of a child receiving services from the
applicant for the variance, as determined by the department.
(c) A variance granted under subsection (b) must be conditioned
upon compliance with the alternative method approved by the
department. Noncompliance constitutes the violation of a rule of the
department and may be the basis for revoking the variance.
(d) The department may grant a waiver of a rule if an applicant for
a license or a licensee under this article does the following:
(1) Submits to the department a written request for the waiver in
the form and manner specified by the department.
(2) Documents that compliance with the rule specified in the
application for the waiver will create an undue hardship on the
applicant for the waiver, as determined by the department.
(3) Documents that the applicant for the waiver will be in
substantial compliance with the rules adopted by the department
after the waiver is granted, as determined by the department.
(4) Documents that noncompliance with the rule specified in the
application for a waiver will not be adverse to the health, safety,
or welfare of a child receiving services from the applicant for the
waiver, as determined by the department.
(e) Except for a variance or waiver of a rule governing foster family
homes, a variance or waiver of a rule under this section that conflicts
with a building rule or fire safety rule adopted by the fire prevention
and building safety commission department of homeland security is
not effective until the variance or waiver is approved by the fire
prevention and building safety commission. department of homeland
security.
(f) A waiver may not be granted for an applicant who has been
convicted of a nonwaivable offense, as defined in IC 31-9-2-84.8.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

400
SECTION 669. IC 31-27-2-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.145-2006,
SECTION 273, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) If the department determines
that a waiver or variance expiring under section 9 of this chapter will
continue to serve the public interest, the department may do the
following:
(1) Renew the waiver or variance without modifications.
(2) Renew and modify the waiver or variance as needed to
promote statewide practices and to protect the rights of persons
affected by this chapter.
(b) Before taking an action under subsection (a), the department
may require a licensee under this article to do the following:
(1) Apply for the renewal of a waiver or variance on the form
specified by the department.
(2) Provide the information required by the department.
(c) Except for a variance or waiver of a rule governing foster family
homes, before taking an action under subsection (a), the department
must obtain the approval of the fire prevention and building safety
commission department of homeland security, or if applicable, the
state building commissioner, for the action if either of the following
occurs:
(1) The fire prevention and building safety commission
substantially department of homeland security or state
building commissioner changes a building rule requirement or
fire safety rule adopted by the department of homeland
security affected by the waiver or variance after the date the
commission department of homeland security or state building
commissioner last approved the waiver or variance.
(2) The department substantially modifies any part of a waiver or
variance that conflicts with a building rule or fire safety rule
adopted by the fire prevention and building safety commission.
department of homeland security.
SECTION 670. IC 31-27-3-17, AS ADDED BY P.L.145-2006,
SECTION 273, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. The fire prevention and
building safety commission department of homeland security may
not adopt rules requiring the installation of a sprinkler system in a
living unit of a licensed child caring institution in which fewer than
sixteen (16) children reside, each of whom is:
(1) ambulatory; and
(2) at least six (6) years of age.
SECTION 671. IC 31-27-4-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.145-2006,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

401
SECTION 273, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. The fire prevention and building
safety commission department of homeland security shall provide
consultation regarding the licensure of foster family homes to the
department upon request.
SECTION 672. IC 32-21-2.5-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.26-2022,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) As used in this section, "paper document"
or "paper documents" means a tangible record that is received by a
county recorder in a form that is not electronic.
(b) On or before July 1, 2022, a county recorder shall receive for
recording, indexing, storage, archiving, access to, searching of,
retrieval, and transmittal all electronic documents proper for recording.
A county recorder shall also accept electronically any fee or tax that the
county recorder is authorized to collect under applicable laws. A
county recorder shall implement the processing of electronic
documents proper for recording in compliance with:
(1) this article;
(2) IC 33-42;
(3) IC 36-2-7.5;
(4) IC 36-2-11; and
(5) IC 36-2-13; and
the standards adopted by the electronic recording commission created
under section 9 of this chapter (before its repeal).
(c) This section does not apply to the following documents:
(1) A military discharge under IC 10-17-2.
(2) A survey of real property.
(3) A plat of real property.
(d) A recorder who accepts electronic documents for recording
shall:
(1) continue to accept paper documents as authorized by state
law; and
(2) place entries for paper documents and electronic documents
in the same index.
(e) A recorder who accepts electronic documents for recording may:
(1) convert paper documents accepted for recording into
electronic form;
(2) convert into electronic form information recorded before the
county recorder began to accept and index electronic documents;
or
(3) agree with other officials of a state or a political subdivision
of a state, or of the United States, on procedures or processes to
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

402
facilitate the electronic satisfaction of prior approvals and
conditions precedent to recording and the electronic payment of
fees and taxes.
SECTION 673. IC 32-21-2.5-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 9. (a) The electronic recording commission is established
to adopt standards to implement this chapter before January 1, 2018.
The commission consists of the following five (5) members appointed
by the governor:
(1) Three (3) members must be county recorders.
(2) One (1) member must be employed in Indiana in the banking
or mortgage lending industry.
(3) One (1) member must be employed in Indiana in the land title
industry.
(b) To keep the standards and practices of county recorders in
Indiana in harmony with the standards and practices of recording
offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this chapter and to
keep the technology used by county recorders in Indiana compatible
with technology used by recording offices in other jurisdictions that
enact substantially this chapter, the electronic recording commission,
so far as is consistent with the purposes, policies, and provisions of this
chapter, in adopting, amending, and repealing standards shall consider:
(1) standards and practices of other jurisdictions;
(2) the most recent standards promulgated by national standard
setting bodies, such as the Property Records Industry Association
(PRIA);
(3) the views of interested persons and governmental officials and
entities;
(4) the needs of counties of varying size, population, and
resources; and
(5) standards requiring adequate information security protection
to ensure that electronic documents are accurate, authentic,
adequately preserved, and resistant to tampering.
SECTION 674. IC 32-21-5.2-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.157-2024,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "local building
department" means, in any county, city, or town, the department,
division, agency, section, or office that enforces the Indiana building
code adopted by the fire prevention and building safety commission,
department of homeland security, as required by IC 36-7-2-9(1).
SECTION 675. IC 34-13-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2021,
SECTION 102, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. This chapter applies to a claim
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

403
or suit in tort against any of the following:
(1) The bureau of motor vehicles commission established by
IC 9-14-9-1.
(2) A member of the bureau of motor vehicles commission board
established under IC 9-14-9-2.
(3) An employee of the bureau of motor vehicles commission.
(4) A member of the driver education advisory board established
by IC 9-27-6-5 (before its expiration on December 31, 2026).
(5) An approved postsecondary educational institution (as defined
in IC 21-7-13-6(a)(1)), or an association acting on behalf of an
approved postsecondary educational institution, that:
(A) shares data with the commission for higher education
under IC 21-12-12-1; and
(B) is named as a defendant in a claim or suit in tort based on
any breach of the confidentiality of the data that occurs after
the institution has transmitted the data in compliance with
IC 21-12-12-1.
(6) The state fair commission established by IC 15-13-2-1.
(7) A member of the state fair commission established by
IC 15-13-2-1 or an employee of the state fair commission.
(8) The state fair board established by IC 15-13-5-1.
(9) A member of the state fair board established by IC 15-13-5-1.
SECTION 676. IC 34-13-3-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.46-2023,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Except as provided in section 9 of this
chapter and subsection (b), a claim against a political subdivision is
barred unless notice is filed with:
(1) the governing body of that political subdivision; and
(2) unless IC 27-1-29 has expired under IC 27-1-29-29, the
Indiana political subdivision risk management commission
created under IC 27-1-29 (before its expiration December 31,
2026);
within one hundred eighty (180) days after the loss occurs.
(b) A claim against a political subdivision is not barred for failure
to file notice with the Indiana political subdivision risk management
commission under subsection (a)(2) if the political subdivision was not
a member of the political subdivision risk management fund
established under IC 27-1-29-10 at the time the act or omission took
place.
SECTION 677. IC 34-30-2.1-30 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 30. IC 5-2-2-14(b) (Concerning the state for
violations of the law enforcement academy building commission law).
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

404
SECTION 678. IC 34-30-2.1-107 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 107. IC 9-27-7-6(e) (Concerning members
of the advisory board to the motorcycle operator safety education
program).
SECTION 679. IC 34-30-2.1-127 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 127. IC 10-18-1-2 (Concerning members of
the Indiana war memorials commission).
SECTION 680. IC 34-30-2.1-252 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 252. IC 16-41-42.2-5(k) (Concerning
members of the spinal cord and brain injury research board).
SECTION 681. IC 34-30-27-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2014,
SECTION 117, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. An architect registered
under IC 25-4-1, a professional surveyor registered under IC 25-21.5,
or a professional engineer registered under IC 25-31-1 IC 25-4-3 who,
after May 31, 2013, voluntarily, without compensation (other than
expense reimbursement), provides architectural, structural, electrical,
mechanical, or professional services:
(1) related to a declared national, state, or local emergency caused
by an earthquake, hurricane, tornado, fire, explosion, gale, severe
storm, flood, or collapse; and
(2) at the request of or with the approval of a federal or state
official with executive responsibility in the jurisdiction to
coordinate:
(A) law enforcement;
(B) public safety; or
(C) building inspection;
believed by the registered architect, professional surveyor, or
professional engineer to be acting in an official capacity;
is not liable for any personal injury, wrongful death, property damage,
or other loss of any nature related to the registered architect's,
professional surveyor's, or professional engineer's acts, errors, or
omissions in the performance of the services.
SECTION 682. IC 34-52-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 29, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. (a) Subject to any other statute governing
reimbursement of fees and other expenses, this chapter applies to the
reimbursement of the fees and other expenses incurred in preparing for
or prosecuting:
(1) a proceeding under IC 4-21.5-5 to judicially review a final
order made by a state agency;
(2) an appeal from a final determination made by the worker's
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

405
compensation board;
(3) an appeal of a final determination made by the department of
state revenue; or
(4) an appeal of a final determination made by the department of
workforce development or the department of workforce
development unemployment insurance review board.
(b) However, this chapter does not apply to an order or other
determination:
(1) under:
(A) IC 16-27-1;
(B) IC 16-28;
(C) IC 16-30;
(D) IC 12-28-4; or
(E) IC 12-28-5;
(2) by an agency described in IC 25-0.5-9; or
(3) by the board of podiatric medicine. medical licensing board
of Indiana under IC 25-29.
SECTION 683. IC 35-44.1-4-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.32-2019,
SECTION 30, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 9. (a) As used in this section, "emergency
medical person" means a person who holds a certificate issued by the
Indiana emergency medical services fire and EMS standards and
education commission to provide emergency medical services.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally obstructs or interferes
with an emergency medical person performing or attempting to perform
the emergency medical person's emergency functions or duties commits
obstructing an emergency medical person, a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 684. IC 35-44.2-3-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 3. A member or person employed by the law
enforcement academy building commission who has a conflict of
interest with respect to an action by the commission is subject to
criminal prosecution under IC 5-2-2-11.
SECTION 685. IC 35-47.5-2-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 3. "Commission" refers to the fire prevention and
building safety commission established by IC 22-12-2-1.
SECTION 686. IC 35-47.5-4-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 134, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The department shall issue a
regulated explosives magazine permit to maintain an explosives
magazine to an applicant who qualifies under section 5 of this chapter.
(b) A permit issued under subsection (a) expires one (1) year after
it is issued. The permit is limited to storage of the types and maximum
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

406
quantities of explosives specified in the permit in the place covered by
the permit and under the construction and location requirements
specified in the rules of the commission. department.
SECTION 687. IC 35-47.5-4-4.5, AS AMENDED BY
P.L.187-2021, SECTION 135, IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) This section
does not apply to:
(1) a person who is regulated under IC 14-34; or
(2) near surface or subsurface use of regulated explosives
associated with oil and natural gas:
(A) exploration;
(B) development;
(C) production; or
(D) abandonment activities or procedures.
(b) The commission department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
to:
(1) govern the use of a regulated explosive; and
(2) establish requirements for the issuance of a license for the use
of a regulated explosive.
(c) The commission department shall include the following
requirements in the rules adopted under subsection (b):
(1) Relicensure every three (3) years after the initial issuance of
a license.
(2) Continuing education as a condition of relicensure.
(3) An application for licensure or relicensure must be submitted
to the department on forms approved by the commission.
department.
(4) A fee for licensure and relicensure.
(5) Reciprocal recognition of a license for the use of a regulated
explosive issued by another state if the licensure requirements of
the other state are substantially similar to the licensure
requirements established by the commission. department.
(d) A person may not use a regulated explosive unless the person
has a license issued under this section for the use of a regulated
explosive.
(e) The department shall carry out the licensing and relicensing
program under the rules adopted by the commission. department.
(f) As used in this section, "regulated explosive" does not include
either of the following:
(1) Consumer fireworks (as defined in 27 CFR 555.11).
(2) Commercially manufactured black powder in quantities not to
exceed fifty (50) pounds, if the black powder is intended to be
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

407
used solely for sporting, recreational, or cultural purposes in
antique firearms or antique devices.
SECTION 688. IC 35-47.5-4-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) To qualify for a
regulated explosives permit, an applicant must:
(1) submit information on the form provided by the state fire
marshal describing:
(A) the location of the affected magazine;
(B) the types and maximum quantities of explosives that will
be kept in the place covered by the application; and
(C) the distance that the affected magazine will be located
from the nearest highway, railway, and structure that is also
used as a place of habitation or assembly other than for the
manufacture of explosives;
(2) except as provided in subdivision (3), demonstrate through an
inspection that the magazine is constructed and located in
accordance with the rules adopted by the commission;
department;
(3) demonstrate through an inspection that smoking, matches,
open flames, and spark producing devices are not allowed within
a room containing an indoor magazine; and
(4) pay the fee under IC 22-12-6-6.
(b) To qualify for the renewal of a regulated explosives permit, the
applicant must pay the fee under IC 22-12-6-6.
SECTION 689. IC 35-47.5-4-6 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) This section does
not apply to storage that is exempted from the requirements of this
section in the rules adopted by the commission department under
IC 22-13-3.
(b) A person who:
(1) stores a regulated explosive;
(2) has control over a regulated explosive that is stored; or
(3) has control over a place where a regulated explosive is stored;
without a regulated explosives magazine permit issued under this
chapter that covers the storage commits a Class C infraction.
SECTION 690. IC 35-52-5-3 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 3. IC 5-2-2-11 defines a crime concerning the law
enforcement academy building commission.
SECTION 691. IC 35-52-16-93 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 93. IC 16-46-6-12 defines a crime
concerning state health grants and programs.
SECTION 692. IC 35-52-25-2.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

408
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2.7. IC 25-4-3-4 defines a
crime concerning engineers.
SECTION 693. IC 35-52-25-2.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2.8. IC 25-4-3-15 defines a
crime concerning engineers.
SECTION 694. IC 35-52-25-53 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 53. IC 25-31-1-13 defines a crime
concerning engineers.
SECTION 695. IC 35-52-25-54 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 54. IC 25-31-1-27 defines a crime
concerning engineers.
SECTION 696. IC 36-1-7-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (b) and regardless of the requirements of section
4 of this chapter, if an agreement under section 3 of this chapter
concerns the provision of services or facilities that a state officer or
state agency has power to control, the agreement must be submitted to
that officer or agency for approval before it takes effect.
(b) If a reciprocal borrowing agreement under section 3 of this
chapter concerns the provision of library services or facilities between
public libraries that are of the same nature as the services provided
under the statewide library card program under IC 4-23-7.1-5.1, the
reciprocal borrowing agreement is not required to be submitted to the
Indiana library and historical board for approval before the reciprocal
borrowing agreement takes effect, but a copy of the reciprocal
borrowing agreement shall be submitted to the state library.
(c) Approval or disapproval is governed by the same provisions
prescribed by section 4(b) of this chapter for the attorney general.
SECTION 697. IC 36-1-12-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.86-2025,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 7. (a) This section does not apply to public
work that:
(1) is considered routine maintenance or upkeep; or
(2) does not require a building permit issued by a city, town, or
county.
(b) Public work performed or contracted for on a public building,
the cost of which is more than one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000), may be undertaken by the board only in accordance with
plans and specifications approved by an architect or engineer licensed
under IC 25-4 or IC 25-31 IC 25-4-1 or IC 25-4-3 if the scope of the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

409
public work requires a design release under IC 22-15-3.
SECTION 698. IC 36-1-12-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 138, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) The board must, within sixty
(60) days after the completion of the public work project, file in the
department of homeland security a complete set of final record
drawings for the public work project. However, this requirement does
not apply to a public work project constructed at a cost less than one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). In addition, the filing of the
drawings is required only if the project involves a public building.
(b) The department of homeland security shall provide a depository
for all final record drawings filed, and retain them for inspection and
loan under regulated conditions. The fire prevention and building
safety commission department of homeland security may designate
the librarian of Indiana as the custodian of the final record drawings.
The librarian shall preserve the final record drawings in the state
archives as public documents.
SECTION 699. IC 36-1-12.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.168-2006,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. (a) As used in this chapter, "qualified
provider" means the following:
(1) Before July 1, 1999, the term means a person that satisfies
both of the following:
(A) The person is experienced in the design, implementation,
and installation of energy conservation measures.
(B) The person submits to the school corporation or political
subdivision a performance bond to ensure the qualified
provider's faithful performance of the qualified provider's
obligations over the term of the guaranteed energy savings
contract.
(2) After June 30, 1999, the term means a person that satisfies all
of the following:
(A) Subject to subdivision (3), the person is experienced in the
design, implementation, and installation of energy
conservation measures.
(B) The person is certified and meets the requirements of
IC 4-13.6-4. The person's response to the request for proposals
must include a copy of the person's certificate of qualification
issued under IC 4-13.6-4.
(C) Subject to subdivision (3), the person provides energy
conservation engineering services by a professional engineer
licensed under IC 25-31 IC 25-4-3 who is under the person's
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

410
direct employment and supervision. The person's response to
the request for proposals must include the license number of
each professional engineer employed by the person to satisfy
the requirement of this clause.
(D) The person provides:
(i) monitoring for the facility performance guarantee; and
(ii) service personnel under the person's direct employment
and supervision;
for the duration of the contract's guarantee.
(E) The person performs at least twenty percent (20%) of the
work (measured in dollars of the total contract price) with its
own workforce.
(F) The person submits to the school corporation or political
subdivision a performance bond to ensure the qualified
provider's faithful performance of the qualified provider's
obligations over the term of:
(i) the guaranteed energy savings contract; or
(ii) the guaranteed savings contract.
(3) With respect to conservation measures for which a contract is
executed after June 30, 2006, the term includes a person that
satisfies the following:
(A) The person is experienced in the design, implementation,
and installation of conservation measures.
(B) The person provides engineering services with respect to
conservation measures by a professional engineer licensed
under IC 25-31 IC 25-4-3 who is under the person's direct
employment and supervision. The person's response to the
request for proposals must include the license number of each
professional engineer employed by the person to satisfy the
requirement of this clause.
(b) For purposes of a guaranteed energy savings contract entered
into before July 1, 1999, a person who was a qualified provider under
subsection (a)(1) at the time the contract was entered into remains a
qualified provider for that contract after June 30, 1999. If the person
enters into:
(1) a guaranteed energy savings contract after June 30, 1999, and
before July 1, 2006, the person must satisfy the requirements of
subsection (a)(2); or
(2) a guaranteed savings contract after June 30, 2006, the person
must satisfy the requirements of subsection (a)(2) and (a)(3);
to be considered a qualified provider.
SECTION 700. IC 36-1-12.5-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

411
SECTION 328, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 8. Conservation measures
installed under a utility efficiency program or a guaranteed savings
contract must be approved by the following:
(1) The Indiana department of health, department of homeland
security, and any other state agency designated by statute.
(2) An architect or engineer licensed under IC 25-4 or IC 25-31
IC 25-4-1 or IC 25-4-3 if the conservation measures have a cost
of more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
SECTION 701. IC 36-2-12-13 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 13. (a) A person
may, for excavation, mineral extraction, or other purposes related to the
person's business, temporarily remove a monument marking a corner.
The person must notify in writing the county surveyor at least thirty
(30) days before removing the monument. The person must replace the
monument within a reasonable time at the person's expense under the
supervision of the county surveyor or, if the county surveyor is not
registered under IC 25-21.5 or IC 25-31, IC 25-4-3, the registered
person who is selected under section 11 of this chapter. The surveyor
shall file a copy of the notice in the corner record book.
(b) Only a county surveyor or a designee may change the location
of any monument. A person who wishes to have the location of a
monument changed must make a request to the surveyor in writing and
furnish written approval of all landowners whose property is affected
by the proposed change. The surveyor may approve, reject, or modify
the request and shall file a copy of the notice and the landowners'
consents in the corner record book.
(c) When, in the construction or maintenance of a state, county, or
municipal road or street, it is necessary to remove or bury a monument
marking a corner, the owner of the public right-of-way shall notify the
county surveyor in writing at least fifteen (15) days before commencing
the work.
(d) A county legislative body may adopt an ordinance:
(1) prohibiting a person from moving, changing, or otherwise
altering a monument marking a corner without complying with
this section; and
(2) prescribing a monetary penalty for a violation of the
ordinance.
Any money collected shall be deposited in the county surveyor's corner
perpetuation fund.
(e) A person who damages or removes a monument marking a
corner or high accuracy reference network (HARN) point shall
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

412
reimburse the county for the cost of repairing or replacing the
monument.
(f) If a person who damages or removes a monument marking a
corner violates an ordinance under subsection (d), the person is liable
for:
(1) the amount of reimbursement under subsection (e); and
(2) any monetary penalty prescribed by the county legislative
body for violation of the ordinance under subsection (d).
SECTION 702. IC 36-2-12-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.127-2017,
SECTION 89, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 15. (a) If the surveyor serves as highway
supervisor or county highway engineer and is compensated for that
service in an amount greater than the compensation fixed under this
title, then that compensation is in lieu of the compensation fixed under
this title.
(b) When fixing the compensation of county officers under this title,
the county fiscal body shall fix:
(1) compensation for the surveyor as if the surveyor is registered
under IC 25-21.5 or IC 25-31; IC 25-4-3; and
(2) compensation for the surveyor as if the surveyor is not
registered under IC 25-21.5 or IC 25-31. IC 25-4-3.
The compensation fixed under subdivision (1) must be one and
one-half (1 1/2) times that fixed under subdivision (2). The county
fiscal body shall then determine whether or not the surveyor is
registered under IC 25-21.5 or IC 25-31 IC 25-4-3 and shall fix the
surveyor's compensation in the proper amount.
(c) In addition to the compensation fixed under subsection (b), if the
surveyor describes and certifies the number of miles of active regulated
drains in the county to the county executive, the surveyor is entitled,
with the approval of the county executive, to:
(1) two dollars ($2) per mile for each mile described and certified,
if the surveyor is not registered under IC 25-21.5 or IC 25-31;
IC 25-4-3; or
(2) four dollars ($4) per mile for each mile described and
certified, if the surveyor is registered under IC 25-21.5 or
IC 25-31. IC 25-4-3.
(d) In addition to the compensation fixed under subsections (b) and
(c), the surveyor is entitled to:
(1) two dollars ($2) for each corner reference required under
section 11 of this chapter, if the surveyor is not registered under
IC 25-21.5 or IC 25-31; IC 25-4-3; or
(2) four dollars ($4) for each corner reference required under
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

413
section 11 of this chapter, if the surveyor is registered under
IC 25-21.5 or IC 25-31. IC 25-4-3.
SECTION 703. IC 36-7-2-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.22-2005,
SECTION 50, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. Each unit shall require compliance with:
(1) the code of building laws and fire safety laws that is adopted
in the rules of the fire prevention and building safety commission
department of homeland security under IC 22-13;
(2) orders issued under IC 22-13-2-11 that grant a variance to the
code of building laws and fire safety laws described in
subdivision (1);
(3) orders issued under IC 22-12-7 that apply the code of building
laws described in subdivision (1);
(4) IC 22-15-3-7; and
(5) a written interpretation of a building law and fire safety law
binding on the unit under IC 22-13-5-3 or IC 22-13-5-4.
SECTION 704. IC 36-7-2-9.1, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 9.1. (a) This section does not apply to:
(1) a manufactured housing community; or
(2) a mobile home community;
that is licensed, permitted, and inspected by the Indiana department of
health or a local board of health.
(b) This section applies only to a city, town, or county that requires
a building permit, plan review, or inspection for the construction of a
Class 2 structure.
(c) As used in this section, "Class 2 structure" has the meaning set
forth in IC 22-12-1-5.
(d) A city, town, or county shall allow the plan review or inspection
to be conducted by the following:
(1) An individual who is employed by the city, town, or county as
a building inspector.
(2) An individual who is employed by another city, town, or
county as a building inspector.
(3) A private provider who is:
(A) an architect registered under IC 25-4-1;
(B) a professional engineer registered under IC 25-31-1;
IC 25-4-3; or
(C) a certified building official (as defined in IC 36-7-2.5-3).
IC 36-7-2.5-4).
(e) An applicant for a building permit may choose to have a private
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

414
provider under subsection (d)(3) conduct the plan review or inspection
as provided in IC 36-7-2.5.
SECTION 705. IC 36-7-2.5-9, AS ADDED BY P.L.146-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 9. As used in this chapter, "private provider"
means a person who:
(1) is:
(A) an architect registered under IC 25-4-1;
(B) a professional engineer registered under IC 25-31-1;
IC 25-4-3; or
(C) a certified building official;
(2) is not:
(A) an employee of;
(B) affiliated with; or
(C) financially interested in;
the person, firm, or corporation engaged in the project to be
reviewed or inspected; and
(3) is not an employee of a unit.
SECTION 706. IC 36-7-4-1108, AS AMENDED BY P.L.134-2024,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1108. (a) This section applies only to a child care
home that is used as the primary residence of the person who operates
the child care home regardless of whether the child care home meets
the definition set forth in IC 12-7-2-28.6.
(b) A zoning ordinance may not do any of the following:
(1) Exclude a child care home from a residential area solely
because the child care home is a business.
(2) Impose limits on the number of children that may be served by
a child care home at any one (1) time that vary from the limits set
forth in IC 12-7-2-33.7 and IC 12-7-2-33.8.
(3) Impose requirements or restrictions upon child care homes
that vary from the requirements and restrictions imposed upon
child care homes by rules adopted by the division of family
resources or the fire prevention and building safety commission.
department of homeland security.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b), a child care home may be
required to meet the same:
(1) zoning requirements;
(2) developmental standards; and
(3) building codes;
that apply to other residential structures in the same residential district
or classification as the child care home.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

415
SECTION 707. IC 36-7-8-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.208-2015,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The legislative body of a county having a
county department of buildings or joint city-county building
department may, by ordinance, adopt building, heating, ventilating, air
conditioning, electrical, plumbing, and sanitation standards for
unincorporated areas of the county. These standards take effect only on
the legislative body's receipt of written approval from the fire
prevention and building safety commission. department of homeland
security.
(b) An ordinance adopted under this section must be based on
occupancy, and it applies to:
(1) the construction, alteration, equipment, use, occupancy,
location, and maintenance of buildings, structures, and
appurtenances that are on land or over water and are:
(A) erected after the ordinance takes effect; and
(B) if expressly provided by the ordinance, existing when the
ordinance takes effect;
(2) conversions of buildings and structures, or parts of them, from
one occupancy classification to another; and
(3) the movement or demolition of buildings, structures, and
equipment for the operation of buildings and structures.
(c) The rules of the fire prevention and building safety commission
department of homeland security are the minimum standards upon
which ordinances adopted under this section must be based.
(d) An ordinance adopted under this section does not apply to
private homes that are built by individuals and used for their own
occupancy. However, onsite sewage systems of a private home
described in this subsection must comply with state laws and rules.
SECTION 708. IC 36-7-8-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The legislative
body of a county having a county department of buildings or a joint
city-county building department may, by ordinance, adopt minimum
housing standards for unincorporated areas of the county. These
standards must be consistent with the rules of the fire prevention and
building safety commission. department of homeland security.
(b) An ordinance adopted under this section applies to:
(1) residential buildings;
(2) residential parts of mixed occupancy buildings; and
(3) conversions of buildings from nonresidential to residential or
partly residential.
(c) A municipality may elect, by ordinance, to make itself subject to
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

416
an ordinance adopted under this section.
(d) This section does not affect IC 16-41-26.
SECTION 709. IC 36-7.5-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.114-2022,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The northwest Indiana regional development
authority is established as a separate body corporate and politic to carry
out the purposes of this article by:
(1) acquiring, constructing, equipping, owning, leasing, and
financing projects and facilities for lease to or for the benefit of
eligible political subdivisions under this article in accordance
with IC 36-7.5-3-1.5;
(2) funding and developing the Gary/Chicago International
Airport expansion and other airport authority projects, commuter
transportation district and other rail projects and services,
regional bus authority projects and services, regional
transportation authority projects and services, and economic
development projects in northwestern Indiana;
(3) assisting with the funding of infrastructure needed to sustain
development of an intermodal facility in northwestern Indiana;
(4) overseeing the operations of the northwest Indiana
commuter transportation district established under IC 8-5-15;
(4) (5) funding and developing regional transportation
infrastructure projects under IC 36-9-43; and
(5) (6) studying and evaluating destination based economic
development projects that have:
(A) an identified market;
(B) identified funding sources and these funding sources
include at least fifty percent (50%) from nongovernmental
sources; and
(C) a demonstrable short and long term local and regional
economic impact, as verified by an independent economic
analysis.
An economic analysis conducted under clause (C) must be
submitted to the budget committee at least thirty (30) days before
review is sought for the project under IC 36-7.5-3-1.5.
SECTION 710. IC 36-7.5-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.114-2022,
SECTION 37, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The development authority shall do the
following:
(1) Subject to sections 1.5 and 1.7 of this chapter, assist in the
coordination of local efforts concerning projects.
(2) Assist a commuter transportation district, an airport authority,
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

417
a regional transportation authority, and a regional bus authority in
coordinating regional transportation and economic development
efforts.
(3) Subject to sections 1.5 and 1.7 of this chapter, fund projects
as provided in this article.
(4) Fund bus services (including fixed route services and flexible
or demand-responsive services) and projects related to bus
services and bus terminals, stations, or facilities.
(5) Oversee the operations of the northern Indiana commuter
transportation district established under IC 8-5-15.
SECTION 711. IC 36-7.5-4-23 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. (a) An appropriation made
for the benefit of the northern Indiana commuter transportation
district established under IC 8-5-15 must be made to the
development authority.
(b) The development authority must do the following with
respect to an appropriation made under subsection (a):
(1) Transfer to the northern Indiana commuter
transportation district the amount necessary for the operation
of the district.
(2) Retain any remaining amount for strategic planning for
and the expansion of the northern Indiana commuter
transportation district.
SECTION 712. IC 36-8-2.5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.7-2021,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. The following definitions apply
throughout this chapter:
(1) "Communication" means an oral or written statement, note,
record, recording, report, or document made during, or arising out
of, a first responder's receipt of CISM services or peer support
services.
(2) "Critical incident" means an actual or perceived event or
situation that involves crisis, disaster, trauma, or emergency.
(3) "Critical incident stress" means the acute or cumulative
psychological stress or trauma that a first responder may
experience in providing emergency services in response to a
critical incident. The stress or trauma is an unusually strong
emotional, cognitive, behavioral, or physical reaction that may
interfere with normal functioning by causing:
(A) physical and emotional injury or illness;
(B) failure of a usual coping mechanism;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

418
(C) loss of interest in work or normal life activities;
(D) loss of ability to function; or
(E) psychological disruption of personal life, including the
emergency responder's relationship with a spouse, child,
relative, or friend.
(4) "CISM services" means critical incident stress management
services that include programs and services related to education,
prevention, and mitigation of the effects from exposure to highly
stressful critical incidents. The term includes services provided by
an individual certified to provide group crisis intervention,
individual crisis intervention, peer support, or any related service.
(5) "CISM services provider" means an individual who is certified
to provide CISM services and who is acting as part of a CISM
team or in another official capacity.
(6) "CISM team" means an organized community or local crisis
response team that is trained and certified under standards
substantially similar to the training and certification standards
established by the Indiana emergency medical services fire and
EMS standards and education commission as set forth under
IC 16-31-2.
(7) "First responder" has the meaning set forth in IC 10-10.5-2-1.
(8) "First responder recipient" means an individual who is a first
responder and receives CISM services, peer support services, or
both.
(9) "Peer support services" means services provided by a person
who:
(A) is a first responder working for the same department or
public agency that the first responder recipient works for; and
(B) acts:
(i) in the person's official capacity as a peer support team
member; and
(ii) within the written peer support guidelines that are in
effect for the person's respective first responder agency
program.
The term includes active listening, assessment, mentoring, crisis
intervention, or other support services provided to an employee
experiencing personal or professional difficulties that may or may
not be a result of the employee's exposure to highly stressful
critical incidents.
(10) "Peer support team member" means a first responder who:
(A) has successfully completed peer support training; and
(B) is designated a peer support team member;
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

419
by the head of the first responder's agency or the president of the
bargaining unit of the employees of the department or agency.
SECTION 713. IC 36-8-3-4.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.57-2023,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4.3. (a) This section also applies to a town,
township, or fire department of a fire protection territory or fire
protection district, that has at least one (1) certified employee of a
full-time, paid fire or police department, without regard to whether:
(1) the employee is an appointed police officer or firefighter; or
(2) under section 5 of this chapter, the police or fire department
is exempt from sections 3, 4, and 4.1 of this chapter.
(b) As used in this section, "certified employee" means an individual
who, as a condition of employment, holds a valid certification issued
under IC 16-31-3 by the Indiana emergency medical services fire and
EMS standards and education commission established by
IC 16-31-2-1. IC 16-31-2-1.5.
(c) As used in this section, "medical director" means a physician
with an unlimited license to practice medicine in Indiana and who
performs the duties and responsibilities described in 836 IAC 2-2-1.
(d) If a medical director takes any of the following actions against
a certified employee, the medical director shall provide to the certified
employee and to the chief of the certified employee's department a
written explanation of the reasons for the action taken by the medical
director:
(1) The medical director refuses or fails to supervise or otherwise
provide medical control and direction to the certified employee.
(2) The medical director refuses or fails to attest to the
competency of the certified employee to perform emergency
medical services.
(3) The medical director suspends the certified employee from
performing emergency medical services.
(e) Before a police or fire department takes any employment related
action against a certified employee as the result of a medical director's
action described in subsection (d), the certified employee is entitled to
a hearing and appeal concerning the medical director's action as
provided in section 4 of this chapter.
(f) If the medical director's action that is the subject of an appeal
under subsection (e) is based on a health care decision made by the
certified employee in performing emergency medical services, the
safety board conducting the hearing shall consult with an independent
medical expert to determine whether the certified employee followed
the applicable emergency medical services protocol in making the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

420
health care decision. The independent medical expert:
(1) must be a physician trained in emergency medical services;
and
(2) may not be affiliated with the same hospital as the medical
director.
SECTION 714. IC 36-8-3.2-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. (a) The
appointing authority shall adopt standards for firefighters establishing
a physical agility test that:
(1) does not discriminate on the basis of sex;
(2) reflects the essential functions of the job; and
(3) at a minimum includes testing the following:
(A) Fear of heights (acrophobia).
(B) Fear of confinement (claustrophobia).
(C) Muscular strength.
(D) Muscular endurance.
(E) Cardiovascular endurance.
(F) Musculoskeletal flexibility.
(b) The appointing authority shall also adopt standards for
firefighters establishing a general aptitude test.
(c) The standards required by this section must be presented to the
board of firefighting personnel standards and education established by
IC 22-12-3-1 Indiana fire and EMS standards and education
commission established by IC 16-31-2-1.5 for review.
SECTION 715. IC 36-8-3.5-19.3, AS ADDED BY P.L.13-2010,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 19.3. (a) This section applies to a department
that has at least one (1) certified employee, without regard to whether:
(1) the employee is an appointed police officer or firefighter; or
(2) the department has a merit system to which this chapter does
not otherwise apply as provided under section 1 of this chapter.
(b) As used in this section, "certified employee" means an individual
who, as a condition of employment, holds a valid certification issued
under IC 16-31-3 by the Indiana emergency medical services fire and
EMS standards and education commission established by
IC 16-31-2-1. IC 16-31-2-1.5.
(c) As used in this section, "medical director" means a physician
with an unlimited license to practice medicine in Indiana and who
performs the duties and responsibilities described in 836 IAC 2-2-1.
(d) If a medical director takes any of the following actions against
a certified employee, the medical director shall provide to the certified
employee and to the chief of the certified employee's department a
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

421
written explanation of the reasons for the action taken by the medical
director:
(1) The medical director refuses or fails to supervise or otherwise
provide medical control and direction to the certified employee.
(2) The medical director refuses or fails to attest to the
competency of the certified employee to perform emergency
medical services.
(3) The medical director suspends the certified employee from
performing emergency medical services.
(e) Before a department takes any employment related action as the
result of a medical director's action described in subsection (d) against
a certified employee, the certified employee is entitled to a hearing and
appeal concerning the medical director's action as provided in sections
17 and 18 of this chapter.
(f) If the medical director's action that is the subject of an appeal
under subsection (e) is based on a health care decision made by the
certified employee in performing emergency medical services, the
commission conducting the hearing shall consult with an independent
medical expert to determine whether the certified employee followed
the applicable emergency medical services protocol in making the
health care decision. The independent medical expert:
(1) must be a physician trained in emergency medical services;
and
(2) may not be affiliated with the same hospital as the medical
director.
SECTION 716. IC 36-8-10.5-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this
chapter, "education board" refers to the board of firefighting personnel
standards and education.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2026.
SECTION 717. IC 36-8-10.5-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. (a) This section applies after
December 31, 2026.
(b) As used in this chapter, "education commission" refers to
the Indiana fire and EMS standards and education commission
established by IC 16-31-2-1.5.
SECTION 718. IC 36-8-10.5-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 209, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 7. (a) The education board
commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 establishing minimum
basic training requirements for full-time firefighters and volunteer
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

422
firefighters, subject to subsection (b) and section 7.5 of this chapter.
The requirements must include training in the following areas:
(1) Orientation.
(2) Personal safety.
(3) Forcible entry.
(4) Ventilation.
(5) Apparatus.
(6) Ladders.
(7) Self-contained breathing apparatus.
(8) Hose loads.
(9) Streams.
(10) Basic recognition of special hazards.
(b) A person who fulfills the certification requirements for:
(1) Firefighter I; or
(2) Firefighter II;
is considered to comply with the requirements established under
subsection (a).
(c) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a), (d), and (f),
the minimum basic training requirements for full-time firefighters and
volunteer firefighters must include successful completion of a basic or
inservice course of education and training on sudden infant death
syndrome that is certified by the Indiana emergency medical services
commission (created under IC 16-31-2-1) education commission
established by IC 16-31-2-1.5 in conjunction with the state health
commissioner.
(d) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a), (c), and (f),
the minimum basic training requirements for full-time and volunteer
firefighters must include successful completion of an instruction course
on vehicle emergency response driving safety. The education board
commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to operate this course.
(e) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a), (c), (d), and
(f), the minimum basic training requirements for full-time and
volunteer firefighters must include successful completion of a basic or
inservice course of education and training in interacting with
individuals with autism that is certified by the Indiana emergency
medical services commission (created under IC 16-31-2-1). education
commission.
(f) This subsection does not apply to volunteer firefighters. After
December 31, 2024, in addition to the requirements of subsections (a),
(c), (d), and (e), the minimum basic training requirement for full-time
firefighters must include training, which may be completed online or
by other means of virtual instruction, that addresses the mental health
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

423
and wellness of firefighters, including:
(1) healthy coping skills to preserve the mental health of
firefighters and to manage the stress and trauma related to
employment as a firefighter;
(2) recognition of:
(A) symptoms of posttraumatic stress disorder; and
(B) signs of suicidal behavior; and
(3) information on mental health resources available for
firefighters.
(g) The education board commission may adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 concerning the adoption of the most current edition of the
following National Fire Protection Association standards, subject to
amendment by the board:
(1) NFPA 472.
(2) NFPA 1001.
(3) NFPA 1002.
(4) NFPA 1003.
(5) NFPA 1006.
(6) NFPA 1021.
(7) NFPA 1031.
(8) NFPA 1033.
(9) NFPA 1035.
(10) NFPA 1041.
(11) NFPA 1521.
(12) NFPA 1670.
SECTION 719. IC 36-8-10.5-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.32-2021,
SECTION 102, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 11. (a) The education board
commission must establish best practices to improve safety and health
outcomes for full-time firefighters and volunteer firefighters not later
than July 1, 2021.
(b) The best practices must include:
(1) a proactive health and safety risk management system
consisting of a joint employer and employee governance structure
to oversee a continuous process of identification, evaluation,
monitoring and controlling, and reporting of safety and health
hazards in the workplace;
(2) ways to reduce firefighter risk of exposure to carcinogens; and
(3) ways to prevent or reduce the risk of injuries and illness with
particular focus on causes of compensable worker's compensation
or disability claims.
(c) The education board commission shall:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

424
(1) review programs established by political subdivisions and
volunteer fire departments implementing best practices under this
section; and
(2) provide a political subdivision or volunteer fire department
with a letter for submission to an insurance company for
consideration in a premium or rate discount toward the purchase
or procurement of worker's compensation insurance under
IC 22-3-2-2 or IC 36-8-12-10 that states that the political
subdivision or volunteer fire department has implemented best
practices under this section.
SECTION 720. IC 36-8-12-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.10-2019,
SECTION 139, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 2. As used in this chapter:
"Emergency medical services personnel" means individuals certified
by the emergency medical services fire and EMS standards and
education commission established by IC 16-31-2-1 who:
(1) as a result of a written application, have been elected or
appointed to membership in a volunteer fire department; and
(2) have executed a pledge to faithfully perform, with or without
nominal compensation, the work related duties assigned and
orders given to the individuals by the chief of the volunteer fire
department or an officer of the volunteer fire department,
including orders or duties involving education and training.
"Employee" means a person in the service of another person under
a written or implied contract of hire or apprenticeship.
"Employer" means:
(1) a political subdivision;
(2) an individual or the legal representative of a deceased
individual;
(3) a firm;
(4) an association;
(5) a limited liability company;
(6) an employer that provides on-the-job training under the
federal School to Work Opportunities Act (20 U.S.C. 6101 et
seq.) to the extent set forth in IC 22-3-2-2.5(a); or
(7) a corporation or its receiver or trustee;
that uses the services of another person for pay.
"Essential employee" means an employee:
(1) who the employer has determined to be essential to the
operation of the employer's daily enterprise; and
(2) without whom the employer is likely to suffer economic injury
as a result of the absence of the essential employee.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

425
"Nominal compensation" means annual compensation of not more
than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).
"Public servant" has the meaning set forth in IC 35-31.5-2-261.
"Responsible party" has the meaning set forth in IC 13-11-2-191(d).
"Volunteer fire department" means a department or association
organized for the purpose of answering fire alarms, extinguishing fires,
and providing other emergency services, the majority of members of
which receive no compensation or nominal compensation for their
services.
"Volunteer firefighter" means a firefighter:
(1) who, as a result of a written application, has been elected or
appointed to membership in a volunteer fire department;
(2) who has executed a pledge to faithfully perform, with or
without nominal compensation, the work related duties assigned
and orders given to the firefighter by the chief of the volunteer
fire department or an officer of the volunteer fire department,
including orders or duties involving education and training as
prescribed by the volunteer fire department or the state; and
(3) whose name has been entered on a roster of volunteer
firefighters that is kept by the volunteer fire department and that
has been approved by the proper officers of the unit.
"Volunteer member" means a member of a volunteer emergency
medical services association connected with a unit as set forth in
IC 16-31-5-1(6).
SECTION 721. IC 36-8-16.7-24, AS AMENDED BY P.L.36-2016,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 24. (a) The statewide 911 board is established to
develop, implement, and oversee the statewide 911 system. The board
is a body corporate and politic, and though it is separate from the state,
the exercise by the board of its powers constitutes an essential
governmental function.
(b) The following recommendations must be made to the governor
concerning the membership of the board:
(1) The executive committees of:
(A) the Indiana chapter of the National Emergency Number
Association (NENA); and
(B) the Indiana chapter of the Association of Public Safety
Communication Officials International (APCO);
shall jointly recommend three (3) individuals, at least one (1) of
whom must have budget experience at the local level.
(2) The facilities based CMRS providers authorized to provide
CMRS in Indiana shall jointly recommend one (1) individual.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

426
(3) The Indiana Association of County Commissioners shall
recommend one (1) individual who is a county commissioner in
Indiana.
(4) The Indiana Sheriffs' Association shall recommend one (1)
individual who is a county sheriff in Indiana.
(5) The Indiana Telecommunications Association, or any
successor organization, shall recommend two (2) individuals as
follows:
(A) One (1) individual representing a local exchange carrier
that serves less than fifty thousand (50,000) local exchange
access lines in Indiana.
(B) One (1) individual representing a local exchange carrier
that serves at least fifty thousand (50,000) local exchange
access lines in Indiana.
(6) The Indiana Cable Telecommunications Association shall
recommend one (1) individual representing a VOIP provider.
(7) The Indiana Association of Cities and Towns shall
recommend one (1) individual representing municipalities.
(c) The board consists of the following fifteen (15) members:
(1) The treasurer of state or the treasurer's designee. The treasurer
of state or the treasurer's designee is chairperson of the board for
a term concurrent with the treasurer of state's term of office.
However, the treasurer of state's designee serves at the pleasure
of the treasurer of state.
(2) Three (3) members for a term of three (3) years who are
appointed by the governor after considering the recommendations
submitted under subsection (b)(1) by the executive committees of
NENA and APCO. At least one (1) member appointed under this
subdivision must have budget experience at the local level.
(3) One (1) facilities based CMRS member who is appointed by
the governor after considering the recommendation submitted
under subsection (b)(2) by the facilities based CMRS providers
authorized to provide CMRS in Indiana. A member appointed
under this subdivision may not be affiliated with the same
business entity as a member appointed under subdivision (6), (7),
or (8).
(4) One (1) county commissioner member appointed by the
governor president pro tempore of the senate after considering
the recommendation submitted under subsection (b)(3) by the
Indiana Association of County Commissioners.
(5) One (1) county sheriff member appointed by the governor
after considering the recommendation submitted under subsection
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

427
(b)(4) by the Indiana Sheriffs' Association.
(6) One (1) member who represents a local exchange carrier that
serves less than fifty thousand (50,000) local exchange access
lines in Indiana and who is appointed by the governor after
considering the recommendation of the Indiana
Telecommunications Association, or any successor organization,
under subsection (b)(5)(A). A member appointed under this
subdivision may not be affiliated with the same business entity as
a member appointed under subdivision (3), (7), or (8).
(7) One (1) member who represents a local exchange carrier that
serves at least fifty thousand (50,000) local exchange access lines
in Indiana and who is appointed by the governor after considering
the recommendation of the Indiana Telecommunications
Association, or any successor organization, under subsection
(b)(5)(B). A member appointed under this subdivision may not be
affiliated with the same business entity as a member appointed
under subdivision (3), (6), or (8).
(8) One (1) member who represents a VOIP provider and who is
appointed by the governor after considering the recommendation
of the Indiana Cable Telecommunications Association under
subsection (b)(6). A member appointed under this subdivision
may not be affiliated with the same business entity as a member
appointed under subdivision (3), (6), or (7).
(9) One (1) member who represents municipalities and is
appointed by the governor speaker of the house of
representatives after considering the recommendation of the
Indiana Association of Cities and Towns submitted under
subsection (b)(7).
(10) The state fire marshal or the state fire marshal's designee.
(11) The superintendent of the state police department or the
superintendent's designee.
(12) The executive director of the department of homeland
security, or the executive director's designee. The executive
director of the department of homeland security or the executive
director's designee is a nonvoting member of the board.
(13) The state GIS officer. The state GIS officer is a nonvoting
member of the board.
(d) This subsection applies to a member appointed by the governor
under subsection (c)(2) through (c)(9). The governor appointing
authority shall ensure that the terms of the initial members appointed
by the governor appointing authority are staggered so that the terms
of not more than five (5) members expire in a single calendar year.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

428
After the initial appointments, subsequent appointments shall be for
three (3) year terms. A vacancy on the board shall be filled for the
vacating member's unexpired term in the same manner as the original
appointment, and a member of the board is eligible for reappointment.
In making an appointment under subsection (c)(2) through (c)(9), the
governor appointing authority shall take into account the various
geographical areas of Indiana, including rural and urban areas. A
member appointed by the governor under this section serves at the
pleasure of the governor. appointing authority.
(e) A member must be a resident of Indiana.
(f) A member may not vote by proxy.
SECTION 722. IC 36-8-17-1 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "commission" refers to the fire
prevention and building safety commission.
SECTION 723. IC 36-8-17-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. As used in this
chapter, "fire safety law" means any law, including rules and orders of
the commission, department, safeguarding life or property from the
hazards of fire or explosion.
SECTION 724. IC 36-8-17-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.107-2023,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) A fire department serving an area that does
not include a city may engage in an inspection program to promote
compliance with fire safety laws. Upon the request of an owner or a
primary lessee who resides in a private dwelling, the fire department
may inspect the interior of the private dwelling to determine
compliance with IC 22-11-18-3.5. The fire department shall maintain
a written report for each inspection. These reports shall be made
available to the department upon request.
(b) The fire department serving an area that includes a city shall
inspect every place and public way within the jurisdiction of the city,
except the interiors of private dwellings, for compliance with the fire
safety laws. Upon the request of an owner or a primary lessee who
resides in a private dwelling, the fire department may inspect the
interior of the private dwelling to determine compliance with
IC 22-11-18-3.5. Except as otherwise provided in the rules adopted by
the commission, department, the fire chief of the fire department shall
specify the schedule under which places and public ways are inspected
and may exclude a class of places or public ways from inspection under
this section, if the fire chief determines that the public interest will be
served without inspection. The fire department shall maintain a written
report for each inspection. The fire department shall submit monthly
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

429
reports to the department, on forms prescribed by the department,
containing the following information:
(1) The total number of inspections made.
(2) The total number of defects found, classified as required by
the office.
(3) The total number of orders issued for correction of each class
of defect.
(4) The total number of orders complied with.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), an inspection may only be
carried out by an individual who:
(1) is a firefighter who meets, at a minimum, the training
requirements described in IC 36-8-10.5; or
(2) has:
(A) obtained certification as a:
(i) fire inspector I as described in 655 IAC 1-2.1-12;
(ii) fire inspector II as described in 655 IAC 1-2.1-13; or
(iii) fire inspector I/II as described in 655 IAC 1-2.1-13.1;
and
(B) in the case of an individual who is not an employee of a
fire department, completed at least two (2) years of experience
as a fire inspector described in clause (A)(i) through (A)(iii).
(d) A volunteer fire department may carry out inspections under this
section only through an individual who is certified under
IC 22-14-2-6(c).
SECTION 725. IC 36-8-17-11 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) An order issued
under section 9 or 10 of this chapter may be appealed to the
commission department under IC 4-21.5-3-7. A decision to deny a
request to modify or reverse an order issued under section 10 of this
chapter is not appealable.
(b) If an order issued under section 9 or 10 of this chapter is
appealed, the commission department or its designee shall conduct all
administrative proceedings under IC 4-21.5. In its proceedings, the
commission department may modify or reverse the order.
SECTION 726. IC 36-8-17-13 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. The commission
department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement this
chapter.
SECTION 727. IC 36-9-7-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.127-2017,
SECTION 288, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. (a) The personnel of the
department of traffic engineering consists of a city traffic engineer, the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

430
traffic engineer's assistants, and other employees necessary to perform
the duties of the department. The city executive shall appoint the traffic
engineer.
(b) The traffic engineer must:
(1) have a thorough knowledge of modern traffic control methods;
(2) be able to supervise and coordinate diversified traffic
engineering activities and prepare engineering reports; and
(3) either:
(A) be a registered professional engineer who has practiced
traffic engineering for at least one (1) year;
(B) have a certificate of engineer-in-training under IC 25-31
IC 25-4-3 and have practiced traffic engineering for at least
two (2) years; or
(C) have practiced traffic engineering for at least ten (10)
years.
A person must furnish evidence of the person's qualifications under this
subsection before the person may be appointed by the executive.
SECTION 728. IC 36-9-27-30, AS AMENDED BY P.L.57-2013,
SECTION 101, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 30. (a) Whenever the county
surveyor is not registered under IC 25-21.5 or IC 25-31 IC 25-4-3 and
that statute prohibits an unregistered person from performing any
function that the county surveyor is directed to do under this chapter,
the surveyor shall employ and fix the compensation of a person who is
a professional engineer or professional surveyor in performing those
functions. However, if the county surveyor does not employ a
registered person within one (1) year of the acceptance of a petition for
construction or reconstruction of a drain, the board may make the
appointment of a registered person that this section requires.
(b) The person employed by the county surveyor, who shall be
known as a qualified deputy, shall file with the county surveyor the
original of all plans, specifications, and other documents made by the
person in performing the work for which the person was employed.
Those plans, specifications, and other documents become a part of the
permanent file of the county surveyor's office, which the county
surveyor shall maintain for the use of the board as provided in section
109 of this chapter.
(c) The rate of compensation paid to a qualified deputy shall be
assessed against the drainage project for which the deputy was
employed.
(d) This subsection applies whenever the county surveyor is not
registered under IC 25-21.5 or IC 25-31, IC 25-4-3, and the county
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

431
surveyor has not employed a registered person as provided in
subsection (a). If the county has a full-time employee who is registered
as a professional surveyor under IC 25-21.5 or as a professional
engineer under IC 25-31, IC 25-4-3, the board may, subject to the
approval of the county executive and the county surveyor, designate
that person to perform the functions of the county surveyor under this
chapter that are allowed under the employee's license as a professional
surveyor or professional engineer. If a designation is made and
approved under this subsection, the county surveyor may not employ
a registered person under subsection (a) to perform that same function.
SECTION 729. IC 36-9-27-31 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 31. If for any
reason there is no elected county surveyor in any county, the board
shall employ and fix the compensation of a part-time or full-time
engineer or surveyor. The engineer or surveyor, who must be registered
under IC 25-21.5 or IC 25-31 IC 25-4-3 and must be or become a
resident of Indiana, shall perform the functions required of the county
surveyor in this chapter.
SECTION 730. IC 36-9-27-71 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 71. (a) When, in
the construction or reconstruction of a regulated drain, the county
surveyor determines that the proposed drain will cross a public
highway or the right-of-way of a railroad company at a point where:
(1) there is no crossing; or
(2) the crossing will not adequately handle or will be endangered
by the flow of water from the drain when completed;
the county surveyor shall include in the plans the grade and cross
section requirements for a new crossing, or the requirements for
altering, enlarging, repairing, or replacing the crossing. The surveyor
shall mail a copy of the requirements addressed to the owner of the
highway or right-of-way.
(b) When requested by the owner of the highway or right-of-way,
the county surveyor shall meet with the owner at a time and place to be
fixed by the surveyor. The surveyor shall hear objections to the
requirements, and may then change the requirements as justice may
require.
(c) When the board finds that in the construction, reconstruction, or
maintenance of a regulated drain it is necessary to:
(1) alter, enlarge, repair, or replace a crossing; or
(2) construct a new crossing where none existed before;
the cost of the work on the crossing shall be paid by the owner of the
public highway. This cost may not be considered by the county
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

432
surveyor or by the board in determining the cost of the work on the
drain or in assessing benefits and damages. However, if it is necessary
for the owner of a public highway to construct a new crossing because
of a cut-off for the purpose of shortening or straightening a regulated
drain, the owner of the public highway shall pay one-half (1/2) of the
cost of the new crossing, and the remainder shall be included in the
cost of the work on the drain.
(d) A railroad company with a right-of-way that is:
(1) crossed by the construction of a regulated drain; or
(2) affected by the altering or enlarging of a crossing;
shall pay one-half (1/2) of the cost of the work on the crossing and the
remainder shall be included in the cost of the work on the drain.
(e) If the county surveyor is registered under IC 25-31, IC 25-4-3,
the county surveyor must review and approve or disapprove the plans
and hydraulic data for an existing crossing that is to be altered,
enlarged, repaired, or replaced, or the construction of a new crossing
for a public highway or the right-of-way of a railroad company. The
county surveyor shall disapprove the plans and hydraulic data if they
do not show that the structure will meet hydraulic requirements that
will permit the drain to function properly.
(f) If the county surveyor is registered under IC 25-21.5, the county
surveyor must review and approve or disapprove the plans and
hydraulic data for an existing crossing that is to be altered, enlarged,
repaired, or replaced or the construction of a new crossing for a public
highway or the right-of-way of a railroad company. The county
surveyor shall disapprove the plans and hydraulic data if they do not
show that the structure will meet hydraulic requirements that will
permit the drain to function properly.
(g) Approval of the plans and hydraulic data by a person who is
registered under IC 25-21.5 or IC 25-31 IC 25-4-3 is required before
the work can take place. However, if the county surveyor is not
registered under IC 25-21.5 or IC 25-31, IC 25-4-3, a registered person
who is selected under section 30 of this chapter shall:
(1) review and approve or disapprove the plans and specifications
described in this subsection;
(2) inform the county surveyor in writing of the approval or
disapproval; and
(3) submit all plans, specifications, and hydraulic data along with
the approval or disapproval.
SECTION 731. IC 36-10-3-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.133-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) This subsection applies only in a third class
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

433
city. A city board consists of four (4) members to be appointed by the
city executive. The members shall be appointed on the basis of their
interest in and knowledge of parks and recreation. In addition, the
creating ordinance may provide for one (1) or two (2) additional
members, those being:
(1) a member selected by the governing body of the school
corporation who is:
(A) a member of the governing body of the school corporation,
serving ex officio; or
(B) an individual who resides in the school corporation;
(2) a member selected by the governing body of the library district
who is:
(A) a member of the governing body of the library district,
serving ex officio; or
(B) an individual who resides in the library district, selected
by the governing body of the library district; or
(3) individuals under both subdivisions (1) and (2).
(b) This subsection applies in a county containing a consolidated
city and in a second class city. A city board consists of four (4)
members to be appointed by the city executive. The members shall be
appointed on the basis of their interest in and knowledge of parks and
recreation, but no more than two (2) members may be affiliated with
the same political party. In addition, the creating ordinance may
provide for one (1) or two (2) additional members, those being:
(1) either:
(A) a member of the governing body of the school corporation,
serving ex officio, selected by the governing body of the
school corporation; or
(B) an individual who resides in the school corporation,
selected by the governing body of the school corporation;
(2) a member of the governing body of the library district, serving
ex officio, selected by that body; or
(3) individuals described in both subdivisions (1) and (2).
(c) A town board consists of four (4) members to be appointed by
the town legislative body. The members shall be appointed on the basis
of their interest in and knowledge of parks and recreation. Except as
provided in section 4.1 of this chapter, not more than two (2) members
may be affiliated with the same political party. Members of the board
must be residents of the district. In addition, the creating ordinance
may provide for one (1) or two (2) additional members, those being:
(1) a member:
(A) of the governing body of the school corporation, serving
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

434
ex officio, selected by that body; or
(B) designated by the governing body of the school
corporation;
(2) a member selected by the governing body of the library district
who is:
(A) a member of the governing body of the library district
serving ex officio; or
(B) an individual who resides in the library district; or
(3) individuals under both subdivisions (1) and (2).
(d) A county board shall be appointed as follows:
(1) Two (2) members shall be appointed by the judge of the
circuit court.
(2) One (1) member shall be appointed by the county executive.
(3) Two (2) members shall be appointed by the county fiscal
body.
The members appointed under subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) shall be
appointed on the basis of their interest in and knowledge of parks and
recreation, but no more than one (1) member appointed under
subdivisions (1) and (3) may be affiliated with the same political party.
In a county having at least one (1) first or second class city, the creating
ordinance must provide for one (1) ex officio board member to be
appointed by the executive of that city. The member appointed by the
city executive must be affiliated with a different political party than the
member appointed by the county executive. However, if a county has
more than one (1) such city, the executives of those cities shall agree
on the member. The member serves for a term coterminous with the
term of the appointing executive or executives.
(e) Ex officio members have all the rights of regular members,
including the right to vote. A vacancy in an ex officio position shall be
filled by the appointing authority. All members serving on a county,
city, or town board have the same rights, including the right to vote. A
vacancy in the seat of a member shall be filled by the appointing
authority.
(f) A municipal executive, a member of a county fiscal body, a
member of the county executive, or a member of the municipal fiscal
body may not serve on a board.
(g) The creating ordinance in any county may provide for:
(1) the county cooperative extension coordinator;
(2) the county extension educator; or
(3) a member of the county extension committee selected by the
committee;
to serve as an ex officio member of the county board, in addition to the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

435
members provided for under subsection (d).
(h) The creating ordinance in a county having no first or second
class cities may provide for a member of the county board to be
selected by the board of supervisors of a soil and water conservation
district in which a facility of the county board is located. The member
selected under this subsection is in addition to the members provided
for under subsections (d) and (g).
SECTION 732. IC 36-12-1-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 49, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. "Indiana library and historical board" refers to
the Indiana library and historical board established by IC 4-23-7-2.
SECTION 733. IC 36-12-3-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.84-2012,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) The library board may adopt a resolution
allowing money to be disbursed under this section for lawful library
purposes, including advertising and promoting the programs and
services of the library.
(b) With the prior written approval of the library board and if the
library board has adopted a resolution under subsection (a), claim
payments may be made in advance of library board allowance for any
of the following types of expenses:
(1) Property or services purchased or leased from the federal
government or the federal government's agencies and the state,
the state's agencies, or the state's political subdivisions.
(2) Dues, subscriptions, and publications.
(3) License or permit fees.
(4) Insurance premiums.
(5) Utility payments or connection charges.
(6) Federal grant programs where:
(A) advance funding is not prohibited; and
(B) the contracting party posts sufficient security to cover the
amount advanced.
(7) Grants of state funds authorized by statute.
(8) Maintenance and service agreements.
(9) Legal retainer fees.
(10) Conference fees.
(11) Expenses related to the educational or professional
development of an individual employed by the library board,
including:
(A) inservice training;
(B) attending seminars or other special courses of instruction;
and
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

436
(C) tuition reimbursement;
if the library board determines that the expenditures under this
subdivision directly benefit the library.
(12) Leases or rental agreements.
(13) Bond or coupon payments.
(14) Payroll costs.
(15) State, federal, or county taxes.
(16) Expenses that must be paid because of emergency
circumstances.
(17) Expenses incurred to advertise and promote the programs
and services of the library.
(18) Other expenses described in a library board resolution.
The library board shall review and allow the claim at the library board's
first regular or special meeting following the payment of a claim under
this section.
(c) Each payment of expenses lawfully incurred for library purposes
must be supported by a fully itemized invoice or other documentation.
The library director shall certify to the library board before payment
that each claim for payment is true and correct. The certification must
be on a form prescribed by the state board of accounts.
(d) Purchases of books, magazines, pamphlets, films, filmstrips,
microforms, microfilms, slides, transparencies, phonodiscs,
phonotapes, models, art reproductions, and all other forms of library
and audiovisual materials are exempt from the restrictions imposed by
IC 5-22.
(e) The purchase of library automation systems must meet the
standards established by the Indiana library and historical board under
IC 4-23-7.1-11(b).
SECTION 734. IC 36-12-11-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005,
SECTION 49, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "board" refers to the
Indiana library and historical board established by IC 4-23-7-2.
SECTION 735. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) The terms of
all of the members serving on the advisory committee established
by IC 4-23-7.2-21 (before its repeal by this act) expire June 30,
2026.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 736. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) As used in
this SECTION, "commission" means the Indiana commission for
arts and humanities in education created by IC 4-23-12-1 (before
its repeal by this act).
(b) As used in this SECTION, "department" means the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

437
department of education.
(c) On July 1, 2026, all agreements and liabilities of the
commission are transferred to the department, as the successor
agency.
(d) On July 1, 2026, all records and property of the commission,
including appropriations and other funds under the control or
supervision of the commission, are transferred to the department,
as the successor agency.
(e) After July 1, 2026, any amounts owed to the commission
before July 1, 2026, are considered to be owed to the department,
as the successor agency.
(f) After July 1, 2026, a reference to the commission in a statute,
rule, contract, lease, or other document is considered a reference
to the department, as the successor agency.
(g) All powers, duties, agreements, and liabilities of the
commission with respect to bonds issued by the commission in
connection with any trust agreement or indenture securing those
bonds are transferred to the department, as the successor agency.
The rights of the trustee under any trust agreement or indenture
and the rights of the bondholders of the commission remain
unchanged, although the powers, duties, agreements, and liabilities
of the commission have been transferred to the department, as the
successor agency.
(h) The terms of all members serving on the commission expire
June 30, 2026.
(i) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 737. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) As used in
this SECTION, "commission" means the law enforcement
academy building commission created by IC 5-2-2-1 (before its
repeal by this act).
(b) As used in this SECTION, "department" means the state
police department.
(c) On July 1, 2026, all agreements and liabilities of the
commission are transferred to the department, as the successor
agency.
(d) On July 1, 2026, all records and property of the commission,
including appropriations and other funds under the control or
supervision of the commission, are transferred to the department,
as the successor agency.
(e) After July 1, 2026, any amounts owed to the commission
before July 1, 2026, are considered to be owed to the department,
as the successor agency.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

438
(f) After July 1, 2026, a reference to the commission in a statute,
rule, contract, lease, or other document is considered a reference
to the department, as the successor agency.
(g) All powers, duties, agreements, and liabilities of the
commission with respect to bonds issued by the commission in
connection with any trust agreement or indenture securing those
bonds are transferred to the department, as the successor agency.
The rights of the trustee under any trust agreement or indenture
and the rights of the bondholders of the commission remain
unchanged, although the powers, duties, agreements, and liabilities
of the commission have been transferred to the department, as the
successor agency.
(h) The terms of all members serving on the commission expire
June 30, 2026.
(i) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 738. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) As used in
this SECTION, "council" means the advisory council established
by IC 14-9-6-1 (before its repeal by this act).
(b) As used in this SECTION, "department" means the
department of natural resources.
(c) On July 1, 2026, all agreements and liabilities of the council
are transferred to the department, as the successor agency.
(d) On July 1, 2026, all records and property of the council,
including appropriations and other funds under the control or
supervision of the council, are transferred to the department, as
the successor agency.
(e) After July 1, 2026, any amounts owed to the council before
July 1, 2026, are considered to be owed to the department, as the
successor agency. The department shall transfer any amounts
received under this subsection to the state comptroller for deposit
in the state general fund.
(f) After July 1, 2026, a reference to the council in a statute,
rule, or other document is considered a reference to the
department, as the successor agency.
(g) All powers, duties, agreements, and liabilities of the council
with respect to bonds issued by the council in connection with any
trust agreement or indenture securing those bonds are transferred
to the department, as the successor agency. The rights of the
trustee under any trust agreement or indenture and the rights of
the bondholders of the council remain unchanged, although the
powers, duties, agreements, and liabilities of the council have been
transferred to the department, as the successor agency.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

439
(h) The terms of all members serving on the council expire June
30, 2026.
(i) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 739. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) As used in this
SECTION, "CHLA" refers to the commission on Hispanic/Latino
affairs established by IC 4-23-28-2 (before its repeal by this act).
(b) As used in this SECTION, "CSSBM" refers to the
commission on the social status of black males established by
IC 4-23-31-2 (before its repeal by this act).
(c) As used in this SECTION, "ICW" refers to the Indiana
commission for women created by IC 4-23-25-3 (before its repeal
by this act).
(d) As used in this SECTION, "NAIAC" refers to the Native
American Indian affairs commission established by IC 4-23-32-3
(before its repeal by this act).
(e) As used in this SECTION, "commission" refers to the
Indiana cultural commission established by IC 4-23-36-3 (as added
by this act).
(f) On July 1, 2026, all agreements and liabilities of the:
(1) CHLA;
(2) CSSBM;
(3) ICW; or
(4) NAIAC;
are transferred to the commission as the successor entity.
(g) On July 1, 2026, all records and property, including
appropriations and other funds under an entity's control or
supervision, of the:
(1) CHLA;
(2) CSSBM;
(3) ICW; or
(4) NAIAC;
are transferred to the commission as the successor entity.
(h) After June 30, 2026, any amount owed to the:
(1) CHLA;
(2) CSSBM;
(3) ICW; or
(4) NAIAC;
is considered to be owed to the commission as the successor entity.
The commission shall transfer any amounts received under this
subsection to the state comptroller for deposit in the state general
fund.
(i) After June 30, 2026, any reference to the:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

440
(1) CHLA;
(2) CSSBM;
(3) ICW; or
(4) NAIAC;
in a statute, rule, or other document is considered a reference to
the commission as the successor entity.
(j) All powers, duties, agreements, and liabilities of the:
(1) CHLA;
(2) CSSBM;
(3) ICW; or
(4) NAIAC;
relating to bonds issued by the board in connection with any trust
agreement or indenture securing those bonds are transferred to the
commission as the successor entity. The rights of the trustee under
any trust agreement or indenture and the rights of bondholders
described in this subsection remain unchanged although the
powers, duties, agreements, and liabilities of the ICW, CHLA,
CSSBM, and NAIAC, as applicable, have been transferred to the
commission as the successor entity.
(k) The term of any member serving as of June 30, 2026, on the:
(1) CHLA;
(2) CSSBM;
(3) ICW; or
(4) NAIAC;
expires July 1, 2026.
(l) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 740. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) The legislative
services agency shall prepare for introduction in 2027 any
legislation necessary to conform the Indiana code to:
(1) the expiration of IC 14-10 (natural resources commission)
on July 1, 2027; or
(2) the expiration or repeal of any other board, commission,
committee, council, or similar entity enacted in this act.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 741. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) Not later than
July 1, 2027, the treasurer of Purdue University shall transfer to
the treasurer of state the balance of any funds that remain on June
30, 2027, and are being held to administer IC 15-18-2. The
treasurer of state shall deposit amounts received under this
SECTION in the creamery inspection fund established by
IC 15-18-2-31.5, as added by this act.
(b) After December 31, 2026, a rule adopted by the creamery
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

441
examining board or the creamery licensing division of Purdue
University is considered a rule adopted by the Indiana state board
of animal health for all purposes of administering IC 15-18-2.
(c) After December 31, 2026, a license issued before January 1,
2027, by the creamery license division under IC 15-18-2:
(1) is considered a license issued by the Indiana state board of
animal health; and
(2) remains valid under the terms of the license until it expires
or is revoked in accordance with IC 15-18-2.
(d) This SECTION expires June 30, 2028.
SECTION 742. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) As used in this
SECTION, "commission" refers to the Indiana fire and EMS
standards and education commission established by IC 16-31-2-1.5,
as added by this act.
(b) As used in this SECTION, "education board" refers to the
board of firefighting personnel standards and education
established by IC 22-12-3-1 (before its expiration).
(c) As used in this SECTION, "EMS commission" refers to the
Indiana emergency medical services commission created by
IC 16-31-2-1 (before its expiration).
(d) On January 1, 2027, all agreements and liabilities of the
education board and the EMS commission are considered
agreements and liabilities of the commission.
(e) On January 1, 2027, all records and property of the
education board and the EMS commission, including any
appropriations and other funds under the control or supervision of
either entity, are considered records and property of the
commission.
(f) After December 31, 2026, any amount owed to the education
board or the EMS commission is considered owed to the
commission.
(g) After December 31, 2026, any reference to the education
board or the EMS commission in a statute, rule, or other document
is considered a reference to the commission.
(h) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
SECTION 743. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) As used in
this SECTION, "commission" means the occupational safety
standards commission created by IC 22-8-1.1-7 (before its repeal
by this act).
(b) As used in this SECTION, "board" means the board of
safety review created by IC 22-8-1.1-30.1.
(c) On January 1, 2027, all agreements and liabilities of the
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

442
commission are transferred to the board, as the successor entity.
(d) On January 1, 2027, all records and property of the
commission, including appropriations and other funds under the
control or supervision of the commission, are transferred to the
board, as the successor entity.
(e) After December 31, 2026, any amounts owed to the
commission before January 1, 2027, are considered to be owed to
the board, as the successor entity.
(f) After December 31, 2026, a reference to the commission in a
statute, rule, contract, lease, or other document is considered a
reference to the board, as the successor entity.
(g) Proceedings pending before the commission on January 1,
2027, shall be transferred from the commission to the board and
treated as if initiated by the board.
(h) The rules adopted by the commission before January 1,
2027, are considered, after December 31, 2026, rules of the board.
(i) All powers, duties, agreements, and liabilities of the
commission with respect to bonds issued by the commission in
connection with any trust agreement or indenture securing those
bonds are transferred to the board, as the successor agency. The
rights of the trustee under any trust agreement or indenture and
the rights of the bondholders of the commission remain unchanged,
although the powers, duties, agreements, and liabilities of the
commission have been transferred to the board, as the successor
entity.
(j) The terms of all members serving on the commission expire
December 31, 2026.
(k) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 744. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) As used in
this SECTION, "architect board" means the board of registration
for architects and landscape architects established by IC 25-4-1-2
(before the amendments made by this act).
(b) As used in this SECTION, "design professionals board"
means the Indiana board of registration for design professionals
established by IC 25-4-1-2.
(c) On January 1, 2027, all agreements and liabilities of the
architect board are transferred to the design professionals board,
as a successor.
(d) On January 1, 2027, all records and property of the architect
board, including appropriations and other funds under the control
or supervision of the architect board, are transferred to the design
professionals board, as a successor.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

443
(e) After January 1, 2027, any amounts owed to the architect
board on or before January 1, 2027, are considered owed to the
design professionals board, as a successor. The design professionals
board shall transfer any amounts transferred under this subsection
to the state comptroller for deposit in the state general fund.
(f) After January 1, 2027, a reference to the architect board in
a statute, rule, or other document is considered a reference to the
design professionals board, as a successor.
(g) All powers, duties, agreements, and liabilities of the architect
board with respect to bonds issued by the architect board in
connection with any trust agreement or indenture securing those
bonds are transferred to the design professionals board, as a
successor. The rights of the trustee under any trust agreement or
indenture and the rights of the bondholders of the architect board
remain unchanged, although the powers, duties, agreements, and
liabilities of the architect board have been transferred to the design
professionals board, as a successor.
(h) The terms of all members serving on the architect board
expire December 31, 2026.
(i) This SECTION expires January 1, 2028.
SECTION 745. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) As used in
this SECTION, "engineers board" means the state board of
registration for professional engineers established by IC 25-31-1-3
(before its repeal by this act).
(b) As used in this SECTION, "design professionals board"
means the Indiana board of registration for design professionals
established by IC 25-4-1-2.
(c) On January 1, 2027, all agreements and liabilities of the
engineers board are transferred to the design professionals board,
as a successor.
(d) On January 1, 2027, all records and property of the
engineers board, including appropriations and other funds under
the control or supervision of the engineers board, are transferred
to the design professionals board, as a successor.
(e) After January 1, 2027, any amounts owed to the engineers
board on or before January 1, 2027, are considered owed to the
design professionals board, as a successor. The design professionals
board shall transfer any amounts transferred under this subsection
to the state comptroller for deposit in the state general fund.
(f) After January 1, 2027, a reference to the engineers board in
a statute, rule, or other document is considered a reference to the
design professionals board, as a successor.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

444
(g) All powers, duties, agreements, and liabilities of the
engineers board with respect to bonds issued by the engineers
board in connection with any trust agreement or indenture
securing those bonds are transferred to the design professionals
board, as a successor. The rights of the trustee under any trust
agreement or indenture and the rights of the bondholders of the
engineers board remain unchanged, although the powers, duties,
agreements, and liabilities of the engineers board have been
transferred to the design professionals board, as a successor.
(h) The terms of all members serving on the engineers board
expire December 31, 2026.
(i) This SECTION expires January 1, 2028.
SECTION 746. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) The terms of
all members serving on the:
(1) Indiana pesticide review board established by
IC 15-16-4-42 (before its repeal by this act); and
(2) invasive species council established by IC 15-16-10-3
(before its repeal by this act);
expire June 30, 2026.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 747. An emergency is declared for this act.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

445
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Government and Regulatory
Reform, to which was referred House Bill 1003, has had the same
under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
House with the recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Delete everything after the enacting clause and insert the following:
(SEE TEXT OF BILL)
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1003 as introduced.)
MILLER D
Committee Vote: yeas 9, nays 4.
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Ways and Means, to which was
referred House Bill 1003, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the House with the
recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 7, between lines 33 and 34, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 3. IC 2-5-53.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 53.5. Government Reform Task Force
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "agency" has the meaning set
forth in IC 4-22-2-3.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "council" refers to the legislative
council established by IC 2-5-1.1-1.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "rule" has the meaning set forth
in IC 4-22-2-3.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "task force" refers to the
government reform task force established by section 5 of this
chapter.
Sec. 5. The government reform task force is established.
Sec. 6. (a) Except as provided in subsections (b), (c), (d), and (e),
IC 2-5-1.2 applies to the task force.
(b) The task force consists of the following ten (10) members of
the general assembly:
(1) Three (3) members appointed by the president pro
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

446
tempore of the senate.
(2) Two (2) members appointed by the minority leader of the
senate.
(3) Three (3) members appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives.
(4) Two (2) members appointed by the minority leader of the
house of representatives.
A member of the task force serves at the pleasure of the appointing
authority.
(c) The task force shall meet as called by the chair. All meetings
of the task force shall be open to the public in accordance with and
subject to IC 5-14-1.5. All records of the task force shall be subject
to the requirements of IC 5-14-3.
(d) A majority of the members of the task force constitutes a
quorum. The affirmative vote of at least a majority of the members
at a meeting at which a quorum is present is necessary for the task
force to take official action other than to meet and take testimony.
(e) The:
(1) chairman of the council shall designate the chair; and
(2) vice chairman of the council shall designate the vice chair;
of the task force from the members of the task force. The chair and
vice chair of the task force serve as chair and vice chair at the
pleasure of the appointing authority.
Sec. 7. The task force shall study:
(1) the feasibility of transferring the administration of the
office of the state chemist from Purdue University to the
Indiana state department of agriculture;
(2) any employment issue arising from a transfer of the
administration of the office of the state chemist; and
(3) any issue arising from a transfer of any property, records,
funds, or accounts of the office of state chemist to the Indiana
state department of agriculture.
Sec. 8. The task force may request information or testimony
from department or agency heads, or the designee of a department
or agency head, as determined necessary by the task force.
Sec. 9. The task force shall:
(1) develop recommendations in a report concerning the
issues set forth in section 7 of this chapter; and
(2) submit the report to the council in an electronic format
under IC 5-14-6 not later than November 1, 2026.
Sec. 10. The legislative services agency shall provide support
staff to the task force.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

447
Sec. 11. This chapter expires June 30, 2027.".
Page 10, delete lines 29 through 42.
Page 11, delete lines 1 through 18.
Page 64, line 8, after "the" insert "Indiana".
Page 110, between lines 2 and 3, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 195. IC 14-21-1-22.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22.5. (a) The review board shall
establish the Indiana historical marker program for marking
historical sites in Indiana. As a part of this program, the review
board shall fix a state format for historical markers. No person
may erect a historical marker in the state format without the
approval of the review board. All historical markers in the state
format shall be provided by the review board using appropriated
funds, local matching funds, donations, grants, or any other funds
provided for that purpose according to the guidelines and rules of
the historical marker program.
(b) The review board may appoint a historical marker advisory
committee to serve without compensation. The committee may
advise the review board and the director concerning the following:
(1) Guidelines and rules for the historical marker program.
(2) Appropriate sites to be marked.
(3) Other matters concerning the historical marker program
as requested by the review board or the director.
(c) Historical markers approved under this section, including
state format markers installed after 1945 and markers installed by
the Indiana Civil War centennial commission, are the property of
the state. Maintenance of state historical markers is part of the
historical marker program. The review board may cooperate with
individuals, local and state agencies, and private institutions and
organizations for the maintenance of the historical markers. Funds
made available to the historical marker program, as approved by
the review board, may be used for necessary maintenance.
(d) No historical marker may be erected on a highway of the
state highway system without the approval of the review board as
to its historical accuracy. This provision is in addition to any other
requirement of law.".
Page 133, delete lines 36 through 42.
Delete pages 134 through 138.
Page 139, delete lines 1 through 37.
Page 147, delete lines 15 through 42.
Delete page 148.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

448
Page 149, delete lines 1 through 22.
Page 149, delete lines 27 through 42.
Page 150, delete lines 1 through 28.
Page 150, delete lines 32 through 37.
Page 150, delete line 42.
Page 151, delete lines 1 through 6.
Page 152, delete lines 19 through 42.
Delete pages 153 through 154.
Page 155, delete lines 1 through 16.
Page 162, delete lines 17 through 42.
Delete page 163.
Page 164, delete lines 1 through 13.
Page 166, line 41, reset in roman "credited to the office of Purdue
pesticide programs. The money".
Page 166, line 42, reset in roman "may be used only to provide
education about pesticides.".
Page 166, line 42, delete "deposited in".
Page 167, delete line 1.
Delete page 168.
Page 169, delete lines 1 through 12.
Page 174, line 37, reset in roman "credited to the office of Purdue
pesticide".
Page 174, reset in roman line 38.
Page 174, line 39, reset in roman "pesticides.".
Page 174, line 39, delete "deposited in the pesticide use and
application fund".
Page 174, delete line 40.
Page 184, delete lines 14 through 42.
Page 185, delete lines 1 through 5.
Page 197, delete lines 4 through 42.
Delete page 198.
Page 227, line 8, after "The" insert "Indiana".
Page 233, delete lines 9 through 42.
Delete page 234.
Page 235, delete lines 1 through 41.
Page 287, line 10, delete "IC 22-10-3-1" and insert "IC
22-10-3-1.1".
Page 287, line 12, delete "Sec.1." and insert "Sec. 1.1.".
Page 362, delete lines 39 through 42.
Page 363, delete lines 1 through 5.
Page 363, delete lines 32 through 34.
Page 364, delete lines 3 through 7.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

449
Page 364, delete lines 19 through 24.
Page 365, delete lines 18 through 23.
Page 366, delete lines 10 through 12.
Page 366, delete lines 19 through 21.
Page 366, delete lines 33 through 42.
Delete page 367.
Page 368, delete lines 1 through 26.
Page 371, delete lines 36 through 42.
Delete page 372.
Page 373, delete lines 1 through 17.
Page 377, line 20, delete "FOLLOWS:" and insert "FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]:".
Page 378, delete lines 15 through 17, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 656. IC 25-4-1-28 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]. Sec. 28. This chapter shall be known and cited as
"The Indiana Architectural and Landscape Architectural Act".".
Page 392, delete lines 6 through 7.
Page 402, delete lines 22 through 23.
Page 406, delete lines 22 through 42.
Delete pages 407 through 420.
Page 421, delete lines 1 through 8.
Page 426, delete lines 2 through 30.
Page 433, delete lines 40 through 42.
Page 434, delete lines 1 through 31.
Page 436, delete lines 5 through 21.
Page 450, delete lines 15 through 42.
Delete pages 451 through 452.
Page 453, delete lines 1 through 12.
Page 496, delete lines 15 through 32.
Page 498, delete lines 28 through 40.
Page 499, delete lines 1 through 9.
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1003 as printed January 22, 2026.)
THOMPSON
Committee Vote: yeas 13, nays 6.
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

450
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1003 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 183, line 39, after "(b)" insert "The Indiana fire and EMS
standards and education commission is created.".
Page 185, between lines 6 and 7, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(h) After December 31, 2026, the rules of the Indiana
emergency medical services commission shall be considered the
rules of the Indiana fire and EMS standards and education
commission.".
Page 287, line 5, delete "2026:" and insert "2026, are considered,
after June 30, 2026, rules of the department. For purposes of
applying IC 4-22-2.6 to the readoption of rules transferred by this
subsection, the rules shall be treated as not expiring until January
1, 2031. In the interim, except as permitted under IC 4-22-2-38 to
make nonsubstantive technical corrections, the department may
not revise or repeal the transferred rules, including matters
incorporated by reference, until the rules are codified by the
general assembly or otherwise authorized by act of the general
assembly.".
Page 287, delete lines 6 through 9.
Page 309, line 31, strike "board" and insert "commission".
Page 310, between line 16 and 17, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"(f) After December 31, 2026, the rules of the board of
firefighting personnel standards and education shall be considered
the rules of the Indiana fire and EMS standards and education
commission.".
(Reference is to HB 1003 as printed January 27, 2026.)
BARTELS
_____
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1003 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 74, line 19, strike "commission's" and insert "department's".
Page 74, line 37, strike "commission." and insert "department.".
Page 75, delete lines 23 through 27.
Page 77, line 2, strike "commission" and insert "department".
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

451
Page 77, line 10, strike "commission" and insert "department".
Page 78, line 4, strike "commission," and insert "department,".
Page 144, line 35, delete "IC 15-11-16-4." and insert "IC
15-11-16.5-4.".
Page 194, line 27, strike "board." and insert "state department.".
Page 194, line 33, strike "board" and insert "state department".
Page 194, line 40, strike "board" and insert "state department".
Page 198, line 23, strike "state egg".
Page 199, line 20, strike "state egg".
Page 242, between lines 5 and 6, begin a new line double block
indented and insert:
"(D) One (1) member representing the Indiana osteopathic
medical association.".
Page 242, line 6, delete "(D)" and insert "(E)".
Page 242, line 8, delete "(E)" and insert "(F)".
Page 242, line 10, delete "(F)" and insert "(G)".
Page 242, line 12, delete "(G)" and insert "(H)".
Page 242, line 14, delete "(H)" and insert "(I)".
Page 242, line 17, delete "(I)" and insert "(J)".
Page 242, line 22, delete "(H)." and insert "(I).".
Page 242, line 23, delete "(J)" and insert "(K)".
Page 261, line 13, strike "Commissioner to Administer - Other
Agencies."
Page 261, line 14, strike "such representatives as he may designate"
and insert "the commissioner's designees".
Page 261, line 17, strike "his" and insert "the commissioner's".
Page 272, line 4, strike "of mines and mine safety".
Page 272, line 25, strike "board" and insert "bureau".
Page 273, line 4, strike "his duties as he is so" and insert "the
practitioner's duties as".
Page 273, line 21, strike "he" and insert "the practitioner".
Page 273, line 31, strike "his name or certificate issued to him" and
insert "the practitioner's name or the practitioner's certificate
issued".
Page 273, line 33, strike "his" and insert "the individual's".
Page 276, line 28, strike "of mines and mine safety".
Page 305, line 4, delete "register" and insert "Register".
Page 305, line 13, delete "register." and insert "Register.".
Page 305, line 15, delete "register." and insert "Register.".
Page 307, line 4, after "the" insert "state".
Page 307, line 7, after "the" insert "state".
Page 319, line 33, delete "Self Certification" and insert
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

452
"Self-certification".
Page 320, line 42, delete "section" and insert "chapter".
Page 321, line 8, delete "section" and insert "chapter".
Page 352, line 25, delete "(a)(1) through (a)(2)" and insert "(b)(1)
through (b)(2)".
Page 418, line 1, delete "IC 25-4-3;" and insert "IC 25-4-3,".
Page 426, line 4, strike "commission's" and insert "authority's".
Page 426, line 35, strike "commission," and insert "authority,".
Page 426, line 38, strike "commission." and insert "authority.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
(Reference is to HB 1003 as printed January 27, 2026.)
BARTELS
_____
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1003 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 35, delete lines 22 through 28, begin a new line block indented
and insert:
"(1) Two (2) members of the house of representatives
appointed as follows:
(A) One (1) member appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives.
(B) One (1) member appointed by the minority leader of
the house of representatives.
(2) Two (2) members of the senate appointed as follows:
(A) One (1) member appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate.
(B) One (1) member appointed by the minority leader of
the senate.".
(Reference is to HB 1003 as printed January 27, 2026.)
HARRIS
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

453
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1003 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 422, delete lines 28 through 42.
Delete pages 423 through 426.
Page 427, delete lines 1 through 32.
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
(Reference is to HB 1003 as printed January 27, 2026.)
HARRIS
_____
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1003 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 169, delete line 42.
Page 170, delete lines 1 through 6, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 280. IC 16-18-2-37.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.3-2008,
SECTION 103, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 37.5. (a) "Board", for purposes of
IC 16-22-8, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-22-8-2.1.
(b) "Board", for purposes of IC 16-41-42.2, has the meaning set
forth in IC 16-41-42.2-1.".
Page 195, delete lines 19 through 42.
Delete pages 196 through 201.
Page 202, delete lines 1 through 39.
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
(Reference is to HB 1003 as printed January 27, 2026.)
CLERE
_____
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1003 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 37, delete lines 21 through 23, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92

454
"(e) A member of the public who serves on a subcommittee is
entitled to receive a minimum salary per diem and to
reimbursement for mileage and traveling expenses. Amounts
payable under this subsection must be paid:
(1) from appropriations made to the civil rights commission;
and
(2) in the same manner that a per diem, mileage, and traveling
expenses are paid to a member of the commission described
in section 9(a) of this chapter.".
(Reference is to HB 1003 as printed January 27, 2026.)
PRYOR
HB 1003—LS 6756/DI 92